
If possible, I'd like to add the "benchmark" and "committee" issues to our 
agenda for Tuesday's meeting.

Best,
Jeff

Howzabout 11 AM?

	Michael Etringer/ENRON@enronXgate
	07/31/2001 03:58 PM
		 
I can be available most of the day except 2:00-3:00.  Let me know if you have 
a set meeting schedule.

Hi Mike:
Parquet found me to talk about the QF ideas that you guys are bouncing 
around.  I'll be in Portland tomorrow.  You have some time to sit and discuss 
a bit?

Best,
Jeff

Sounds good.  See you at 11.

Best,
Jeff

	Michael Etringer/ENRON@enronXgate
	07/31/2001 04:26 PM
		 
Sounds good.  

I have reserved Mt. Bachelor conf room for 11:00 tomorrow.

Also, I am forwarding the invite to Alan Comnes, Jonalan Page ,Angela Cadena 
and Andrea Woodland.  They were a part of the discussion with Dave.

Howzabout 11 AM?

I can be available most of the day except 2:00-3:00.  Let me know if you have 
a set meeting schedule.

Hi Mike:
Parquet found me to talk about the QF ideas that you guys are bouncing 
around.  I'll be in Portland tomorrow.  You have some time to sit and discuss 
a bit?

Best,
Jeff

Bear with me.  I want to work on it through the evening.  Will make sure that 
it's out tonite, well in advance of tomorrow's 1 PM PDT conference call.

Best,
Jeff

please print out as overheads:

pages 1 (cover page), 5, and 6.

Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

Got 'em.  Thanks a million.

	Karen Denne/ENRON@enronXgate
	07/31/2001 05:25 PM
		 
You poor thing!  Did you get the faxes I sent?  Hang in there and holler if 
there's anything I can do to help. kd

Bear with me.  I want to work on it through the evening.  Will make sure that 
it's out tonite, well in advance of tomorrow's 1 PM PDT conference call.

Best,
Jeff

I've just been informed that I'm being switched to Outlook tonite, which 
means, I've been told, that I may not have access to my email later this 
evening.  If that holds, I'll email the draft to everyone first thing in the 
morning (hopefully by 8 AM Houston) time.  Otherwise, it'll land in your 
email later tonite.  My apologies for all the machinations.

Best,
Jeff

Man, there must be a lot of bad hair out your way with that kind of heat.

Thanks, Mike.

I prefer the $15,000/clean slate option.  For comments on the proposed 
decision and lobbying on this specific case, I'm willing to go straight 
hourly basis, but I will continue to request fixed prices going foward.  And 
worry not, it's not a Rick, Paul, Steffes issue.  I'm the headache.

All this said, and budget haggling aside, I'm sure you're aware that it's my 
view that 1) you do fantastic work and 2) it's great to work with you.

Best,
Jeff

	MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	10/10/2000 12:14 PM
		 
Jeff:

 You are quite correct about the facts of the arrangement.  However, between
the previous fixed price deal we did on the alternative settlement  and this
most recent agreement, we have lost $10,000 plus $12,500 for a total of
$22,500 on this one case.  In both situations, our hours were required by
the expanded press of the work in the hearing, and the uncertainty that is
involved in estimating the cost of hearing work is always difficult to deal
with.  As you will no doubt recall, on our last arrangement, I provided an
estimate that was much closer to what we have acutally spent on the GRI
hearing and briefing to date, which you then proceeded to propose paring on
an essentially arbitrary basis.  I unable to plead anything other than brain
disfunction as to why I agreed with your numbers, which I knew would be too
low.  So here we are.   In response to your proposal, I offer two
suggestions, one: we should split the difference between the estimate and
the actuals to date. That would mean you would pay $19,761 of the current
balance.  On that basis, we would prepare written comments and lobby for the
proposed decision when it comes out at no additional cost.  Two:  you pay
only the $15,000 that you propose ($13,500 plus the extra $1500), but we
clean the slate and start over on the file and any written comments or
lobbying on the proposed decision are paid for on a straight hourly basis.
I think either solution is fair to both sides.  We continue to absorb
losses, but get some additional compensation, you pay a bit more, but no
more than is fair, and there is still substantial commercial value in the
outcome of the case to warrant the regulatory expense.  If you want me to
explain the situation to Paul or Rick or Steffes in order to assist in
justifying the additional expense, I would be more than happy to do so.
Thank you, and I mean this sincerely, for considering our request for a
revision of the billing arrangements.  I am also willing to get together
today and talk about this face to face if you want.  Mike

Mike:

We'd talked about getting together to discuss the bills for the case.  We'd
originally agreed to a flat fee of $13, 500 (if memory serves) with a bonus
for coming in under the cap.  You've sent me bills (as of August 17
according to my records) for over $25,000.  As you recall, we had a very
lengthy discussion regarding the magnitude of the work associated with the
hearings and associated briefs.  I stressed that $13.5 was what I'd spend
and that we'd have to do the best we could within that constraint, which is
why I pressed for a flat fee arrangement at the outset.  With that in mind,
I believe that it's important to honor the arrangement.  However, in light
of the particular circumstances in this case, I'm willing to exceed the
previous arrangement for a total of $15,000, but can't go above that.  If
you'd like to discuss it further, I'd be happy to talk about it.  Let me
know.

Best,
Jeff

i have a finance midterm and will be at your place around 10 or 10:15, most 
likely.  be happy to chat.  i can't believe those fins.

	Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com>
	10/24/2000 11:47 AM
		 
It's about a new hire in my group and I wanted advice.  Easier to talk in
person though.  Maybe I'll see you tonight?

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT.COM
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

sorry, was traveling in LA yesterday.  what's up.

Greetings:

We are getting considerable traction with the idea of using a "benchmark" to 
judge utility purchases, similar in concept to what's in place on the gas 
side.  To oversimplify it:  

1) set the benchmark 
2) the utility buys for consumers and tries to beat the benchmark 
3) if (at the end of the year) the utility has beat the benchmark, it shares 
the profits with consumers; if the benchmark wins, the utility shares the 
losses with consumers 
4) the PUC performs no "after-the-fact" reasonableness; no "second-guessing"

California likes the idea and is now looking to Enron to come up with what 
the benchmark ought to be.  I talked to Calger a bit about it today and he 
suggested that I get together with you guys.  As always, time's short. Are 
you available on Monday?

Thanks,
Jeff

She was at attention, throughout the meeting.....

Thanks very much, Doug.

Apologies.  I've had to focus a bit on the finance project (and slogging 
through the case has been long and painful).  I'll have my responses to 1-3 
to Kim later this afternoon.

I didn't get an email on German GAAP from the professor.

Here's the exec sum draft that distributed hard copies of today.  it's going 
to change quite a bit based on today's work.  i'll try to turn it around by 
tomorrow for folks to look at.

well?

Ditto, Christine:  I've proposed some edits (for what they're worth) to 
Christine's fine work.  Kim, this case has left me brain dead ("compare the 
differences between the US Consitutation and the Magna Carta"---give me a 
break), so you may want to make sure that I haven't made any outrageous typos.

Best,
Jeff

	Kimberly Kupiecki <kkupiecki@arpartners.com>
	12/03/2000 10:37 PM
		 
Thanks Christine.

At 05:34 PM 12/3/00, Christine Piesco wrote:
>All,
>
>My answers are attached. I had thought the SF group was going to do 4-6
>before I received Kimberly's email and I had already started working on
>#4, so I have attached 1,2, and 4. I never got the professor's email on
>German GAAP, so my answers are based strictly on the text book.
>
>Christine
>
>Kimberly Kupiecki wrote:
>
> > Thanks Jimmy,
> >
> > I will take a look too - this case is a pain - what a chore comparing
> > obscure accounting rules.
> >
> > At 01:18 PM 12/2/00, JcjCal02@aol.com wrote:
> > >Dylan,
> > >Here's my quick shot at 4-6.  Feel free to modify as you see fit.
> > >Jimmy
> >
> > Kimberly Kupiecki
> > Director
> > A&R Partners
> > kkupiecki@arpartners.com
> > (650) 762 2800 main
> > (650) 762 2825 direct
> > fax (650) 762 2801
>

Kimberly Kupiecki
Director
A&R Partners
kkupiecki@arpartners.com
(650) 762 2800 main
(650) 762 2825 direct
fax (650) 762 2801

Greetings.  I have a conflict in the morning, but could join by conference 
calling beginning at 2 pm.  Is that possible.  If not, no big deal.  I, like 
Ralph, will catch up at the next meeting, and submit our ideas to Eve between 
now and then.  Let me know.  And I agree with Ralph re: staying focused on 
the most urgent issues.

Best,
Jeff

	RCavanagh@nrdc.org (Ralph Cavanagh)
	12/03/2000 07:30 PM
		 
Colleagues:  it turns out that at this hour I will be presiding over hearings 
in
Wyoming on the disposal of wastes from nuclear weapons (your condolences are
gratefully accepted).  I hope to join the next meeting, whenever it is.  My
advice remains what I said at our Dec. 1 meeting:  let's try to help the
legislature stay focused for now on the most urgent electricity issues that
absolutely must be addressed now:  forward contracting in the wholesale 
markets
to reduce customers' exposure to very high and volatile wholesale prices, and 
a
rate stabilization plan to deal with the issues surrounding this year's
wholesale costs.  If we can help narrow the immediate issues to those, and 
frame
the differences and decisions that remain, we'll have made a useful
contribution.

____________________Reply Separator____________________
Folks-
Ok, so you are the chosen ones......
Just to reiterate the meeting will be on 
Tuesday, December 5, 2000 
at 10:00 am
CA Chamber of Commerce 
1215 K Street, 14th Floor

Please give me a call if you have any questions or need further details.

Thanks,
Delaney 

Received: from mail07a.vwh1.net ([209.238.9.57]) by mail.nrdc.org with SMTP
  (IMA Internet Exchange 3.14) id 000A55F7; Fri, 1 Dec 2000 16:46:50 -0500
Received: from www.smithandkempton.com (208.55.14.51)
    by mail07a.vwh1.net (RS ver 1.0.58s) with SMTP id 021558702;
    Fri,  1 Dec 2000 16:48:05 -0500 (EST)

Very glad to here that things have gone well thus far.  I'm keeping my 
fingers crossed that the good luck continues!  If we don't talk between now 
and Thursday, we'll talk then.

Best,
Jeff

Not sure that you were on the email list for this.  Who's "Chris Fair?"  I 
don't think that's you.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/03/2000 08:41 PM
		
Here's the exec sum draft that distributed hard copies of today.  it's going 
to change quite a bit based on today's work.  i'll try to turn it around by 
tomorrow for folks to look at.

Great.  How's 2 PM today?

T&J:

I think at this point, any more changes, and we're going to blow our 
collective brains out.  But here's a question.  What interest rate did we use 
to calculate the interest the County receives on its "ending balance?"  Ted, 
you likely have a much better feel for this, but should it be something like 
the 3-month commercial paper rate, or something?  Did we use the 20-year 
treasury?  Again, I think we likely ought leave the thing along at this 
point, but thought I'd throw it out there.  Tell me that it doesn't matter, 
please.

And Ted, I thought we agreed that the interest rate was 5.720928373983039 
(kidding).

Jackie:  Good luck with Schwab.  I'll keep my fingers and toes crossed.

Best,
Jeff

I agree.  My expectations for the new "California Energy Solutions Group" are 
low, but willing to give it a go.  I'm planning on having the piece done by 
lunch---working on it now.  Attached is the first message;  there are 3 more 
messages, or so, which will only be (no more than) one more page.

New Yorker reviews Henry Moss in this week's issue.  Haven't read it yet.  
Did you guys like it?

Cameron, what's the name of the bandwidth exchange firm that you guys did 
your deal with?  Bandwidth Exchange?  (I"m brain dead.)

Got your message re: reverse auction all of the utility's demand.  Getting 
(interestingly complicated), though.  Now, the utilities want to create a 
"core/noncore" split in electricity, like in gas  (where large gas customers 
can't take commodity from the utility).  With a core/noncore split, Edison 
claims that QF contracts, nukes and other existing generation that it still 
holds is sufficient to meet "core" needs and it therefore may not need 
"contracts."  As you can imagine, large customers ain't clamoring to get 
thrown into the market as "noncore" customers right about now.  But they may 
find themselves without a choice.  I talked to Calger on Friday about reverse 
auction versus benchmark and I'll be talking to the traders about it this 
afternoon, and we'll be discussing further when Rick, Steffes et al are here 
tomorrow.  Will let you know where it goes.

Best,
Jeff

Talk to you then.

Sorry to bring it up again, but did we finally give up on UC/CSU?  Jessie 
Knight called me.  He's now the CEO of the Chamber of Commerce is S.D.  They 
plan to launch a campaign next week telling businesses in S.D. that the best 
thing to leave Sempra and switch to another provider.  ("Do you want the 
Legislature to manage your energy costs, or do you want to manage them 
yourself?")  

They want to give illustrative examples of folks who've switched and how well 
they're doing.  Ray McNally's sister is an extremely enthusiastic Enron 
customer and is going to contact the Chamber.  Be useful to have a business 
or two, or, UC/CSU.  Know it's a long shot, but figured it don't hurt to try.

Hi Michelle:

Guess who?  Just went into Ehronline and noticed that under vacation it sez 
that I'm entitled to 75 hours of vacation, and that I've used 48 hours, 
leaving 27.  I think that I'm actually entitled to more than 75 hours.  
Please tell me that I am.  Thanks very much.

Signed,
Desperately in need of vacation

Also, I clicked on deferral enrollment, and by-golly if I couldn't find the 
election form to download.  Am I just clueless, or is there another place 
that I need to look for it?  Thanks a million.

Sounds good.

	Paul Kaufman@ECT
	12/04/2000 12:57 PM
		
Our messages are getting a little mixed.   So .. to that end, can we have a 
day or two to:  (1) figure out whether we want a reverse auction, competitive 
bidding for PLR, a GCIM-like mechanism? and (2) rationalize the various 
mechanisms if want it all.  

I'm confident that we can rationalize all of these mechanism--e.g, we can 
limit the percentage of load put up for auction, etc. if we put our minds to 
it.  However, we haven't done so yet.  

We will discuss this tomorrow in SFO.  

thanks.  we should talk more about the perfect deal----if it's still 
something that you think is worth pursuing.

you didn't think henry moss was the cat's meow, did you?

I think that you're wondering is right on target.

	"Pocta, Robert M." <rmp@cpuc.ca.gov>
	12/04/2000 02:14 PM
		 
        I just received a notice of reassignment of the Gas Strategy OII from 
ALJ Andrea Biren to ALJ John Wong.  I wanted to also mention on the 
conference call that the PD did not have ALJ Biren's name on it, which led me 
to wonder how much of the PD was her writing.   
Here is the draft letter. We received no input from anyone.  So this 
represents our best shot.  Please edit mercilessly.   Please share only with 
CSA signatories.  Please comment by email or in person or by phone at the 
socalgas meeting, where I will distribute the letter and seek support. 
Thanks, Mike Day 

 <<X18828.DOC>> 

Hi:

Though I'll miss the meeting (if it's over by 2 PM), I'll be able to give you 
our ideas on the agenda items tomorrow.  If there's anything else, just let 
me know.

Best,
Jeff

Please keep this confidential at this point.  It's the agenda for the 
California "subcommittee" meeting on Tuesday that I mentioned in an earlier 
note.  They were unable to reschedule the meeting, which starts at 10 AM 
tomorrow, but we're on the subcommitte and  will have very good access to the 
final product, so I'm not too concerned about missing the "kickoff" meeting.  
Folks in California are really looking to us to help figure out item #2 
"forward contracting."  It would be very useful to discuss this outline 
tomorrow while we're all together.

Best,
Jeff
	Evelyn Kahl Elsesser <eke@aelaw.com>
	12/04/2000 02:38 PM
		 
Attached is a discussion agenda for tomorrow's CESG meeting at 10:00 at
the Chamber of Commerce.  Our objective for tomorrow is to move through
these and other issues you raise to outline a strawperson proposal for
forward contracting,  rate stabilization and TRA undercollections.  As
Ralph's email of Sunday evening observed,  if we manage to stay narrowly
focused on these issues in the short-run we may have an opportunity to
move the debate.

 - California Energy Solutions Group Agenda 120500.doc

good point.  if you'd like to include it in this draft, i'm fine with 
that---we certainly have been very vocal about the need to reform it.  
alternatively, we could discuss with the larger group tomorrow whether we 
weigh in heavily and if so what our exact message ought to be.  either way 
works for me, just let me know.

thanks.  my assumption is that, with respect to power plant siting and what 
we ought to do, you'll take the lead tomorrow.  does it make sense for now to 
leave a "placeholder' under that one and we can discuss further tomorrow, or 
would you prefer to put a specific item in there now, like "Legislature 
should revisit last session's streamlining bill?"

	Sandra McCubbin
	12/04/2000 03:15 PM
		
thoughts on messages..couldn't 1 and 2 be combined...the thinking in Sacto by 
people like Rod is to come up with a portolio approach for the utilities..do 
you think considering what has been going on at the CPUC that using natural 
gas deregulation is a good example, even though it is, but it may set off red 
flags.  I think that the action point on 3 should not focus on the CPUC as 
with the current climate it will never happen there..I assume it will have to 
be legislative action or the legislature ordering the CPUC to do it.As to 
streamlining of regulations, we should talk about a clean up of last year's 
legislation..particularly regarding union contracts...as to air quality, Sam 
is hesitant at this time, to raise air issues, while they are in serious 
negotiations with some of the projects, and he is afraid that the legislature 
could highlight these and they could go south..inter basin transfers is a 
good example..it can be done without legislation..having local permitting 
done concurrent with the CEC process is one important issue..in terms of 
actions, I would rather say that we are working closely with the CEC.  We may 
also want to mention Rod's idea of public private partnership and how we want 
to flesh that out..he is open to suggestions.

you're cash flow spreadsheet is freakin' awesome.  nice job.

plz call 415.782.7822.  jeff

can you please call me?  i'm trying to input the numbers from the spreadsheet 
into the exec sum, and have a question.  thanks.  415.782.7822.

Thank you so much.  Really sorry to bother you so much.

	Michelle Hargrave@ECT
	12/04/2000 04:19 PM
		
Hello My Favorite Problem Child!! (Just kidding!)

You truly only have 27 hrs remaining.  What is confusing is the "entitlement" 
piece.  What that means that as of 7/1/00 you had 75 hrs remaining when we 
moved to SAP.  You begain the year with 126 hrs, took 51 hrs prior to 7/1/00 
leaving you 75 hrs.  After 7/1/00 you took 48 hrs leaving you with 27 hrs as 
your balance.  Hope this helps!

Mary - can you help Jeff with his deferral enrollment?  He apparently does 
not have that piece on his eHRonline.  He is way out in San Francisco and a 
really nice guy - can you help him please???

Regards,
Michelle

Hi Michelle:

Guess who?  Just went into Ehronline and noticed that under vacation it sez 
that I'm entitled to 75 hours of vacation, and that I've used 48 hours, 
leaving 27.  I think that I'm actually entitled to more than 75 hours.  
Please tell me that I am.  Thanks very much.

Signed,
Desperately in need of vacation

Also, I clicked on deferral enrollment, and by-golly if I couldn't find the 
election form to download.  Am I just clueless, or is there another place 
that I need to look for it?  Thanks a million.

Just had a long internal meeting.  Over the next 24 hours, we're going to try 
to simulate on California a potential solution we devised in the meeting.  No 
sense in offering something up if we don't know what the numbers look like, 
at least in a "ball park" sense.   I should be able to get you something 
fairly concrete by end of day tomorrow or first thing Wednesday.  That work?  
Have fun tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

That sounds like a very reasonable way to proceed.

	Evelyn Kahl Elsesser <eke@aelaw.com>
	12/04/2000 05:39 PM
		 
I plan to start at 10: 00 with those present.   Obviously we'll revisit issues
after tomorrow, so anyone who isn't there can express their views later... but
I'm inclined to make as much progress as we can rather than to wait for a full
quorum.

Mike Florio wrote:

> I am flexible, but would like to know when the meeting will actually start,
> since I'm driving up from Oaktown.  And I believe Bill Marcus and I are
> still meeting with Edison afterward, right John Fielder??
>
> At 09:51 AM 12/4/2000 -0800, Tony Braun wrote:
> >Madame Chair Elsesser:
> >
> >It appears you may not have a quorum.  I too have a conference call at 
10:00
> >a.m.  I hope to be able to make it over to the Commitee around 11:00-11:30
> >a.m.
> >
> >Thank you for your patience.
> >
> >Tony Braun
> >Braun & Associates, P.C.
> >915 L Street
> >Suite 1460
> >Sacramento, California 95814
> >(916) 441-1733
> >(916) 441-4053 (facsimile)
> >braun@braunlegal.com
> >
> >Counsel to CMUA
> >
> >-----Original Message-----

Attached is a very rough draft of solutions/messages for discussion at 
tomorrow's meeting.  I'll bring hard copies to the meeting.

Ok.  Here they are.  On exhibit A, I didn't touch numbers are exhibit #s.  
Also, I deleted CAPM, since we ain't got anything yet.  And I deleted the 
part that said "ticket sales taxes don't matter much," because now that we 
have the numbers they could matter, cuz it's really tight between bond 
payments and tax revs.  Anyway, that's it.  I checked and doubled checked the 
numbers and exihibit #s in the exec sum, but you may want to give one last 
peek.  Thanks SO much for pulling it together.

Best,
Jeff

Hi Mary:
Well, the problem is likely just that I'm dense.  I log in, click on deferral 
and find a description of what one needs to do (i.e., fill out the form), but 
I've surfed around the site a bit and can't seem to find the form.  Am I 
(probably) missing something?  Thanks a bunch.

Best,
Jeff

many thanks, mary.  and michelle, i'm indebted, as always.  if you don't hear 
from me, that means all went well.

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/04/2000 06:57 PM
		 
Attached is a very rough draft of solutions/messages for discussion at 
tomorrow's meeting.  I'll bring hard copies to the meeting.

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/05/2000 02:12 AM
		
Ok.  Here they are.  On exhibit A, I didn't touch numbers are exhibit #s.  
Also, I deleted CAPM, since we ain't got anything yet.  And I deleted the 
part that said "ticket sales taxes don't matter much," because now that we 
have the numbers they could matter, cuz it's really tight between bond 
payments and tax revs.  Anyway, that's it.  I checked and doubled checked the 
numbers and exihibit #s in the exec sum, but you may want to give one last 
peek.  Thanks SO much for pulling it together.

Best,
Jeff

Available Wednesday but not Tuesday.  Happy holiday to all.

	Alan Comnes@ECT
	12/06/2000 03:44 PM
		 
Jeff,

Please pass this note onto whomever on the call asked the question "what 
would Enron be paid if there was an electricity curtailment?"

I talked with staff on the West Desk and confirmed that if there is an 
unscheduled electricity curtailment (i.e., rolling or widespread blackout) 
power scheduled by EES to a retail customer would still flow, assuming it had 
been prescheduled.  EPMI (acting as EES's scheduling coordinator, or SC) 
would be paid the ISO decremental  (dec) price for that power.  EPMI would 
pass that revenue (along with the cost of supplying that power) onto EES.  

If the blackout continued for some time (i.e., days), presumably EES would 
adjust its preschedule and there would be no net sales into the ISO.

Whether the retail customer gets a payment for being curtailed depends 
completely on the contract between EES and the customer.  Presumably the 
force majure provisions of the contract would protect EES from utility 
blackouts.

Alan Comnes

I'm on your man.  What do you need?

11 AM PST.  I'll try to be on but can't promise.

	Karen Denne
	12/07/2000 09:37 AM
		
Is it 11 a.m. PST or central?  I've got a conflict around 11 a.m. Houston 
time.  If it's 11 a.m. PST, I can do it.  Let me know.  thx. kd

Susan J Mara
12/07/2000 08:00 AM
I'll be in the air.  Can one of you call in?
	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	12/06/2000 01:54 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
Greetings:

My apologies for the delay in sending out this message.

We will be holding a PR call tomorrow at 11:00 a.m. to discuss this week's
session as well as ongoing PR efforts responsive to recent announcements and
what we are doing to move forward.

Agenda Includes:

o McNally/Temple Update/Upcoming issues

o Edson/Modisette Update/upcoming issues

o Upcoming Meetings
o Coalition Building

The call in number is 888-232-0365
Pass code:   111756

Let me know if you want to add anything to the rough agenda.
Thanks!

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Can we have a quick call (i.e., no more than 30 minutes) at 9 AM (PST) on 
Monday to discuss? 

	Alan Comnes@ECT
	12/07/2000 03:07 AM
		
The Joskow/Kahn paper raises two issues:  price above cost  and witholding.  

Enron obviously has concerns with the "price above cost" analysis.  I drafted 
some specific concerns and put them into a draft to Enron's reponse to Hoeker 
Question 1.  Although the detail was dropped in the final draft, the basic 
technical concerns were laid out there. To really rebut Joskow/Kahn would 
take considerable work.  Jeff D's idea was to write a paper that raised 
issues and indicated how complicated a "correct" response would  be.

The Joskow/Kahn withholding section has recieved criticism from the ISO so I 
am not sure Enron needs to respond to that.

I think my bottom line now is that the debate at FERC will soon be over or 
enter a new stage on the 13th.  As far as how a response would help us in 
California, I think requires a discussion with Jeff.

Alan

Alan --

Before we bring in Seabron Adamson to do some analysis, I'd like your read of 
the Joskow and Hogan papers.   When we have our understanding straight, let's 
talk.

Jim

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	11/30/2000 11:49 AM
		 
FYI. In bizarre times, help can sometimes come from bizarre places.  Granted, 
we're likely to disagree strongly with Hogan's continued obsession with 
Poolco, but the discussion in his paper regarding market power may be 
helpful---I've read the Joskow paper, but haven't yet had a chance to review 
the Hogan piece.  

Steve and I discussed the need to do a focused assessment of the Joskow/Kahn 
"analysis"  (remember it's Ed Kahn, not Alfred Kahn).  Seems that it would be 
very useful to fold into that analysis any useful stuff on market power 
included in the paper done by Hogan & Co.  If, in the end, there ain't 
nothing useful, so be it.  But seems like there's little downside to 
exploring it.

Jim, my understanding is that Alan is already working with the fundamentals 
folks on the Portland desk to deconstruct the Joskow paper.  Might want to 
include the Hogan paper in those discussions and might also be useful to pull 
Seabron Adamson into the thinking, too.  Ultimately, may be preferable to 
have any assessment of Joskow and/or Hogan to come from economists, rather 
than directly from us. 

Best,
Jeff
	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	11/30/2000 11:29 AM
		 
Has FERC Gone Far Enough in California?
The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission isn't going far enough in its 
attempt to reform the California wholesale electric market, according to a 
paper by three prominent economists done for San Diego Gas and Electric. The 
paper by John D. Chandley, Scott M. Harvey, and William W. Hogan argues that 
FERC should first end the artificial separation that divides the California 
Power Exchange and the California Independent System Operator, rather than 
worrying about the governance of the two institutions.
"The change in governance may help," says the paper - "Electricity Market 
Reform in California" - "but it is not likely to be decisive in the near 
term. Explicit guidance from the commission regarding the nature and 
trajectory of reforms will be essential if market reform is to be 
accomplished within an acceptable time frame." Hogan, of the Kennedy School 
of Government, has been writing since 1995 in opposition to California's 
market separation.
Also, argues the paper, freeing the California utilities to engage in forward 
contracting is no panacea. "The expectation that merely allowing utilities to 
participate in forward contracting necessarily would be the solution to high 
prices is problematic and not supported by the commission's staff report," 
says the analysis, adding that "putting pressure on buyers to sign contracts 
in the present environment may make things worse." If the underlying problem 
in California is high cost and low capacity, requiring forward contracting 
could harm not only California but also the entire Western U.S. electric 
system.
FERC's $150 so-called "soft cap" is a wild card that has the three economists 
scratching their heads. "It does not appear in the staff report and there is 
little critical analysis of their implications, other than the discussion of 
Commissioner [Curt] Hebert." If the intent of the soft cap is to move toward 
cost justification for bids above $150/MWh, then FERC is headed into an 
administrative morass "that would rival those under wellhead price controls 
in the natural gas industry."
If, on the other hand, the soft cap is "truly soft" and would only require 
some paper work at FERC and the possibility of a refund if the price is 
eventually deemed not just and reasonable, "there might be little impact on 
consumer prices (particularly if the principal sources of those high prices 
are high costs and regional capacity shortages rather than the exercise of 
market power). Even so, the proposal might serve to deter entry and new 
investments, thus combining the worst of both worlds, high consumer prices 
and little or no new investment."
FERC's proposed order in California also demonstrates confusion about just 
what constitutes market power. The paper cites the proposed order's lawyerly, 
obfuscatory conclusion that "while this record does not support findings of 
specific exercises of market power, and while we are not able to reach 
definite conclusions about the actions of individual sellers, there is clear 
evidence that in California market structure and rules provide the 
opportunity for sellers to exercise market power when supply is tight and can 
result in unjust and unreasonable rates under the [Federal Power Act]." The 
economists note, "In this regard, the debate is confused because we are 
dancing around the words where the truth may be hard to face."
In the case of California, say the economists, there is no evidence of market 
power. Even the practice of generators avoiding the day-ahead market in favor 
of the real-time market "is a response to bad market design and pricing 
incentives (including price caps), but does not demonstrate the exercise of 
market power." Nor is bidding above marginal cost necessarily an exercise of 
market power, they add. "The distinction between direct marginal cost and 
opportunity cost is sometimes lost in the discussion. Hence, a competitive 
bidder whose direct cost of generation is $40 but who could sell the same 
energy outside California for $100 should bid no less than $100. This would 
not be an exercise of market power."

you getting this stuff?
	Joe Ronan <JoeR@calpine.com>
	12/06/2000 11:45 PM
		 
Thanks, Kelli. In my opinion, this ad captures our message very well. Thanks
for responding so quickly.

IEP Team,
Attached is a revised January CalJournal ad for your review. Based on
the group's comments, which were significant, we have developed an
entirely new ad. However, since the deadline has not changed (art is
still due today), we need your feedback asap. Please e-mail or call me
at 916-447-8186 as soon as possible with any comments. If we do not hear
from you, we will assume you are fine with the ad as is. Thank you for
all of your help.
Kelli

will be at both meetings and will have detailed proposals beforehand.  we 
continue to work on procurement piece and have reached teh same conclusion as 
you in your note---need something to implement now, as well as a "longer" 
term solution to IOU procurement.  you'll be hearing from me.

	Evelyn Kahl Elsesser <eke@aelaw.com>
	12/06/2000 03:44 PM
		 
We have scheduled a telephone conference of the CESG on Tuesday, December 
12th at 12:00 noon.  The call-in number will be 1.800.377.4827, confirmation 
number 7680189.  I have scheduled 15 lines for 1.5 hours.  We have also 
scheduled a meeting  of the group in Sacramento on Friday, December 15th, at 
10:00 at the Chamber of Commerce's office. 
In the interim, we should all be working toward building the strawpaper 
outlined in yesterday's agenda.  I plan to complete an outline of what we did 
manage to agree to (or identify as proposals) yesterday by the end of 
Friday.  Other responsibilities include: 
preparation by SCE, AES, Enron and the PX of proposals for a "benchmark" 
against which, if necessary, individual purchases by the utility could be 
measured for the next 1-2 years;  proposals for longer term benchmarks for 
measuring the reasonableness of the utility portfolio would be helpful, but 
we need to focus on the short-run first.  Also, throw out ideas on tolerance 
bands, including a way to expand/contract the band with changes in 
volatility, and risk/reward mechanisms for utility shareholders.
proposals by SCE, AES and the PX (and any others with ideas) regarding how we 
can address in an overall solution the risk perceived by the utility of 
customer attrition from the utility portfolio (e.g., term commitments, two 
portfolios or a bifurcated single portfolio, etc.);
a proposal from SCE and CLECA regarding how to commoditize the utility 
generating assets (assuming retention of the entitlement to the generation) 
and allocate those assets to small/large customers as the foundational supply 
component of two portfolios (overlaying longer term contracts in the small 
customer portfolio and potentially shorter and medium term contracts in the 
large customer portfolio).
proposals for mechanisms to provide customers with some ability to understand 
the overall cost of utility procurement for comparison with ESP fixed price 
contracts (e.g.,  publication of "actual" to date on a monthly basis, 
forecast of fixed price, fixed price product offering).
Obviously, any other ideas you have will be welcomed. 
We failed to make much progress on the design for any stabilized rate or TRA 
undercollections. Consider more carefully (1) whether a "residual" (SCE) or 
stand-alone (PG&E) calculation for procurement costs would best serve your 
interests and (2) what level of increase could be tolerated effective early 
2001.  Also consider structural proposals for addressing the TRA 
undercollections prior to the end of the rate freeze. 
Our goal should be to close on a structure, with as many details as possible, 
by Friday, December 15.  Please call me for any reason that will help us move 
this along. 
  
 

yes, thank you.  see you tonite!

	Kelli Norton <knorton@mcnallytemple.com>
	12/06/2000 04:26 PM
	Please respond to knorton
		 
IEP Team,
Attached is a revised January CalJournal ad for your review. Based on
the group's comments, which were significant, we have developed an
entirely new ad. However, since the deadline has not changed (art is
still due today), we need your feedback asap. Please e-mail or call me
at 916-447-8186 as soon as possible with any comments. If we do not hear
from you, we will assume you are fine with the ad as is. Thank you for
all of your help.
Kelli

 - Cal Journal Ad (Series #1).pdf

Folks:  

The "subcommittee" I've referenced that's trying to come up with a solution 
to California's train wreck is moving very quickly.  The group's shooting to 
have a first cut at a "straw person" proposal sketched out by end of next 
week.  The group's meeting on Tuesday to continue to bounce around ideas.  

I'd like to try to have an internal call on Monday at either 10 AM (PST) or 
3  PM (PST) to pin down at least a vaguely detailed conceptual framework that 
I can propose to the subcommittee on Tuesday.  The agenda items for the 
internal meeting are:

Finalize proposal for benchmark(s) for utility procurement.  
Goal: increase utility willingness to enter into forward contracts by 
replacing PUC after-the-fact "reasonableness" review with a benchmark. (Been 
working the Portland desk on a "portfolio benchmark" concept.)

Determine our view of how to treat term contracts w.r.t. the PX credit, i.e., 
should those contracts be disclosed to the market, or should PUC keep them 
confidential, calculate the PX credit behind closed doors, and publish the 
credit ex poste?  The PX credit depends on the overall utility portfolio, not 
just the PX price.

Let me know if 10 AM or 3 PM (PST) works better.

Harry:  I'll assume that you'll contact the folks from EES that need to 
participate.

Best,
Jeff

Hi Gavin:

Could you do me a favor (know you're busy).  Someone told me that there's an 
article in last Thursday's? NYT blaming the California fiasco on former 
California Commissioner Dan Fessler, who was responsible (a few years back) 
for putting in place the structure we have here.  Have you seen it?  If so 
could you forward?  If not, could you try and find it and forward.  Very much 
appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

Mark:
I don't know how any "concerns" I may have raised reached you, but rest 
assured that there are no worries from my end.  

I saw the piece on the local news.  Vacar's on a one-person crusade to kill 
capitalism, that's certain.  It was very clear that you were taken horribly 
out of context, and they did you a great disservice.  

Just between us chickens, it did come up as if you were implying that there's 
some reasonable likelihood that manipulation's the culprit.  You can imagine 
just how sensitive we are to that issue.  But I don't think that you should 
sweat it.  In a very brief conversation with Mike Day I mentioned the piece 
and that they got you responding to manipulation (i.e., "when'd you stop 
beating your wife) on camera.  So agitated was I that I didn't even bother to 
bring it up with Herr Fawcett.  So again, thanks much for the note, but no 
big deal.

Now for my two cents:

Question:  "what's the problem?"  answer:  "very bad state energy 
policy---and here are the five big regulatory problems standing in the way of 
a solution for California....."  

"market manipulation?  well, those charges are raised in every industry, 
whenever prices spike.  the lion's share of the time, it turns out to be 
market fundamentals."

Appreciate your note.  Thanks.

Jeff

perhaps you were a little strong in relaying my concerns to someone?
	mbaldwin@igservice.com
	12/07/2000 12:19 PM
		 
Jeff,

It has come to my attention that you were concern by some of my comments
recently televised on CH. 2. Let me try to  fill in the blanks. First, the
interview lasted almost 45 minutes of actual camera time. Of course, the
news media took their usually advantage of editing "for their agenda" what
they wanted. The risk you take in any situation like this. During the course
of the interview, I made it quite clear that it would be a mistake to lay
California's current natural gas problems on the doorstep of deregulation.
No one should question I am strongly in favor of gas deregulation in the
state.

On a more direct point, Mr. Vacar was clearly trying to get me to confirm
what he had already been told before my interview that the culprit here was
Enron Online. I disagreed with that conclusion yesterday and this morning.
About 1/2 hour ago, Mr. Vacar phone me to presumably find out what natural
gas prices where doing in the spot market. He quickly brought the
conversation back to Enron Online. I told him that it would be a mistake to
blame these current day prices on Enron Online. While it is convenient for
some to look for a simple singular answer or someone to blame, the answer
isn't Enron Online. He went on to reason that Enron is such a large energy
company they could conceivably "do this". I responded that would also be a
mistake. I acknowledged Enron as a large player but in no way capable of
running up California Gas prices because of some "perceived dominance".

Yesterday, I shared my concern that Mr. Vacar was directing his inquiries
toward Enron with Mr. Fawcett. Obviously , I reserve my right to call them
like I see them independent from anyone of my clients own agendas and will
continue to do so. The source of potential allegations against Enron isn't
me. If I can clarify anything else let me know.

Mark, IGS

	Roger Yang@EES
	12/07/2000 12:36 PM
		 
In a non-descriptive article in today's SF Chronicle, an article reports on 
some TURN plan to basically take the assets retained by the utilities and use 
the assets to deliver 5 cent energy to customers.  I imagine that TURN's plan 
only covers small customers because there is obviously not enough capacity 
for all customers.  Whereas, we have seen the utility's attempts to get the 
assets at below market prices in the past, it looks like TURN may be trying 
to maneuver to get the assets below market for its customers.  This leaves 
either the C&I or utility shareholders holding the bag for undercollections.  
I am sure that this is just some posturing, but CLECA/CMTA needs to be on top 
of this issue so that they don't get stuck.  It would be a double whammy for 
CLECA/CMTA customers, because not only would they see the higher market 
prices, but would have to bear a burden of undercollections that are not 
offset by an appropriate valuation of retained assets.

We will need Government Affairs to stay on top of this issue for us.

Roger

	Jennifer Rudolph@EES
	12/07/2000 12:57 PM
		 
Per the conference call here is the requested article.

Beth

congratulations?  condolences?  anyway, let's talk.  today's bad.  you in 
tomorrow?

Thanks very much Dave.  We've got the proposal (and we've got a few issues 
with it).  

Rog:
I know that you're swamped managing EES' book, etc.  So I'd be happy to fill 
Dave in on EES' view of CLECA's proposal, the negotiations that are underway 
generally, and what we're cooking up to try to help the negotitations along.  
Just let me know.    

Also, Dave, be happy to talk to Hanson, and fill them in one what's going on 
out there if that would be useful.

Jeff

	David Parquet@ECT
	12/07/2000 03:32 PM
		 
I got this from Hanson.  Please advise as to which points we agree with and 
which we disagree with.  I want to know because I talk to this guy quite a 
bit and EES and ENA are trying to do a deal with him.  I probably will have 
several opportunities to influence him, if necessary.  Barbara Barkovich and 
Bill Booth probably had a big hand in developing this doc.

Any follow up necessary?  
	"Bouse, Earl" <EBouse@hansonaggwest.com>
	12/07/2000 09:29 AM
		 
Greetings:

Attached for your information is the subject "solution" document. We have 
passed this on to the Governor's staff and Assembly Member Rod Wright has 
included it in his briefing book.

<<CLECA Solutions to Electrical Crisis.doc>> 

!?????? Earl F. Bouse, Jr.

??????? Hanson Aggregates Mid-Pacific 

??????? Hanson Permanente Cement

_??????(925) 426-4084

'?????? (925) 426-4060

??????? ebouse@hansonaggwest.com

??????? earlbouse@aol.com

 - CLECA Solutions to Electrical Crisis.doc

sorry for the delay.  be great to catch up, but with all this energy mess, 
i've had to cancel going, unfortunately.  hope you're well.

Best,
Jeff

fyi.  most responses back have been for 3 pm (from the traders).  also, give 
dennis a call.  he's polling folks to get views on what ferc's going to do on 
the 13th.  best, jeff

you bet.  i'm at 415.782.7822.

Thank you very much for the info.

	Anita Taff-Rice <anitatr@earthlink.net>
	12/07/2000 07:11 PM
		 
PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY CLIENT COMMUNICATIONS

Jeff, we wanted to make sure you were aware that the CPUC approved an
alternate decision from Loretta Lynch today that limits the ability of
Edison (CLEC light) to use leased facilities from other providers as an
alternative to getting CEQA approval and building its own facilities.
Upon initial review, it doesn't appear that the ruling would preclude
the arrangement we discussed, in which Enron would purchase SERVICE
(which could be dark fiber) from a carrier with CEQA authority even
though provision of the service would require building new facilities.
I'd like to wait until I see the final version of the decision before
giving you a more definite interpretation, but I wanted to make sure you
were aware of this development until then.  Please call if you have any
immediate questions.

Here's an attempt at being frank about the legislation without jeopardizing 
our relationships or commercial prospects.

Overall, we respect the effort, but California failed to get the ball over 
the goal line:

On Siting
Intentionally or not, California has designed power plant siting laws that 
make it excruciatingly difficult to construct power plants in the state.  
Folks seem to have lost sight of the need to balance growth and environmental 
quality in California.
That's why nothing's been built in the state for a decade and developers are 
going outside the state to build power plants. 
Tinkering around the edges won't help; and (with all due respect) the 
legislation passed yesterday tinkers.
Real reform is required if California hopes to build the supply necessary to 
keep pace with Silicon Valley and a high tech culture and tame the price 
spikes.
If developers continue to have to navigate through a maze of a half a 
dozen--or more--state and local agencies, California's supply problems will 
continue, or worsen.
California needs real, one-stop shopping and it needs it now.

On the retail price cap
They don't work (we've already developed all the arguments, so I won't repeat 
them hear)
The press has already reported that the measure the Legislature passed simply 
puts off the day of reckoning.
It's like using your credit card--eventually they're going to knock on your 
door to collect.
Now, families and businesses will have a hard time managing their budgets 
because they can't gauge the size of the balloon payment they'll face a 
couple of years down the road.
So San Diegans who continue to take service from SDG&E will pay the same 
amount, but the cap will remove the powerful incentive prices create to use 
electricity wisely.
There's a better answer:
Instead of urging consumers not to switch, encourage customers to sign with 
another retail provider.  
Clearly, the biggest mistake California made was The press and decision 
makers should spend more time talking to folks who signed fixed price deals 
with companies like Enron.  But for the press reports, they hardly know 
there's a crisis.

FYI.  Per my voice message to you yesterday.
=09"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
=0912/08/2000 09:39 AM
=09=09=20

For those WPTF members who are interested in following?the  interruptible O=
II=20
at the CPUC, ALJ Mattson issued a ruling yesterday concerning  future filin=
gs=20
and the scope of the matters to be covered in them.
?
This ruling clarifies that respondents and parties should not delay making =
=20
proposals on curtailment and other issues.? He directs that, "respondents =
=20
and parties should, within seven days of the date of this ruling, file and=
=20
serve  proposals that address each of the four items in Ordering Paragraph =
1=20
of the  Rulemaking, including curtailment issues:
(a)? "the role of customers on  a utility=01,s interruptible tariffs to ens=
ure=20
reliable and reasonably-priced  electric service in California, especially=
=20
for the Summer of 2001;
(b)?  coordinate the variety of interruptible, curtailable and demand=20
responsiveness  programs being offered and proposed in California;=20
(c)? identify  alternative means for customers to reduce their energy usage=
=20
during periods of  peak demand; and=20
(d)? "to revise and update the Commission=01,s priorities  for curtailing=
=20
customers during times of energy shortages."? (R.00-10-002,  Ordering=20
Paragraph 1, page 15.)?=20
Further, to the extent proposals filed  December 4, 2000 do not address=20
improved curtailment notification measures,  respondents and parties may fi=
le=20
and serve additional proposals.? For  example, respondents and parties may=
=20
address the feasibility, desirability and  cost of creating phone banks or=
=20
using electronic mail to notify customers before  curtailments (e.g., rolli=
ng=20
blackouts).? Comments on proposals filed and  served seven days from today=
=20
may be filed and served within seven days after  proposals are filed."
?
A copy of the ruling is attached for your information.
?
Dan
Received: from dymwsm08.mailwatch.com by ArterHadden.com; Thu, 07 Dec 2000=
=20
19:00:13 -0500
Received: from dymw0114.mailwatch.com (dymw0114.allegro.net [204.253.83.107=
])=20
by dymwsm08.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id eB800I807848 for=20
<douglass@arterhadden.com>; Thu, 7 Dec 2000 19:00:18 -0500
Received: from 204.253.83.34 by dymw0114.mailwatch.com with SMTP (=20
WorldSecure Server SMTP Relay(WSS) v4.3); Thu, 07 Dec 00 19:00:06 -0500
X-Server-Uuid: 17085090-7ecb-11d4-ba0b-00508bd371a2
Received: from [134.186.70.194] (nic.cpuc.ca.gov [162.15.7.1]) by=20
dymwsm12.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id eB8004e29390 for=20
<douglass@arterhadden.com>; Thu, 7 Dec 2000 19:00:04 -0500
Received: from nic.cpuc.ca.gov by [134.186.70.194] via smtpd (for=20
mail.mailwatch.com [204.253.83.157]) with SMTP; 7 Dec 2000 23:58:47 UT
Received: from [162.15.7.254] (exchserver1 [162.15.5.63]) by nic.cpuc.ca.go=
v=20
(8.9.3+Sun/8.9.1) with SMTP id PAA16921; Thu, 7 Dec 2000 15:56:18 -0800 (PS=
T)
Received: from no.name.available by [162.15.7.254] via smtpd (for=20
nic.cpuc.ca.gov [162.15.7.1]) with SMTP; 7 Dec 2000 23:57:35 UT
Received: by EXCHSERVER1 with Internet Mail Service (5.5.2650.21) id=20
<YNG1RV17>; Thu, 7 Dec 2000 15:58:53 -0800

DATE:?? December 7, 2000

TO:???? ??????? Service List in R.00-10-002

FROM:?? Burton W. Mattson
??????? ??????? Administrative Law Judge

Please find attached below a ruling in R.00-10-002.?=20

For clarification, the additional proposals and comments covered therein ma=
y=20
be as broad as any party wishes, but are intended to address Summer 2001.?=
=20

?=20
 - CPUC01-#85215-v1-R0010002_Mattson_Ruling.DOC

Distributed Power: The Next Big Investment?
 
With today's electricity demand expanding beyond the reach of available 
supply, and nationwide electric deregulation efforts providing inconsistent 
results, distributed power just may be the next big thing, according to Bear 
Stearns analyst Robert Winters. 

With technology-laden, electricity-hungry companies popping up every time you 
turn around, and blackouts and brownouts occurring more frequently as large 
power grids are becoming less reliable, the analyst points towards 
distributed energy services as a possible solution, and maybe the "next big 
investment opportunity for the coming decade." In Winters' 250 page report, 
"Distributed Energy Services-The World's Power and Transportation Industries: 
Set for a Revolution-Part 2," he examines technologies and companies within 
the distributed energy services sector that might be able to take advantage 
of the current situation. 

"Thanks to major technological advances and energy deregulation, a wave of 
new investment in the power industry has just begun. We believe that this 
coming era in the power industry could resemble the wave of investments which 
flooded into the telecommunications industry following the breakup of AT&T in 
the early 1980's," said Winters. 

"Companies and municipalities need to find ways to ensure the availability of 
high quality, reliable power," added Winters. According to his research, 
microturbines are the best positioned of the "new" technologies that would be 
able to have an immediate impact on electric generation. 

He based his recommendation on the fact that microturbines are small, quiet, 
efficient and very versatile. "They can be used as a main power source, a 
back-up power source or as an alternative when there is a spike in 
traditional energy prices," the analyst said. "Microturbines can also be used 
in remote locations, including developing countries, that do not have access 
to electricity." Another attractive feature of microturbines is their fuel 
requirements. The units often use natural gas, but can also use several other 
fuels as well. 

In the study, the analyst also examined fuel cells, flywheel technology, and 
existing reciprocating engines technologies such as diesel engines and 
Stirling engines, which he noted are enjoying a comeback. 

In addition to the report, Winters initiated coverage on two distributed 
energy companies. He labeled Active Power, a company that is pioneering 
flywheel technology, as a "buy" and Capstone Turbine Corp., a leading 
manufacturer of microturbines, as "attractive." The companies are in addition 
to two fuel cell companies he currently follows. Ballard Power is currently a 
buy, and Plug Power is rated neutral. 

Thanks very much for the info, Hedy. 

Folks:

As you recall from out meeting on Tuesday, we decided that I'd pull together 
a brief description of our key priorities and the actions underway to achieve 
them.  The status report will be updated weekly.  We'll use the weekly update 
as an important internal communication tool to keep folks abreast of 
activities and developments in CA.  It will also serve as a a tool to help 
identify the need to modify our priorities and/or actions in light of 
ever-changing circumstances.   

We were going to try to get the first report out this week, but with the 
meeting in Houston, Sue's doctor appt and Karen's meetings with Marathon, 
we'll get the first one out Monday.

My notes suggest that (today's) key priorities---understanding that 
everything's subject to change on a daily basis---are: 
1. ENA
No refunds
End wholesale price caps as soon as possible
Get forward markets working in CA
Expedite plant siting

2. EES
No early roll of/maintain the rate freeze (till ~01/02)
Maintain current PX credit framework (till ~01/02)

Please forward to me the actions underway and planned in the area for which 
you've been designated "lead."  Given how fluid things are, It seems prudent 
to limit "planned" items to those we've got planned for the next 2-4 weeks.  

I'll compile for distribution by COB Monday.    My notes show the following 
leads:

Legislative--Sandi
PR--Karen
FERC-Sue
PUC--Jeff/Sue
Miscellaneous (e.g., AB 1890 "subcommittee)--Jeff

Also please let me know if my notes w.r.t. leads is consistent with yours.

Thanks very much and have a great weekend.

Best,
Jeff

Rick, Jim, Harry:

You will have the first status report for California by COB on Monday.  We 
will update that report weekly. If there's anything you need between now and 
Monday, please let me know.  Have a good weekend.

Best,
Jeff

FYI:  Yesterday, the California PUC rejected the utilities request to, among 
other things, raise rates and end the rate freeze.  The status quo prevails, 
at least for now.

Well, you two really raised the bar with that celebration.  It was just 
fantastic.  Prentice said it's the best birthday she's ever had.  Thanks so 
much for everything.  It was really neat.

	Dasovichd@aol.com
	12/10/2000 04:39 PM
		 
Merry Christmas to all!

Thanks to Jeff for picking the names.
The list is below; buyer on the left, recipient is on the right. Now our 
shopping can begin....

Mom     buys for        Debbie
Jeff                           Mike
Prentice                    Steve
Robert                      Charry
Dad                          Nancy
Steve                        Robert
Nancy                       Jeff
Charry                       Prentice
Mike                         Mom
Debbie                      Dad

Jeff, please forward this to Prentice.  I will call Mom and Dad.  

Finally, Mike and I are hosting Christmas Day at our house with a big assist 
from Jeff on the dinner preparation.  I will probably do it the same way we 
do Thanksgiving at Steve and Charry's by asking each of you to bring/make 
something.  We are looking forward to having you all here.

Debbie

The votes have been counted (kidding), and the call will take place today at 
3 PM PST.  Call-in number to follow.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/07/2000 12:13 PM
		
Folks:  

The "subcommittee" I've referenced that's trying to come up with a solution 
to California's train wreck is moving very quickly.  The group's shooting to 
have a first cut at a "straw person" proposal sketched out by end of next 
week.  The group's meeting on Tuesday to continue to bounce around ideas.  

I'd like to try to have an internal call on Monday at either 10 AM (PST) or 
3  PM (PST) to pin down at least a vaguely detailed conceptual framework that 
I can propose to the subcommittee on Tuesday.  The agenda items for the 
internal meeting are:

Finalize proposal for benchmark(s) for utility procurement.  
Goal: increase utility willingness to enter into forward contracts by 
replacing PUC after-the-fact "reasonableness" review with a benchmark. (Been 
working the Portland desk on a "portfolio benchmark" concept.)

Determine our view of how to treat term contracts w.r.t. the PX credit, i.e., 
should those contracts be disclosed to the market, or should PUC keep them 
confidential, calculate the PX credit behind closed doors, and publish the 
credit ex poste?  The PX credit depends on the overall utility portfolio, not 
just the PX price.

Let me know if 10 AM or 3 PM (PST) works better.

Harry:  I'll assume that you'll contact the folks from EES that need to 
participate.

Best,
Jeff

Could you please set up a call and distribute to this list?  Topic:  utility 
forward contracting proposal.  Time 3-4:30 pm PST.  Thanks very much.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/11/2000 10:20 AM
		 
The votes have been counted (kidding), and the call will take place today at 
3 PM PST.  Call-in number to follow.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/07/2000 12:13 PM
		
Folks:  

The "subcommittee" I've referenced that's trying to come up with a solution 
to California's train wreck is moving very quickly.  The group's shooting to 
have a first cut at a "straw person" proposal sketched out by end of next 
week.  The group's meeting on Tuesday to continue to bounce around ideas.  

I'd like to try to have an internal call on Monday at either 10 AM (PST) or 
3  PM (PST) to pin down at least a vaguely detailed conceptual framework that 
I can propose to the subcommittee on Tuesday.  The agenda items for the 
internal meeting are:

Finalize proposal for benchmark(s) for utility procurement.  
Goal: increase utility willingness to enter into forward contracts by 
replacing PUC after-the-fact "reasonableness" review with a benchmark. (Been 
working the Portland desk on a "portfolio benchmark" concept.)

Determine our view of how to treat term contracts w.r.t. the PX credit, i.e., 
should those contracts be disclosed to the market, or should PUC keep them 
confidential, calculate the PX credit behind closed doors, and publish the 
credit ex poste?  The PX credit depends on the overall utility portfolio, not 
just the PX price.

Let me know if 10 AM or 3 PM (PST) works better.

Harry:  I'll assume that you'll contact the folks from EES that need to 
participate.

Best,
Jeff

Sounds very good.  

Might be useful to get a "reputable" economist to write a paper that 1) 
describes traditional means for defining, identifying and mitigating market 
power, 2) compares those with the "new" means folks are coming up with these 
days,  and 3) comments on the "split" in the academic community over the 
issues.  

When Steve Kean and I discussed the notion initially, thought it might be a 
good idea to gently "pile on" to the public discussion with the goal of 
making clear 1) just how complex this issue is and 2) how important it will 
be to have a thorough analysis (say, about 12+ months worth?) before rushing 
to judgment on anything Joskow might allege in his paper.  Thoughts?

Best,
Jeff

	James D Steffes
	12/11/2000 10:02 AM
		
Having read the Hogan paper, I think that the "academic" community is 
somewhat divided on this issue.  If we want to move forward on the issues 
Joskow addresses, I would recommend that EPSA be the vehicle.  The entire 
marketer / generator community needs to counter.

What do people think about seeking activity through EPSA, WPTF, and/or IEP of 
CA  to push back on the studies and analysis especially after the Dec 13 
Order?  I don't think that the discussions will be ending very soon.

Jim

	Alan Comnes@ECT
	12/07/2000 03:07 AM
		
The Joskow/Kahn paper raises two issues:  price above cost  and witholding.  

Enron obviously has concerns with the "price above cost" analysis.  I drafted 
some specific concerns and put them into a draft to Enron's reponse to Hoeker 
Question 1.  Although the detail was dropped in the final draft, the basic 
technical concerns were laid out there. To really rebut Joskow/Kahn would 
take considerable work.  Jeff D's idea was to write a paper that raised 
issues and indicated how complicated a "correct" response would  be.

The Joskow/Kahn withholding section has recieved criticism from the ISO so I 
am not sure Enron needs to respond to that.

I think my bottom line now is that the debate at FERC will soon be over or 
enter a new stage on the 13th.  As far as how a response would help us in 
California, I think requires a discussion with Jeff.

Alan

Alan --

Before we bring in Seabron Adamson to do some analysis, I'd like your read of 
the Joskow and Hogan papers.   When we have our understanding straight, let's 
talk.

Jim

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	11/30/2000 11:49 AM
		 
FYI. In bizarre times, help can sometimes come from bizarre places.  Granted, 
we're likely to disagree strongly with Hogan's continued obsession with 
Poolco, but the discussion in his paper regarding market power may be 
helpful---I've read the Joskow paper, but haven't yet had a chance to review 
the Hogan piece.  

Steve and I discussed the need to do a focused assessment of the Joskow/Kahn 
"analysis"  (remember it's Ed Kahn, not Alfred Kahn).  Seems that it would be 
very useful to fold into that analysis any useful stuff on market power 
included in the paper done by Hogan & Co.  If, in the end, there ain't 
nothing useful, so be it.  But seems like there's little downside to 
exploring it.

Jim, my understanding is that Alan is already working with the fundamentals 
folks on the Portland desk to deconstruct the Joskow paper.  Might want to 
include the Hogan paper in those discussions and might also be useful to pull 
Seabron Adamson into the thinking, too.  Ultimately, may be preferable to 
have any assessment of Joskow and/or Hogan to come from economists, rather 
than directly from us. 

Best,
Jeff
	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	11/30/2000 11:29 AM
		 
Has FERC Gone Far Enough in California?
The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission isn't going far enough in its 
attempt to reform the California wholesale electric market, according to a 
paper by three prominent economists done for San Diego Gas and Electric. The 
paper by John D. Chandley, Scott M. Harvey, and William W. Hogan argues that 
FERC should first end the artificial separation that divides the California 
Power Exchange and the California Independent System Operator, rather than 
worrying about the governance of the two institutions.
"The change in governance may help," says the paper - "Electricity Market 
Reform in California" - "but it is not likely to be decisive in the near 
term. Explicit guidance from the commission regarding the nature and 
trajectory of reforms will be essential if market reform is to be 
accomplished within an acceptable time frame." Hogan, of the Kennedy School 
of Government, has been writing since 1995 in opposition to California's 
market separation.
Also, argues the paper, freeing the California utilities to engage in forward 
contracting is no panacea. "The expectation that merely allowing utilities to 
participate in forward contracting necessarily would be the solution to high 
prices is problematic and not supported by the commission's staff report," 
says the analysis, adding that "putting pressure on buyers to sign contracts 
in the present environment may make things worse." If the underlying problem 
in California is high cost and low capacity, requiring forward contracting 
could harm not only California but also the entire Western U.S. electric 
system.
FERC's $150 so-called "soft cap" is a wild card that has the three economists 
scratching their heads. "It does not appear in the staff report and there is 
little critical analysis of their implications, other than the discussion of 
Commissioner [Curt] Hebert." If the intent of the soft cap is to move toward 
cost justification for bids above $150/MWh, then FERC is headed into an 
administrative morass "that would rival those under wellhead price controls 
in the natural gas industry."
If, on the other hand, the soft cap is "truly soft" and would only require 
some paper work at FERC and the possibility of a refund if the price is 
eventually deemed not just and reasonable, "there might be little impact on 
consumer prices (particularly if the principal sources of those high prices 
are high costs and regional capacity shortages rather than the exercise of 
market power). Even so, the proposal might serve to deter entry and new 
investments, thus combining the worst of both worlds, high consumer prices 
and little or no new investment."
FERC's proposed order in California also demonstrates confusion about just 
what constitutes market power. The paper cites the proposed order's lawyerly, 
obfuscatory conclusion that "while this record does not support findings of 
specific exercises of market power, and while we are not able to reach 
definite conclusions about the actions of individual sellers, there is clear 
evidence that in California market structure and rules provide the 
opportunity for sellers to exercise market power when supply is tight and can 
result in unjust and unreasonable rates under the [Federal Power Act]." The 
economists note, "In this regard, the debate is confused because we are 
dancing around the words where the truth may be hard to face."
In the case of California, say the economists, there is no evidence of market 
power. Even the practice of generators avoiding the day-ahead market in favor 
of the real-time market "is a response to bad market design and pricing 
incentives (including price caps), but does not demonstrate the exercise of 
market power." Nor is bidding above marginal cost necessarily an exercise of 
market power, they add. "The distinction between direct marginal cost and 
opportunity cost is sometimes lost in the discussion. Hence, a competitive 
bidder whose direct cost of generation is $40 but who could sell the same 
energy outside California for $100 should bid no less than $100. This would 
not be an exercise of market power."

Jeff Dasovich
09/01/2000 05:31 PM
Here's an attempt at being frank about the legislation without jeopardizing 
our relationships or commercial prospects.

Overall, we respect the effort, but California failed to get the ball over 
the goal line:

On Siting
Intentionally or not, California has designed power plant siting laws that 
make it excruciatingly difficult to construct power plants in the state.  
Folks seem to have lost sight of the need to balance growth and environmental 
quality in California.
That's why nothing's been built in the state for a decade and developers are 
going outside the state to build power plants. 
Tinkering around the edges won't help; and (with all due respect) the 
legislation passed yesterday tinkers.
Real reform is required if California hopes to build the supply necessary to 
keep pace with Silicon Valley and a high tech culture and tame the price 
spikes.
If developers continue to have to navigate through a maze of a half a 
dozen--or more--state and local agencies, California's supply problems will 
continue, or worsen.
California needs real, one-stop shopping and it needs it now.

On the retail price cap
They don't work (we've already developed all the arguments, so I won't repeat 
them hear)
The press has already reported that the measure the Legislature passed simply 
puts off the day of reckoning.
It's like using your credit card--eventually they're going to knock on your 
door to collect.
Now, families and businesses will have a hard time managing their budgets 
because they can't gauge the size of the balloon payment they'll face a 
couple of years down the road.
So San Diegans who continue to take service from SDG&E will pay the same 
amount, but the cap will remove the powerful incentive prices create to use 
electricity wisely--bad solution.
There's a better answer:
Instead of urging consumers not to switch, encourage customers to sign with 
another retail provider.  
Clearly, the biggest mistake California made was neglecting to establish a 
retail market in its restructuring legislation.
Urging customers to stay with the utility made matters worse, given the 
volatility of the Power Exchange. (Variable rate mortgage story.)
But some customers who did switch and who took a fixed-price deal with 
companies like ours are doing very well.  
But for the press reports, the customers who switched to those deals hardly 
know there's a crisis.
So California needs to follow's Pennsylvania's lead and make a market that 
works for retail customers.
If the price spikes in the PX worry you, the best way to protect yourself is 
to leave the utility and switch to another provider who's willing to take on 
that risk on your behalf.
Remove the monopoly that California originally granted to the PX.
Just like the customers who switched, the utilities could have bought 
fixed-price power and protected themselves from the PX's price volatility.
But for some crazy reason, California forced the utilities to buy everything 
from PX.
And the utilities have complained about it---even former monopolies don't 
like buying from a monopoly.
Let the utility buy from any competitive source available.
Don't meld the PX with the ISO---that would simply re-enforce the PX monopoly 
and make a bad situation much worse.
Make California's ISO a for-profit "Transco," like we have in our interstate 
gas pipeline system
[[I leave this last recommendation as food for thought.  May be too much to 
bite off.]]

Have a good holiday.

Best,
Jeff

I believe that on Thursday/Friday? you sent a note with some suggestions on 
proposed solutions.  Darned if I can find it.  Could you resend it?  Or, in 
the flurry of activity, am I mistaken, and the last dispatch I got from you 
was the note you sent on the 6th?

Apologies,
Jeff

I've been buried.  What did we hear from FERC last week?  Was that from 
Larcamp's their visit to Houston?

I ain't forgot.  Your proposal is a "touchy" one, and let's just say that 
it's required some nimble dancing in the attempt to gauge where folks sit, if 
you get my drift.  I'm still on the case, however.  

who's on so far?

Mon-Thurs:  SF
Fri--Sacramento

Mike:  Please forward the letter to Jeff.  Jeff, we'll be signing the 
letter.  Look like something TW can sign.  Give me a ring when you get a 
chance to look at it.

Best,
Jeff

Given the messy spot that SDG&E in particular and SoCalGas find themselves in 
due to what's happened to gas prices at the Cal border, it might not be a bad 
time to check in with our friend Neil Schmally (sp?) at Sempra to see how 
Enron might help?

In case folks haven't already heard through other sources, a reliable person 
told me that PG&E is hedged for core gas requirements:

financial--for 45% of core volumes at prices "in the single digits/decatherm"
physical--for 15% of core volumes (via storage) at prices "less than the 
financial hedge"

SDG&E is naked.

SoCalGas is likely in the same boat as SDG&E, or worse, since they optioned 
core's storage gas to noncore customers, and, those customers are exercising.

You're a star.  I owe ya.  Next time you're in town, let me know in advance.  
Maybe we can have lunch or something.  Hope all is well.

Best,
Jeff

OK. You and I are the last ones to get the info....Here it is.
	Joseph Alamo
	12/11/2000 02:18 PM
		 
sorry!
Joseph Alamo
12/11/2000 10:23 AM
Please note:  
On the attached, the subject topic of the referenced conference call should 
have been:

"Utility Forward Contracting Proposal."

Sorry for any confusion;  all other call data remains the same.

Again, thanks in advance for your participation.

Joseph
Joseph Alamo
12/11/2000 10:02 AM
On behalf of Enron Host Jeff Dasovich, please consider this confirmation 
that a conference call has been arranged, on the above-referenced topic, 
as noted below:

 Date:   Monday, December 11th
 Time:   3:00 PM PST
 Call-in number: 1-877-288-4427
 Participants' Code: 217756
 Host Code (Jeff) 501722

Thanks in advance for your participation.

Joseph 
Could you please set up a call and distribute to this list?  Topic:  utility 
forward contracting proposal.  Time 3-4:30 pm PST.  Thanks very much.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/11/2000 10:20 AM
		 
The votes have been counted (kidding), and the call will take place today at 
3 PM PST.  Call-in number to follow.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/07/2000 12:13 PM
		
Folks:  

The "subcommittee" I've referenced that's trying to come up with a solution 
to California's train wreck is moving very quickly.  The group's shooting to 
have a first cut at a "straw person" proposal sketched out by end of next 
week.  The group's meeting on Tuesday to continue to bounce around ideas.  

I'd like to try to have an internal call on Monday at either 10 AM (PST) or 
3  PM (PST) to pin down at least a vaguely detailed conceptual framework that 
I can propose to the subcommittee on Tuesday.  The agenda items for the 
internal meeting are:

Finalize proposal for benchmark(s) for utility procurement.  
Goal: increase utility willingness to enter into forward contracts by 
replacing PUC after-the-fact "reasonableness" review with a benchmark. (Been 
working the Portland desk on a "portfolio benchmark" concept.)

Determine our view of how to treat term contracts w.r.t. the PX credit, i.e., 
should those contracts be disclosed to the market, or should PUC keep them 
confidential, calculate the PX credit behind closed doors, and publish the 
credit ex poste?  The PX credit depends on the overall utility portfolio, not 
just the PX price.

Let me know if 10 AM or 3 PM (PST) works better.

Harry:  I'll assume that you'll contact the folks from EES that need to 
participate.

Best,
Jeff

Tim/Bob:

Attached is the letter that we sent to Lynch explaining the info we thought 
ought to be made publicly available.  We're discussing how we can ensure that 
the market has access to any and all information that FERC might use in its 
"investigation" so that independent analyses might be undertaken.  Is there 
anything in addition to the information we included in the letter to Lynch 
(or that is already be publicly available) that FERC might use in its 
investigation and that we ought to target for public release?  Thanks alot.

Best,
Jeff

James D Steffes
08/16/2000 04:02 PM
We need to come up (very quickly) with a strategy on how to get the market 
information that will be important for FERC Investigation into the public 
arena.

I keep thinking that FERC can require the information and somehow get it made 
public right away.  

1. What information is not public that would be helpful?

2. What strategy will work to get FERC to take action?

Jim

Some thoughts on the conference.

Best,
Jeff

Good luck.

Only if it's not a bother.  You're very sweet to forward along.  You must 
feel GREAT being done!

can't wait.

	Kathleen E Magruder@EES
	12/11/2000 02:22 PM
		
my last trip was planned a day in advance.  I promise to give you more notice 
next time.  I expect I'll be in CA a LOT next year with all the activity 
going on out there.  You'll have a chance to buy me at least one meal.

Talked to Eric.  He'll give Kari a ring and pass along message.  Best, Jeff

Paul:  Here's additional info for the "curtailment" data that we're pulling 
together.

Utility Pricing for Core Gas Customers

Prior to the month in question, the utility forecasts gas prices based on 
NYMEX monthly prices.  So for example, based on November's forecast, the 
utility sets prices to be charged to core consumers in December.

When December's over, the utility compares forecast prices with actual 
prices.  If the forecast was too low, and there's an undercollection, the 
utility will increase January's price forecast by "just enough" to make up 
for the December undercollection.  If prices were too high and there's an 
overcollection, the utility will reduce January price forecast by just enough 
to refund the overcollection.

If the overcollection/undercollection is very large, the utilities have 
generally spread out the "true-up" over several months to avoid "rate shock" 
one way or the other.  However, under the current circumstances, the 
utilities may be less willing to spread it out, and may wish to recover the 
entire undercollection in the following month.  In short, there's at least a 
one-month lag in customer prices to account for differences in forecasts 
versus actual.

Refer such calls to Karen Denne in Houston.  Thanks.

	George Waidelich@EES
	12/11/2000 04:57 PM
		 
I received a call from Tim Roberts of the Energy Journal in San Jose CA.  
They are writing a piece on the current energy situation in CA and how it is 
effecting IPP's and power marketers and their intentions towards the CA 
market in the future.  He would like to speak with somebody at Enron.  As far 
as I know, I do no have media clearance so I had no comment.

If Enron wants an opportunity to make a public statement we should talk to 
this guy as early as possible today or tomorrow.  He can be reached at 
408-299-1821.

George Waidelich
925-543-3801

I don't want to create an hassles. Don't feel like you have to get the thing 
all fixed up by Friday if it not's a cake walk.

	"Eldon Sellers" <eldon@interx.net>
	12/11/2000 05:32 PM
	Please respond to eldon
		 
Not true; I had a new muffler put in today and I'm having the roughness in 
the engine checked tomorrow by Wine Country Motors at 10:00 am.
Apparently the Suburban is NOT running reliably so you might want to come up 
with an alternative ! 

Nancy 
(707) 251-4870 (phone) 
(707) 265-5446 (fax) 
"Plus je bois, mieux je chante" 

If all goes well, I'll have some info to distribute before the meeting 
regarding forward purchases.  I'll be ready to discuss it at the meeting, 
too.

Professor Berk:

Very interesting to hear the perspectives of a South African ex-pat last 
evening. 

Today's been very hectic, but I'll get back to you on the possibility of 
having Enron sponsor internships for the financial engineering program.  
Until we've had a chance to talk, could you wait before forwarding my name 
along to anyone else in the fin eng group?  Much appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

Editorial/Opinion 

Making it hot for deregulation 
Gregory Palast 
The New York Times 
 
08/29/2000 
The News & Observer Raleigh, NC 

Final 
A11 
(Copyright 2000) 
 

 
PECONIC, N.Y. -- While reporters ogled celebrities at Barbra Streisand's 
bungalow during the Democratic Convention in Los Angeles, something important 
was being debated 100 miles to the south in San Diego, where there was a real 
display of populism. There politicians have enrolled 2 million citizens in a 
scary economic experiment. This year, San Diego became the first city in 
California to experience the end of state regulation of electricity prices. 
When California's lawmakers voted to bring the miracle of market competition 
to electricity, they wrote into the law that homeowners' bills would fall "by 
at least 20 percent." In fact, bills jumped 124 percent this August over 
last. Rather than repudiate this mad market experiment, the federal 
government and 24 other states have rushed to imitate California's lead. 
 
Actually, Californians were lucky. Every hour of every day, San Diego Gas and 
Electric, the local utility, must now buy its electricity at a state auction 
known as a power pool. On the first hot day this summer, during the noonday 
heat, the companies that produce the power, newly deregulated, cranked up 
their bids to $9,999 per megawatt hour. That's about 5,000 percent more than 
the once- controlled price of $20, but it could have been worse. 
According to those inside the secretive auction agency, sellers assumed the 
pool's computers could handle only four-digit bids. In fact, the computers 
could have accepted bids for seven figures and bankrupted a chunk of the 
state in a day. 
One can trace California's electricity market plague largely to a single 
source, Daniel Fessler. In the early 1990s, Fessler, then president of the 
state's Public Utilities Commission, developed an infatuation with one of 
Margaret Thatcher's free-market ventures: the troubled England-Wales Power 
Pool. 
How strange. Britons pay about 70 percent more for electricity than 
Americans. That's hardly a surprise, as each day around tea time, when 
England's usage peaks, a small clique of power plant owners take over the 
electricity auction, bidding up prices by 200 percent to 2,000 percent. 
In the United States, utilities vowed they would play no such tricks if 
California removed the limits on profits that have been at the core of 
regulation policy for the past 100 years. The promise lasted several months, 
during which time five giant international electricity sellers - all new to 
California - imported the techniques they'd learned in Britain that were 
designed to manipulate the bidding process and in a single month produce 
profits once permitted for an entire year. 
The deregulation bug is now winging eastward. New York City, for example, has 
reportedly succumbed to 43 percent increases in Con Edison bills. 
But in San Diego, something extraordinary happened. This month, thousands 
joined an unprecedented consumers' boycott. The power companies can send out 
their bloated bills, but the tanned masses won't pay. Refuseniks include the 
Council of Churches, the school district and - without a hint of shame - 
Steve Peace, the state senator who sponsored the deregulation law. 
* * * 
The electricity fiasco should be a godsend for Al Gore's campaign. After all, 
it was Fessler and his fellow Republicans who threw California's consumers to 
the meager mercies of the marketplace. And Gov. George W. Bush pushed through 
deregulation in Texas, which is widely expected produce hefty returns for a 
former business partner, Sam Wyly, owner of the GreenMountain, a power 
seller. 
But while Gore spoke out in Los Angeles against "powerful forces," on this 
subject he's mum. No wonder: the Clinton-Gore administration still promotes 
California-style deregulation as a model for the nation. 
But someone's ready to feel California's pain, and it's not good news for 
Gore. During the Democrats' big show, Ralph Nader went to San Diego to remind 
boycotters that he was founding father of the Utility Consumer Action 
Network, the 46,000-member local group leading the anti-corporate uprising. 
Electricity is the first big U.S. industry formerly under the tight control 
of states to be opened up to international operators and their free market 
rules. For the first time, Americans feel the bite of real globalization, and 
we don't like it one bit. 

Thanks---couldn't agree more on the "crisis here"/"need education" 
assessment.  The more we educate folks, the more they agree with our views 
and positions.

	Karen Denne
	12/11/2000 01:18 PM
		 
Working with Marathon to develop a PR strategy for December and 1Q01.  Will 
circulate the plan early this week for comments and buy-in.

Jeff -- just a note... the energy situation in CA has already escalated into 
a crisis and is on the front-burner of elected officials, the media, business 
and the public (so if one of our goals was to create a sense of crisis, it's 
been taken care of).  We need to take advantage of this heightened awareness 
with an educational campaign.  It's an opportune time to communicate our 
messages.

Let me know what else you need. 
Thanks!
kd

bed situation is as follows:

everyone will be naked and in the same bed; your parents may excuse 
themselves if they wish.

i'll be there round 7:30.

That would work for me.  And presumably Rory and Co. could come then, too?

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	12/12/2000 10:06 AM
		 
If you can all spend the night of the 23rd here - we could have our 
"Christmas" together on the morning of the 24th?? 

Nancy 
(707) 251-4870 (phone) 
(707) 265-5446 (fax) 
"Plus je bois, mieux je chante" 

Can the deal bench presentation be distributed publicly?  I'd like to use it 
in the "subcommittee" meetings I mentioned last week as a means to a solution 
for California's reasonableness review morass.

Left a message with Kahn late last evening.  Haven't heard back yet.  Will 
let you know.

Best,
Jeff

Frank's number at Luntz Research Companies is 703.358.0080.  For video info, 
ask Steve Kean.

	Karen Denne
	12/12/2000 10:52 AM
		 
J -- do you have Frank's phone number? any info about the focus group video?  
Let me know so I can pass along to Marathon.  Thanks! kd
Karen

Rich spoke with Frank regarding focus group video and polling results.
Frank said that he would be happy to release poll results if he gets
approval from someone at Enron.  Can you facilitate this?

Also, Frank said that he does not have a copy of the focus group video.  Can
you obtain a copy for Rich?

Thanks.

Sandra

	Alan Comnes@ECT
	12/06/2000 03:44 PM
		 
Jeff,

Please pass this note onto whomever on the call asked the question "what 
would Enron be paid if there was an electricity curtailment?"

I talked with staff on the West Desk and confirmed that if there is an 
unscheduled electricity curtailment (i.e., rolling or widespread blackout) 
power scheduled by EES to a retail customer would still flow, assuming it had 
been prescheduled.  EPMI (acting as EES's scheduling coordinator, or SC) 
would be paid the ISO decremental  (dec) price for that power.  EPMI would 
pass that revenue (along with the cost of supplying that power) onto EES.  

If the blackout continued for some time (i.e., days), presumably EES would 
adjust its preschedule and there would be no net sales into the ISO.

Whether the retail customer gets a payment for being curtailed depends 
completely on the contract between EES and the customer.  Presumably the 
force majure provisions of the contract would protect EES from utility 
blackouts.

Alan Comnes

Will do.

	Mary Hain@ECT
	12/12/2000 10:55 AM
		 
San Diego Gas & Electric Company's filing for emergency relief asked FERC to 
re-impose price caps for short-term releases of capacity for service to the 
California border and to points of interconnection between interstate 
pipelines and California LDCs, and provide that sellers be required to state 
separately the transportation and commodity components of the bundled rate 
for bundled sales at these points, etc.

did they bite (i.e., commerce one)?  i'm very excited.  you hear about the 
announcement this AM re: Ariba/IBM hooking up with Microsoft to create B2B 
software?

Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com> on 09/02/2000 08:59:45 PM
 Well what?

Did you have a good time at the dome??

well?

But Rory (who by the way is responsible for this mess!) now has decided that 
he'd like to do a Xmas "make up" on the 29th, which is smack dab in the 
middle of when we'll be up at the dome (tween xmas and new year's--hopefully 
you and eldon will join us so we can kick yer butts in spades).  so the 29th 
is very bad, as you can imagine.  if we could do the 24th, that would be 
great.  when's your plane leave on the 24th?

do surf shops rent wet suits?  you think i can rent one from live water?

yes.  do we have a call-in number yet?

Jennifer:  I got a call from Chris Bailey (sp?) needing a summary of 
California dereg for a presentation(s) that Harold's assembling.  Attached is 
summary that Mona pulled together for Harold a couple of months ago.  I don't 
have Chris' email address (I've left him a message).  Could you forward this 
along to him?  Thanks a bunch.

Best,
Jeff
	Mona L Petrochko
	12/12/2000 11:38 AM
		 
FYI.
	Enron Energy Services
	

Per Ed's request, here is a summary of California's deregulation history:

If you have any questions, please page me!
---Jennifer
wk 713-345-8206
pgr 877-681-5956

yep.

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	12/12/2000 11:52 AM
		 
We plan to leave here about 3 - will someone be around to let us in the 
house? 
             
                    Jeff 
Dasovich                                                          
                    12/11/2000           Subject:     
Directions                           
                    01:23 
PM                                                               
                                                                              
             
                                                                              
             

Telephone number at the house is 415.868.1254. 
             
                    Jeff 
Dasovich                                                          
                    12/11/2000           Subject:     
Directions                           
                    01:02 
PM                                                               
                                                                              
             
                                                                              
             

Can we do a little planning tonite for this weekend? 

Cameron: 
Here are the directions to the place in Stinson.  Can you email to your 
invites?  Did you invite John E? 
We have the place from 5 PM on Friday evening till 10 AM on Sunday morning. 
Address: 
11 Sonoma Patio 
Stinson Beach 
If you're coming from the City and take Panoramic over Mt. Tam, then when 
you hit Highway One, make a right and head north toward town.  Go through 
town and make a left on Calle del Arroyo.  If you see the lagoon on your 
left, you've gone too far.  After making a left on Calle del Arroyo, make a 
left on Sonoma. 
If you're coming from points North, then you'll be heading south on Highway 
One toward Stinson.  After you've passed the lagoon on your right, you'll 
eventually come to Calle del Arroyo.  If you arrive in the town of Stinson 
Beach, you've gone too far.  Make a right on Calle del Arroyo, then a left 
on Sonoma. 

Sean:  305.5160

naked, all in one bed.

star doesn't need a bed.  prentice and i will need a bed (hey, it's her 
birthday!)  tom & karen are very iffy, but if they show, and stay overnight 
(iffy times two), then they'll need a bed.  that work?

For today's noon call.  when you open, answer "disable macros" to first 
prompt, and "no" to question about links.  there are three portfolio 
scenarios that i'd be happy to discuss very quickly during the call.
	Stephen Swain@ECT
	12/12/2000 12:38 PM
		 

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/12/2000 11:47 AM
		 
Jennifer:  I got a call from Chris Bailey (sp?) needing a summary of 
California dereg for a presentation(s) that Harold's assembling.  Attached is 
summary that Mona pulled together for Harold a couple of months ago.  I don't 
have Chris' email address (I've left him a message).  Could you forward this 
along to him?  Thanks a bunch.

Best,
Jeff
	Mona L Petrochko
	12/12/2000 11:38 AM
		 
FYI.
	Enron Energy Services
	

Per Ed's request, here is a summary of California's deregulation history:

If you have any questions, please page me!
---Jennifer
wk 713-345-8206
pgr 877-681-5956

FYI.  As you know, we're attempting to find a solution to the "reasonable 
review" morrass that's impeding utility forward contracting.  For that 
effort, we've worked with the Portland desk to pull together some educational 
materials to use with a subset of California stakeholders that's trying to 
devise a solution to California's melt down.

The attached graphs show 3 scenarios for the state as a whole.  
1) "do nothing"  
2) for 60% of IOU short position, split the amount 50-50 and 1cover half the 
amount with 10-year  fixed priced power and the other half with 5-year fixed 
priced power.
3) create a portfolio with a) 25% of short position covered by 10-year fixed 
priced power, b) 20% of short position covered by 5-year fixed price power, 
c) 15% covered by 1-year fixed price power, d) 20% covered by May-Sept 
fixed-price power, and e) 15% from the PX.  

The term of each scenario is 5 years.

Because each is priced off our our curves, the average price is roughly 
equivalent for each of the three portfolios.  However, the graph shows (as 
one would expect) that exposure to price volatility is significantly higher 
under scenario 1 compared to 2 and 3.

The goal is to use the illustrative scenarios to persuade the industry that 
in the short run (i.e., immediately) the utilities should be permitted to buy 
a modest amount of power under 5 and 10 terms, and those purchases (if 
undertaken using a "DealBench-like" tool) ought to be "per se" reasonable.

If anyone has questions about it, or would like to discuss further, give a 
call at 415.782.7822.

Best,
Jeff
	Stephen Swain@ECT
	12/12/2000 12:38 PM
		 

I'm faxing the final to you.

Kathleen E Magruder
09/05/2000 08:13 AM
so which bill passed?  I would love to see copies of any bill that was 
actually adopted by the legislature.  It's not clear to me from the memo 
whether both bills passed.

Agree that Enron shouldn't be the lead.  An economist should be the lead with 
a broad group of folks funding.  Seems funny that EPSA wouldn't have an 
interest in the debate over how market power is assessed and addressed.

	James D Steffes
	12/11/2000 10:27 PM
		
I still think that Enron shouldn't be the lead.  We need the industry to 
respond.  Hartsoe doesn't think that EPSA will be interested in spending the 
$.  

Jim

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/11/2000 11:59 AM
		
Sounds very good.  

Might be useful to get a "reputable" economist to write a paper that 1) 
describes traditional means for defining, identifying and mitigating market 
power, 2) compares those with the "new" means folks are coming up with these 
days,  and 3) comments on the "split" in the academic community over the 
issues.  

When Steve Kean and I discussed the notion initially, thought it might be a 
good idea to gently "pile on" to the public discussion with the goal of 
making clear 1) just how complex this issue is and 2) how important it will 
be to have a thorough analysis (say, about 12+ months worth?) before rushing 
to judgment on anything Joskow might allege in his paper.  Thoughts?

Best,
Jeff

	James D Steffes
	12/11/2000 10:02 AM
		
Having read the Hogan paper, I think that the "academic" community is 
somewhat divided on this issue.  If we want to move forward on the issues 
Joskow addresses, I would recommend that EPSA be the vehicle.  The entire 
marketer / generator community needs to counter.

What do people think about seeking activity through EPSA, WPTF, and/or IEP of 
CA  to push back on the studies and analysis especially after the Dec 13 
Order?  I don't think that the discussions will be ending very soon.

Jim

	Alan Comnes@ECT
	12/07/2000 03:07 AM
		
The Joskow/Kahn paper raises two issues:  price above cost  and witholding.  

Enron obviously has concerns with the "price above cost" analysis.  I drafted 
some specific concerns and put them into a draft to Enron's reponse to Hoeker 
Question 1.  Although the detail was dropped in the final draft, the basic 
technical concerns were laid out there. To really rebut Joskow/Kahn would 
take considerable work.  Jeff D's idea was to write a paper that raised 
issues and indicated how complicated a "correct" response would  be.

The Joskow/Kahn withholding section has recieved criticism from the ISO so I 
am not sure Enron needs to respond to that.

I think my bottom line now is that the debate at FERC will soon be over or 
enter a new stage on the 13th.  As far as how a response would help us in 
California, I think requires a discussion with Jeff.

Alan

Alan --

Before we bring in Seabron Adamson to do some analysis, I'd like your read of 
the Joskow and Hogan papers.   When we have our understanding straight, let's 
talk.

Jim

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	11/30/2000 11:49 AM
		 
FYI. In bizarre times, help can sometimes come from bizarre places.  Granted, 
we're likely to disagree strongly with Hogan's continued obsession with 
Poolco, but the discussion in his paper regarding market power may be 
helpful---I've read the Joskow paper, but haven't yet had a chance to review 
the Hogan piece.  

Steve and I discussed the need to do a focused assessment of the Joskow/Kahn 
"analysis"  (remember it's Ed Kahn, not Alfred Kahn).  Seems that it would be 
very useful to fold into that analysis any useful stuff on market power 
included in the paper done by Hogan & Co.  If, in the end, there ain't 
nothing useful, so be it.  But seems like there's little downside to 
exploring it.

Jim, my understanding is that Alan is already working with the fundamentals 
folks on the Portland desk to deconstruct the Joskow paper.  Might want to 
include the Hogan paper in those discussions and might also be useful to pull 
Seabron Adamson into the thinking, too.  Ultimately, may be preferable to 
have any assessment of Joskow and/or Hogan to come from economists, rather 
than directly from us. 

Best,
Jeff
	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	11/30/2000 11:29 AM
		 
Has FERC Gone Far Enough in California?
The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission isn't going far enough in its 
attempt to reform the California wholesale electric market, according to a 
paper by three prominent economists done for San Diego Gas and Electric. The 
paper by John D. Chandley, Scott M. Harvey, and William W. Hogan argues that 
FERC should first end the artificial separation that divides the California 
Power Exchange and the California Independent System Operator, rather than 
worrying about the governance of the two institutions.
"The change in governance may help," says the paper - "Electricity Market 
Reform in California" - "but it is not likely to be decisive in the near 
term. Explicit guidance from the commission regarding the nature and 
trajectory of reforms will be essential if market reform is to be 
accomplished within an acceptable time frame." Hogan, of the Kennedy School 
of Government, has been writing since 1995 in opposition to California's 
market separation.
Also, argues the paper, freeing the California utilities to engage in forward 
contracting is no panacea. "The expectation that merely allowing utilities to 
participate in forward contracting necessarily would be the solution to high 
prices is problematic and not supported by the commission's staff report," 
says the analysis, adding that "putting pressure on buyers to sign contracts 
in the present environment may make things worse." If the underlying problem 
in California is high cost and low capacity, requiring forward contracting 
could harm not only California but also the entire Western U.S. electric 
system.
FERC's $150 so-called "soft cap" is a wild card that has the three economists 
scratching their heads. "It does not appear in the staff report and there is 
little critical analysis of their implications, other than the discussion of 
Commissioner [Curt] Hebert." If the intent of the soft cap is to move toward 
cost justification for bids above $150/MWh, then FERC is headed into an 
administrative morass "that would rival those under wellhead price controls 
in the natural gas industry."
If, on the other hand, the soft cap is "truly soft" and would only require 
some paper work at FERC and the possibility of a refund if the price is 
eventually deemed not just and reasonable, "there might be little impact on 
consumer prices (particularly if the principal sources of those high prices 
are high costs and regional capacity shortages rather than the exercise of 
market power). Even so, the proposal might serve to deter entry and new 
investments, thus combining the worst of both worlds, high consumer prices 
and little or no new investment."
FERC's proposed order in California also demonstrates confusion about just 
what constitutes market power. The paper cites the proposed order's lawyerly, 
obfuscatory conclusion that "while this record does not support findings of 
specific exercises of market power, and while we are not able to reach 
definite conclusions about the actions of individual sellers, there is clear 
evidence that in California market structure and rules provide the 
opportunity for sellers to exercise market power when supply is tight and can 
result in unjust and unreasonable rates under the [Federal Power Act]." The 
economists note, "In this regard, the debate is confused because we are 
dancing around the words where the truth may be hard to face."
In the case of California, say the economists, there is no evidence of market 
power. Even the practice of generators avoiding the day-ahead market in favor 
of the real-time market "is a response to bad market design and pricing 
incentives (including price caps), but does not demonstrate the exercise of 
market power." Nor is bidding above marginal cost necessarily an exercise of 
market power, they add. "The distinction between direct marginal cost and 
opportunity cost is sometimes lost in the discussion. Hence, a competitive 
bidder whose direct cost of generation is $40 but who could sell the same 
energy outside California for $100 should bid no less than $100. This would 
not be an exercise of market power."

oh!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  In the "big" house, sleeps 10---3 kings and 
2 twins!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  In the "little" house, sleeps 
6--2 queens and 1 trundle!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

anything else!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

	Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com>
	12/12/2000 01:18 PM
		 
NO.  I need to know how many beds there are total!!!!!!!!!!!

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

naked, all in one bed.

star doesn't need a bed.  prentice and i will need a bed (hey, it's her
birthday!)  tom & karen are very iffy, but if they show, and stay overnight
(iffy times two), then they'll need a bed.  that work?

Hi.  Got your message.  As you know, it's complete meltdown here, so I 
apologize for not having got back to you sooner.  I'll read and get back to 
you.  Deadline?

Leslie:  Looks good.  Just a couple of comments:

1. General
May want to point out that the roots of California's current gas woes are the 
same ones causing the electric problem---combined effect of California's 
"import-based" energy policy and the state's failure to invest in in-state 
infrastructure.  California imports about 25% of its electricity, but about 
80-90 percent of its gas supply.  California has failed to invest in the 
in-state infrastructure necessary to support increased gas demand over the 
last decade.  So we've got an interstate pipeline superhighway to the border 
and a dirt road of in-state transportation once you get into California.
The last bullet seems to suggest that manipulation may be taking place.  Can 
we support that suggestion, and is it one that we want to make necessarily?  
If we do suggest that manipulation may in part explain current prices, do we 
need to propose ways to eliminate it?  Otherwise, seems that we may be giving 
FERC ammunition to take action without trying to "steer" that action in the 
right direction.  Maybe I'm reading too much into the bullet.

2. Specific
Competition for gas coming to California has increased significantly.  The 
midwest (via Alliance) is competing away Canadian gas.  The Southwest 
(Nevada, Arizona) is competing away supply from the Southwest before it hits 
the California border.

	Mary Hain@ECT
	12/12/2000 11:58 AM
		 
We thought it would be good to basically give Chair Hoecker talking points 
with any numbers that Enron provides.  We will visit on these later today 
when the numbers are ready (before 3:00).  Comments?
Here is my stab at the talking points  to be sent in to FERC along with the 
gas pricing info they requested for the California markets.  Let me or 
Christi know if you have any disagreements, additions, whatever.  I am 
supposed to be out of here at 2:15 today, so if you have stuff to add after 
that, get it to Christi.  Thanks.

But if they kept Grace, they might have a winning season, and lord knows 
nobody wants that....

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	12/12/2000 03:32 PM
		 
The Cubs traded Mark Grace - what bums! 

Nancy 
(707) 251-4870 (phone) 
(707) 265-5446 (fax) 
"Plus je bois, mieux je chante" 

Thanks a bunch.  So how in the world did you find yourself standing in front 
of this tornado?

FYI.  EPSA and IEP will have a joint PR call tomorrow in case anyone would 
like to listen in.
	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	12/12/2000 02:04 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
Greetings
IEP will host our weekly PR/Market Response call tomorrow at 10:00 a.m. PST.
At the request of EPSA their PR group will also join in the call to discuss
IEP/EPSA's response to recent events in California.

The call in number is:
1-800-486-2726

The pass-code is:
111756

Thanks,
Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

He just can't help himself.
	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	12/12/2000 02:18 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
FYI

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

 - December 11 letter to Hoecker.doc

thanks very much.

math error.  big sleeps 8. little sleeps.  

can you explain the panic about sleeping arrangements, and could you fill me 
in on what those arrangements are prior to sending the email out?

	Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com>
	12/12/2000 03:52 PM
		 
I don't see how you get the numbers.  Can you please explain.  I don't have
the time to do this right now and I have to get the email off to the people
about sleeping arrangements.  I get 8 in one house and 5 in the other.
Please answer ASAP.

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

oh!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  In the "big" house, sleeps 10---3 kings
and 2 twins!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  In the "little" house,
sleeps 6--2 queens and 1 trundle!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

anything else!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

 

                    Cameron

                    <cameron@perf        <Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com>

                    ect.com>             cc:

                                         Subject:     RE: Directions

                    12/12/2000

                    01:18 PM

 

 

NO.  I need to know how many beds there are total!!!!!!!!!!!

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

naked, all in one bed.

star doesn't need a bed.  prentice and i will need a bed (hey, it's her
birthday!)  tom & karen are very iffy, but if they show, and stay overnight
(iffy times two), then they'll need a bed.  that work?

Could you please set up a conference call and send the information to the 
list below?  Please set it up for tomorrow, Wednesday, at 9 AM PDT, for one 
hour.  Thank you very much.

Jeff Dasovich/SFO/EES@EES, Steven J Kean/NA/Enron@Enron, James D 
Steffes/HOU/EES@EES, Rob Bradley/Corp/Enron@ENRON, mpalmer@enron.com, Karen 
Denne/Corp/Enron@ENRON, Mona L Petrochko/SFO/EES@EES, Susan J 
Mara/SFO/EES@EES, Paul Kaufman/PDX/ECT@ECT Dave Parquet, Samuel 
Wehn/HOU/ECT@ECT, Tim Belden/HOU/ECT@ECT, Sandra McCubbin/SFO/EES@EES

Looks fine to me to send around.  You want to send it?  Give a call when you 
get a chance to discuss.

That's the information that they sent me, copied from what they sent me.

8 (big) 6 (little). i assume "trundle" sleeps two.

	Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com>
	12/12/2000 04:33 PM
		 
Damnit Jeff.  What is the sleeping situation in the second cabin.  I don't
have time!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

The panic is my waste of time trying to get things organized.  That's the
panic.  I also don't want to tell people there are beds for them if there
are not.  Could you just right a simple straightforward email with the
number of beds.  Was there a math error on that one also????

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

math error.  big sleeps 8. little sleeps.

can you explain the panic about sleeping arrangements, and could you fill
me in on what those arrangements are prior to sending the email out?

 

                    Cameron

                    <cameron@perf        <Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com>

                    ect.com>             cc:

                                         Subject:     RE: Directions

                    12/12/2000

                    03:52 PM

 

 

I don't see how you get the numbers.  Can you please explain.  I don't have
the time to do this right now and I have to get the email off to the people
about sleeping arrangements.  I get 8 in one house and 5 in the other.
Please answer ASAP.

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

oh!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  In the "big" house, sleeps 10---3 kings
and 2 twins!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  In the "little" house,
sleeps 6--2 queens and 1 trundle!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

anything else!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

                    Cameron

                    <cameron@perf        <Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com>

                    ect.com>             cc:

                                         Subject:     RE: Directions

                    12/12/2000

                    01:18 PM

NO.  I need to know how many beds there are total!!!!!!!!!!!

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

naked, all in one bed.

star doesn't need a bed.  prentice and i will need a bed (hey, it's her
birthday!)  tom & karen are very iffy, but if they show, and stay overnight
(iffy times two), then they'll need a bed.  that work?

Just met with the industry group trying to come up with a solution for 
California.  The group liked our portfolio approach. In sum: 

A portfolio approach is the right long-term solution.
In the short run, our illustrative portfolios show that the utilities ought 
to immediately fill a modest portion of their requirements via fixed-price, 
long term contracts, and those contracts should be found reasonable, up 
front, so long as the utility uses a competitive auction.  To stimulate 
discussion we proposed that the utility fill 5% of its net short position 
with 5-year, fixed-price contracts and 5% from 10-year, fixed-price contracts.

Everyone on the call liked the proposal.  After some discussion about whether 
5%-5% was the right one, Edison agreed to come to Friday's meeting with its 
proposal for price/term/quantity that it ought to contract for immediately.  
(Edison may want the number to be higher, and the baskets to be different.)

Anything can happen between now and Friday, but thus far looks positive.  
Thanks to everyone for the help in getting the proposal together, Steve Swain 
in particular.  (Steve:  We may get asked to run a few more illustrative 
portfolios for the group.)  I'll report back on what happens at the meeting 
on Friday.  If there are any questions, etc., just let me know.

Best,
Jeff

NRDC--Ralph
CLECA--Barkovich/Booth
CMA--McCrae
PX--Flory
Eve Elsesser
Edison--Fielder
Sempra
Turn--Florio
AES--Aaron Thomas (retail)
Munis
Smutney-IEP

Munis and Florio were not on the call today, but I suspect both will be OK 
with our proposal.

As we discussed, attached is a brief description of ENA's and EES' key goals 
in California and the actions underway to achieve them.  We'll update the 
status report weekly.  We hope that the weekly update will serve as a useful 
internal communication tool to keep folks abreast of activities and 
developments in CA.  It can also serve as a tool to help identify the need to 
modify our goals and/or actions as circumstances change.   

Comments on the form and/or substance of the document and how we can make it 
more useful are welcome.

Best,
Jeff

Joseph will set up the call and distribute to the list.

	Rebecca W Cantrell@ECT
	12/12/2000 06:56 PM
		 
This is all I have received.   I asked for a confirmation, but have not 
received one yet.  I got Lysa's phone mail, so I don't know if she is there 
or not.

Lysa Akin
12/11/2000 05:43 PM
Please advise ASAP your availability for a call regarding the above 
referenced topic on Wednesday, December 13th at 
7:00 am Pacific / 9:00am Central / 10:00am Eastern

Lysa Akin
Enron Corp.
Sr. Admin. Ass't. - Gov't Affairs
121 SW Salmon, 3WTC0306
Portland, OR  97204
Office (503) 464-7927
Fax (503) 464-3740
lysa.akin@enron.com

paul.  please leave the number on paul's voicemail since he's traveling.  
thanks a billion.

NRDC, TURN, Edison, Sempra, CLECA (large industrial), AES (formerly NEV), 
Munis, PX, CMA, Enron.  Though TURN and Munis, while not opposed, are 
posturing at this point as "noncommittal."

Apologies.  Forgot the subject of the meeting.  It's "Strategy for 
California."
Jeff Dasovich
09/05/2000 11:55 AM
Could you please set up a conference call and send the information to the 
list below?  Please set it up for tomorrow, Wednesday, at 9 AM PDT, for one 
hour.  Thank you very much.

Jeff Dasovich/SFO/EES@EES, Steven J Kean/NA/Enron@Enron, James D 
Steffes/HOU/EES@EES, Rob Bradley/Corp/Enron@ENRON, mpalmer@enron.com, Karen 
Denne/Corp/Enron@ENRON, Mona L Petrochko/SFO/EES@EES, Susan J 
Mara/SFO/EES@EES, Paul Kaufman/PDX/ECT@ECT Dave Parquet, Samuel 
Wehn/HOU/ECT@ECT, Tim Belden/HOU/ECT@ECT, Sandra McCubbin/SFO/EES@EES

Hmmmm.  The world is no longer safe, not even for we relics.  Well, I'l glad 
to know that at least one adult is involved.

yes, and we can discuss storage further if you like.

Being a true blue American, I support expansion.  If you get a free minute, 
can you give me a call to discuss.  My short answer is--no problem, looks 
good.

nada.

I'll get you my comments ASAP.  Has Shelley Corman seen it?

Kahn's secretary has left messages that he's "very tied up" and continues to 
try to contact me.  Suggests to me that they may be planning something and 
he's reluctant to contact folks.  I'll poke around.
I thought our stock would go UP when an announcement about Skilling was made.
I guess this means you'll be going to D.C. with Lay.

I was thinking that you might be able to bring a modicum of legitimacy to 
it....

	Richard Shapiro
	12/13/2000 10:49 AM
		
Hell will freeze over many times before I join an illegitimate administration.

Kahn's secretary has left messages that he's "very tied up" and continues to 
try to contact me.  Suggests to me that they may be planning something and 
he's reluctant to contact folks.  I'll poke around.
I thought our stock would go UP when an announcement about Skilling was made.
I guess this means you'll be going to D.C. with Lay.

I was thinking that I should probably get another case of coastal.  1) What 
do you think?  2) Could you have one delivered?  I could pick it up.

Going to be an ugly four years....

FYI.  I'm editing now and have several proposed edits.  Should be to you 
within 20 minutes.

I'm available.

gramlr@pjm.com on 09/05/2000 12:44:21 PM
 It looks like tomorrow, Wednesday 9/6, at 5:30 Eastern time/2:30 Pacific
works for most people.  Any objection?

 I will send around an agenda by tomorrow morning which includes the
progress of the GSPP alumni group to date.  I look forward to welcoming Carl 
and
Severin and speaking with all of you to nail down a list of speakers to begin
contacting.
 Rob

 P.S. Coincidentally, I would highly recommend Carl's recent book
Information Rules as a new economy business strategy guide that even has some
relevance in what often appears as the old economy backwaters of the electric
industry.
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/087584863X/o/qid=968173636/sr=8-1/ref=a
ps
_sr_b_1_3/002-4543327-5556850.  The parallel of Carl and Severin's work to 
place
the popular mythologies of the electric industry and information economy into
tried-and-true economic principles is interesting.  That, in combination with
tried-and-true public policy methods will be a strong antidote to many of the
current political proposals.

I'm thinking we need two cases.

you got it.

My pleasure.  Thanks for the opportunity.  Good luck.  Between the US Supreme 
Court and the energy crisis, D.C. must be very interesting right about now.

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	12/13/2000 12:50 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
Edison Mission Energy Power Project Starts Construction After Expedited
Approval By California Energy Commission

 Monday December 11 6:39pm
 Source: Dow Jones

 Operation Targeted for August

 IRVINE, Calif., Dec. 11 /PRNewswire/ -- Edison Mission Energy (EME), an
Edison International company (NYSE: EIX), started construction of its new
 Sunrise power plant on Thursday, December 7, having received expedited
approval from the California Energy Commission (CEC) to proceed. The
 power generation facility will be located in Kern County, California, and
will bring both short- and long-term generation capacity to the state, which
is in
 dire need of new power generation.

 "From the onset of the California power crisis, we have sought to find
means to bring new power to the California market," said John E. Bryson,
 chairman and CEO of Edison International. "This CEC approval will help
ensure that this critical new project will be able to provide a significant
amount
 of new peaking power to the state as soon as next August. Our thanks and
appreciation go to the California Energy Commission, and the
 environmental and regulatory agencies for their swift consideration of this
important project."

 "This power has been offered by contract to the state so that the pricing
for it does not depend on California's broken deregulated power market,"
said
 Alan J. Fohrer, president and CEO of EME. "Alternatively, EME will seek to
enter into a long-term, cost-based contract with either Pacific Gas &
 Electric Company or San Diego Gas & Electric Company to further ensure that
California's consumers reap the benefit of this additional power
 resource," Fohrer said.

 The Sunrise Power Project will be completed in two phases. Phase 1 will
consist of a 320-megawatt (MW), simple-cycle peaking facility scheduled to
 be in service during the summer 2001. Phase 2 will convert the peaking
facility to a 560-MW, combined-cycle operation with an in-service date of
 summer 2003. The project will meet or exceed all pertinent environmental
and safety standards.

 Final regulatory approvals have been received for Phase I of the project
only.

 EME will be seeking expedited permitting approval for the Phase II
expansion in line with the fast-track approval process recently enacted by
the
 California legislature.

 EME has also negotiated an agreement with the labor unions for an adequate
supply of highly skilled labor in order to achieve an accelerated
 construction schedule. The accelerated schedule is aimed at providing this
additional power to California by next summer.

 Edison Mission Energy specializes in the development, acquisition,
construction management and operation of global power production facilities.
As
 one of the world's leading global power producers, Edison Mission Energy
owns nearly 23,000 megawatts of generating capacity, including interests in
 75 projects currently under construction or operating in Australia,
Indonesia, Italy, New Zealand, Puerto Rico, Spain, Thailand, Turkey, the
United
 Kingdom and the United States.

 Based in Rosemead, Calif., Edison International is a premier international
electric power generator, distributor and structured finance provider. With
a
 portfolio of approximately 28,000 megawatts, Edison International is an
industry leader in privatized, deregulated and incentive-regulated markets
and
 power generation. It is the parent company of Edison Mission Energy,
Southern California Edison, Edison Capita, Edison Enterprises and Edison
 O&M Services.

 /CONTACT: Kevin Kelley of Edison Mission Energy, 626-302-1033, Fax,
626-302-7827/ 21:35 EST

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Word on the street is that Davis, Hoecker and Richardson are meeting in D.C. 
today.  That consistent with what your hearing?

I'm on the EPSA/IEP call but doing a million things simultaneously.  Lynn's 
taking a big role on the call.  I think that you should check in with her 
afterwards to get a briefing since I'll be getting off for another call in 
the next 5 minutes.

	Richard Anderson@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	12/13/2000 09:07 AM
		
Regrettably, I am tied up in another meeting from 1:45 to 3:30 PST today.  
Could we reschedule the second part of this meeting to a later time or date?

Thanks,
Richard D. Anderson
Director of Taxes
Enron Broadband Services, Inc.
713-345-7729 (Houston office through 12/15, no voice mail)
503-886-0335 (Portland office and messages)
503-425-6005 (fax)
richard_anderson@enron.net

	Mona L Petrochko@ENRON
	12/12/00 03:21 PM
		 
It seems that 2 p.m. p.s.t. works best for all for a conference call.  The 
call-in number is 888-311-9051 passcode is 60396.

The agenda would be to discuss:

1.  interconnection agreements
2.  tax implications of c-corp vs. llp

please send the call-in number around for 1:30 call when you get.  kaufman's 
going to be on the call.  thanks, buddy.

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	12/13/2000 01:23 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
DJ Edison To Call For End To Calif Elec
                  Dereg Wed -Sources

                  Copyright (c) 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc.

                  LOS ANGELES (Dow Jones)--Edison International (EIX),
saying the current state of
                  California's power markets threatens the company with
bankruptcy, will call Wednesday
                  for an end to California's four-year experiment with
deregulation, sources familiar with
                  the issue told Dow Jones Newswires.

                       John Bryson, chief executive of Edison International,
is expected to announce that
                  the company's regulated utility unit, Southern California
Edison, won't be able to
                  recover more than $3 billion in losses related to power
purchases and continue serving
                  its retail customers unless the state's deregulated market
structure is scrapped.

                       In a move tantamount to a call for reregulation,
Edison will propose to break ground
                  on new power plants within 90 days and re-enter the
power-generation business
                  Southern California Edison was required to exit under the
state's landmark 1996
                  deregulation law, the sources said.

                       Edison plans to follow the announcement by filing a
request with state regulators to
                  increase retail electricity rates by as much as 20%, the
sources said, even though
                  regulators rejected Edison's request for a rate increase
of 10% last week.

                       The utility has lined up the support of some state
lawmakers for the broader
                  proposal, which would require action by the state
legislature, the sources said.

                       Southern California Edison, with 4.2 million
customers, is one of the country's largest
                  electric utilities. Edison was the first of the state's
utilities to sign on to the deregulation
                  effort and, as it says on its Web site, "played a central
role in the restructuring of the
                  electric industry in California."

                       Among the concessions won by utilities in 1996 is the
rate freeze, which they
                  demanded to help them recover costs related to
deregulation but which is now
                  producing huge losses.

                       Edison's current losses stem from an imbalance
between the soaring prices it must
                  pay to purchase power on the wholesale markets and the
fixed rate at which it can sell
                  power to its customers.

                       About half of those losses are offset the utility's
own power sales revenues, which
                  are accounted for separately and used to pay down
deregulation-related debt. Rising
                  power costs have produced a surplus in that account.
Edison wouldn't reveal the
                  current size of the surplus, but said previously that the
California Power Exchange paid
                  the utility $1.3 billion over its generating costs for
power through the end of September,
                  at a time when its power-purchase losses were $2.4
billion.

                       Power-Purchase Losses Mounting

                       The net losses continue to mount. California's
wholesale power prices hovered at
                  record levels all summer and spiked even higher in the
past two weeks, as colder
                  weather arrived in the Northwest at a time when much of
California's power supply was
                  down for maintenance.

                       The price of power for delivery Wednesday in
California hit an average of $1,182 a
                  megawatt-hour Tuesday, up from $250 a megawatt-hour a week
ago, the result of high
                  demand and a decision by California's wholesale market
operator to lift its cap on prices.

                       The rate Southern California Edison can charge its
retail customers, however, is fixed
                  at $66/MWh.

                       Last week, Merrill Lynch & Co. (MER) downgraded its
ratings for Edison
                  International and PG&E Corp. (PCG), the parent of
California's other major utility, Pacific
                  Gas & Electric, to neutral, saying the utilities may be
forced to file for bankruptcy if the
                  state doesn't allow them to raise their retail rates.

                       A Morgan Stanley Dean Witter (MDW) analyst drew the
same conclusion Monday,
                  also cutting his rating to neutral.

                       Edison to this point has kept its power-purchase
losses off its earnings statement, in
                  hopes that a political or regulatory solution will allow
them to be collected later.

                       The California Public Utilities Commission put the
hope of such a solution further out
                  of reach last week, however, when it ruled against rate
increases sought by Edison and
                  PG&E.

                       Credit rating agency Fitch Inc. on Monday lowered its
ratings for Edison
                  International and Southern California Edison's senior
unsecured debt to the A-minus
                  level, citing "increased liquidity pressure" and
uncertainty about the utilities' ability to
                  recover the costs of their power purchases. The agency
downgraded Edison
                  International, the parent, because half its consolidated
cash flow is provided by
                  Southern California Edison.

                       Edison - which sources said plans to remain in the
retail electricity business - said
                  late last week that it has secured a $1 billion line of
credit and expects to have enough
                  cash on hand to continue to pay for wholesale electricity
for the next several months.

                       California paid more than $1 billion for power last
week, sources said. Some of that,
                  however, was paid to Southern California Edison, which
still generates about 2,800
                  megawatts of power in the state.

                       Shares in Edison International have fallen 21% over
the past three weeks. They
                  closed Wednesday at $18.56, down $0.06.

                       -By Jason Leopold, Dow Jones Newswires; 323-658-3874;
                  mailto:jason.leopold@dowjones.com(Mark Golden contributed
to this article.)

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Edison Mission Energy Power Project Starts Construction After Expedited
Approval By California Energy Commission

 Monday December 11 6:39pm
 Source: Dow Jones

 Operation Targeted for August

 IRVINE, Calif., Dec. 11 /PRNewswire/ -- Edison Mission Energy (EME), an
Edison International company (NYSE: EIX), started construction of its new
 Sunrise power plant on Thursday, December 7, having received expedited
approval from the California Energy Commission (CEC) to proceed. The
 power generation facility will be located in Kern County, California, and
will bring both short- and long-term generation capacity to the state, which
is in
 dire need of new power generation.

 "From the onset of the California power crisis, we have sought to find
means to bring new power to the California market," said John E. Bryson,
 chairman and CEO of Edison International. "This CEC approval will help
ensure that this critical new project will be able to provide a significant
amount
 of new peaking power to the state as soon as next August. Our thanks and
appreciation go to the California Energy Commission, and the
 environmental and regulatory agencies for their swift consideration of this
important project."

 "This power has been offered by contract to the state so that the pricing
for it does not depend on California's broken deregulated power market,"
said
 Alan J. Fohrer, president and CEO of EME. "Alternatively, EME will seek to
enter into a long-term, cost-based contract with either Pacific Gas &
 Electric Company or San Diego Gas & Electric Company to further ensure that
California's consumers reap the benefit of this additional power
 resource," Fohrer said.

 The Sunrise Power Project will be completed in two phases. Phase 1 will
consist of a 320-megawatt (MW), simple-cycle peaking facility scheduled to
 be in service during the summer 2001. Phase 2 will convert the peaking
facility to a 560-MW, combined-cycle operation with an in-service date of
 summer 2003. The project will meet or exceed all pertinent environmental
and safety standards.

 Final regulatory approvals have been received for Phase I of the project
only.

 EME will be seeking expedited permitting approval for the Phase II
expansion in line with the fast-track approval process recently enacted by
the
 California legislature.

 EME has also negotiated an agreement with the labor unions for an adequate
supply of highly skilled labor in order to achieve an accelerated
 construction schedule. The accelerated schedule is aimed at providing this
additional power to California by next summer.

 Edison Mission Energy specializes in the development, acquisition,
construction management and operation of global power production facilities.
As
 one of the world's leading global power producers, Edison Mission Energy
owns nearly 23,000 megawatts of generating capacity, including interests in
 75 projects currently under construction or operating in Australia,
Indonesia, Italy, New Zealand, Puerto Rico, Spain, Thailand, Turkey, the
United
 Kingdom and the United States.

 Based in Rosemead, Calif., Edison International is a premier international
electric power generator, distributor and structured finance provider. With
a
 portfolio of approximately 28,000 megawatts, Edison International is an
industry leader in privatized, deregulated and incentive-regulated markets
and
 power generation. It is the parent company of Edison Mission Energy,
Southern California Edison, Edison Capita, Edison Enterprises and Edison
 O&M Services.

 /CONTACT: Kevin Kelley of Edison Mission Energy, 626-302-1033, Fax,
626-302-7827/ 21:35 EST

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Mark:  Did you have wind of Jason's story on Edison calling for an end to AB 
1890?  His spin on the story was good one---Edison got everything it wanted 
(out of 1890) and now it wants out of the contract.

The story seems worthy of a response, particularly since Jason's the 
reporter.  Even the Chair of FERC recognizes that going backwards is not the 
answer.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks for keeping us in the loop.  Good luck.

I'm available at 8 am (do while you're driving?) and will make my schedule 
flexible in the afternoon.

That was painful.

I feel so useless.  Thanks so much for taking charge of this and doing such a 
fantastic job.  Are you in close contact with Martin and Doug?

Jeannie:  Apologies.  Though I'm sure it doesn't seem like it, I'm on the 
job.  I'll try to get the numbers and I'll read the piece now.

Best,
Jeff

I was told that Lynch and Duque released press releases today saying that the 
Commission does not intend to let the utilities to go bankrupt.  Haven't been 
able to find any press releases on the CPUC website, however.

Professor Aceves:

Attached are a word and an excel file.  Both are formatted for easy print 
out.  Note that the excel file has two work sheets:  "balance sheet" and 
"income statement."  I'd be happy to provide you with a hard copy, too, if 
you would prefer a hard copy.  Just let me know.  Thanks for a great course.

All the best,
Jeff

dome was cool.  studied, got some shit cleaned up (cut up logs, torn down 
deck, etc.), picked lots of apples from my trees!  they're so good.  made to 
apple pies with your folks last nite.  one's at your house--apples, too.  
picked some killer huckles--gave them to your mom.  dove for abalone---water 
was HORRIBLE, though.  ate it last nite.  one in your refrigerator.  got 
killed in the pool.  annie ate rat poison, had to drive to S.R. sunday nite; 
got back about midnight.  you know, same ol' shit.  you?

Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com> on 09/05/2000 01:39:44 PM
I did not hear about the announcement - please send!!

C1 is doing a demo integration with us.  We are having a hard time getting a
booth at their conference, but at least we will be able to announce a loose
partnership with them.

We meet with Ariba tomorrow.

How was the dome?  San Diego was beautiful!

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT.COM
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

did they bite (i.e., commerce one)?  i'm very excited.  you hear about the
announcement this AM re: Ariba/IBM hooking up with Microsoft to create B2B
software?

Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com> on 09/02/2000 08:59:45 PM

 Well what?

Did you have a good time at the dome??

well?

Mary:  FYI.  Ms Mara's back.  Please include her on everything, too.  Thanks 
a million.

Best,
Jeff
	
Attached is a notice advising of a Public Meeting in San Diego regarding the
recent events in Caifornia's wholesale markets.

(See attached file: MS090100)

 - pic32767.pcx
 - MS090100

Hi.  I'm hear in Houston---currently at Elizabeth's desk.  Do we have a 
number for Sue Nord and Scott to call into?  Or are we just going to call 
them from the conference room?  I'll come look for you later.

Best,'
Jeff

Tracy McLaughlin@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
08/17/2000 10:16 AM
Hey Joseph

Could you give me the details (what/who/where/when) of the meeting that is 
supposed to be taking place tomorrow a.m. with respect to the California 
regulatory filing -- Scott bolton mentioned to me that there is a 
meeting/call taking place -- need to find out the info

thanks J

Tracy J. McLaughlin
Enron Broadband Services
Government Affairs Coordinator
(503) 886-0396 

Jeff

I found it
The RFP provided for our updating prices by noon today.  Here is what I sent 
out just a few minutes ago.  We don't know if they are going to disqualify us 
because we are not keeping our prices open, but we are trying to stay in the 
game.  (Jeff:  please forward tthis to Jim Steffes with a copy to me.  I 
can't find him in the Enron Corp. e-mail.)

C

You're welcome.  When would you like to talk re: Mr. Bray?  And please give 
me your number again---I've switched computers and gone to Windows 2000.  
What a bloody mess.

Best,
Jeff

Here it is.  And I have JUST been informed that I have to be on a conference 
call tomorrow from 1-2.  Could we do our call at noon or 2 pm California 
time?  Sorry for the inconvenience.

Best,
Jeff
Tracy Cooper@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
09/01/2000 05:56 PM
Rich and Jeff -- I apologize -- I left you off the original distribution that 
I sent about an hour and a half ago -- 

Thanks!

Tracy J. Cooper
Please note my name has changed from McLaughlin to Cooper
Enron Broadband Services
Government Affairs 
(503) 886-0396 

	Scott Bolton
	09/01/00 11:03 AM
		 
call me first  thanks 

You're a gem. 

jackasses?  that might not be a word we'd want to use in emails that might, 
shall we say, get into unfriendly hands....

Gary Ackerman <foothill@lmi.net> on 09/05/2000 02:37:49 PM
Please respond to foothill@lmi.net
They did it!  The jackasses changed the hearing date to Sept 12 as of 3
pm today.  A lady from FERC just called me to let me know.

My suggestion is we cancel our scheduled Board meeting, meet prior to
the 12th, and get our story in line.  Another notice will be published
by FERC regarding participation in the Hearing.

gba

Content-Transfer-Encoding: 7bit
X-Mozilla-Status2: 00000000

I just copied from the FERC's web page the following notice.  It appears
that FERC will hae a hearing in San Diego, possibly on Friday, Sept 15.
However, an earlier date is equally likely because all four
Commissioners are testifying at a Congressional Hearing in San Diego on
Sept 11.  I guess we need to agendize this for our next meeting, and if
the FERC holds its hearings on Sept 12, we may need to cancel our Board
meeting, and attend this.  I did call the office of External Affairs at
FERC to register WPTF as a speaker.  They were clueless, but promised to
call me back.

gba

                          UNITED STATES OF AMERICA
                    FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION

                        NOTICE OF PUBLIC MEETING ON
                        WHOLESALE POWER MARKETS AND
                    TRANSMISSION SERVICES IN CALIFORNIA

                            (September 1, 2000)

          On September 15, 2000, the Federal Energy Regulatory
     Commission is planning to convene a public meeting in San Diego,
     California to allow interested persons to give the Commission
     their views on recent events in California's wholesale markets.
     While the Commission is finalizing arrangements for a meeting on
     September 15th, the Commission may need to change the meeting to
     a different date within the week of September 11th.  A further
     notice will be issued confirming the date.  The meeting is
     scheduled to begin at 9:00 a.m., at the San Diego Concourse, the
     Copper Room, 202 C Street, San Diego, California 92101.  All
     interested persons may attend the meeting.  The meeting will be
     transcribed.  A separate notice will be issued before the
     meeting, setting forth an agenda and identifying the panels of
     participants.   Additional information may be obtained from the
     Office of External Affairs at (202) 208-0870.  Information also
     may be obtained from the Commission's web page at
     www.ferc.fed.us.

                           Linwood A. Watson, Jr.
                              Acting Secretary

Given that the hearing is Friday, we'll need to decide pretty quickly.   
Might be useful to discuss on a call first thing tomorrow AM?  We'll want to 
assure that our message is tracks consistently with message J. Skilling will 
be delivering this week and with other messages we'llbe delivering (e.g., 
FERC inquiry).  Also, attached are some messages that Jim distributed 
following a focus group conducted in Orange County.

Mona L Petrochko
09/05/2000 03:14 PM
I spoke w/ Bill Julian, Cmmr. Wood's Advisor, about the hearing that is being 
held on Friday, September 8 in San Diego.  There will be a morning panel and 
an afternoon panel.  The morning panel will discuss "pricing 
behavior/patterns" and the afternoon panel will provide 
explanations/refutations of the morning presentations.  I'm not sure yet who 
will be speaking, but I have inquired from Steve Weisman, who appears to be 
heading this effort.  

Do we want an Enron representative on the panel?  Who would be the best 
witness?

While this investigation has the opportunity to turn into a witch hunt, I am 
also concerned about the record being developed in such a way as to lead to 
the conclusion that Wood, or the legislature, have in mind.  This could mean 
an attempt by the Commission to assert more regulation in the market, assert 
more state (vs. federal) jurisdiction, build a case for collapsing the ISO/PX 
into one organization, or hang blame on generators and scheduling 
coordinators.

I think Tim and Mary's presentation would be very effective in showing the 
other (real) side of the story.

The following is an exerpt from the pre-hearing conference transcript held on 
8/28 from Cmmr Wood:

27               I am not going to sit here and say that it's not 

           28    an appropriate time to assign blame.  If there has been 

            1    wrongdoing, we will assign blame.  We will ferret out the 

            2    wrongdoers, and we will bring them to account to the 

            3    greatest of our ability. 

            4               But I think that, as Judge Wetzell pointed out, 

            5    the scope of this proceeding is quite broad.  We are not 

            6    only addressing the immediate issues, but we are also 

            7    addressing the underlying problems of this market which 

            8    clearly is not functioning, which clearly is broken. 

            9               We have to look at problems with the structure of 

           10    the market, we have to look at problems with the behavior of 

           11    market participants; and getting beyond the wholesale 

           12    market, we have to look at the interaction with the retail 

           13    market because, after all, that's where the pain actually 

           14    occurs.  That's what consumers themselves face.

           15               There are probably implications for the long-term 

           16    viability of California's utilities that are connected with 

           17    this proceeding, and we have to get into that.  And for that 

           18    reason, as well as the fact that the other utilities in 

           19    California are going to be coming out of the rate freeze at 

           20    some point in the future, we have to consider the statewide 

           21    implications of what we're doing. 

           22               So this is not just the San Diego proceeding, 

           23    although we are focused on events here in the San Diego 

           24    area.

Mona L Petrochko
08/30/2000 03:51 PM
Wood, the Assigned Commissioner in the investigation of wholesale electric 
markets, has asked for comments on the following questions by Friday, 
September 8.  We are an individual party to the case as well as a member of 
ARM and WPTF.  

This would be a good opportunity to get our version of what is wrong on the 
record.  The presentation that Tim and Mary put together for FERC will be 
helpful in answering these questions.  I will take a first cut at drafting 
response to be circulated by Tuesday of next week.  We can take liberties in 
providing responses that go beyond the question asked.

Market Structure:

Are the market conditions currently being experienced (price spikes and suppy 
shortages) inevitable under the current market structure?
Do generators and/or scheduling coordinators have market power?
Is there a need to mitigate such market power?
Which market participants or other entities are responsible for reliability 
planning?
Do California regulatory agencies have adequate jurisdiction to ensure 
reasonable prices and reliable service?
Do the structures and governance of the Cal ISO and PX adequately support the 
goals of providing reasonably priced and reliable service?

Market Rules:

Are there rules which allow or encourage unacceptable market outcomes?
What roles, if any, do underscheduling in forward markets, out of state 
transfers, uniform PX auction prices and ISO real-time and out-of-market 
purchases play in the outcomes being experienced?

Behavior of Market Participants:

What is working and not working in terms of price, reliability, information 
exchange, resource distribution, equity, service quality, and types of 
planned generation?

Greetings:

As part of our final tariff filing, we need to submit "sample" forms for 
things like a Disconnect Notice, Sample Bill and New Service Orders.? Do we 
have any?  Have we had to file any elsewhere?  If not, do we want Bowen & Co. 
to "create" some for us to review, or do we prefer to find the right folks 
internal to EBS and create them internally?  Make sense to arrange a 15-30 
minute call to discuss how to execute?  All opinions, views, etc. are 
encouraged and welcome.

Best,
Jeff

Ain't seen the joint resolution, thought my in-box is a mess.  Did you send 
that around?

Could you please see if you can get a copy (electronic) preferably of this?  
Greatly appreciated.
Kathy Ringblom@ENRON
09/05/2000 05:05 PM
I requested a copy of the filing from the CPUC - they are mailing it to me 
because they don't have a fax machine.  I hope this doesn't duplicate 
anything you've done.

	
	

Jeff and Jeff--Pls keep me and Kathy Ringblom posted on whatever you find.  
Thanks. DF

Jeffery Fawcett
09/05/2000 01:31 PM
Jeff,
Is it possible for TW to get a copy of the Edison filing at the CPUC?  While 
the article [shown below] doesn't provide any details, I suspect Edison's 
complaint echoes earlier allegations against El Paso regarding their sale of 
the 1.2 Bcf/d block of capacity to their affiliate.  I don't think 
Transwestern and/or Enron affiliate marketing companies are implicated in 
this deal at all.  

Can you confirm this is an "El Paso only" problem and not something Enron is 
being drawn into?  I really appreciate your help here.

   
	
	

Please get copies to me asap of the Edison motion and the CPUC FERC 
complaint.  Has someone, maybe someone at ENA, already looked at any 
allegations about Enron or TW?  Please forward these to Kathy Ringblom also 
and I'll have her itemize any allegations we might want to repond to.  
Thanks  DF 

ET & S Business Intelligence Department
Edison Charges Gas Market Manipulation

Southern California Edison filed a motion late last week with the California 
Public Utility Commission seeking emergency relief from high spot gas prices 
on which its power purchase rates are based. The company told the CPUC that 
Southern California Border (Topock, AZ) prices in the last month have risen 
by $2.50/MMBtu possibly because of market manipulation, in particular the 
withholding off of the market of pipeline transportation capacity between the 
supply basins and the California border. 

"[T]here is substantial and compelling evidence that the basis differential 
has been and continues to be grossly distorted by market power abuse, 
collusion and affiliate self dealing of out-of-state gas suppliers and 
merchants," Edison told the CPUC. 

The company noted the CPUC already has filed a Section 5 complaint with FERC 
regarding this issue and is seeking a recision of "certain allegedly 
collusive contracts which it contends have permitted out-of-state natural gas 
suppliers and their affiliates to drive up artificially California border gas 
prices by wrongfully withholding capacity." It notes the complaint 
"conservatively estimates that the anti-competitive manipulation of the basis 
differential has already damaged California gas and electricity users by $100 
million annually since the beginning of 1998." 

Edison seeks an expedited order authorizing it to use the posted gas price of 
$4.5133/MMBtu, which was applied to SCE's August 2000 avoided cost posting, 
to calculate its payment obligations to qualified power producers for the 
month of October and every month going forward. It estimated September 
bidweek border prices would average $7/MMBtu. If such prices were used in 
Edison's September avoided costs posting, its Transition Formula payments to 
certain independent power producers will be $29 million more than the month 
prior, the company told the CPUC. "No mechanism exists to recapture the 
increase in such payments if it is later determined by this commission or in 
another forum that the Topock border indices are unreliable at this time." 

AllanOri@aol.com on 08/17/2000 04:52:35 PM
Designed to be on my letterhead - it is from me.

 - one page CEC.doc

done at 9:30.  can you pick me up.  i'd love it.  check your voicemail, too.  
i left a message there.

Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/05/2000 05:42:28 PM
Are you there?  I'll be online for the next half hour or so.  Did you get
my message?  Dinner is at 8.  What time are you done with class?

Attached is a memorandum from Ellison & Schneider summarizing the California
EOB's FERC Bid Cap Complaint and the CALPX's Proposed Tariff Amendment on
bid caps.  Interventions are due Sept. 12 and Sept. 18, respectively.

Recently, IEP forwarded a Restructuring/Transmission Task Force
solicitatation seeking to raise funds to help fund IEP's intervention in
matters such as this.  To date, IEP has received two responses.  In the
absence of significant funding, IEP will be unable to utilize consultants to
help in the monitoring and filing of interventions in
restructuring/transmission matters.  We will endeavor to continue to keep
the members apprised of key issues through the use of in-house staff, but
resources will be limited and may make the preparation and filing of
interventions difficult.  For example, IEP is unlikely to file an
intervention at the FERC in response to the EOB and CALPX filings given time
and resource constraints.

If you are interested in funding additional support in this effort, please
respond ASAP to the solicitation distributed in August.  Thank you.

> Steven: attached is the memo we discussed in Word format.
>
> Andrew B. Brown
> Ellison, Schneider & Harris, LLP
> 2015 H Street
> Sacramento, CA  95814
> Phone: (916) 447-2166
> Fax: (916) 447-3512
> mailto:abb@eslawfirm.com
>
> CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE:  This communication and any accompanying
document(s)
> are confidential and privileged.  They are intended for the sole use of
the
> addressee.  If you receive this transmission in error, you are advised
that
> any disclosure, copying, distribution, or the taking of any action in
> reliance upon the communication is strictly prohibited.  Moreover, any
such
> inadvertent disclosure shall not compromise or waive the attorney-client
> privilege as to this communication or otherwise.  If you have received
this
> communication in error, please contact the sender at the internet address
> indicated or by telephone at (916)447-2166. Thank you.
>
>

 - 000901_IEP_memo_re_EOB-CalPX_FERC.doc

Jeff/Drew:

Been out all day.  Will get a copy.  I believe that Jeff's suspicions are 
dead on.  Given all the investigations regarding electricity "price spikes" 
in California, seems very likely that Edison feels the timing is right to 
push the gas issue.  Will confirm that it is targeted solely at El Paso and 
get back to you either way.  If there's anything else, just holler. Will keep 
you apprised of events as they occur.

Best,
Jeff

Jeffery Fawcett@ENRON
09/05/2000 01:31 PM
Jeff,
Is it possible for TW to get a copy of the Edison filing at the CPUC?  While 
the article [shown below] doesn't provide any details, I suspect Edison's 
complaint echoes earlier allegations against El Paso regarding their sale of 
the 1.2 Bcf/d block of capacity to their affiliate.  I don't think 
Transwestern and/or Enron affiliate marketing companies are implicated in 
this deal at all.  

Can you confirm this is an "El Paso only" problem and not something Enron is 
being drawn into?  I really appreciate your help here.

   
	
	

Please get copies to me asap of the Edison motion and the CPUC FERC 
complaint.  Has someone, maybe someone at ENA, already looked at any 
allegations about Enron or TW?  Please forward these to Kathy Ringblom also 
and I'll have her itemize any allegations we might want to repond to.  
Thanks  DF 

ET & S Business Intelligence Department
Edison Charges Gas Market Manipulation

Southern California Edison filed a motion late last week with the California 
Public Utility Commission seeking emergency relief from high spot gas prices 
on which its power purchase rates are based. The company told the CPUC that 
Southern California Border (Topock, AZ) prices in the last month have risen 
by $2.50/MMBtu possibly because of market manipulation, in particular the 
withholding off of the market of pipeline transportation capacity between the 
supply basins and the California border. 

"[T]here is substantial and compelling evidence that the basis differential 
has been and continues to be grossly distorted by market power abuse, 
collusion and affiliate self dealing of out-of-state gas suppliers and 
merchants," Edison told the CPUC. 

The company noted the CPUC already has filed a Section 5 complaint with FERC 
regarding this issue and is seeking a recision of "certain allegedly 
collusive contracts which it contends have permitted out-of-state natural gas 
suppliers and their affiliates to drive up artificially California border gas 
prices by wrongfully withholding capacity." It notes the complaint 
"conservatively estimates that the anti-competitive manipulation of the basis 
differential has already damaged California gas and electricity users by $100 
million annually since the beginning of 1998." 

Edison seeks an expedited order authorizing it to use the posted gas price of 
$4.5133/MMBtu, which was applied to SCE's August 2000 avoided cost posting, 
to calculate its payment obligations to qualified power producers for the 
month of October and every month going forward. It estimated September 
bidweek border prices would average $7/MMBtu. If such prices were used in 
Edison's September avoided costs posting, its Transition Formula payments to 
certain independent power producers will be $29 million more than the month 
prior, the company told the CPUC. "No mechanism exists to recapture the 
increase in such payments if it is later determined by this commission or in 
another forum that the Topock border indices are unreliable at this time." 

I can wait a little bit.  But let's coordinate, OK?

Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/05/2000 06:15:10 PM
Well, if dinner is at 8, I think I can probably pick you up at close to
9:30.  What if it's going to be a little later than that?  Would you rather
wait or take Bart?

At 06:04 PM 9/5/2000 -0500, you wrote:

>done at 9:30.  can you pick me up.  i'd love it.  check your voicemail,
>too.  i left a message there.
>
>
>
>
>Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/05/2000 05:42:28 PM
>

glad to hear that you're back, generalissimo.  we will follow you up the hill.

seriously, though, you will start seeing/hearing from us quite soon., e.g., 
skilling's at the national press club this thursday.

Jessie Knight <JKnight@sdchamber.org> on 09/05/2000 06:04:33 PM
Jeff,
     I chuckled to read about Dan being the center of Dante's Inferno core,
but quickly was overcome more by disdain of the simpleton Mr. Palast's
wretched journalistic license.  Why don't you get Skillings, Michaels,
McCrae, Levin et al to answer all the preposterous revisionist pablum that
is saturating the marketplace as we speak?  Is there or was there only one
Jessie Knight who lived that 6-year hell to have crap like this spread
about?  Where are all the direct access/bilateral
contract/anti-poolco/anti-Hogan/anti-Harvard Electricity Group/anti-command
& control proponents?  It is sad for me to hear the deafening silence out of
a community that I helped lead to battle and to leave and see that most have
abandoned the cause to leave it the world to the government infidels that
want to and will certainly re-create the Gulag.

Jessie J. Knight Jr.
President & CEO
San Diego Regional Chamber of Commerce

(See attached file: State Deregulates.doc)

Hi Darlin':

Thanks again for everything last night.  All kidding aside, I wish you all 
the best with your procedure tomorrow.  I'll be sending lots of positives 
vibes your way all day, and I'm sure we'll be up to see you this weekend.

Best,
Jeff

No duplication.  With both of us trying to dig up a copy, we're sure to find 
one!

Best,
Jeff

sorry, your mom kept the huckles. 

Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com> on 09/05/2000 04:00:16 PM
The apples and apple pie sound great.  And you made with mom & dad.
Everyone probably pitched in, right?  Sounds American as...

That's scary about Annie- I guess she is OK now.

I want the huckles - I would have made a sauce with them like I was going to
do last time (but you guys forgot and made other plans with Tom & Karen).

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT.COM
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

dome was cool.  studied, got some shit cleaned up (cut up logs, torn down
deck, etc.), picked lots of apples from my trees!  they're so good.  made
to apple pies with your folks last nite.  one's at your house--apples, too.
picked some killer huckles--gave them to your mom.  dove for
abalone---water was HORRIBLE, though.  ate it last nite.  one in your
refrigerator.  got killed in the pool.  annie ate rat poison, had to drive
to S.R. sunday nite; got back about midnight.  you know, same ol' shit.
you?

Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com> on 09/05/2000 01:39:44 PM

I did not hear about the announcement - please send!!

C1 is doing a demo integration with us.  We are having a hard time getting
a
booth at their conference, but at least we will be able to announce a loose
partnership with them.

We meet with Ariba tomorrow.

How was the dome?  San Diego was beautiful!

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT.COM
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

did they bite (i.e., commerce one)?  i'm very excited.  you hear about the
announcement this AM re: Ariba/IBM hooking up with Microsoft to create B2B
software?

Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com> on 09/02/2000 08:59:45 PM

 Well what?

Did you have a good time at the dome??

well?

Will do.

Drew Fossum@ENRON
09/05/2000 03:58 PM

Jeff and Jeff--Pls keep me and Kathy Ringblom posted on whatever you find.  
Thanks. DF

Jeffery Fawcett
09/05/2000 01:31 PM
Jeff,
Is it possible for TW to get a copy of the Edison filing at the CPUC?  While 
the article [shown below] doesn't provide any details, I suspect Edison's 
complaint echoes earlier allegations against El Paso regarding their sale of 
the 1.2 Bcf/d block of capacity to their affiliate.  I don't think 
Transwestern and/or Enron affiliate marketing companies are implicated in 
this deal at all.  

Can you confirm this is an "El Paso only" problem and not something Enron is 
being drawn into?  I really appreciate your help here.

   
	
	

Please get copies to me asap of the Edison motion and the CPUC FERC 
complaint.  Has someone, maybe someone at ENA, already looked at any 
allegations about Enron or TW?  Please forward these to Kathy Ringblom also 
and I'll have her itemize any allegations we might want to repond to.  
Thanks  DF 

ET & S Business Intelligence Department
Edison Charges Gas Market Manipulation

Southern California Edison filed a motion late last week with the California 
Public Utility Commission seeking emergency relief from high spot gas prices 
on which its power purchase rates are based. The company told the CPUC that 
Southern California Border (Topock, AZ) prices in the last month have risen 
by $2.50/MMBtu possibly because of market manipulation, in particular the 
withholding off of the market of pipeline transportation capacity between the 
supply basins and the California border. 

"[T]here is substantial and compelling evidence that the basis differential 
has been and continues to be grossly distorted by market power abuse, 
collusion and affiliate self dealing of out-of-state gas suppliers and 
merchants," Edison told the CPUC. 

The company noted the CPUC already has filed a Section 5 complaint with FERC 
regarding this issue and is seeking a recision of "certain allegedly 
collusive contracts which it contends have permitted out-of-state natural gas 
suppliers and their affiliates to drive up artificially California border gas 
prices by wrongfully withholding capacity." It notes the complaint 
"conservatively estimates that the anti-competitive manipulation of the basis 
differential has already damaged California gas and electricity users by $100 
million annually since the beginning of 1998." 

Edison seeks an expedited order authorizing it to use the posted gas price of 
$4.5133/MMBtu, which was applied to SCE's August 2000 avoided cost posting, 
to calculate its payment obligations to qualified power producers for the 
month of October and every month going forward. It estimated September 
bidweek border prices would average $7/MMBtu. If such prices were used in 
Edison's September avoided costs posting, its Transition Formula payments to 
certain independent power producers will be $29 million more than the month 
prior, the company told the CPUC. "No mechanism exists to recapture the 
increase in such payments if it is later determined by this commission or in 
another forum that the Topock border indices are unreliable at this time." 

I will check.  Good chance that I will be there, too.

Allison Navin@ENRON
09/05/2000 03:53 PM

Steve Kean will be in San Diego for the electricity hearing on the 11th.  Can 
either of you suggest a hotel in close proximity to the hearing site?  It 
will be held at the County Adminstration Center Building, 1600 Pacific 
Highway in San Diego.  Thanks.

call me at 415.505.6633.  thx, jeff d.

Jessie:  

Steve Kean and I need to be at the following address on the 11th:  County 
Adminstration Center Building, 1600 Pacific Highway in San Diego.  Can you 
recommend a hotel that's near by and tolerable.  Much appreciated. 

Best,
Jeff

My pleasure. Sounds like he's got a big job---glad that Enron can help....

Riccardo Bortolotti@ECT
09/04/2000 03:33 PM
Jeff,

thanks a lot for exceeding expectations .

Regards,

         R

Jeff Dasovich@EES
31/08/2000 16:49
Greetings Dr. Gobbo:

If my memory serves, you should have arrived back in Italy, or will return 
soon.  Since we met, I have spoken with Severin Borenstein, who is intimately 
involved with California's electricity restructuring (melodrama?) and a 
renowned energy economist  at UC Berkeley.  Severin has offered to serve as a 
contact for you as you continue to take on the formidable task of 
restructuring your country's electric industry.  I've included his contact 
information below.  And, of course, if there is ever anything I can do for 
you, do not hesitate to contact me.  

All the best,
Jeff

Severin Borenstein

E.T. Grether Professor of Business
  Administration and Public Policy   Director
Haas School of Business              U.C. Energy Institute
University of California             2539 Channing Way
Berkeley, CA 94720-1900              Berkeley, CA 94720-5180
(p) 510-642-3689                     (p) 510-642-5145
(f) 707-885-2508                     http://www.ucei.berkeley.edu/ucei

Email: borenste@haas.berkeley.edu
WWW: http://haas.berkeley.edu/~borenste

OK.

Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/05/2000 06:43:59 PM
Unfortunately, Christine lives in the hills and I'm pretty sure I won't get
cell service there.  How bout if I plan on picking you up at 9:30.  If I'm
going to be later than that, I'll leave you a message on your work
voicemail.  Right now, I'll try to find a place where my phone works so I
can call you.

At 06:20 PM 9/5/2000 -0500, you wrote:

>I can wait a little bit.  But let's coordinate, OK?
>
>
>
>
>Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/05/2000 06:15:10 PM
>

Getting you the info by the end of the week, or sooner, will not be a problem.

Michael Etringer@ECT

09/05/2000 03:37 PM

I forgot to give you an idea of the timing for the request I sent you 
earlier.  We are shooting to have the models completed this week.  The 
Alstrom deal was placed on a fast track last week.  If possible, it would be 
very beneficial to have your input by then.  Let me know your schedule.

Thanks again,
Mike

you might want to try using a landline phone, sweetie.  only 35 cents.  works 
great.

Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/05/2000 06:43:59 PM
Unfortunately, Christine lives in the hills and I'm pretty sure I won't get
cell service there.  How bout if I plan on picking you up at 9:30.  If I'm
going to be later than that, I'll leave you a message on your work
voicemail.  Right now, I'll try to find a place where my phone works so I
can call you.

At 06:20 PM 9/5/2000 -0500, you wrote:

>I can wait a little bit.  But let's coordinate, OK?
>
>
>
>
>Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/05/2000 06:15:10 PM
>

did you burn the man?  are we having lunch?  are you famous now?

i love you very much and miss you.

Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/05/2000 06:43:59 PM
Unfortunately, Christine lives in the hills and I'm pretty sure I won't get
cell service there.  How bout if I plan on picking you up at 9:30.  If I'm
going to be later than that, I'll leave you a message on your work
voicemail.  Right now, I'll try to find a place where my phone works so I
can call you.

At 06:20 PM 9/5/2000 -0500, you wrote:

>I can wait a little bit.  But let's coordinate, OK?
>
>
>
>
>Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/05/2000 06:15:10 PM
>

tomorrow is absolutely horrible for me.  let's talk in the am.  perhaps you 
and mona, sue and sandi can cover sans moi.

Haven't had a chance to read yet, but wanted to get to folks ASAP.
 - motion.doc

Everyone, meet everyone else's email address.  Thanks to one and all for the 
taking the time to discuss the issues.  Seems that the conensus is that the 
meeting was useful.  Have a great weekend.

Best,
Jeff

don't apologize.  more interesting when your blood boils.

Jessie Knight <JKnight@sdchamber.org> on 09/05/2000 08:04:54 PM
Sorry, I got worked up and my blood boiling.

Jessie J. Knight Jr.
President & CEO
San Diego Regional Chamber of Commerce

glad to hear that you're back, generalissimo.  we will follow you up the
hill.

seriously, though, you will start seeing/hearing from us quite soon., e.g.,
skilling's at the national press club this thursday.

Jessie Knight <JKnight@sdchamber.org> on 09/05/2000 06:04:33 PM

Jeff,
     I chuckled to read about Dan being the center of Dante's Inferno core,
but quickly was overcome more by disdain of the simpleton Mr. Palast's
wretched journalistic license.  Why don't you get Skillings, Michaels,
McCrae, Levin et al to answer all the preposterous revisionist pablum that
is saturating the marketplace as we speak?  Is there or was there only one
Jessie Knight who lived that 6-year hell to have crap like this spread
about?  Where are all the direct access/bilateral
contract/anti-poolco/anti-Hogan/anti-Harvard Electricity Group/anti-command
& control proponents?  It is sad for me to hear the deafening silence out
of
a community that I helped lead to battle and to leave and see that most
have
abandoned the cause to leave it the world to the government infidels that
want to and will certainly re-create the Gulag.

Jessie J. Knight Jr.
President & CEO
San Diego Regional Chamber of Commerce

(See attached file: State Deregulates.doc)

Jessie Knight, the CEO of the S.D. Chamber of Commerce recommends:

Stay at the hotel right here where the Chamber is located.  It is one
of the best and a 5 minute taxi away for you.  It is called the Whyndham (on
Broadway).  

Allison Navin@ENRON
09/05/2000 03:53 PM

Steve Kean will be in San Diego for the electricity hearing on the 11th.  Can 
either of you suggest a hotel in close proximity to the hearing site?  It 
will be held at the County Adminstration Center Building, 1600 Pacific 
Highway in San Diego.  Thanks.

I'm on the phone with Jim now.  If you want to contact him, I'd wait 5-10 
minutes and give him a call on his cell phone.

floated idea.  people like.  but.....(hate to sound like a broken record) the 
whole ball of wax from Enron's view regarding sponsorship, streaming, etc., 
will depend on the agenda/participants).  

looking forward to the call.  i'll only have 60 minutes max, however, so 
counting on you to facilitate forcefully.

The following article appeared in the Arizona Republic last week.  I will 
keep an eye out for the filing.

"Citizens Utilities says it won't triple its rates"

Citizens Utilities is assuring customers that it won't double or triple 
rates, even though the electric company is paying triple the normal amount to 
purchase energy.  Citizens recently announced a possible rate increase due to 
higher charges from its energy supplier, Arizona Public Service Co.  The 
company estimates it paid $19 million to APS for energy in June.  Citizens 
normally pays $6 million a month, spokesman Tom Ferry said.  Citizens 
customers can expect a rate increase, but the utility company is proposing to 
spread out the increases through a three year recovery period for the rate 
increase expected for June, July and August, Ferry said.

Citizens will file a plan requesting a rate increase with the ACC in a week 
or two.  Ferry wouldn't say what the rate increase would be if the ACC 
approves a shorter recovery period than the one Citizens proposes.  The 
earliest any rate increase could take effect would be February, an ACC 
spokeswoman said.  Ferry blamed the increase on a rise in summer temperatures 
and economic growth resulting in above-normal demand for electricity.

Lara:  I have rather hastily put this list together.  For that I apologize.  
Hope it is helpful.  The things on the list are ones that you've likely 
already considered.  Nevertheless, some of the issues we face in California 
include:

1. POWER PLANTS
The utilities' subs are building power plants; competitors (like Enron) are 
also trying to develop plants to sell power into both wholesale and retail 
markets.
The utilities control the interconnection of plants to the grid. 
The interconnection rules are currently so vague and ambiguous, that the 
utility could quite easily favor its generation sub over competitors.
This would have an effect on prices at both the wholesale and retail level 
(i.e., how do we know we've gotten the best generation deal if the utility 
can favor its subs plants via interconnection?).

2. DISTRIBUTED GENERATION
And the same goes for DG:  in California many are pointing to DG as a viable 
solution to the price spikes.
If the utility loses sales because a customer has installed DG on her 
premises as a hedge against price spikes, the utility will have an incentive 
to thwart interconnection of the DG unit.  (Recall that in many places, 
recovery of distribution costs is derived from kwh sales; and if sales go 
down, so can recovery of the utilities' distribution-related costs).
In addition, if someone attempts to install DG at the grid level (as opposed 
to on-site DG) and sell the DG power in wholesale and retail markets, the 
utility has the ability to frustrate the DG project via interconnection.  
This permits the utility to retain bundled service customers.  Utility 
control of DG Interconnection can also permit the utility to favor its DG 
subs.

3. INTERCONNECTION/VOLTAGE BUY-UP
And the same goes for the retail level---remember how SDG&E used 
interconnection to thwart our deal with South West Marine in San Diego. 
(Obviously, we're not doing these deals any more, but the interconnection 
caused us ultimately to lose the commodity deal, too.)

4. TRADING
PG&E and Sempra have developed significant trading units.  
Now that the utilities have been granted authority to buy outside the PX, the 
trading subs are getting more aggressive and vocal about the opportunity to 
sell the utility power via short and long term power contracts.  
Again, any sort of favoritism could do considerable harm to consumers and 
competition (through the shareholders of the utilities' parent would surely 
profit).

5. DISTRIBUTION
In general, the utilities control over distribution is complete and it's a 
problem (see DG, above, for example).  
Shouldn't state and federal policy makers at least consider doing the 
equivalent of FERC Order 888 (i.e., open access) at the distribution level?  
Right now, distribution is a real black box.

6. RETAIL
In California, the utility effectively controls customer sign-up, switching, 
information, and turn back.  The problems have been significant.

7. MARKET INSTITUTIONS
Finally, a big mistake in California was to replace one monopoly--the 
utility--with another--the PX.  
Because the utility has been forced to buy from the PX, and because the 
market structure in California gives customers no incentive to switch, the 
utility continues to control the overwhelming majority of the load in 
California.  
This gives the utilities monopsony power.  With that power, they can 
influence PX prices.  
Solution:  1) Don't make the PX a monopoly. 2) Create a system that provides 
customers with the incentive to switch.

If you have any questions, or if there's anything else I can do to help, 
don't hesitate.

Best,
Jeff

Plz see email.  Sent you info for u & Rick.  Best, Jeff

Hi Kevin:

Got your message.  I will be at the FERC hearing on Tuesday.  You like me to 
fill you in on what transpires?

Best,
Jeff

in conf. call hell.  can i fax for your review?

on its way.  plz review and call.  best, jeff

Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com> on 08/18/2000 10:31:52 AM
I have been told by the author's office that the Assembly is not going to 
bring
up the bill today.  Governor Davis is having a signing ceremony in Los Angeles
today for the new Caesar Chavez holiday so many of the latino members are out.
They need these members, baring a sudden change of heart by the Republican's,
in order to achieve a 2/3 vote.  However, the bill is still on file for
concurrence so we will monitor.  I'll let Sandi know.

Scott

jdasovic@enron.com wrote:

> Thanks a million.  That's not good that they don't intend to take a
> position on the bill, since what happens in S.D. could end up happening
> later behind PG&E and Edison, which could affect them significantly and
> negatively.  You may want to mention this to Sandi, who may want to follow
> up with Babs.  Thanks again for your help.  Any word on whether the
> Assembly is going to act today, and what they might act upon?
>
> Best,
> Jeff
>
> Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com> on 08/18/2000 09:21:58 AM
>

i expected as much.  and lunch?

Colleen Silva <Csilva@redsky.com> on 09/06/2000 03:50:49 PM
burning man was lofty, writer's conference was total debauchery, of course
i'm famous now...

did you burn the man?  are we having lunch?  are you famous now?

Jeff Dasovich
09/06/2000 03:02 PM
Lara:  I have rather hastily put this list together.  For that I apologize.  
Hope it is helpful.  The things on the list are ones that you've likely 
already considered.  Nevertheless, some of the issues we face in California 
include:

1. POWER PLANTS
The utilities' subs are building power plants; competitors (like Enron) are 
also trying to develop plants to sell power into both wholesale and retail 
markets.
The utilities control the interconnection of plants to the grid. 
The interconnection rules are currently so vague and ambiguous, that the 
utility could quite easily favor its generation sub over competitors.
This would have an effect on prices at both the wholesale and retail level 
(i.e., how do we know we've gotten the best generation deal if the utility 
can favor its subs plants via interconnection?).

2. DISTRIBUTED GENERATION
And the same goes for DG:  in California many are pointing to DG as a viable 
solution to the price spikes.
If the utility loses sales because a customer has installed DG on her 
premises as a hedge against price spikes, the utility will have an incentive 
to thwart interconnection of the DG unit.  (Recall that in many places, 
recovery of distribution costs is derived from kwh sales; and if sales go 
down, so can recovery of the utilities' distribution-related costs).
In addition, if someone attempts to install DG at the grid level (as opposed 
to on-site DG) and sell the DG power in wholesale and retail markets, the 
utility has the ability to frustrate the DG project via interconnection.  
This permits the utility to retain bundled service customers.  Utility 
control of DG Interconnection can also permit the utility to favor its DG 
subs.

3. INTERCONNECTION/VOLTAGE BUY-UP
And the same goes for the retail level---remember how SDG&E used 
interconnection to thwart our deal with South West Marine in San Diego. 
(Obviously, we're not doing these deals any more, but the interconnection 
caused us ultimately to lose the commodity deal, too.)

4. TRADING
PG&E and Sempra have developed significant trading units.  
Now that the utilities have been granted authority to buy outside the PX, the 
trading subs are getting more aggressive and vocal about the opportunity to 
sell the utility power via short and long term power contracts.  
Again, any sort of favoritism could do considerable harm to consumers and 
competition (through the shareholders of the utilities' parent would surely 
profit).

5. DISTRIBUTION
In general, the utilities control over distribution is complete and it's a 
problem (see DG, above, for example).  
Shouldn't state and federal policy makers at least consider doing the 
equivalent of FERC Order 888 (i.e., open access) at the distribution level?  
Right now, distribution is a real black box.

6. RETAIL
In California, the utility effectively controls customer sign-up, switching, 
information, and turn back.  The problems have been significant.

7. MARKET INSTITUTIONS
Finally, a big mistake in California was to replace one monopoly--the 
utility--with another--the PX.  
Because the utility has been forced to buy from the PX, and because the 
market structure in California gives customers no incentive to switch, the 
utility continues to control the overwhelming majority of the load in 
California.  
This gives the utilities monopsony power.  With that power, they can 
influence PX prices.  
Solution:  1) Don't make the PX a monopoly. 2) Create a system that provides 
customers with the incentive to switch.

If you have any questions, or if there's anything else I can do to help, 
don't hesitate.

Best,
Jeff

off that call and on another.  will call your cell soon as this one's done.

will that's some good news.  thanks.

Sue Mara called from the ISO:

The Market Issues Committee rejected lowering the price cap from $250.
The Market Issues Committe of the Board voted to extend the ISO price cap 
authority beyond October 15th, with no end date.
ISO Board will vote on these issues tomorrow.
75% chance that the ISO Board will adopt the Issues Committe's 
recommendations.

pleasure's all mine.  anything else i can do, just holler.

EBS Update
FERC Update (w/Sue)
Congressional and FERC hearings in S.D. next week
Gas Update

	Joseph Alamo
	09/06/2000 07:02 PM
	
LAST CALL FOR AGENDA ITEMS FOR TOMORROW'S STAFF MEETING!!!! Thank you!!!
	Joseph Alamo
	09/05/2000 04:33 PM
	
For the first time in quite awhile.......please forward to me your agenda 
items - if any - for the next Staff Meeting, currently scheduled for this 
Thursday, September 7th at 8:30 AM PDT.

Thanks in advance for assisting with this request.

Joseph Alamo
Sr. Administrative Assistant
Government Affairs - The Americas
San Francisco CA 

As you know, I have great interest.  However, I've checked flight schedules 
to come out Tuesday night, and to put it mildly, it's very ugly.  Seems like 
alot to arrive in D.C. around 3 AM only to turn around and head back to the 
left coast the next day at 3-4 PM.  But I think the meeting should go ahead 
and take place anyway.  Is there any chance that Lisa could get a phone in 
your meeting room so that I could participate by conference call?  Sorry for 
the headache.  Let me know.  Thanks again for the chat this PM.

Best,
Jeff

Paul Kaufman@ECT
09/06/2000 07:06 PM
By this e-mail I'm requesting that we all meet on Wednesday, September 13, 
2000, for breakfast to discuss the California/FERC wholesale issues that have 
been plaguing us and will plague us over the next year or so.   I suggest 
that the meeting be limited to:  (1) an identification of the inventory of 
forums we are facing; and (2) our allocation of resources to the inventory.  
If time permits, we can also have a substantive discussion of the issues.  In 
this regard, if its ready, we can present an overview of the California 
strategy that is being developed (initially) by Sandi and Jeff.   

Respond ASAP directly to Lysa Akin with your interest in participating in 
this meeting.

Lysa:  once we have a head count, please get us a meeting room and 
breakfast.  We'll need an easel with paper and markers. 

Great food for thought.  Thanks.  My only concern is timing.  Likely to be 
spending the balance of the week (tomorrow and Friday) on prep for the 
FERC/House subcomittee hearings. We can discuss further on the staff meeting 
call tomorrow.

Paul Kaufman@ECT
09/06/2000 07:16 PM
I'd like us to take a stab at drafting the California strategy so we can 
present initial thoughts at the meeting I'm hoping to set up next Wednesday 
in D.C.  (Discussed under separate e-mail).  To that end, I suggest the 
following outline for the strategy:

What are our specific business interests in California?  Let's be as specific 
as possible, but limit the list to "hot buttons."   In this regard, Jim 
Steffes identified "the imposition of price caps in the summer of 2001" as 
the hot button.  Are there others?  
What are the forums we expect will affect our business interests?
For each forum, how do we want to posture Enron?  Do we want to be the most 
aggressive company?  Do we want to act alone?  Do we want to work only in 
coalitions?  What about IEP?  What will motivate us to act independently?
What is our overall strategy?  Do we want to go back to our pre-1999 
rhetoric?  We can scream louder than anyone else that California didn't do it 
right..  Peace will be gone ... should we breach Steve K.'s promise to play 
nice?  Do we want to tear down AB 1890 or shore it up?  
Forum-by-forum identify our:  (a) goals; (b) strategy; (c) what we (Enron) 
want out of the forum.  For example, re:  the legislature, do we want to 
identify legislation that we will seek affirmatively?  If not, why not?

FYI.  Under the settlement with SoCal, PG&E and countless others, Altra was 
going to provide the platform for the (unregulated) secondary markets in 
intrastate storage, capacity and imbalance trading rights.  Altra declined 
and SoCal and PG&E will now look for someone else to provide the service.
Dear fellow signatories to the Comprehensive Settlement: 

On Friday of last week, SoCalGas and PG&E informed ALJ Biren that Altra had 
definitively declined to offer the electronic trading services that both the 
already-approved PG&E settlement and the pending SoCalGas/SDG&E Comprehensive 
Settlement contemplated would be provided specifically by Altra for at least 
an intial period.? Both SoCalGas and PG&E sent a letter and email to to the 
full service list yesterday (Tues, 9/5) informing parties of this development.

SoCalGas believes that some modification to the Comprehensive Settlement in 
necessary to take this development into account, and that we then need to 
file the modification as soon as possible with the Commission.? The ALJ has 
indicated to us that some formal filing with the Commission in response to 
this development will be necessary.

We want to work with the signatories to the Comprehensive Settlement to reach 
a consensus as soon as possible.? Our goal is to cause little or no delay in 
the processing of a decision on the Comprehensive Settlement.

What SoCalGas has in mind is modifying the settlement to remove the specific 
naming of Altra and to insert language saying that SoCalGas will select and 
contract with a third-party provider for a specified period of time, without 
identifying in the settlement who that will be.?? We also need to consider 
whether we should address in the revision to the settlement how we will 
handle the possibility that the third-party provider will not be ready to 
operate by the April 1, 2001 date the settlement provides for the monthly 
imbalance trading, OFO day imbalance chip trading, and storage rights 
trading.? SoCalGas is looking at interim arrangements that it could provide 
in-house starting April 1, 2001, until the third-party provider could begin 
service.? We also might consider what would happen if no third party provider 
can be found.

To avoid any claims that we have not complied with the settlement rules, 
today we mailed and emailed to the full service list a notice of a settlement 
conference for Wednesday of next week.? We want to file something with the 
Commission very promptly thereafter.

Please feel free to contact Glen Sullivan at 619-699-5027, Lad Lorenz at 
213-244-3820, Bob Betonte at 213-244-3832, or June Suwara at 213-244-3504 on 
this subject.? 

For those of you who have not heard, Brian Cherry has submitted his 
resignation from Sempra Energy's Regulatory Affairs Dept. and will be going 
to work shortly for PG&E in a similar capacity.

Thanks again. 

Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com> on 08/18/2000 10:31:52 AM
I have been told by the author's office that the Assembly is not going to 
bring
up the bill today.  Governor Davis is having a signing ceremony in Los Angeles
today for the new Caesar Chavez holiday so many of the latino members are out.
They need these members, baring a sudden change of heart by the Republican's,
in order to achieve a 2/3 vote.  However, the bill is still on file for
concurrence so we will monitor.  I'll let Sandi know.

Scott

jdasovic@enron.com wrote:

> Thanks a million.  That's not good that they don't intend to take a
> position on the bill, since what happens in S.D. could end up happening
> later behind PG&E and Edison, which could affect them significantly and
> negatively.  You may want to mention this to Sandi, who may want to follow
> up with Babs.  Thanks again for your help.  Any word on whether the
> Assembly is going to act today, and what they might act upon?
>
> Best,
> Jeff
>
> Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com> on 08/18/2000 09:21:58 AM
>

Dear Ms Leisure:

If you're still tanning, and still up for lunch, I'm game.  Besides, I owe 
you a beer.  Let me know.  Don't work too hard,

Best,
Jeff

ferget it.  i'm just as swamped.  i don't care if you've got a goddamed 
boyfriend and a busy job.  friday we're having coffee.  for 30 rotten 
minutes.  you name the place and the time.  

hugs and kisses,
jeff

Colleen Silva <Csilva@redsky.com> on 09/06/2000 04:17:16 PM
next week would probably be best, as i am swamped with hundreds of emails
and my project/beast... how are you and how is school?

i expected as much.  and lunch?

Colleen Silva <Csilva@redsky.com> on 09/06/2000 03:50:49 PM

burning man was lofty, writer's conference was total debauchery, of course
i'm famous now...

did you burn the man?  are we having lunch?  are you famous now?

Thanks, Sue.  Agreed.  

Also, I met today with Bowen & Co. re: interconnection.  We have some 
decisions to make on that front, too, which will also require a bit of 
discussion.  

Tracy, I'm sure that Scott's in Istanbul and Donald's in Marrakesh.  Could 
you try to track those two broadband cowboys down and see if we can set up a 
conference call for next Wedneday (hopefully, that's ample lead time)?  

Finally, the draft final tariff (in strike-out-underline form) will be ready 
for review by COB Friday.  I'll email it around.  Hope all is well with all.

Best,
Jeff

Hi Jeff,

Here are my votes:

If we have the documents in hand, great.  
If we don't have them in hand, asking Bowen to produce samples probably would 
do quite a bit to speed the process.   I assume he probably has a good idea 
of what they should look like.
A short call to be sure we're all on the same page is a good idea.

Best regards,

Sue

	Jeff Dasovich@EES
	09/05/2000 04:48 PM
		 
Greetings:

As part of our final tariff filing, we need to submit "sample" forms for 
things like a Disconnect Notice, Sample Bill and New Service Orders.? Do we 
have any?  Have we had to file any elsewhere?  If not, do we want Bowen & Co. 
to "create" some for us to review, or do we prefer to find the right folks 
internal to EBS and create them internally?  Make sense to arrange a 15-30 
minute call to discuss how to execute?  All opinions, views, etc. are 
encouraged and welcome.

Best,
Jeff

Please keep the following confidential.  

Jessie Knight called.  Here's the latest.  

Seems the Chamber of Commerce is going to launch a campaign with the 
following messages:  1) Deregulation must go forward, not back.  2) The 
transition will continue to be a bit bumpy.  3) The best option businesses 
and families have is to switch to an alternative service provider.  

The Chamber has cut deals with ESPs (I didn't get all the details, but sounds 
like an exclusive) according to which the Chamber will aggregate customers 
and deliver them to the ESPs.  I believe that The New Power Company will be 
one of those ESPs.  

Ray McNally's sister, who is one of our very satisfied rez customers in S.D., 
will appear at the press conference with the Chamber to announce the 
program.  They are attempting to launch the program and have the press 
conference this week.  

The Chamber is also launching a program to educate S.D. politicians and 
business leaders on the benefits of retail choice and how to benefit from it.

The Chamber is still looking for a business customer to appear with them at 
the press conference.

just goe your email.  all go well?  415.782.7822.

Thanks.  We're on the same page.  Already notified folks.  But given the 
witch hunt, figured we'd sit back and let things run their course.  

MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com> on 09/07/2000 12:03:27 PM

	
Jeff, this sounds like an opportunity for Enron on line.  We should bide our
time for now, but tell the guys in the server farms to gear up.  Mike
Dear fellow signatories to the Comprehensive Settlement:

On Friday of last week, SoCalGas and PG&E informed ALJ Biren that Altra had
definitively declined to offer the electronic trading services that both the
already-approved PG&E settlement and the pending SoCalGas/SDG&E
Comprehensive Settlement contemplated would be provided specifically by
Altra for at least an intial period.  Both SoCalGas and PG&E sent a letter
and email to to the full service list yesterday (Tues, 9/5) informing
parties of this development.

SoCalGas believes that some modification to the Comprehensive Settlement in
necessary to take this development into account, and that we then need to
file the modification as soon as possible with the Commission.  The ALJ has
indicated to us that some formal filing with the Commission in response to
this development will be necessary.

We want to work with the signatories to the Comprehensive Settlement to
reach a consensus as soon as possible.  Our goal is to cause little or no
delay in the processing of a decision on the Comprehensive Settlement.

What SoCalGas has in mind is modifying the settlement to remove the specific
naming of Altra and to insert language saying that SoCalGas will select and
contract with a third-party provider for a specified period of time, without
identifying in the settlement who that will be.   We also need to consider
whether we should address in the revision to the settlement how we will
handle the possibility that the third-party provider will not be ready to
operate by the April 1, 2001 date the settlement provides for the monthly
imbalance trading, OFO day imbalance chip trading, and storage rights
trading.  SoCalGas is looking at interim arrangements that it could provide
in-house starting April 1, 2001, until the third-party provider could begin
service.  We also might consider what would happen if no third party
provider can be found.

To avoid any claims that we have not complied with the settlement rules,
today we mailed and emailed to the full service list a notice of a
settlement conference for Wednesday of next week.  We want to file something
with the Commission very promptly thereafter.

Please feel free to contact Glen Sullivan at 619-699-5027, Lad Lorenz at
213-244-3820, Bob Betonte at 213-244-3832, or June Suwara at 213-244-3504 on
this subject.

For those of you who have not heard, Brian Cherry has submitted his
resignation from Sempra Energy's Regulatory Affairs Dept. and will be going
to work shortly for PG&E in a similar capacity.

can you give me a call when you get a minute---415.782.7822.  Thanks a bunch.

gramlr@pjm.com on 09/07/2000 01:01:04 PM
I said I would pass this around and put Shmuel into the mix to consider, but
that we're getting pretty tight and the academic spots have mostly been 
chosen.

 - CALIFORNIA.doc

Paul and Lysa:

I want to apologize in advance.  It now seems that FERC has realized that it 
has a biz meeting in D.C. on the 13th, which makes having a meeting in San 
Diego on the 12th somewhat difficult.  So, if FERC changes the date (again) 
and pushes the meeting back, I'll go to S.D. on the 11th to see Steve Kean 
testify and fly to D.C. on the evening of the 11th or morning of the 12th and 
attend Paul's meeting in person.  If they don't change the date and it stays 
on the 12th, I won't go to D.C. and will participate in Paul's meeting on the 
12th in D.C. by phone.  I'll let you know what FERC decides, when it decides 
it.

Exasperatedly yours,
Jeff

An excerpt from a SD Union Tribune article this morning, and I quote:

The governor will spend most of this month signing and vetoing hundreds of
bills passed by the Legislature before adjournment last week. He said he
will meet with power generators and "immerse" himself in the electricity
issue next month before proposing reforms in November.

"If people don't act responsibly I am going to name names and publish a list
out in my reception area," Davis said. "We have to do this together."

The governor said that ratepayers, utilities and power generators will all
have to "accept their fair share of pain." He called on all Californians,
including businesses and environmentalists, to act responsibly to bring
electricity supply and demand into balance.

Hinting at reforms, Davis said there may have to be a restructuring of the
industry-dominated Independent Systems Operator, created under deregulation
to run the transmission system and make some power purchases needed to keep
the grid operating.

"Over time I think deregulation will reduce bills," Davis said. "I wasn't
part of putting it in place. I have inherited this. But I believe it can
work."

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Associate
Edson+Modisette
916-552-7070
Fax- 552-7075
jmball@ns.net

Looks good.  I vote yes.

Mona suggested that it would be a good idea to try to schedule a separate 
meeting to discuss rather than attempt to do it during our weekly staff 
meeting.  Let me know if this date works.

FYI.
Susan M Landwehr
08/17/2000 11:36 AM
a little opinion piece from our friend at New Energy, Phil O'COnnor
We thought that you would find the attached Op-Ed piece that appeared in the
Chicago Tribune today of interest.

PLEASE DON'T SHOOT THE MESSENGER
DEREGULATION NOT THE PROBLEM
By Philip R. O'Connor. Philip R. O'Connor is president of Chicago-based
NewEnergy Midwest, the leading provid-er of...
August 17, 2000
The firestorm raging in the San Diego area that devours homes and likely
will be followed in the spring by mudslides that will carry homes into
ravines isn't what Midwesterners are used to.
But there's no blaming Bad Ol' El Nino this time. The firestorm that has
everyone pointing fingers has to do with electric power shortages, rolling
blackout warnings and summer utility bills that have soared two and
threefold over last summer's.
To avoid "wearing the jacket," (in our Chicago patois), California's
voter-shy public officials and utility executives are blaming Bad Ol'
Deregulation.
Understandably, but regrettably, the media have tended to follow the story
line that electricity deregulation is to blame. Such stories could well
create worry that deregulation in Illinois and elsewhere in the Midwest will
lead to San Diego-style problems.
If anything, deregulation in the Midwest is avoiding the fundamental errors
California made, not only during the two years of deregulation but during
the decade preceding deregulation. In the summer of 1998 the Midwest had
some close calls of its own when triple-digit temperatures drove wholesale
electric prices for certain midday hours to as much as 100 times the normal
price.
The reigning theories in the California panic today are much like the myths
that emerged in the Midwest back then. There were allegations of price
gouging by power producers and warnings that we were moving too fast toward
deregulation--even though there was no retail deregulation and competition
in the Midwest at that time. In fact, it was the lack of retail,
customer-level competition that allowed the wholesale market to fly
completely out of control. Since 1998, the Midwest has begun to get its act
together.
In California, the initial reactions are to put the toothpaste back in the
tube and to burn the witch. But my native state still will need to face up
to its legacy of thinking, "I'll do that tomorrow," while at the same time
trying to regulate free markets as if there were no tomorrow.
Deregulation, which started in California in the spring of 1998, is but a
messenger of painful truths. The truth is that the chickens are coming home
to roost and that any attempt to retreat into the past will produce more
power shortages and higher prices.
There are some big differences between Illinois, the first state in the
Midwest to open up the electric network for customer choice, and California,
the first state in the nation to open up the network for competition.
In spite of a booming California economy spurring massive increases in
electrical demand, not one new power plant came on line during the
1990s--and none since. California thought it could rely on power plants in
other western states, but those plants are now serving growing loads in
their own areas.
In Illinois and elsewhere in the Midwest, new clean natural gas-fired plants
are able to serve during periods of peak demand. Gov. Ryan has convened a
committee to review state and local government handling of proposed "peaker"
plants. It seems likely to keep strict environmental standards in place
while helping to identify ways to reduce uncertainties, speed up
approvals--or disapprovals--and thereby reduce costs and improve power
reliability.
While the Midwest is realizing the benefit of newly constructed transmission
lines that allow access by Chicago and other areas to competitive power
supplies, many areas in California, remain too dependent on just a few local
power plants.
In California, once a utility finishes collecting "stranded-cost" charges to
pay off investments in nuclear plants and high-cost power contracts, price
caps for plain, old utility service based on rates in place prior to
deregulation are lifted. That's why San Diego Gas & Electric, the first
utility to finish collecting stranded costs, merely had the job of acquiring
power in the wholesale market and passing along the cost to customers who
had not switched to new competitive suppliers.
In Illinois and Ohio, by contrast, utility rates are capped at reduced
levels for at least five more years for customers who do not switch.
Illinois and the Midwest have stayed away from such Rube Goldberg
contraptions as the California Power Exchange that was supposed to serve as
a sort of mandatory clearing house for wholesale power transactions but
instead became a sort of private regulator that regulated no better than the
government used to.
The rules of the game in the Golden State could not have been more skewed
against giving opportunities for customers to switch to new competitors or
to take other precautions to avoid high summer power prices during an
unexpected heat wave. My NewEnergy colleagues in California have faced an
ever shifting set of increasingly inhospitable rules. In Illinois, utilities
and new competitive suppliers, have had more flexibility to offer products
that let customers choose between fixed prices that balance out the ups and
downs of the market or prices that float with the seasons.
Importantly, Illinois regulators have been reasonably quick to approve
proposals that let utilities and new suppliers, such as my company, work out
contracts with commercial and industrial customers to reduce their
electrical demand during peak summer hours in return for payments. Such
arrangements, less available in California, are key to avoiding blackouts
and blunting big-price spikes.
As chairman of the Illinois Commerce Commission from 1983 through 1985, I
remember when the costs of new nuclear plants showed up in electric
rates--today's stranded costs. I know what California utility commissioners
must be going through as they seek solutions for problems with roots going
back at least a decade. They'd better have thick skins and nimble minds.
I'll never forget former Gov. Jim Thompson, whose 1982 campaign I co-managed
and who appointed me to the ICC, saying, after several big rate increases,
the political equivalent of "I've never seen this man before in my entire
life." Having been yelled at on the bus by angry consumers a few times on
the way to the office, I could only be happy that Thompson had the good
political judgment to say, "I know not the man," on his own without my
prompting. I felt proud, not betrayed.

David I. Fein
PIPER MARBURY RUDNICK & WOLFE
203 North LaSalle Street
Suite 1800
Chicago, Illinois  60601
312-368-3462
(Fax) 312-630-7418
david.fein@piperrudnick.com

The information contained in this communication may be confidential, is 
intended only for the use of the recipient named above, and may be legally 
privileged.  If the reader of this message is not the intended recipient, you 
are hereby notified that any dissemination, distribution, or copying of this 
communication, or any of its contents, is strictly prohibited. If you have 
received this communication in error, please re-send this communication to 
the sender and delete the original message and any copy of it from your 
computer system.
Thank you.

For more information about Piper Marbury Rudnick & Wolfe, please visit us at 
http://www.piperrudnick.com/

would seem useful if we all contribute in some manner, but i'm open to 
suggestions.  perhaps we could divvy up the questions.

Dylan Windham <dwindham@uclink4.berkeley.edu> on 09/07/2000 04:50:31 PM
Hello,

I have started to look at the case assignment for Monday.  Since, I will be
out of town the following week I will volunteer to write this one up.  I
don't know how he want to divvy up the work (by Questions or everyone does
it all), but let me know.  I have already made a spreadsheet with the
combined cash flow statement that I will send to you tomorrow.  Let me know
how we want to handle this.

--Dylan

Ofc. Dylan H. Windham
Threat Management/Domestic Violence Unit
University of California Police - Berkeley
Room 1 Sproul Hall
Berkeley, CA 94720
(510) 642-1606

I'll be in S.D. on Monday to watch.  What time do you go on?

Ariba Hits Some Speed Bumps on the Fast-Growth Highway 
By Joe Bousquin 
Staff Reporter
9/7/00 3:21 PM ET 
URL: http://www.thestreet.com/tech/internet/1070107.html

SAN FRANCISCO -- In a sign that the business-to-business software game is 
tough even when you're on top, Ariba (ARBA:Nasdaq) has been running into 
problems this summer, both at home and abroad. 
Ariba told analysts and investors at a private breakout session here Tuesday 
at the Robertson Stephens Internet Conference that its business in Europe 
this summer has been "soft," according to Eric Upin, an analyst at the firm. 
And at home, analysts are starting to talk about problems the company has had 
integrating its Tradex software into its own and customers' systems. 
An Ariba spokeswoman didn't immediately return a call seeking a comment. 
The challenges Ariba is facing illustrate how difficult it can be to stay 
ahead of the game in an emerging industry, even for one of its most 
aggressive leaders. And they come at a time when its main competitor, 
Commerce One (CMRC:Nasdaq), is gaining momentum in key markets -- including 
Europe -- through its partnership with German software maker SAP (SAP:NYSE 
ADR). 
Upin, who rates Ariba a buy and lists the company as one of his top B2B 
picks, says the new concerns have to be taken in context. (His firm hasn't 
performed underwriting for the company.) 
"Ariba's just getting ramped up in Europe, and Europe's slow during the 
summer. It's a tiny part of their business," Upin said. "But there was 
concern because Ariba was saying that business was soft [in Europe] in 
August." 
That concern has been reflected in Ariba's stock, which is trading just under 
$162, off from its Sept. 1 close of $166.25. It fell 6.1% Wednesday after the 
breakout session, though it's up about 3% Thursday. With the stock trading at 
more than 70 times next year's projected sales, it's priced to perfection. 
Ariba's softness in Europe comes at a time when Commerce One has been making 
strides there. Its partnership with SAP has resulted in six new customers so 
far. Commerce One also announced a joint marketing and sales alliance with 
Intershop, another German software maker, on Thursday. 
At home, Ariba has been encountering problems in integrating its Tradex 
software, which enables users to participate in auctions over the Internet, 
into its customers' systems, as well as into its own software platform. 
Ian Toll, an analyst at Credit Suisse First Boston, says those problems 
shouldn't be viewed as too much of an impediment for Ariba. But they do 
illustrate the complexities of building software that is designed to do 
everything from manage back-office accounting systems to trade real-time with 
outside partners. 
"Implementation has certainly been a concern with Tradex," Toll said. 
"Certain Tradex customers have highlighted what appear to be longer time 
lines than they had hoped for. But I think that's true across competing 
vendors as well." (Toll rates Ariba a buy, and his firm hasn't done 
underwriting for the company.) 
While Ariba issued a news release Thursday crowing about how drugstore 
operator CVS (CVS:NYSE) recently went live on its Ariba Buyer software in 
just 60 days, observers say that getting Tradex installed and working is 
taking closer to six months. In the hard-charging world of B2B, that's an 
eternity. 
Ariba completed its acquisition of Tradex in March. Ariba has hailed the 
acquisition as one that gives it best-of-breed auction capability, which it 
would integrate into its own suite of software products. But competitors, 
most notably Oracle (ORCL:Nasdaq), pooh-poohed the deal, saying that 
stringing together complex technologies through acquisitions is easier said 
than done. 
And in its most recent quarterly results release, when it reported record 
revenue of $80.7 million that was backed up by $153 million in deferred 
revenue, the company cautioned that integration of Tradex could be a 
stumbling point. 
In the release's boilerplate section that noted that actual results could 
differ from projections, Ariba said those differences could result from, 
among other things, "difficulties in assimilating companies recently 
acquired, including Tradex." 
Despite the problems, though, analysts are still positive on the company. 
"Ariba could be the next Oracle," Robbie Stephens' Upin said. "And there were 
quarters when Oracle promised and didn't deliver or it missed altogether. But 
even for an Ariba, there will be those bumps along the road." 
But as competition increases in the B2B sector, those bumps are getting more 
pronounced. 

Looks like I won't be going to Washington, but I will participate in the 
strategy meeting by phone on the 12th.

	
Here's the latest info. about the FERC meeting.  Only Commissioners and their
Staffs will be attending, no additional FERC Staff (no one from the Office of
Markets and Tariff Rates).  The Meeting is mostly an opportunity for customers
to blow off steam.  Presentations will be made by the three IOUs, one 
generator,
one marketer (Enron) and one ESP, UCAN, and various politicians.  When I get 
the
list I'll forward it.  Each presenter will have about five minutes with no
questions from the audience.  Panelists should expect questions and discussion
among panelists or in response to Commissioner's questions.

Attached is the latest FERC notice about the California meeting.  It 
recognizes
that there may be discussions about pending FERC cases.  This does not mean 
FERC
will be grilling our panelist about these cases.  Rather, FERC has to issue 
this
notice so if someone talks about an issue pending in one of those cases, the
Commissioners don't violate the government in the sunshine rules.

(See attached file: EL00-91.1)

 - EL00-91.1

Folks:

My apologies in advance if I vent somewhat.  

Briefly, some of you know that I attended Berkeley's Policy School.  I have 
been very closely involved with the conference Severin describes in his note 
to Littlechild.  I have been working to try to establish a joint venture 
between the policy and business schools at Berkeley to hold an "energy 
summit," where national and international energy leaders would converge on 
California (under the auspices of UC Berkeley) to talk energy policy.  Jim 
Steffes has helped a lot in brainstorming the idea.  In short,, our goal was 
to have a group of prominent folks squarely refute the extremely retrograde 
notions of "turn the clock back" that the Governor of California's two most 
recent appointees have been articulating at every opportunity over the past 
several months, and re-seize the agenda in California. The "energy heads of 
state" at the summit would come up with solutions for going forward.

The concept (and invitees) that Severin describes is loosely based on 
proposals I have made to the "steering committee."  However, for reasons I 
won't bore you with in this note, the effort has frankly turned into a 
fiasco.  I notified the group this week that Enron would not be 
participating, that they should go forward with the conference without us, 
and that I would help somewhat (contacts, etc.) when (and if) they ever came 
to agreement on the agenda and particpants.  From my perspective, the effort 
turned out to be a rather big disappointment.  I urge us not to get involved 
or contribute $$s.  At this juncture I would recommend against having Ken Lay 
participate.  Depending on how the thing shapes up, we may  or may not want 
to have someone at a substantially lower level participate, but I'm 
pessimistic at this point.  If anyone would like to discuss my reasons in 
more detail, I'd be happy to discuss.

I still think the idea of an energy summit is very promising.  But the forum 
that these folks are creating ain't the right one.

Best,
Jeff

Mark Schroeder@ECT
09/08/2000 04:09 AM
Please see Professor Littlechild's note to our former Deputy Chairman for 
Enron Europe, Ralph Hodge.  Ralph is no longer with us.  Let me know if you 
would like to support ($$) Littlechild coming to California.  He was a 
somewhat passive regulator (too academic), but is a credible authority, 
having written what is regarded as one of the seminal works on incentive 
regulation, which is the model in use in the UK.   He likes Enron, and has 
been trying to get us to pay him for some work for some time.  No need for it 
here in the UK, but I would use him in emerging markets given the 
opportunity.  Let me have your thoughts at your earliest convenience.  
thanks  mcs 

Dear Ralph
?
I have just written a?paper on retail  competition in electricity, arguing 
that Joskow, Hogan and Ruff, and California,  have got it all wrong, both in 
theory and in practice.? It is forthcoming  shortly in the DAE and Judge 
Institute working paper  series at Cambridge, but I thought you might like to 
see a copy now  (attached).
?
This is obviously a hot issue in California at  present, and this morning I 
received an invitation to  participate?in a debate there in November  (copy 
forwarded separately). It seems that Enron is also to be invited. I have  no 
other commitments in the US at that time.? Is is something that Enron  might 
be interested in supporting, or for that matter developing  further?
?
We spoke some time ago about the Common Carriage  Consultative Working Group 
at Ofwat. I did in fact aprticipate in that, along  with Kyran Hanks. It was 
a real eye-opener, to see how little awareness there  was of the basic 
conditions conducive to competition, like separate businesses  and accounts.? 
I'm not sure whether Enron is pursuing this now or not. No  doubt lots of 
other things going on.
?
I should be interested to hear from you on retail  competition.? I am copying 
this to Mark Schroeder and Kyran.
?
With regards
?
Stephen
 - Summary 22Aug2000.doc
 - Why we need electricity retailers 22Aug00.doc

Rick:  Thanks very much.

Rick Johnson@ENRON
09/08/2000 11:35 AM
Jeff, per your recent voice mail,  below you will find the labor relationship 
summary that I prepared for Sandy.  
Hope it is helpful, please call if I can be of any assistance. Rj. 

Rick Johnson
08/29/2000 07:16 PM
Sandy, I was again disapointed to hear that Union leaders are accusing Enron 
as being unfriendly to Labor.  In the last 20 months we have pursued 
construction on over 3000 MW of new generation capacity.  
Enron Development Activity subject to Building & Construction Trade Labor 
Agreements
California 
 500 mw - PDEF - FeB. 99
 750 mw - PEF - Feb. 2000
Indiana
 550 mw- Westfork Development -  Oct. 99
Illinois
 680 mw - Lincoln Energy Facility - Nov 99 
Tennessee
 540 mw -  Gleason Power I - Oct 99
Oregon 
 240 mw - Coyote II (planned January 2001)
 Ethynol Plant - Columbia County - Baugh Const. June 2000

Hopefully this will prove to be valuable information:  In addition to the 
direct agreements, Enron is pursuing third party projects in Chicago and New 
York City that will be subject to labor agreements.

If the parties are interested, feel free to have them contact me directly 
503-464-7548
Regards, Rick Johnson

Thanks very much.

Thanks, Cynthia.  Extreme rhetoric likely from Ms Lynch, CPUC Prez, UCAN and 
Sempra chief (Steve Baum).  Rest of panel looking pretty good.  Might be 
useful to let Smutney do at least the lion's share of the "responding" to Ms 
Lynch's and Mr. Baum's rabid attacks on generators.  Smutney's had a lot of 
practice in the last couple of months and he's close to the issue.  But, of 
course, a few well placed jabs, couldn't hurt....

Cynthia Sandherr@ENRON
09/08/2000 12:23 PM

Steve:  here's the witness list as discussed for Monday, September 11th's San 
Diego hearing.
We have not finalized who is on what panels.  Following are the 16
witnesses:

4 FERC Commissioners
Cal PUC Chair
Cal Energy Commission Chair
Cal ISO CEO
Cal PX
SDG&E
Reliant
Enron
Solar Turbines
Oracle
Jan Smutny-Jones as head of Cal Independent Energy Producers
restauranter Roy Tyler of Tyler's Taste of Texas (no, we didn't plan that)
Utility Consumers Action Network

I do plan on accompanying Steve.  Steve, you want me to bring the copies.  Be 
glad to.  What time does the party start?

Cynthia Sandherr@ENRON
09/08/2000 12:38 PM

Jeff:  will you accompany Steve?  If so, the Committee needs you to bring at 
least 75 copies of the attached testimony with you to give to the Committee 
Clerk to "satisfy the anticipatied public interest."  I would suggest you 
bring more.....
Elizabeth Linnell
09/08/2000 12:44 PM
Sent by: Elizabeth Linnell
Attached is the final version.

Attached are the draft message points.  As always, all comments, suggestions, 
etc. are encouraged and welcome.  I have five minutes.  Consequently, based 
on what other panelists say, and general tenor of the hearing, may end up 
emphasizing some points more and others less in opening, and use any Q & A to 
round things out.  Joe/Mary:  any final word on format/participants?  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

AllanOri@aol.com on 08/17/2000 04:52:35 PM
Designed to be on my letterhead - it is from me.

 - one page CEC.doc

Do we know what time the party starts?

i'll call my folks right now.

Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/08/2000 02:58:45 PM
Hi.  Cameron can't go to the game -- she's in Boston.  I don't have anyone
to go with me.  My dad is planning on selling the tickets to someone he
doesn't even know.  Do you want to find out if anyone in your family wants
to use them?  He needs to know in the next half hour.

just remembered that my folks are in connecticutt.  if you want to go to the 
game, i'll go with you.  can you call me (from a land line phone)?

Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/08/2000 02:58:45 PM
Hi.  Cameron can't go to the game -- she's in Boston.  I don't have anyone
to go with me.  My dad is planning on selling the tickets to someone he
doesn't even know.  Do you want to find out if anyone in your family wants
to use them?  He needs to know in the next half hour.

John/Gia:

You asked that we attempt to evaluate our activities.  Working with TW, I've 
valued this one.

The California Commission ruled that the "Hector Road" natural gas recent 
point in California ought to be made a primary receipt point.  This would 
have had the effect of TW losing access right to 200 MMcf/d of capacity at 
SoCalGas' Needles receipt point.

Best case scenario:  Under SFV rates, loss to TW is commodity rates (wash) 
and the fuel margin.  TW calculates the fuel margin to be $5.8MM/yr.

Bad case:  If shippers on TW try to make the case that TW is at fault for 
losing the primary access rights, then TW is at risk for the demand component 
of the contracts associated with the 200 MMcf/d.  TW calculates the demand 
charges loss to be $16.5 MM/yr.

Worse case:  In addition to actual damages listed above, shippers face 
performance penalties and other contractual damages (from their customers) 
and they try to pass those costs on to TW.

I discussions with TW, we concluded that the most likely case fell between 
"best" and "bad," somewhere in the $12-15MM/yr range.

TW believes that without the assistance of CA Gov't Affairs in the case, the 
$12-15 MM/yr would have been lost.  

Be happy to discuss with you further.

Best,
Jeff

I'm working on my assistant's computer, who has sharing rights to my email.  
How's it going?

arrive S.D. Sunday nite.  staying at wyndahm on Broadway.  Breakfast?

Hey, sounds like life in Bay Watch is treating you well.  Glad to hear you've 
got some classes--8 units?  You really are a bit of a Type A+.  Week after 
next would be best for lunch.  Next week is completely nuts.  I may miss both 
Monday and Tuesday.  Happy hour is a great idea.  I think it's your turn to 
organize.  Have a super weekend  (I've caught a cold, and haven't cracked a 
book since school started, so looks like I'll be buried in books all weekend).

Best,
Jeff

P.S.  "Sent by Joseph Alamo" because my computer has completely died, and I'm 
using my assistant's computer.

Courtney Abernathy <courtney_abernathy@yahoo.com> on 09/08/2000 08:18:01 AM
Thanks for the invite.  I'm still beached. Did a
little shopping yesterday.  Cleaned up a photo albumn.
  I'm actually beginning to enjoy this.  Training
starts next week, and work will start the week after.
Thus all the fun ends.  Hey I got into business law,
and Managing in the Internet Age, and Diverity
Management.  Went from 0 units to 8.  If I can handle
it, I want an early graduation.
I have to drive over to Haas today and pick up my
b-law book so I'm not too buried next week.
It looks like I'll be spending my days in the city for
at least while after next week, perhaps lunch then?
We need to have a happy hour sometime very soon too.
Talk to you soon..Oh-I spotted the chantrelle
mushrooms in the grocery store yesterday and thought
of you mushroom picking.

Courtney

--- Jeff Dasovich <jdasovic@enron.com> wrote:
>
>
> Dear Ms Leisure:
>
> If you're still tanning, and still up for lunch, I'm
> game.  Besides, I owe you a
> beer.  Let me know.  Don't work too hard,
>
> Best,
> Jeff
>
>

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Yahoo! Mail - Free email you can access from anywhere!
http://mail.yahoo.com/

Hi.  I'm going to forward you a bunch of stuff, starting with this.  Hope you 
and yours are doing well.

Best,
Jeff
Susan J Mara
09/08/2000 02:13 PM
Steve, thought you should see this for Monday.
Mary Hain@ECT
09/08/2000 01:48 PM
FYI

MEMORANDUM

TO: Regulatory Affairs Committee

FROM: Don Santa, Regulatory Affairs Committee Chair
             Joe Hartsoe, Power Marketers Working Group Chair
             Julie Simon, Vice President of Policy

DATE: September 8, 2000

RE: California: The Real Story

Attached is the final version of California: The Real Story.  It will be 
distributed in San Diego next week at both the Congressional field hearing 
(September 11th) and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission meeting 
(September 12th).  EPSA will also file the document next week at the 
California Public Utilities Commission in docket I00-08-002, the Commission's 
investigation into the functioning of wholesale electric markets and the 
associated impact on retail rates.
Thank you all for your help in finalizing the document!

Jacqueline Gallagher
Research/Policy Assistant
Electric Power Supply Association
1401 H Street, NW
Suite 760
Washington, DC  20005
202.789.7200
202.789.7201
jgallagher@epsa.org

 - California The Real Story 9-00.doc

Monday--S.D. at congressional hearing w/S. Kean
Tuesday--S.D. appearing at FERC hearing
Wed--In office
Thur--In office--Meeting with LECG re: study on competition v. command and 
control
Frid--In office

Elizabeth Linnell@ENRON
09/08/2000 11:44 AM
Sent by: Elizabeth Linnell@ENRON
Attached is the final version.

	Joseph Alamo
	08/28/2000 12:33 PM
	
Jeff - 
here are the computer people I've been speaking to (Note:  you may want to 
review your Voice mail first for the message 
I just forwarded to you from Emory --- perhaps *that* will rectify your 
problem!)  Joseph

Texas techs:   Bill Cain   713.646.9567
    pager:   713.639.8564
  Mike Fernandez  713.853.7740
  Emory   713.345.3578

Jeff Dasovich
09/08/2000 01:03 PM
Attached are the draft message points.  As always, all comments, suggestions, 
etc. are encouraged and welcome.  I have five minutes.  Consequently, based 
on what other panelists say, and general tenor of the hearing, may end up 
emphasizing some points more and others less in opening, and use any Q & A to 
round things out.  Joe/Mary:  any final word on format/participants?  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

Greetings folks.  We should decide how we want to handle.  One thing I'm not 
clear on and that I couldn't find in the syllabus is, what's the format for 
the write up?  If we're called on to discuss, do we simply discuss orally, 
some sort of simplistic PP slides, spreadsheets, other?  Anyway to discuss 
between now and Monday, or do we want to just take Dylan up on his offer?

Best,
Jeff

Kimberly Kupiecki <kkupiecki@arpartners.com> on 09/07/2000 06:56:44 PM
Hello all,

I will take a look at the case tonight.

Divvying is fine with me.

At 03:22 PM 9/7/00, jdasovic@enron.com wrote:

>would seem useful if we all contribute in some manner, but i'm open to
>suggestions.  perhaps we could divvy up the questions.
>
>
>
>
>Dylan Windham <dwindham@uclink4.berkeley.edu> on 09/07/2000 04:50:31 PM
>
Kimberly Kupiecki
Senior Account Executive
A&R Partners
kkupiecki@arpartners.com
(650) 762 2800 main
(650) 762 2825 direct
fax (650) 762 2801

Susan J Mara
09/07/2000 04:08 PM
This is hot off the website.  WIll be discussed at ISO Board meeting today.  
Regulators will be very interested in this.

If there's other stuff you need, or if you'd like to discuss, don't 
hesitate.  Best, Jeff

Greetings.  Kim's stuff looks pretty good to me.  There's a pretty high 
likelihood though that I won't be in class Monday or Tuesday either.  That 
means I can't turn in whatever it is we're turning in tomorrow (if I sound 
clueless, it might be because he ran out of handouts in the first class 
describing how the cases would work, and there's nothing posted on the 
site--apologies).  I can do the write-up for next week.

Kimberly Kupiecki <kkupiecki@arpartners.com> on 09/09/2000 09:02:50 PM
Hello fellow E220 mates,

Attached are my attempts at Q1 and Q3.  I will not be in class Mon or Tues.

Jeff, can you hand the case in?

I am happy to take a crack at the other questions, let me know if you would
like me to help out there.

The xcel file is a little messy, it was really just a work sheet to play
around with the numbers, but you are welcome to it.  In terms of format,
since there is no guidance, I say we do it however we want.  We could
answer the questions in prose style, for example.  The write up should be
no more than a page and a half - but that is just my humble opinion.

Cheers,

At 12:40 PM 9/9/00, jdasovic@enron.com wrote:

>Greetings folks.  We should decide how we want to handle.  One thing I'm
>not clear on and that I couldn't find in the syllabus is, what's the format
>for the write up?  If we're called on to discuss, do we simply discuss
>orally, some sort of simplistic PP slides, spreadsheets, other?  Anyway to
>discuss between now and Monday, or do we want to just take Dylan up on his
>offer?
>
>Best,
>Jeff
>
>
>
>
>Kimberly Kupiecki <kkupiecki@arpartners.com> on 09/07/2000 06:56:44 PM
>
 - E220 Case 5-1 Northrop.xls
 - E220 Case 5-1Northrop.doc

Kimberly Kupiecki
Senior Account Executive
A&R Partners
kkupiecki@arpartners.com
(650) 762 2800 main
(650) 762 2825 direct
fax (650) 762 2801

Jeremy Meier <jermeier@earthlink.net> on 09/08/2000 09:10:55 PM
Jeff:

Attached please find the revised tariff(s) to be filed once we get the
final order - we are going to add to it and send you more on Monday.

Jeremy
B & C

 - enron CaliforniaTariffSept.doc

Thanks, Dylan.  In the event I can't make to either class, I'm available Wed 
and Thur evening to discuss the next case.  And as I mentioned, I'd be happy 
to write that one up.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks very much.  Now I just need to get the workspace view I had before you 
had to re-install notes.

Best,
Jeff

I think the answer to #1 is:  as much as possible, but I'm not altogether 
certain--pretty sure that our preference would be to use our own internal 
construction folks as much as possible.  Answer to #2 would be very 
interesting; I don't know the answer, but I'm sure that it's tightly linked 
to the answer to #1.  I think you might want to start with Shelly Corman to 
find the right contact for the pipeline constructions.

I leave for S.D. tonite.  I'll give you updates as the day transpires 
tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

James D Steffes
09/10/2000 12:50 PM
Rick --

The information below is very helpful for Government Affairs across the 
country.  I have a few other questions to support our advocacy:  

1. How much of our new power plant development is not subject to Building & 
Construction Trade Labor Agreements? 

2. Does Enron have any specific policies on whether or not we should use 
Union labor on our construction?  We recently established human rights and 
environmental policies, I am wondering if this applied to Unions?

3. Do you know if the pipelines are also using Union labor on their 
expansions?  Or maybe, who could tell me?

Thanks.

Jim

Jeff Dasovich
09/08/2000 11:46 AM
Rick:  Thanks very much.

Rick Johnson@ENRON
09/08/2000 11:35 AM
Jeff, per your recent voice mail,  below you will find the labor relationship 
summary that I prepared for Sandy.  
Hope it is helpful, please call if I can be of any assistance. Rj. 

Rick Johnson
08/29/2000 07:16 PM
Sandy, I was again disapointed to hear that Union leaders are accusing Enron 
as being unfriendly to Labor.  In the last 20 months we have pursued 
construction on over 3000 MW of new generation capacity.  
Enron Development Activity subject to Building & Construction Trade Labor 
Agreements
California 
 500 mw - PDEF - FeB. 99
 750 mw - PEF - Feb. 2000
Indiana
 550 mw- Westfork Development -  Oct. 99
Illinois
 680 mw - Lincoln Energy Facility - Nov 99 
Tennessee
 540 mw -  Gleason Power I - Oct 99
Oregon 
 240 mw - Coyote II (planned January 2001)
 Ethynol Plant - Columbia County - Baugh Const. June 2000

Hopefully this will prove to be valuable information:  In addition to the 
direct agreements, Enron is pursuing third party projects in Chicago and New 
York City that will be subject to labor agreements.

If the parties are interested, feel free to have them contact me directly 
503-464-7548
Regards, Rick Johnson

Didn't receive your attachements.  Only got the ones Kim had already sent.  
Did you just modify those, or create a new document?

Dylan Windham <dwindham@uclink4.berkeley.edu> on 09/10/2000 07:25:55 PM
Here is what I have put together so far.  I just answered the questions
because I am not sure what he wants.  If you think we need to change
anything call me at 510-642-1606 tomorrow or email me by 4:00 pm.  I will
print it out and bring it to class.

--Dylan

At 11:36 AM 9/10/00 -0500, jdasovic@enron.com wrote:

>Greetings.  Kim's stuff looks pretty good to me.  There's a pretty high
>likelihood though that I won't be in class Monday or Tuesday either.  That
>means I can't turn in whatever it is we're turning in tomorrow (if I sound
>clueless, it might be because he ran out of handouts in the first class
>describing how the cases would work, and there's nothing posted on the
>site--apologies).  I can do the write-up for next week.
>
>
>
>
>Kimberly Kupiecki <kkupiecki@arpartners.com> on 09/09/2000 09:02:50 PM
>
 - Northrop Case.doc
 - Northrop.xls

Mona L Petrochko@ENRON
08/25/2000 08:41 PM
	

We have seen an early release of legislative language.  It is SB 1433 
Alpert/Davis.

1.  It institutes a rate cap of 6.5 cents/kWh for residential and small 
commercial retroactive to June 2000 through December 31, 2002.  It leaves the 
ability for the Commission to extend to 2003 if in the public interest.  (We 
will strike the last part.)

Small commercial customers are all accounts on Schedule A, all accounts who 
are general acute care hospitals, public and private k-12 schools and all 
accounts on AL-TOU (up through 6000 kWh/billing period)

2.  Provides an opt-in provision for large commercial/agricultural/industrial 
customers with an annual true-up.

The sense I got was that CMTA/CLECA may have asked for this.  It gives 
legislative cover.  Will be difficult to administer and the true-up will 
discourage sign up. 

Please let me know if you agree.

3.  Provides that overcollections of PPA/QFs/SONGs will be used to offset 
undercollections of cap.

Our comment is that the overcollections, on a pro-rata basis will be used to 
offset the cap.  All customers pay stranded costs associated with those 
contracts, all customers should receive stranded benefits.

4.  SDG&E is still subject to reasonableness review by the Commission.  To 
the extent FERC orders refunds as part of its investigation, such refunds 
will go to SDG&E's customers.

Not too bad.

I'd say, "What next?", but I'm afraid to ask....
Regarding our California strategy, preventing the merger would seem to be 
right up there with "end the price caps" in our list of priorities.  At 
today's FERC hearing, a hair-brained consumer advocate called for merging the 
PX and the ISO.  During the panel I was on, I made the point that a merger 
would make California's problems worse than they are today.  The FERC 
Commissioners seemed somewhat responsive to my concerns.
P.S. After the panel, Heber lobbied me hard to support transcos.
DJ Freeman Sees Cal/ISO, PX Merger, Lower Price Cap 
Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. 

By Jason Leopold 
     Of DOW JONES NEWSWIRES 
     SAN DIEGO (Dow Jones) -- David Freeman, seen a likely replacement for 
Marcie Edwards on the board of governors of the California Independent System 
Operator, said his first order of business would be to try and merge the ISO 
and the California Power Exchange. 
     Edwards resigned her post on the ISO Thursday. 
     An informal consensus among the board has already approved his 
membership. 
     Freeman told Dow Jones Newswires that the $250 per megawatthour 
wholesale power price cap in California is too high, and that he would like 
to see it reduced below $100/MWh. 
     "I think my role (on the board) will help the state solve it's serious 
generation shortage problem," Freeman said. 
     Some market participants said Freeman is expected to run for chair of 
the ISO's board of governors, a seat currently held by Jan Smutny-Jones. 
     The Los Angeles Department of Water and Power has this summer been able 
to sell the ISO power in the real time market, and make a great profit for 
itself in return. 
     By Jason Leopold (323)658-3874. 

Apologies.  I invariably leave someone of the damned list.
Jeff Dasovich
09/12/2000 10:50 PM
I'd say, "What next?", but I'm afraid to ask....
Regarding our California strategy, preventing the merger would seem to be 
right up there with "end the price caps" in our list of priorities.  At 
today's FERC hearing, a hair-brained consumer advocate called for merging the 
PX and the ISO.  During the panel I was on, I made the point that a merger 
would make California's problems worse than they are today.  The FERC 
Commissioners seemed somewhat responsive to my concerns.
P.S. After the panel, Heber lobbied me hard to support transcos.
DJ Freeman Sees Cal/ISO, PX Merger, Lower Price Cap 
Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. 

By Jason Leopold 
     Of DOW JONES NEWSWIRES 
     SAN DIEGO (Dow Jones) -- David Freeman, seen a likely replacement for 
Marcie Edwards on the board of governors of the California Independent System 
Operator, said his first order of business would be to try and merge the ISO 
and the California Power Exchange. 
     Edwards resigned her post on the ISO Thursday. 
     An informal consensus among the board has already approved his 
membership. 
     Freeman told Dow Jones Newswires that the $250 per megawatthour 
wholesale power price cap in California is too high, and that he would like 
to see it reduced below $100/MWh. 
     "I think my role (on the board) will help the state solve it's serious 
generation shortage problem," Freeman said. 
     Some market participants said Freeman is expected to run for chair of 
the ISO's board of governors, a seat currently held by Jan Smutny-Jones. 
     The Los Angeles Department of Water and Power has this summer been able 
to sell the ISO power in the real time market, and make a great profit for 
itself in return. 
     By Jason Leopold (323)658-3874. 

Jim:  After today's hearing, I think you're note is dead on.  Let's talk.  
I'm in the office tomorrow.  Miss seeing you all in D.C.

Best,
Jeff

James D Steffes
09/11/2000 03:12 PM
Chris --

Given this development, now may be the right time for Enron to come in and 
make a "public" offer to SDG&E.  We may be able to put some pressure on the 
CPUC to approve a full requirements offer that works with the legislative 
rate cap.

I'll be in contact with you to discuss.

Jim

Surprise, surprise.  

SDG&E is afraid to do anything without the pre-approved reasonableness from 
the CPUC which I don't think will be obtained.

Chris

Chris

SDG&E would like to inform you that  we did not gain authority from the
commission on 9/7 and cannot enter into bilateral trades at present; (2) we
anticipate receiving that approval on September 21; we will solicit new
proposals between now and then and look forward to your continuing
participation, as well as your assistance in gaining the necessary
regulatory approvals.  Thanks

Hey darlin'.  How are you?  Bet NYC is mighty nice this time of year.  Hope 
to get there real soon. 

Best to you and your better half,
Jeff

Can we talk before you bring it up with SoCal?  Very interesting about Herr 
Cherry.  Hadn't heard.  I'm coming out soon to see you guys.

Jeffery Fawcett@ENRON
09/12/2000 09:15 AM
Considering that EnronOnline is more of a "market maker" than a pure trading 
platform, I don't think they are necessarily the right choice to replace 
ALTRA, nor do I think they would want to.  I just thought I'd point out the 
need and see if there is anything within our family of companies that might 
work here.  Thoughts?

	
	

Jeff -- I assume you would have no objection to SoCal's proposed 
modification.  Let me know.
And be sure to read to the very end for news about our pal bbbbri ian.
Dear fellow signatories to the Comprehensive Settlement: 

On Friday of last week, SoCalGas and PG&E informed ALJ Biren that Altra had 
definitively declined to offer the electronic trading services that both the 
already-approved PG&E settlement and the pending SoCalGas/SDG&E Comprehensive 
Settlement contemplated would be provided specifically by Altra for at least 
an intial period.? Both SoCalGas and PG&E sent a letter and email to to the 
full service list yesterday (Tues, 9/5) informing parties of this development.

SoCalGas believes that some modification to the Comprehensive Settlement in 
necessary to take this development into account, and that we then need to 
file the modification as soon as possible with the Commission.? The ALJ has 
indicated to us that some formal filing with the Commission in response to 
this development will be necessary.

We want to work with the signatories to the Comprehensive Settlement to reach 
a consensus as soon as possible.? Our goal is to cause little or no delay in 
the processing of a decision on the Comprehensive Settlement.

What SoCalGas has in mind is modifying the settlement to remove the specific 
naming of Altra and to insert language saying that SoCalGas will select and 
contract with a third-party provider for a specified period of time, without 
identifying in the settlement who that will be.?? We also need to consider 
whether we should address in the revision to the settlement how we will 
handle the possibility that the third-party provider will not be ready to 
operate by the April 1, 2001 date the settlement provides for the monthly 
imbalance trading, OFO day imbalance chip trading, and storage rights 
trading.? SoCalGas is looking at interim arrangements that it could provide 
in-house starting April 1, 2001, until the third-party provider could begin 
service.? We also might consider what would happen if no third party provider 
can be found.

To avoid any claims that we have not complied with the settlement rules, 
today we mailed and emailed to the full service list a notice of a settlement 
conference for Wednesday of next week.? We want to file something with the 
Commission very promptly thereafter.

Please feel free to contact Glen Sullivan at 619-699-5027, Lad Lorenz at 
213-244-3820, Bob Betonte at 213-244-3832, or June Suwara at 213-244-3504 on 
this subject.? 

For those of you who have not heard, Brian Cherry has submitted his 
resignation from Sempra Energy's Regulatory Affairs Dept. and will be going 
to work shortly for PG&E in a similar capacity.

It would be great to get Bryson.

sit tight.

MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com> on 09/12/2000 02:03:16 PM

	
Are you covering the PG&E Gas Accord II kickoff meeting on 9-14?  Let me
know if you want us to do anything.  Mike

I don't have the name of the CFO at Sempra, though I'm sure he's on their 
website.  If not, let me know.

Thanks, Jim.  We'll monitor.

Best,
Jeff

I have worked closely with Anthony Mazy (Calif Public Utility Comm - Office 
of Ratepayer Advocates) in the past, and he asked me to provide input from 
Enron with our perspective on the energy mess in California for a conference 
they are putting together in October.  (Prior to joining EES I trained the 
CPUC ORA staff on a variety of issues and have earned their trust.)  However, 
I feel that the Enron input into this CPUC conference would be more 
appropriately provided by other members of the EES & ENA team, so I wanted to 
pass this email along to you for your review and action as needed.  

Let me know if my relationship with Anthony and other members of the CPUC 
staff could be useful in advancing Enron's positions at this conference.

Jim Trudeau
Director, Power Quality Services
(530) 518-9789

CONFERENCE:? " THE CALIFORNIA DISASTER: LESSONS LEARNED " 
??????????????????????????????????????????????????? (Working Title) 

DATE:????????????????????????????????? Saturday,? October 21, 2000 

LOCATION:?????????????????????? University of California, Berkeley 

The CPUC Office of Ratepayer Advocates (ORA) together with the University of 
California is organizing a special conference, Saturday October 21, 2000, to 
address the current wholesale electricity market situation, as manifest in 
San Diego, and in light of both the economic framework and industrial 
realities in which utility restructuring is taking place.

We wish to emphasize the importance of maintaining consistent and predictable 
forward progress with the restructuring of the electric services industry, 
while remediating structural shortcomings as they appear.? The need for a 
quick and effective response to the cost escalation in California is urgent.? 
Meanwhile, we do not want to overlook emerging generation and information 
technologies and their appropriate role in an increasingly competitive energy 
and utility sector.

Your input is urgently requested to develop the detailed agenda for this 
workshop/conference.? We have had the opportunity to speak with some of you 
directly, and we appreciate your comments.? We are presently concluding 
negotiations with key national observers to be participants, and must 
complete the detailed agenda this week.? If you have any further topical 
insights to share with us, I must have your input no later than 4:00 p.m. 
Pacific time, Thursday, September 14.? (By 4:00 p.m., Wednesday, if at all 
possible.)

Let me emphasize that today we are only concerned with conceptual, topical 
content, so please do not trouble yourselves with highly "stylized" 
presentations.?? Our immediate objective is to release a preliminary program, 
with a partial list of key participants, by Monday, September 18th, that we 
believe is likely to secure the active support of a wide range of industry 
stakeholders.? We plan to distribute a final program by Monday, September 
25th.

Please suggest topical areas that you can help develop, or believe are 
essential to the success of this program.? We will be particularly interested 
in your informed, practical insights into:

the daily operations of the electric services industry, from various 
perspectives, that help clarify problems and distinguish truly problematic 
issues from those misunderstood,

the political and legislative processes in California, as they may tend to 
suggest effective courses of action to promote short-term market 
accommodations that are consistent with, and constructive toward, long-term 
goals for industry restructuring,

case studies from other jurisdictions that shed light on the probable 
response of California's institutions to any of the various proposed 
solutions currently circulating,

case studies of anachronistic or otherwise inefficient industry practices 
impeding development, interconnection, or operation of distributed 
generation, or the sale or other transfer of the energy produced,

case studies of market power abuse, or gaming, in both transmission and 
generation, 

proposals for innovative treatment of cost-effective emerging generation 
and/or information technologies, 

proposals for developing greater diversity of generation technologies and/or 
energy providers within the state, 

otherwise appropriate technical, economic, or regulatory principles and 
practices that are being misrepresented in the academic, trade, or popular 
press or other media, 

distinguishing informational difficulties or factual disagreements from 
policy conflicts or conflicts of interest, and 

specific suggestions for speakers who are particularly effective in 
addressing specific key issues or establishing confidence with the target 
audiences.

Attendance at this conference/workshop will be limited, with approximately 
one-half of the seats reserved for key policymakers and/or their aides, key 
agency staff, and the speakers.? The remaining seats will be allocated among 
interested consumer representatives, manufacturers, vendors, developers, and 
other end-users, and local government and community and business 
representatives.? We presently envision the conference to include one or two 
key speakers, with four panels of three to seven persons each addressing 
specific topics.? We are also reserving facilities for Friday evening to 
address topical seminars requested by decisionmakers and/or their key staff 
and additional facilities for Sunday morning when the information technology 
and distributed generation communities will be invited to provide additional 
follow-on to questions and comments offered by key policymakers on Saturday.

Some have commented that we should have started this as much as a year ago.? 
Unfortunately, a year ago we did not know that today we would have doubled 
and tripled consumer energy bills or a $250/MWH wholesale price cap, much 
less an intense, across-the-board attack on electric restructuring by some 
parties.? We are especially concerned about the efforts of some distribution 
utilities to establish a foothold in DG, the efforts of some utilities and 
the independent system operator to restrict distribution-level wheeling and 
the aggregation it would facilitate, and the latest proposal to reintegrate 
metering into the distribution utility after it was successfully unbundled 
for the benefit of competitive Energy Service Providers.? Likewise, language 
in recent legislation echoing regulatory arguments for retrenchment cannot be 
brushed aside.? 

We understand the difficulty of organizing such an event on less than two 
months notice, but we also appreciate the importance of the subject, as we 
are sure you do as well.? We are committed to preparing an event worthy of 
the time and attention of both key national observers and top-ranked 
California policymakers in the executive, legislative, and regulatory arenas, 
and we would welcome your active assistance.? 

If you have any questions, you are welcomed to call me, at 415-703-3036 from 
9:30 AM to 5:30 PM Pacific time.? For those with particularly busy schedules 
or time zone considerations, you are welcomed to call me at my personal 
telephone 925-855-0554 from 5:30 to 7:30 AM Pacific time.

Thanks, Ron.  Greatly appreciated.  For my part, please feel free to forward 
along any articles.

Best,
Jeff

You have probably already seen the trade press accounts of the hearing this 
week, but I wanted to make sure that you see this one, since it is more 
evenhanded and informative, with less rhetoric.

Let me know if you would like me to forward the other articles that I've seen.

Ron
Content-Transfer-Encoding: quoted-printable
Date: Wed, 13 Sep 2000 07:33:40 -0500
FYI - This article is very informative about the options FERC is considering 
to address the California power market situation; no surprises for anyone 
following this closely.  Please note that Chairman Hoecker felt the need to 
emphasize the limitations of FERC's power under the Federal Power Act.

DJ FERC Chief Pledges Action, If Needed, On Calif Pwr Woes
Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc.

(This article was originally published Monday)
     WASHINGTON (Dow Jones)--The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission has 
limited authority to address flawed electricity markets in California and 
alleged price gouging by power producers, but will act to overhaul the 
state's wholesale power markets if necessary, FERC Chairman James Hoecker 
told a congressional panel Monday.

     The commission was ready to act once the results of an expedited staff 
investigation of problems affecting power markets in the U.S. West becomes 
available, Hoecker said in testimony presented to a San Diego field hearing 
of the House Commerce Committee's energy panel.

     "If we need to fix market rules or market structures within our 
jurisdiction, we will do so," Hoecker told lawmakers. And if price gouging is 
occurring "as some have alleged," he added, "we will respond accordingly, by 
revoking market-based rates or otherwise."

     However, Hoecker stressed that the commission's authority is limited 
under the Federal Power Act.

     "The commission has limited ability to relieve the immediate customer 
crisis. Important aspects of this problem are a state responsibility, such as 
authorizing construction of new generation and transmission facilities," 
Hoecker testified.

     The commission can't act to limit prices charged by power providers 
"until we have a record supporting such action," he said, referring to the 
results of the pending staff investigation.

     Further, he said, the law bars FERC from ordering retroactive refunds to 
San Diego Gas & Electric Co. for the power it purchased this summer to serve 
its retail customer base.

     Hoecker testified before the House Commerce Committee's Energy and Power 
Subcommittee, which is looking into the supply shortages in California this 
summer that have forced San Diego electricity consumers to pay twice as much 
for power as they did a year ago.

     State Mkt Structure Blamed For Crisis

     The hearing comes after much wrangling at FERC, as SDG&E, a unit of 
Sempra Energy (SRE), sought an order setting price caps for power bid into 
the state-sponsored electricity exchange, and power producers sought an order 
allowing cost recovery for lost opportunity sales if the state's independent 
grid operator curtailed sales outside California, where price controls don't 
apply.

     FERC hasn't yet responded to the producers, and deferred action on 
SDG&E's bid for price controls until the staff investigation is completed. 
But it left in place an order allowing the independent system operator to 
limit the price it pays for power, which acts as a de facto cap on prices bid 
into the power exchange.

     Hoecker, while withholding judgment pending the staff probe, appeared to 
place much of the blame for this summer's crisis with the state-mandated 
market structure, which left San Diego consumers subject to spot-market 
volatility.

     And he appeared to suggest that FERC's order directing utilities to 
transfer transmission assets to control of large regional transmission 
organizations, or RTOs, will offer an opportunity to develop a regional 
solution to the power-supply problem.

     FERC deferred to California in restructuring the wholesale market in 
California because its experience with new market institutions such as power 
exchanges and ISOs was limited, Hoecker said.

     Other states, such as Pennsylvania, were "less prescriptive than 
California in telling the commission how their wholesale markets should 
operate," Hoecker noted.

     Now, with FERC's Order 2000 encouraging formation of RTOs, "the 
commission is in a very different posture with respect to the structure of 
wholesale markets," he said.

     "Large regional markets can be made to work effectively," Hoecker told 
the lawmakers, citing the Pennsylvania restructuring as an example.

     Other witnesses were more forceful in criticizing the state-mandated 
market structure.

     By requiring the state's three investor-owned utilities to purchase all 
their electricity from the power exchange and limiting their ability to hedge 
price risks by entering into long-term fixed-price contracts, the state left 
consumers subject to volatility in the state-mandated spot market, said 
officials with Enron Corp. (ENE) and Reliant Energy (REI).

     California's market structure "placed no economic incentives on the 
default utility providers to look out for the costs that are ultimately 
passed on to their consumers," Reliant's John Stout testified.

     "San Diego's experience offers the Congress an unparalleled opportunity 
to learn from a bungled attempt at deregulation," said Michael Shames, 
executive director of Utility Consumer's Action Network.

     Shames and other witnesses warned the congressional committee that 
California's electricity crisis is likely to occur in other regions of the 
country unless steps are taken to free up interstate trade in power and allow 
FERC to better police markets.

     "California is just the latest problem area in U.S. power markets and, 
unless policymakers act quickly, it will not be the last," said Enron Corp. 
(ENE) Steven Kean executive vice president.

     "Unless Congress and FERC are willing to address the interstate issues 
that are beyond the jurisdiction of state legislators and regulators, I 
predict that our experience in San Diego is indicative of what others will 
encounter in trying to create a competitive electricity market," said Edwin 
Guiles, Sempra's president of regulated operations.

     "This electricity crisis is not a California-only problem," said Rep. 
Brian Bilbray, R-Calif., who represents San Diego and requested Monday's 
hearing.

     "We will continue to be in this mess if state and federal officials 
don't work together to find long-term solutions to the flaws in the 
marketplace," Bilbray said.

     -By Bryan Lee, Dow Jones Newswires, 202-862-6647, 
mailto:bryan.lee@dowjones.com
     (END) Dow Jones Newswires 12-09-00

     1215GMT

I can be on the call.  Please let me know if you get this, since I've been 
having severe email problems.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

gramlr@pjm.com on 08/25/2000 07:04:27 AM
  Please confirm that this schedule works.  It is the only day
that worked for everyone.  Jeff Dasovich is still in the Sierras so I can 
check
in with him Monday.

  The agenda sounds simple but don't be deceived, there are many
many options.  Please be prepared with a list of 3 top speaker choices.

  1.  Topics of panels.

  2.  Speaker list.  Try to agree on an 'A' list who we can start
calling and a 'B' list of alternates.

FYI.  Kahn's heading up the "power plant streamlining" task force.  At 
yesterday's FERC hearing, Mike was put in the position of reading word for 
word a statement by the governor (even had to read it in the first person).  
Awkward to say the least.  And Mike wasn't prepared at all to answer the 
questions he got on the statement from the FERC commissioners, particularly 
from Heber.  "I don't know" came up a lot.
Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com> on 09/13/2000 10:29:36 AM
Here's is Governor Davis' press release regarding the Clean Energy Green
Team as mandated by AB 970 (Ducheny).

http://www.governor.ca.gov/briefing/pressreleases/sept00/a00245912.html

Never mentioned the CFO.  Let's discuss further.  I can get you in.

Laird Dyer@ECT
09/13/2000 06:11 AM
Jeff,

My memory is failing me but I remember you telling me that you had a high 
placed contact at Sempra that you could contact to set up a meeting.

Don't let me down man.  I thought you told me it was the CFO.  Who is your 
contact?

Laird

FYI.  Please take a look.  I would not be inclined to sign the letter.  
Thoughts?

Best,
Jeff
Folks-
At today's meeting, those Group members who attended agreed that we should
indeed send the letter with changes reflecting the new legislation. Attached
is the newest draft of such a letter. We need to send this letter out FRIDAY
so in order to do that please look over the letter carefully and let me know
if your organization wishes to be included as a signatory. I need every set
of eyes out there to look this letter over for spelling, grammar and
content -- my eyes have seen it too many times and are apt to miss things.
So, here is the process ---

Let me know of any minor changes ASAP. If there are content changes please
email them to the ENTIRE group for sign off. Please understand that we want
to send this FRIDAY so we do not have a lot of time to make changes. When I
have a final draft I will ask people to fax signatures or send originals to
me by Friday.Thank you all for your help with this letter. We could not have
done it with out you.

We will be scheduling our next general meeting for mid October. Also, we
have finalized the dates for the Annual Retreat and will be sending out
packets with all the details next week. DJ and I are working on the agenda
so if you have a specific topic you would like covered please let us know.
As always, please send me an email or give me a call if you have any
concerns or questions about the letter or any other matter.

Thanks,
Delaney

 - ltr to governor -- options list.doc

See page 46 of the PDF file, Article 10 "nonutility power providers."  that's 
where sec. 390 is.
MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com> on 09/13/2000 01:11:01 PM

	
 <<ab_1890_bill_960924_chaptered.url>>

http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/95-96/bill/asm/ab_1851-1900/ab_1890_bill_960924_c
haptered.pdf

 - ab_1890_bill_960924_chaptered.url

Not a problem, Jimmie.  About this week's case.  Been travelling.  I'm back.  
Kim:  in your absence on Monday, we talked a little about how to proceed on 
the next case.  How's this sound:  everyone takes a question.  If the answer 
to one question depends on the answer to another, the folks doing those 
questions should get together and discuss.  Everyone should distribute to the 
team a draft of the answer to the question by tomorrow (Thursday) night.   
Then folks could look at the responses, make suggestions, comments, etc. and 
distribute via email by Noon on Saturday.  I'll then compile in a form that 
we can submit on Monday.  Thoughts?  

I have randomly selected questions:  here are the results.  Jeff--#3; 
Jimmie--#1; Kim--#2; Dylan--#4.  If folks are comfortable with this 
distribution, let me know.  

Best,
Jeff

Team
My Haas e-mail is forwarded to my work e-mail.  Last week I was on vacation
and did not see any of these e-mails.  I worked all 4 questions in what
turned out to be a parallel path (I will say your compiled answers were a
lot better than mine).  Anyway, please add my home e-mail address
"jcjcal02@aol.com" (Thats a zero next to the 2) in addition to my hass email
address.  This will give me access to the data regardless of where I'm at.
This is particularly important on weekends.  Sorry I let you down on the
first case.
Jimmy

Looks good.  Couple of proposed edits.

GOVERNOR DAVIS PRESSES FERC FOR ACTION ON WHOLESALE POWER RATES: Calls on
Federal Regulators to Reduce Prices, Issue Refunds

GOVERNOR DAVIS NAMES KAHN CHAIR OF THE GOVERNOR'S CLEAN ENERGY GREEN TEAM

OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
GOVERNOR DAVIS PRESSES FERC FOR ACTION ON WHOLESALE POWER RATES
Calls on Federal Regulators to Reduce Prices, Issue Refunds

SAN DIEGO - At a Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) hearing today
in San Diego, Governor Gray Davis reiterated his call to federal regulators
to intervene "to the fullest extent possible" to lower electricity prices in
California.

"FERC bears responsibility to ensure that a workably competitive market
exists before California consumers and California's economy are subjected to
unconstrained, market-based electricity prices," said Governor Davis in a
statement read by Energy Oversight Board Chairman Michael Kahn.
"Consequently, I renew my prior request that the Commission act with utmost
speed to intervene to the fullest extent possible to restore wholesale
prices to fair levels and to remedy harms that have resulted from the
exercise of market power."

Governor Davis noted that he and state lawmakers have taken dramatic action
in recent weeks to provide rate relief. "While these actions should provide
short-term rate predictability and longer-term benefits to customers in
terms of improved supplies, the fundamental problem of exorbitant wholesale
prices still exists and remains the responsibility of FERC to address," said
the governor. "No combination of state actions can substitute for federal
action to ameliorate the problems of California's wholesale markets."

Governor Davis has taken the following actions in reaction to rising
electricity prices in San Diego:

On June 14, he called for emergency reduction of electricity use by all
state facilities in the San Francisco Bay area in response to electricity
emergency and rolling blackouts.

On June 15, he called on chairpersons of the Public Utilities Commission
(PUC) to analyze the conditions that led to electricity shortages in the San
Francisco Bay area the previous day, including a statewide perspective on
the price and delivery of electricity. Report was completed, submitted to
the governor and released on August 2.

On July 27, 2000, Governor Davis called on federal and state regulators to
take swift action to extend the caps on wholesale electric rates in
California and provide San Diego ratepayers with million of dollars in
refunds.

In letters written by the governor to two state regulatory agencies and two
California-based panels charged with overseeing California's power market,
he called for a coordinated state effort to urge federal regulators to take
strong measures to reduce power rates in both the short- and long-term.

On August 2, 2000, Governor Davis issued three Executive Orders designed to
reduce energy consumption by state government and speed up the time it takes
new power generating facilities to win approval from state agencies.

On August 9, 2000, Governor Davis called on the Public Utilities Commission
(PUC) to establish a two-year plan that would cut electricity rates by
nearly half for residential and business customers of San Diego Gas &
Electric.

The governor also reached an agreement with the California Grocers
Association that will save enough electricity to provide power to between
50,000 and 60,000 homes during periods of peak demand, as grocers agreed to
reduce power consumption by 10 percent during Stage One emergencies.

On August 10, 2000, Governor Davis wrote a letter to President Clinton
urging him to expedite FERC's investigation to determine whether current
electric rates in San Diego were unjust.

On August 22, 2000, Governor Davis called on President Clinton to release
emergency funds from the Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP)
to the state to help low-income Californians pay their rapidly-rising
electricity bills.

On August 23, 2000, President Clinton responded to Governor Davis' request
by releasing $2.6 million in emergency funds to help low-income Southern
Californians cope with the surge in their electricity bills. The President
also asked federal regulators to speed up their investigation into the
operation of U.S. power markets and urged the Small Business Administration
to use its credit programs to help small firms hurt by the price increases.

On August 23, 2000, Governor Davis reached agreement with legislators on
legislation to provide relief to San Diego ratepayers. The governor signed
two bills into law on September 6, 2000.

Please see attached letter (below).

# # #

SEPTEMBER 12, 2000

STATEMENT OF GOVERNOR GRAY DAVIS

TO THE FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION CONCERNING ITS INVESTIGATION OF
WHOLESALE PRICE ESCALATION IN CALIFORNIA

The Summer of 2000 has confronted California with an electricity crisis that
seriously threatens the safety, health and well being of citizens and
businesses throughout the state. At the heart of the crisis is the
extraordinary run up in prices for wholesale electric energy and ancillary
services, accompanied by deteriorating service and reliability. In San
Diego, electric customers' bills have more than doubled this summer,
threatening permanent harm to businesses and the health and welfare of
residential customers in the warm southern climate. All remaining California
electric consumers are faced with similar prospects as their legislated rate
freeze periods come to an end. In San Francisco we saw rolling blackouts for
the first time in our history.

As soon as the dimensions of the crisis became evident, I directed
California regulators, including the Public Utilities Commission and the
Electricity Oversight Board, and the Independent System Operator, to take
immediate steps to identify and implement specific measures to mitigate the
damage, including restoring price caps at Summer 1999 levels. I am happy to
report that those measures have been adopted, although not without
considerable resistance from self-interested parties.

In recent weeks, I have worked with the California Legislature to enact
further relief within the existing framework of options now available to the
state. These include provisions to stabilize retail rates, expedite
generation licensing where possible, implement targeted demand reduction and
demand response and remove constraints in transmission and distribution
systems. I have also established a task force comprised of key state
officials which is developing measures to increase energy efficiency and
alternative supplies and to expedite permitting by state agencies.

While these actions should provide short-term rate predictability and
longer-term benefits to customers in terms of improved supplies, the
fundamental problem of exorbitant wholesale prices still exists and remains
the responsibility of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission to address.
No combination of state actions can substitute for federal action to
ameliorate the problems in California's wholesale markets.

A joint report submitted to me on August 2nd by the Chairman of the
California Electricity Oversight Board and the President of the California
Public Utilities Commission concluded that exorbitant wholesale prices in
California result from wholesale market dysfunction and the exercise of
market power by sellers. Subsequent reports by the Market Analysis
Department and the Market Surveillance Committee of the California
Independent System Operator reach the same conclusions. Subsequent behavior
of wholesale electric prices during August confirms their conclusions, and
subjects California to further economic damage. While I remain hopeful that
California wholesale markets may ultimately become competitive and become
capable of serving the interests of consumers and the public, I cannot and
will not accept the liabilities to California that result from the current
situation for even a short period. I intend to take any and all steps
necessary to restore economic stability to the electric service
infrastructure of California.

FERC bears the responsibility under its organic act to assure just and
reasonable wholesale electric rates. FERC bears responsibility to ensure
that a workably competitive market exists before California consumers and
California's economy are subjected to unconstrained, market-based
electricity prices. Consequently, I renew my prior request that the
Commission act with utmost speed to intervene to the fullest extent possible
to restore wholesale prices to fair levels and to remedy harms that have
resulted from the exercise of market power.

###

OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
GOVERNOR DAVIS NAMES KAHN CHAIR OF THE GOVERNOR'S CLEAN ENERGY GREEN TEAM
SACRAMENTO - Governor Gray Davis today announced the appointment of Michael
A. Kahn as chairman of the newly-created Governor's Clean Energy Green Team.
The Team was created by Governor Davis' signing of AB 970 by Assemblywoman
Denise Moreno Ducheny (D-San Diego) on Wednesday.

Mr. Kahn, 51, of San Francisco, is the chairman of the California
Electricity Oversight Board, and he also serves as vice-chair of the
California Commission on Judicial Performance. He has been senior partner
and head of litigation at Folger Levin & Kahn LLP since 1979. Mr. Kahn has
held numerous state and federal government appointments and assignments over
the last 15 years.

Mr. Kahn is the author of several articles and reports on litigation
practice and Supreme Court history. He is a magna cum laude, Phi Beta Kappa
graduate of the University of California, Los Angeles. Mr. Kahn also earned
master of arts and juris doctorate degrees from Stanford University, where
he was an editor of the Law Review. After graduation, he served for a year
as a law clerk to Judge Ben C. Duniway of the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals
in San Francisco.

The signing of AB 970 established the Governor's Clean Energy Green Team,
which works to streamline the process of creating new power plants to ensure
that an adequate supply of power will exist to make a deregulated
marketplace work. The Team does this by working with local governments,
identifying environmental impacts, developing recommendations for low
interest financing programs for renewable energy and obtaining input on
natural gas supply, emission offsets and water supply.

Members do not receive a salary. This position does not require Senate
confirmation.

# # #

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Edson + Modisette
Associate
925 L Street Suite 1490
Sacramento CA 95814
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

Covisint Running Out of Excuses to Deliver on Its B2B Promise
By Joe Bousquin 
Staff Reporter
9/13/00 9:09 AM ET 
URL: http://www.thestreet.com/tech/internet/1076377.html
Uh-oh. Covisint can't blame it on the government anymore. 
When word came Monday that the Federal Trade Commission had green-lighted the 
Big Three automakers' Internet exchange, the business-to-business world 
breathed a collective sigh of relief. That huge cloud of uncertainty, known 
as government intervention, had been lifted. 
Which means Covisint can't blame its state of disarray on the policy wonks 
anymore. Instead, the company will have to execute on its B2B promise -- soon 
-- for positive momentum to continue in the B2B sector. 
The influence of the mega exchange, in which Ford (F:NYSE), General Motors 
(GM:NYSE) and DaimlerChrysler (DCX:NYSE) plan to buy materials and supplies 
on the Internet, has already affected the performance of business-to-business 
stocks. Just look at Commerce One (CMRC:Nasdaq) on Monday, when Covisint's 
FTC clearance was made public. It shot up $3.75, or 5.3%, to close at $75.13, 
though it had traded as high as $78.13. But Tuesday, after the initial impact 
of Covisint's clearance had waned, so did Commerce One's stock price. It 
closed down $6, or 8%, at $69.12. 
Similarly, when the antitrust issues started creeping onto the B2B scene, and 
the government made known that it was looking at the exchange over antitrust 
concerns, B2B stocks swooned. Now, going forward, how Covisint executes on 
making B2B a reality, and not just the substance of a press release, will 
surely play itself out on B2B stocks. 
Right now, though, the company's prospect for swift and flawless execution of 
its vision doesn't look good. It hasn't named a CEO. It hasn't finalized yet 
where its headquarters will be. And perhaps most important, it has yet to 
hammer out exactly what technology it will run on. 
"Covisint doesn't have a crutch or an excuse anymore," says Scott Crompton, 
vice president for global automotive practices at consultant SeraNova. 
"Before, they could lean on the FTC as to why they weren't going forward, but 
now, they're going to have to show some meaningful progress." 
To date, there has been anything but. In its first few months, the company 
stumbled about nameless, until Covisint was decided upon. That moniker, which 
is meant to evoke the ideals of communication, vision and integration, 
instead elicited visions of corporate wonks sitting around a triangular table 
white-boarding their separate goals. 
All the while, the company had four interim co-CEOs and two competing 
technologies to run on. Because Oracle (ORCL:Nasdaq) had worked with Ford and 
Commerce One with GM before Covisint was announced, the two software firms 
were both brought into the deal. But ever since then, speculation has run 
rampant over whether one firm would push the other out of the picture. 
On Monday, Commerce One's CEO told TheStreet.com that the technology question 
still hadn't been settled, even if the FTC's antitrust ones had. 
Combine all those things and what you've got is the picture of a joint 
venture between three highly competitive companies that's going nowhere fast. 
Or, as Crompton puts it, Covisint is "three different companies, two 
different technologies and everyone talking about whether there's a lot of 
arguing and infighting." 
But Covisint's already come up with someone else to blame. Now that the FTC 
has passed, the company says that it's waiting for approval from the 
Bundeskartellamt, or the German equivalent to the FTC. Covisint insists it 
can't even begin operations in the U.S. until it gets the go-ahead from that 
agency. 
"If you were a supplier and I was a manufacturer, both located in San 
Francisco, we could not do business because the Bundeskartellamt still holds 
this control over Covisint," says Thomas Hill, a Covisint spokesman. 
"Everyone at Covisint is anxious to start this business. Once the 
Bundeskartellamt gives its blessing, we expect to see Covisint up and running 
in 30 days." 
Hill concedes that might sound like another excuse for justifying its lack of 
actual operations. 
"Sure, that might seem like another convenient excuse to delay a launch," 
Hill said. "I would say if people could work 25 hours a day to get this done, 
they would. ... Everyone at Covisint is focused on launching in a really 
timely fashion." 
The company hasn't settled on a headquarters, in part, because it expects its 
yet-to-be-named CEO to have some input into that decision. And as far as that 
CEO goes, Covisint is still looking for one. Again, Hill said it was hard to 
fill the spot when the FTC was probing the endeavor because of the 
uncertainty that it brought with it. 
"If you're a CEO, why would you leave your current job and take the Covisint 
job before the FTC approved it?" Hill offered. "And on the other hand, if 
you're the FTC and you see the company you're reviewing hiring people, that 
might make you look a little more closely at what they're doing." 
Both good points. But the fact remains that Covisint still has a lot more 
work to do to get up and running, and these kinds of challenges tend to take 
more time than expected, not less. And if those challenges become problems 
for the company, the company could become a problem for the entire B2B 
sector, as investors realize all over again how hard it will be to make B2B 
work. 
So the FTC's approval, while good for the ideal of B2B in general, might have 
come a bit early for Covisint and the public B2B companies now trying to show 
real results going forward. 
"My perspective is that this approval from the FTC is very important for the 
industry as a whole, but it shouldn't be a suggestion that Covisint has 
anything wonderful in the works," says Ben Smith, a consultant with A.T. 
Kearney. (His firm is a subsidiary of EDS, which formerly was a part of 
General Motors.) "Now we can move on to execution. But this doesn't suggest 
that Covisint has moved to that stage." 
Which means investors in B2B should watch the performance of this exchange 
closely. 

Forgive the length, but it was a long couple of days.  Apologies in advance, 
since I'm sure I've missed something.  Hopefully, it hits the highlights and 
gives a good flavor.  Please foreward to anyone I've inadvertently missed.  
Don't hesitate to contact me if you have any questions.

Best,
Jeff

Jeff Dasovich
09/09/2000 02:33 PM
Elizabeth Linnell@ENRON
09/08/2000 11:44 AM
Sent by: Elizabeth Linnell@ENRON
Attached is the final version.

monday--in office
tuesday--in office
wednesday--in office
thurs--vacation
fri.--vacation

	Joseph Alamo
	08/25/2000 12:25 PM
	
Please forward to me your anticipated schedule for next week
(August 28 - September 1,2000) by Monday morning the 28th.

Your assistance would be sincerely appreciated.

Joseph Alamo
Sr. Administrative Assistant
Government Affairs - The Americas
San Francisco CA 

Jeff Dasovich
09/09/2000 02:34 PM
Jeff Dasovich
09/08/2000 01:03 PM
Attached are the draft message points.  As always, all comments, suggestions, 
etc. are encouraged and welcome.  I have five minutes.  Consequently, based 
on what other panelists say, and general tenor of the hearing, may end up 
emphasizing some points more and others less in opening, and use any Q & A to 
round things out.  Joe/Mary:  any final word on format/participants?  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks for the update.  Just want to add that 1) if we're uneasy about 
wearing the full requirements risk, then focusing on offering a purely 
wholesale deal can still be very attractive, given SDG&E's blunders w.r.t. 
procurment wholesale power on behalf of its customers.  And 2) the CPUC has 
been beat up pretty well for tying the IOUs hands in attempting to hedge, so 
they'll be subject to a considerable amount of pressure to pre-approve if a 
deal is offered that can be show to shield San Diegans from volatility and 
that looks"attractive." 

Appreciate being kept in the loop on the details.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

J

I think we could get below $60 on a 5 year deal with a bell shaped load 
profile at SP-15.  I do not think we can get there for the SDG&E zone.  In 
fact, I don't think Tim will want to sell the SDG&E zone at all.  If we offer 
it, it will be at a significant premium to SP-15.  

We just showed SCE $58 for a 5 year peak (By the way, like the SDG&E RFP, the 
SCE RFP resulted in no transactions because they did not get pre-approved 
reasonableness review and they were too chicken to do it at shareholder 
risk.  The PG&E RFP for essentially the same deal structure is due tomorrow 
and we will be responding.  With the PG&E RFP, prices can be changed oon 
October 11 so  the prices we will show them now are indicative only).

Get me that load profile data and I will put together a deal structure.    I 
wil also be working with the traders to address this "new zone" issue as it 
exists for all three utilities, not just SDG&E.

C

James D Steffes@EES
09/12/2000 07:39 AM
Chris --

I agree with you on the difficulty of a "true" full requirements deal.  I 
assume what you are talking about is some pre-agreed to 100% load factor 
energy delivery that could be different for each hour during the year (a sort 
of "load profile solution").  SDG&E would be responsible for +/- around this 
delivery?  Maybe offer SDG&E an option on wide variations.

The other key issue I guess that is important is transmission congestion 
risk.  Would EPMI be willing to agree to deliver the energy into the SDG&E 
load zone or just to SP15?  It is my understanding that there is a 
significant economic difference the SP15 and specific load zones?  Am I 
correct in my thinking?

We probably need to beat $60/Mwh and leave $5/Mwh for the load following.  We 
may need to go even lower (if possible) to give SDG&E room to recover this 
summer's high cost of power with the retroactive retail ratemaking back 
through July 1, 2000.

On your issue of CPUC approval, that is exactly the play.  We need to walk 
into the CPUC with an offer that it can't pass up (with or without SDG&E).

I've asked Thane Twiggs to get you the appropriate 8760 load profile for 
SDG&E residential customers.  While the rate deal was broader, we could just 
supply this customer group.

I'll call when we have the information.

Jim

Jim:

A couple thoughts...

I don't think Tim would be interested in a true "Full Requirements" deal that 
would put us at risk for actual load.  If we could define "Full Requirements" 
as a load profile that has been set ahead of time, and have SDG&E be at risk 
for deviations from that profile, then I think we would be interested.  With 
this structure, we could offer a fixed price equal to the weighted average 
price of their load profile.  If that fixed price was lower than the SDG&E 
embedded generation cost in rates we might have an angle. "Winning" such a 
deal still seems like a pretty low probability event, given SDG&E's desire to 
RFP everything.  However, SDG&E's (and SCE's) main objective seems to be 
pre-approved reasonableness review.  Since they can't make money on 
commodity, at least they don't want to lose money.  Maybe we could get the 
approval of the CPUC? SDG&E wouldn't mind buying from us if this is what it 
took to get pre-approved reasonableness review.  

If someone could get me that load profile information, I would be willing to 
price it up. 

Let me know what you think.

C 
James D Steffes@EES
09/11/2000 01:12 PM
Chris --

Given this development, now may be the right time for Enron to come in and 
make a "public" offer to SDG&E.  We may be able to put some pressure on the 
CPUC to approve a full requirements offer that works with the legislative 
rate cap.

I'll be in contact with you to discuss.

Jim

Surprise, surprise.  

SDG&E is afraid to do anything without the pre-approved reasonableness from 
the CPUC which I don't think will be obtained.

Chris

Chris

SDG&E would like to inform you that  we did not gain authority from the
commission on 9/7 and cannot enter into bilateral trades at present; (2) we
anticipate receiving that approval on September 21; we will solicit new
proposals between now and then and look forward to your continuing
participation, as well as your assistance in gaining the necessary
regulatory approvals.  Thanks

Thanks.

plz call when you can.  thanks, jeff  415.782.7822.

The CPUC can do it it it wants---it's a decision about risk and reward.  If 
the CPUC wants to set up a mechanism by which pre-approval is permitted, it 
can do so.  Here's the catch, pre-approval means that the IOU has to be 
willing (generally) to accept a bit more risk.  They don't like that.  The 
CPUC has to be willing to relinquish a bit of control---this Commission 
definitely doesn't like that idea.  So often, the utility puts up a proposal 
that the Commission says places to much risk with granny.  The CPUC often 
issues a decision in response that the utility claims leaves to much control 
(read "second-guessing") with the Commission (and therefore leaves to much 
risk with the utility).  In the end, the utility often "declines" the 
Commission's offer.  However, it can be done.  For example, under 
California's restructuring law, the utility's purchases from the PX are just 
and reasonable, period.   (Of course, we see where the incentive built into 
that mechanism got us--a debacle.)  

Do you have PG&E's and Edison's proposals filed regarding bilaterals some 
weeks ago, in which they propose certain pre-approval mechanisms?  The 
Commission didn't adopt them wholesale, and the decision has made PG&E and 
Edison reticent to sign any such as a result---witness the unfruitful RFPs.

This at all helpful?

Honey, I really want to come, but my homework is due to my group tonite and I 
haven't even started it.  I love you tons and hope you understand.  

Please call your mom.  She was a pain on the phone today, saying there's no 
need to remove the stumps at the dome.  Jeff's willing to do ALL THREE for 
$350.  It's just ridiculous and I am having a hard time haggling anymore. 

 I love you tons.  And if you want to talk more about dinner, please call 
me.  I'm sorry, but there's just too darned much to do.  (I think my cold's 
getting worse, not better.  :(

xoxoxoxoxox

thanks very much for the info.  certainly makes it interesting.  how's 
things?  

P.S. do you know that edison at the FERC hearing said that it hedged $30MM 
and made a whopping $415 MM!!!  Are they gouging San Diegans?  Are they 
"gaming" the system?  Inquiring minds want to know.  You may want to check in 
with Smutney when Edison made the statement.  There may be nothing to it, but 
it might be interesting to check into.  Is Edison one of those "profiteers" 
who ought to give San Diegans a refund?

Please see the last third of this column.  Karen

Dan Walters: 2% problems vex governor

(Published Sept. 14, 2000)
Two percent doesn't sound like much of anything, but California's economy is
just so big -- a trillion-plus dollars a year, measured by either output or
personal income -- that even a tiny share can mean many billions of dollars.
As it happens, Gov. Gray Davis finds himself in the middle of several
quasi-economic, quasi-political squabbles, each of which involves a couple
of percentage points of California's economy -- and the outcome of which may
affect his governorship.
One showdown occurred last week when the Air Resources Board, an arm of the
Davis administration, decided to stick with its policy of compelling the
auto industry to sharply increase sales of zero-emission cars. There are
about 2,000 electric-powered cars now on California's roads, and the ARB
wants that to increase tenfold and beyond, despite industry assertions that
battery technology isn't advanced enough. Californians lay out about $20
billion a year for a million new cars -- 2 percent of the state's personal
income stream. The ARB's decision could either create an entirely new
industry of nonpolluting cars, as advocates claim, or reduce the overall
supply of cars that can be legally sold and drive up Californians' costs, as
critics maintain. And Davis will get the credit or blame.
Although exact numbers are hard to obtain, it's likely that within a few
years, Californians will be spending another $20 billion a year to gamble,
mostly in casinos operated by Indian tribes, thanks to legislation signed by
Davis -- a major recipient of tribal political contributions. Cardroom
operators, who say they may be driven out of business by lavish new Indian
casinos, persuaded the Legislature to pass two bills that would allow them
to offer new card games, including a form of blackjack. But the tribes
oppose such expansion, obviously wanting to maintain what is rapidly
becoming a state-sanctioned monopoly on casino gambling, and Davis must
decide the bills' fate. Regardless of what he does, cardroom operators are
mulling a federal lawsuit alleging that the Indian monopoly on slot machines
violates federal law, which generally grants Indian casinos parity with
other forms of gambling.
The final 2-percent issue facing Davis poses the greatest peril to his
governorship: the huge run-up in electric utility costs in the wake of
deregulation. Utilities were paying about $20 billion a year for power
before the recent spike, but their costs now have doubled. San Diego
ratepayers got hit first, but those in other major metropolitan areas could
feel the pocketbook pain soon.
Davis signed two measures, one that rolls back San Diegans' power bills
temporarily, but could lead to balloon payments later, and another to speed
up siting of new power plants. But they are, at best, stop-gap measures, and
he may veto a third bill that would have the state directly underwrite the
higher utility bills. What the governor appears to be doing, by word and
deed, is to plead with the Public Utilities Commission and the Energy
Commission to get him off the hook.
The timing is critical because Pacific Gas and Electric Co. and Southern
California Edison say they are absorbing billions of dollars in higher
wholesale costs that they can't immediately pass on to consumers thanks to a
rate freeze. The freeze is supposed to end in 2002, just as Davis is seeking
a second term, and if he and his utility regulators can't come up with a
solution by then, all hell could break loose as consumers' bills escalate
sharply and they look for someone to blame.
Davis may not have had anything to do with the original deregulation
legislation -- as he points out at every opportunity -- but he's stuck with
the problem now. Dealing with it could be critical to his political future.
DAN WALTERS' column appears daily, except Saturday. Mail: P.O. Box 15779,
Sacramento, CA 95852; phone (916) 321-1195; fax (781) 846-8350
E-mail: dwalters@sacbee.com <mailto:dwalters@sacbee.com>
Recent columns: <http://www.capitolalert.com/voices/index_walters.html>

Karen Edson
kedson@ns.net
916/552-7070

10 AM works for me.

Mary Hain@ECT
09/14/2000 12:41 PM
Jim is available at 10:00 pacific time.  Does that work for others?  Jim - 
Ron suggests having Carl Imparato on the call because of his extensive 
knowledge of California markets.  What do you think? If you were looking for 
an attached list, I haven't prepared it yet.

James D Steffes@EES
09/14/2000 09:42 AM
9am Central time is bad for me.  I could do it at 8am Central or 12noon 
Central.  Don't hold off for me.

Jim

Mary Hain@ECT
09/14/2000 11:32 AM
I'd like to have a conference call tommorrow at 9:00 a.m. to review Tim's 
"top 5" priorities to fix the wholesale market in California.  I need to do 
this tomorrow so Seabron and Ron can write our pleading for the Section 206 
proceeding while I'm on vacation next week.  Please let me know ASAP if 9:00 
is a bad time or if you don't want to be on the call.

Needs to know before your parents leave for Mexico, which is tomorrow, 
unfortunately.  I guess I'll be at my house.  You want to stay there, or you 
want to stay at your place?  Either way's OK with me.

Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/14/2000 03:08:01 PM
OK, I understand.  Are you going to be at your house tonight then?

When does Jeff need an answer about the stumps?  Can we talk about it this
weekend?

At 02:55 PM 9/14/2000 -0500, you wrote:

>Honey, I really want to come, but my homework is due to my group tonite and
>I haven't even started it.  I love you tons and hope you understand.
>
>Please call your mom.  She was a pain on the phone today, saying there's no
>need to remove the stumps at the dome.  Jeff's willing to do ALL THREE for
>$350.  It's just ridiculous and I am having a hard time haggling anymore.
>
>  I love you tons.  And if you want to talk more about dinner, please call
>me.  I'm sorry, but there's just too darned much to do.  (I think my cold's
>getting worse, not better.  :(
>
>
>xoxoxoxoxox

FYI.  In case you're interested.
Andy Brown <ABB@eslawfirm.com> on 09/14/2000 12:14:02 PM
All:  Attached in RTF format is the current draft of the IEP intervention &  
protest in opposition to the EOB complaint at FERC.? Also below are the  
details for the conference call on Friday (at 10 am) to discuss this.? The  
filing will be made on Monday the 18th.? We're looking for comments on  
angle/spin, tone, argument, etc.? There are still some holes that I will be  
filling in, most likely after the call.? Questions/comments can be sent to  
me and should CC Steven Kelly.? The cut-off for comments with be 10 am on  
Sunday, Sept. 17.? ABB
?

Andrew B. Brown
Ellison, Schneider & Harris, LLP
2015  H Street
Sacramento, CA? 95814
Phone: (916) 447-2166
Fax: (916)  447-3512
mailto:abb@eslawfirm.com

CONFIDENTIALITY  NOTICE:? This communication and any accompanying document(s) 
are  confidential and privileged.? They are intended for the sole use of the  
addressee.? If you receive this transmission in error, you are advised that  
any disclosure, copying, distribution, or the taking of any action in 
reliance  upon the communication is strictly prohibited.? Moreover, any such  
inadvertent disclosure shall not compromise or waive the attorney-client  
privilege as to this communication or otherwise.? If you have received this  
communication in error, please contact the sender at the internet address  
indicated or by telephone at (916)447-2166. Thank you.

In response to the email distributed last  Fridayregarding IEP's intervention 
in the EOB and CALPX price cap filings at  FERC, IEP is proceeding to draft 
comments on the EOB filing.? Much of the  filing will build off arguements 
used in the San Diego pleading as well as  comments IEP made to the 
Congressional Subcommittee meetings in San  Diego.? In addition, IEP has 
intervened for "party status" in the CALPX  proceeding on price caps.? 
?
We plan to distrubute comments on  Thursday, convene a conference call 
Friday, Sept. 15 at 10:00 a.m.  (PST).
?
The Call-In Number is???  ??? ??? 800/205-3434
The Participant Code  is?????????  111756
?
IEP is still interested in receiving Task Force  commitments to assist in 
restructuring/transmission related matters.?  While a numberr of companies 
have indicated verbally their interest in the EOB  filing as well as others, 
we have yet to receive a written confirmation.?  If you are interested, 
please respond to the Friday email soliciting  funds.? Thanks.
 - 000918_IEP_Mo_Interv_EL00-104.doc

Thanks very much to all for your assistance.  Is it possible to get some idea 
of exactly what the amount to be refunded is?  Thanks so much again for your 
help.

Best,
Jeff

Andrea Williams@ENRON
08/24/2000 04:12 PM
Michelle,
We have corrected Mr. Dasovich's tuition reimbursement to non-taxable.  Due 
to SAP configuration, the system will not deduct any taxes from his pay until 
the total is refunded.  Therefore, on his 8/31 paycheck, he will not have a 
tax deduction for FICA/SS/MED.

Thanks,
Andrea

Michelle Hargrave@ECT

08/04/2000 04:41 PM

Hi Andrea,

Jeff Dasovich (508152) received his latest tuition reimbursement on 7/31/00, 
unfortunately it was not supposed to be taxed.  A letter was sent with his 
tuition on 4/15/00 that was paid correctly - but I think Gwen forgot to send 
it with the July claim.   It is being required by his Managing Director, Rick 
Shapiro, and should therefore not be subject to income tax.  Can you please 
process a refund for the the taxes that were taken?  I will insure that we 
send the letter with all future claims.

Should you have any questions, please feel free to contact me on ext 36023.

Regards,
Michelle 

Who are John and Kittina?  Who are the others you've invited?  What's the 
occasion?  When's your anniversary?  Why is there a foie gras shortage?

Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com> on 09/14/2000 11:37:04 AM
John and Kittina Powers (among others) are coming to dinner Oct 7.? Please 
let me know by the time we get back (9/23) from Mexico if any or all of you 
care to join us.? It is not a command performance, but you are most welcome.? 
I need to know to order the foie gras - there is a shortage of it right now - 
probably due to our anniversary approaching

Nancy 
(707) 251-4870 (phone) 
(707) 265-5446 (fax) 
"Plus je bois, mieux je chante" 

Good points, Chris, and well taken.  

The PUC Commisisoners took some heat for their heavy-handed approach at 
hearings held by Congress on Monday and FERC on Tuesday.  I think those 
hearings may have loosened things the Commission up at least somewhat, though 
finding a balance between Commission willingness to grant pre-approval and 
utility willingness to wear some risk in exchange won't be a cakewalk. 

We need to remind the Commission that they gave 100 % pre-approved 
reasonableness for purchases from the PX, and that pre-approval for other 
purchases is necessary.  That said, I concur that it ain't a gimmee.

Best,
Jeff

Jeff:

 Re: you comment below that "...they'll be subject to a considerable amount 
of pressure to pre-approve if a deal is offered that can be show to shield 
San Diegans from volatility and that looks"attractive."   The CPUC did not 
pre-approve either SDG&E or SCE recent attempts to buy forward.   I don't 
think they ever will give pre-granted reasonableness review for purchases.  
That is why boith utilites decided not to execute as part of their recent 
RFPs.  PG&E RFP is up next...I expect more of the same.

Chris

Jeff Dasovich@EES
09/14/2000 08:54 AM
Thanks for the update.  Just want to add that 1) if we're uneasy about 
wearing the full requirements risk, then focusing on offering a purely 
wholesale deal can still be very attractive, given SDG&E's blunders w.r.t. 
procurment wholesale power on behalf of its customers.  And 2) the CPUC has 
been beat up pretty well for tying the IOUs hands in attempting to hedge, so 
they'll be subject to a considerable amount of pressure to pre-approve if a 
deal is offered that can be show to shield San Diegans from volatility and 
that looks"attractive." 

Appreciate being kept in the loop on the details.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

J

I think we could get below $60 on a 5 year deal with a bell shaped load 
profile at SP-15.  I do not think we can get there for the SDG&E zone.  In 
fact, I don't think Tim will want to sell the SDG&E zone at all.  If we offer 
it, it will be at a significant premium to SP-15.  

We just showed SCE $58 for a 5 year peak (By the way, like the SDG&E RFP, the 
SCE RFP resulted in no transactions because they did not get pre-approved 
reasonableness review and they were too chicken to do it at shareholder 
risk.  The PG&E RFP for essentially the same deal structure is due tomorrow 
and we will be responding.  With the PG&E RFP, prices can be changed oon 
October 11 so  the prices we will show them now are indicative only).

Get me that load profile data and I will put together a deal structure.    I 
wil also be working with the traders to address this "new zone" issue as it 
exists for all three utilities, not just SDG&E.

C

James D Steffes@EES
09/12/2000 07:39 AM
Chris --

I agree with you on the difficulty of a "true" full requirements deal.  I 
assume what you are talking about is some pre-agreed to 100% load factor 
energy delivery that could be different for each hour during the year (a sort 
of "load profile solution").  SDG&E would be responsible for +/- around this 
delivery?  Maybe offer SDG&E an option on wide variations.

The other key issue I guess that is important is transmission congestion 
risk.  Would EPMI be willing to agree to deliver the energy into the SDG&E 
load zone or just to SP15?  It is my understanding that there is a 
significant economic difference the SP15 and specific load zones?  Am I 
correct in my thinking?

We probably need to beat $60/Mwh and leave $5/Mwh for the load following.  We 
may need to go even lower (if possible) to give SDG&E room to recover this 
summer's high cost of power with the retroactive retail ratemaking back 
through July 1, 2000.

On your issue of CPUC approval, that is exactly the play.  We need to walk 
into the CPUC with an offer that it can't pass up (with or without SDG&E).

I've asked Thane Twiggs to get you the appropriate 8760 load profile for 
SDG&E residential customers.  While the rate deal was broader, we could just 
supply this customer group.

I'll call when we have the information.

Jim

Jim:

A couple thoughts...

I don't think Tim would be interested in a true "Full Requirements" deal that 
would put us at risk for actual load.  If we could define "Full Requirements" 
as a load profile that has been set ahead of time, and have SDG&E be at risk 
for deviations from that profile, then I think we would be interested.  With 
this structure, we could offer a fixed price equal to the weighted average 
price of their load profile.  If that fixed price was lower than the SDG&E 
embedded generation cost in rates we might have an angle. "Winning" such a 
deal still seems like a pretty low probability event, given SDG&E's desire to 
RFP everything.  However, SDG&E's (and SCE's) main objective seems to be 
pre-approved reasonableness review.  Since they can't make money on 
commodity, at least they don't want to lose money.  Maybe we could get the 
approval of the CPUC? SDG&E wouldn't mind buying from us if this is what it 
took to get pre-approved reasonableness review.  

If someone could get me that load profile information, I would be willing to 
price it up. 

Let me know what you think.

C 
James D Steffes@EES
09/11/2000 01:12 PM
Chris --

Given this development, now may be the right time for Enron to come in and 
make a "public" offer to SDG&E.  We may be able to put some pressure on the 
CPUC to approve a full requirements offer that works with the legislative 
rate cap.

I'll be in contact with you to discuss.

Jim

Surprise, surprise.  

SDG&E is afraid to do anything without the pre-approved reasonableness from 
the CPUC which I don't think will be obtained.

Chris

Chris

SDG&E would like to inform you that  we did not gain authority from the
commission on 9/7 and cannot enter into bilateral trades at present; (2) we
anticipate receiving that approval on September 21; we will solicit new
proposals between now and then and look forward to your continuing
participation, as well as your assistance in gaining the necessary
regulatory approvals.  Thanks

Not a problem.  the schedule was only a suggestion.  work it in when you 
can.  and if you get totally fried, just say so, and we can take on the 
question.

Kimberly Kupiecki <kkupiecki@arpartners.com> on 09/13/2000 10:18:19 PM
Hi Jeff, and team

I will due my best on the Thursday deadline, but I am pretty fried at
present.  I should be able to focus on this tomorrow eve.  I am happy to
take on the assigned question.

Cheers,

At 01:12 PM 9/13/00, you wrote:

>Not a problem, Jimmie.  About this week's case.  Been travelling.  I'm
>back.  Kim:  in your absence on Monday, we talked a little about how to
>proceed on the next case.  How's this sound:  everyone takes a question.
>If the answer to one question depends on the answer to another, the folks
>doing those questions should get together and discuss.  Everyone should
>distribute to the team a draft of the answer to the question by tomorrow
>(Thursday) night.   Then folks could look at the responses, make
>suggestions, comments, etc. and distribute via email by Noon on Saturday.
>I'll then compile in a form that we can submit on Monday.  Thoughts?
>
>I have randomly selected questions:  here are the results.  Jeff--#3;
>Jimmie--#1; Kim--#2; Dylan--#4.  If folks are comfortable with this
>distribution, let me know.
>
>Best,
>Jeff
>
>
>
>
Kimberly Kupiecki
Senior Account Executive
A&R Partners
kkupiecki@arpartners.com
(650) 762 2800 main
(650) 762 2825 direct
fax (650) 762 2801

3 words:  steffes, steffes, steffes

Susan J Mara
09/14/2000 03:47 PM
LIST OF THINGS WE WANT THE CPUC TO DO?  We should be using it for the OII 
filing.

i love you.  thanks for being so sweet.

Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/14/2000 03:42:40 PM
I can go to your house after dinner.

At 03:09 PM 9/14/2000 -0500, you wrote:

>Needs to know before your parents leave for Mexico, which is tomorrow,
>unfortunately.  I guess I'll be at my house.  You want to stay there, or
>you want to stay at your place?  Either way's OK with me.
>
>
>
>
>Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 09/14/2000 03:08:01 PM
>

Recognizing the time constraints you face, I've tried to 1) clear up a few 
inaccuracies and 2) massage some of the sharper language without taking a 
chainsaw to the otherwise good job.  

How long you going for?  I'm jealous.

Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com> on 09/14/2000 12:20:39 PM

I thought you already knew that we will already be in Italy.? Scott leaves =
on=20
the 26th and I leave on October 5th.? Oh well=01(

?

Cameron Sellers

Vice President, Business Development

PERFECT.COM

1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210

Palo Alto, CA 94303

cameron@perfect.com

650.798.3366 (direct dial)

650.269.3366 (cell)

650.858.1095 (fax)

?

?

John and Kittina Powers (among others) are coming to dinner Oct 7.? Please=
=20
let me know by the time we get back (9/23) from Mexico if any or all of you=
=20
care to join us.? It is not a command performance, but you are most welcome=
.?=20
I need to know to order the foie gras - there is a shortage of it right now=
 -=20
probably due to our anniversary approaching

?

Nancy
(707) 251-4870 (phone)
(707) 265-5446 (fax)
"Plus je bois, mieux je chante"

?
 - image001.jpg

Might have perhaps been simpler if Bill "Al Haig" Richardson had announced at 
the press conference yesterday that he was ordering his energy company, BPA, 
to stop "withholding" and send power to California.

	Cynthia Sandherr
	12/14/2000 10:37 AM
		 
DOE and FERC just briefed the Hill and confirmed they never issued the Order 
yesterday since Bonneville released a lot more power late yesterday.  The 
Administration advised that if the situation warrants, they will indeed issue 
the Order.  This remains a fluid situation with Richardson yesterday 
announcing his intent to "sign an Order" which his staff had not yet written 
while in the interim BPA acted so as to make his announcement moot.

We will continue to apprise you of the developments including reports of 
FERC's surprise site inspections.

Can you believe this?

Ralph:  No one else had any problems with it.  It's a simply Excel file that 
should show graphs with 3 "portfolio scenarios."  Would you like me to fax to 
you, or bring copies to tomorrow's meeting?

Sue, Sandi, Paul:

Let's try to discuss and collect any comments we have this afternoon at our 
weekly staff meeting.

Thanks.  The hearings were tiresome, but hanging out with you and Steve was a 
real treat.  Hope to do it again soon.  You probably noticed that, in my 
summary, I made no mention of the shoes that I was wearing.....

Best,
Jeff

Karen Denne@ENRON
09/14/2000 07:32 AM
Now I know why you were scribbling in that little blue book!  Great notes!  
Sounds like Tuesday was quite a circus -- and a long, drawn-out one, too.  I 
think you did great and wish Steve and I could have stayed for Tuesday's 
performance.  Thanks for all the updates.  kd

apologies.  could you resend me the id and password to get into EOL.  thanks 
a bunch.

Professor Aceves:

Could you let me know that you received the final exam files that I sent last 
nite?  I'll sleep easier knowing that you've received them and that they're 
not floating around somewhere in cyberspace.  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

Sorry.  Been a bit crazy around here.  Thanks for the note, and thank you for 
doing such a good job at driving this process.  My thoughts on your proposal 
(and these are very preliminary):  1) politicians may not be willing to go as 
high as 25% for fear of being accused of a "utility bailout"--maybe 10-15%?  
though utility solvency may force their hands.  2) TURN will go ape-#%#$ if 
we make the "roll off" retroactive to October.  3) I'm willing to allow 
utilities to collect TRA undercollections, but feel that customers and 
utilities (not me) need to figure out precisely what that number is.

Look forward to getting closure tomorrow, though I'm very concerned that 
we've lost Edison, given Bryson's public calls to return to 1950.

Best,
Jeff

	Evelyn Kahl Elsesser <eke@aelaw.com>
	12/12/2000 06:57 PM
		 
I really appreciated your participation today...very substantive and
constructive.  I particularly liked the idea of a migration "trigger",
which I included in the outline.  I personally think that the big ticket
items are rate level, rate freeze end and TRA allocation.  I wish we
could start facing that dance.  I'd play with (a) 25% immediate increase
in commodity price (explicit, rather than residual); (b) rate freeze end
on October 2, 2000 (c) pre EOF TRA undercollections to utilities,
everything after is allocated forward to procurement customers.
Thoughts?

Actually, please keep doing this, but send them only to Miyung Buster and ask 
that they be included in the group of articles sent out to everyone twice a 
day.  Miyung's in charge of compiling and distributing such articles on a 
twice-a-day basis.  Thanks a bunch.

Glad to hear that you're on the distribution.  I think it's vital that you 
attend.  It's a centrist group that's making a lot of progress.  But chances 
for success will be greatly diminished without PG&E's participation.

Best,
Jeff

P.S. If you're responsible for getting Dan there, you're a genius.  I've 
written Dan a note telling him that it's absolutely critical that he be 
there.  Maybe you could ask the other folks on the distribution to urge Dan 
to come, too.

Best,
Jeff

	Miyung Buster@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	12/14/2000 10:51 AM
		 
Please see the attached articles:

Hi Kari:  

I know that you and I are both swamped, so I'm writing very briefly to give 
you a brief update.  But first, thank you very much again for meeting last 
week.  Greatly appreciated, and look forward to working together to help in 
any way I can to find solution that is acceptable to all. Here's the update:

Our "subcommitte" is meeting tomorrow to try to close the deal on a proposed 
solution.  It focuses on 3 key areas:

Using the utilities retained assets to moderate prices.
Designing a framework for forward contracting that strikes a much more 
appropriate balance in CA between state oversight and the need for utility 
flexibility.
Rate stabilization/Undercollections (utility solvency)

I will update you tomorrow on the group's progress.  If thing's go according 
to plan, we may be in a position to submit something to you a early as 
Monday.  If there's a deadline from your end that I ought to be aware of, let 
me know and I'll incorporate it into the subcommittee's work plan.

In the meantime, if there is anything at all that I can do to help, please 
don't hesitiate to contact me.

Thanks again and all the best,
Jeff

who the hell is this bozo?

you forward this to wolfe, belden & co.?

now i'm really jealous.  let me see what i can muster up for you on tuscany.  
o, jealous am I.

Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com> on 09/14/2000 05:06:45 PM
I am meeting him in London on the 5th and we are leaving that Sunday the 8th
for Florence.  We stay in Florence (and the Tuscany area) until the 16th.
Have you been there?  Do you know anyone who would be willing to give me
some advice or ideas of a cool place to stay?

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT.COM
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

 << File: JPEG File Interchange >>

How long you going for?  I'm jealous.

Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com> on 09/14/2000 12:20:39 PM

I thought you already knew that we will already be in Italy.  Scott leaves
on the 26(superscript: th) and I leave on October 5(superscript: th).  Oh
well?

Cameron Sellers

Vice President, Business Development

PERFECT.COM

1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210

Palo Alto, CA 94303

cameron@perfect.com

650.798.3366 (direct dial)

650.269.3366 (cell)

650.858.1095 (fax)

John and Kittina Powers (among others) are coming to dinner Oct 7.  Please
let me know by the time we get back (9/23) from Mexico if any or all of you
care to join us.  It is not a command performance, but you are most
welcome.  I need to know to order the foie gras - there is a shortage of it
right now - probably due to our anniversary approaching

Nancy
(707) 251-4870 (phone)
(707) 265-5446 (fax)
"Plus je bois, mieux je chante"

(See attached file: image001.jpg)

I think we need to be careful about broadcasting every rumor floating around 
to an email list of this size.  Just a thought.

	Mary Hain@ECT
	12/14/2000 02:51 PM
		 
Please confirm or deny - rumor has it PG&E has or is filing for bankruptcy

no problem.  we're cancelling the meeting.

	Sandra McCubbin
	12/14/2000 02:51 PM
		
since I just got in the office, and just got the e mail, I doubt if I will 
have time before 4 to discuss it

FYI.  Here's the release that I referenced yesterday evening.
		? 
		
		

		
		
		
		
		
		
		CONTACT:
		
		Armando Rend?n
		December 13, 2000
		CPUC: 103
		? 
		415-703-1366
		
		abr@cpuc.ca.gov
		? 
		
		CPUC PRESIDENT LYNCH AND COMMISSIONER DUQUE STATEMENT 
		California Public Utilities Commission (CPUC) President Loretta Lynch and 
Commissioner Henry Duque today issued a statement regarding revisions to item 
8 on the Commissioner agenda of December 21, 2000:
		We note certain revisions to the Commission's published agenda for December 
21st. Item 8 has been revised to reflect the scope of options available to 
the Commission in addressing current financial conditions facing Pacific Gas 
and Electric and Southern California Edison. The financial problems faced by 
California's utilities are the result of the failure of the wholesale 
electric market to ensure just and reasonable prices for this necessity. The 
Commission need not act on this agenda item on December 21st, but the fact 
that it is on our agenda allows the Commission to act if necessary. 
		The financial stability of California's utilities is of paramount importance 
to California, and to this Commission. The CPUC stands ready to act to 
protect the financial viability of California utilities. The exorbitant and 
unjustified prices now being charged in California's electricity market 
demonstrate the necessity for the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) 
to intervene and control the opportunism of the electricity sellers. FERC 
must act to solve the underlying market failure so that all energy consumers 
are assured of reliable delivery of power and protected from exorbitant 
energy costs. We urge FERC to act immediately. 
		For information on this item, please contact Harriett Burt, Deputy Chief of 
Staff for Loretta Lynch at 415-703- 2444, Mary Lou Tousey, 415-703-2593, or 
Commissioner Carl Wood, 415-703- 2440.
		###

you will be on call, correct?

Since I'm in S.F., I assume that I'll be able to call in by phone?

Jeannie:  there are currently  8,300 MWs worth of applications submitted and 
awaiting approval for construction from the CEC. 

get rid of him.

And the same to you.  Sorry you didn't make to have a beer after the final.  
See you at MPAR in January.  Have fun catching up on your sleep and laying 
around a little bit.

Best,
Jeff

Only the presidential election was more bizarre!  I have my fingers crossed 
that a Republican administration will help.  In any case, it's a welcome 
change of pace.  Hope you're well out there.

Best,
Jeff

Here are some suggestions for the op-ed piece.  One general comment:  It may 
be a bit lengthy at this point.  Also, have we decided whether it would be 
our op-ed piece?  

And one key point that is very commercially sensitive:  The term "end the 
rate freeze" has very ominous implications for EES's book, depending on the 
timing of any such "end" in California.  Thus my heavy-handed edits on that 
portion.

Nice job, Jeannie.

Best,
Jeff

can you talk to sandi?  she's on vacation beginning on monday.  the idea wa=
s=20
that she and i should get together before she left (based on the call we ha=
d=20
where Rick and Paul put the ball in my and sandi's court to coordinate the=
=20
strategy).  she suggested that it would also be a good idea to grab whoever=
=20
was here tomorrow, too.  it's really just a prelim meeting to discuss the=
=20
note that sandi sent around and for me to bounce a few ideas off of her. =
=20
we'll be having many, many more, and nothing discussed in tomorrow's "kick=
=20
off" will set anything in stone.  that said, if you prefer that we wait,=20
that's ok with me.

Mona L Petrochko
09/14/2000 03:30 PM
ARM is having a full-day off-site tomorrow.  If you are going to be having =
a=20
meeting w/ GA folks on strategy development for next year, I would like to =
be=20
able to participate. =20

=09Joseph Alamo
=0909/11/2000 03:40 PM
=09

Government Affairs
Weekly Schedules
September 11-15, 2000

Paul Kaufman

Mon, 9/11 Travel to Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Tues, 9/12 GA Meetings =01) Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Wed, 9/13 GA Meetings =01) Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Thurs, 9/14  Carson City, Reno NV
Fri, 9/15  Sacramento for Meetings with SMUD/TANC or Portland (TBD)

Sue Mara

Mon, 9/11 Travel to Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Tues, 9/12 GA Meetings =01) Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Wed, 9/13 GA Meetings =01) Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Thurs, 9/14 San Francisco Office
Fri, 9/15  San Francisco Office; ARM Meeting (9:00 - 11:00 AM)

Mona Petrochko

Mon, 9/11 San Francisco Office =01) am; Travel to DC, pm
Tues, 9/12 GA Meetings =01) DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Wed, 9/13 GA Meetings =01) DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Thurs, 9/14  San Francisco Office =01) am; Travel to DC, pm
Fri, 9/15  ARM Meeting (offsite) (9:00 =01) 11:00 AM)

Jeff Dasovich

Mon, 9/11 San Diego for Congressional Hearing w/S. Kean
Tues, 9/12 San Diego - Appearing at FERC Hearing
Wed, 9/13 San Francisco Office
Thurs, 9/14 San Francisco Office - Meeting with LECG re: Study on Competiti=
on=20
vs. Command and Control
Fri, 9/15  San Francisco Office

Sandi McCubbin

Mon, 9/11 San Francisco Office
Tues, 9/12 Travel to Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Wed, 9/13 GA Meetings =01) DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Thurs, 9/14 San Francisco Office
Fri, 9/15  San Francisco Office

Marcie Milner

Mon, 9/11 Phoenix Office
Tues, 9/12 Travel to Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Wed, 9/13 GA Meetings =01) DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Thurs, 9/14=20
 day Travel to Phoenix Office
Fri, 9/15  Phoenix Office

Attached is a letter that we worked on today and that will be sent to the 
Governor, CA's US Senators (Boxer/Feinstein), congressional folks, and key 
Cal state legislators.  It's going out first thing tomorrow AM.  It builds on 
many of the things we've discussed over the past several months, so there 
shouldn't be any surprises.  If you've got any concerns please give Paul a 
call at home or page me at 888.916.7184.

Jeff

	Paul Kaufman@ECT
	12/14/2000 06:57 PM
		 
Attached is a revised draft of the letter reflecting the comments recevied on 
today's call.  I toned down references to the Secretary's action yesterday, 
reduced the discussion of caps, and eliminated our response to the "when did 
you stop beating your dog" question.

Thank you.  Have a nice holiday.

Best,
Jeff

FYI.  Please keep this internal and confidential.  Here's where the group I 
mentioned left off last Friday.  It will be useful for our discussion this 
afternoon.  You'll note from the comments that it's anything but a done 
deal.  I'll forward the SF press mentioned in the note.

Best,
Jeff 
	Evelyn Kahl Elsesser <eke@aelaw.com>
	12/17/2000 11:05 PM
		 
A revised CESG outline is attached, updated to reflect Friday's
discussion.  While we discussed much greater detail, I have continued to
try to keep the outline more general to avoid generating a treatise at
this point.  Particularly, we discussed much greater detail around the
rate stabilization plan than is reflected in the attached outline.

SCE has committed to providing some sort of percentage or tiered term
structure for forward contracting to complete that section of the
framework (section 2).  Obviously, PG&E's ideas in this area would also
be welcome.

In Section 4 (undercollections) I have thrown in the numbers provided to
the Chronicle for the Saturday morning article describing the extent to
which the utilities may have already committed to Governor Davis to
absorb undercollections.  (Which leads to the question for John and Dan,
again, whether we are wasting our time with this exercise given the
media coverage describing the state of the IOU deal.)

Delaney has committed to provide a call-in number for tomorrow's 3:30
conference call.  Thank you all again for your efforts.

Can we try to set up a quick call to discuss?

	Thane Twiggs@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	12/18/2000 09:40 AM
		 
The New York PSC staff has issued a preliminary price report for the New York 
wholesale market.  The are asking for similar remedies that California 
recently received from the FERC, i.e. $150 soft price caps, retroactive 
price/bid reductions, etc.

Howard Fromer and I are putting together an action plan and would like your 
input.  Did/Do  you have an action plan for California to counter the recent 
developments (if so I would like a copy)?  Do you have any thoughts on what 
worked, what did not?  Any information or thoughts would be helpful.

Thanks,

TTT
713-853-3199 

1) Is it your sense that the deal is done and that it will be announced at 
the PUC meeting on Thursday?
2) Would the PUC be required to provide 30 days comment, or could it be 
effective immediately?

Best,
Jeff

Bad.  Let's talk.

Yes.

need to be 12:30

	Lysa Akin@ECT
	12/18/2000 12:56 PM
		 
Can you do it prior to 1:30pm??

Susan J Mara@ENRON
12/18/2000 10:57 AM
I have ab appointment at 4:00, so I would have to do it from the car and I 
would not have nmuch time -- any time until 1:30 pm is better.

	Lysa Akin@ECT
	12/18/2000 10:46 AM
		 
Please advise if you would be available for a call at 3:30pm Pacific time 
today.
Mary Hain
12/18/2000 10:43 AM
Please get times when people are available.  Thanks.
Mary Hain
12/18/2000 10:42 AM
I'd like to set up a call for this afternoon to discuss the FERC's order, in 
general.  Also, in an hour or so I'll also be forwarding a proposed issue 
list on rehearing so we can talk about it.

Lysa Akin
12/18/2000 09:53 AM
I got your message after I sent you this update.  I sent a note to everyone I 
contacted, advising the call would not take place.

Mary Hain
12/18/2000 09:52 AM
Jim says he doesn't want to have a conference call yet.

Lysa Akin
12/18/2000 09:26 AM
regarding the call you asked me to set up:

Jim is is DC with Rick and Steve.  Marcia is paging him to see if he is 
available at 2:30pm Central/3:30pm Eastern
I left a message wither Bernadette to call me back regarding Joe and Sarah's 
availability at 3:30pm Eastern
Jeff indicated is he available at 12:30 Pacific.
I left a message w/Sue asking if she can make it at 12:30pm.

Maureen advised that Steve might be able to make it at 3:30pm Eastern, so I 
will make sure she has all the info so that she can page him.

I left a message for Richard to call me back

Mike:
Can't thank you guys enough for coming.  It was a great time, and Prentice 
was really happy that you made it.  Hope you didn't get too much of a 
headache listening to me play (?) the bass.  Please pass along thanks to 
Lisa, and no reciprocation needed.  Great to have you.  Happy holidays.

Best,
Jeff

	Mike Herring <mherring@myfamilyinc.com>
	12/18/2000 12:12 PM
		 
Great weekend overall.  Thanks for inviting us, Jeff, we had a really good
time and thouroughly enjoyed oursleves the entire time.  

Hopefully we'll get a chance to reciprocate soon.

Best-
Mike

likely a mistake.  send the sender an email and ask?

thanks.

800.713.8600 code: 80435

Jennifer:

With respect to FERC's ruling from Friday, I'll forward to you what's been 
forwarded to me.  With respect to the governorn's plan, the one that you 
forwarded along from EES' customer is definitely one of the more extreme 
scenarios we've been hearing, but with Davis, I wouldn't rule anything out.  
If I hear anything, I'll report back.

Best,
Jeff

	Jennifer Rudolph@EES
	12/18/2000 05:03 PM
		 
Jeff, Marcie---
Do you have any updates for us regarding FERC's Friday ruling?
I've had many inquiries.
Plus, I heard from one of the commodity originators the following:

*  Tricon, Inc. (an EES customer);  their lobbyists were in a meeting with 
Gov. Davis today
*  The lobbyists reported back to Tricon the Governor's plan to combat FERC's 
order
*  The Gov's plan:  utilities build additional generation, utilities set a 
rate for the next 8-10 years
*  Reregulation

Lemme know...
---Jennifer

The haircut notion, I believe, arises from Edison's claim that the PX price 
includes a capacity payment, particularly when demand (i.e., the price) is 
higher.  I think there's discussion of it in the proposed decision that came 
out some time ago and which sits in "hold" limbo on the Commission's agenda.  
I've attached it.  Alan could you see if it's included in the decision?  If 
not, I can poke around more.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

	Alan Comnes@ECT
	12/18/2000 03:59 PM
		 
Jeff, Paul,

I talked to Mike Etringer and found out that the reason why he wanted to talk 
to Jeff is Mike's recollection of a conversation with Jeff that a SRAC 
"haIrcut" in the 5-10% range had been suggested based on the total amount of 
load in California about 39,000 to 40,000 MW.

Jeff, is there anything we can point Mike to to better understand this basis 
of a capacity adjustment?

In our call with Doug Kerner last week, the best guess, summed up by Calger, 
was that SRAC would go PX based beginning in '03 with  a capacity clipping of 
20% (half way between SCE o 40% and IEP of 0%).  However, I think Mike is 
struggling to justify a smaller haircut.  Thus, the follow up call to Jeff.

Alan Comnes

	Mary Hain@ECT
	12/17/2000 07:20 PM
		 

Steve:

Here's the info for tomorrow's call.  Thanks for making the time.  Talk to 
you then.

Best,
Jeff

12:00 CDT Call with Dick Anderson (EBS Tax), Steve Bowen and Dan Clearfield 
re:  using a c-corp vs. an LLC for   our CLEC

1-888-311-9051  passcode:  60396

FYI.  Just learned that California's key small consumer group, TURN, will be 
sending a letter to the PUC saying that it would be a violation of due 
process to issue on Thursday the sorts of orders the PUC is comtemplating 
without first giving folks a chance to comment.

Just got off the call with the California stakeholders. The group's trying to 
come up with a solution and today's call was a challenge.  Edison threw new 
demands on the table that effectively ended any chance for a deal today.  

Appears that at this point that anything more than a 10% rate increase is out 
of the question politically for the Governor, and the utilities are very 
unhappy about it.  Consumer groups are already balking publicly at the 10% 
increase reported in the press.

The meeting effectively ended when Edison announced that, in response to New 
West turning back their customers, Edison plans to file a proposal with the 
Commission this week that would require all returning customers to pay the 
spot price for energy.  The large customer groups blew their tops and that 
pretty much ended the call.

The group agreed to meet again on Friday, after the PUC business meeting on 
Thursday.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks for the effort.  Not looking so great.  We should keep plugging away, 
however.

Trucks with bullhorns?

Best, 
Jeff

don't even worry about it.  i didn't feel jumped on at all.  the debate has 
turned about 100% political with very little rational economic thought 
present, unfortunately.

Thanks.  These are the portions of the deal that I've been highlighting as 
problematic for us with the settlement group for  the past few weeks.  The 
group knows that unless there's some compromise on these points in a way that 
directly addresses our concerns, we won't be signing anything.  After 
yesterday's call, at which Edison blew the meeting up, there's no deal in 
sight in the immediate term.

	Scott Stoness@EES
	12/19/2000 08:47 AM
		
If this settlement discussion is close to possible we should immediately 
starting switching customers to standard offer.  Scott

Other comments: 

This would be the critical excerpts for us:

Upon termination by a customer of the utility commitment in favor of a direct 
access arrangement, a customer could not return to the utility portfolio, 
except on a spot-price basis, for a period of [one year]; accommodations 
would be made for customers abandoned by direct access providers with no 
market alternatives.

(2) Large customers would be required to commit to a minimum service term of 
[12-36 months]; discontinuing service prior to the end of the committed term 
to engage in a direct access transaction with another supplier would result 
in a true-up of the price paid by the customer and the actual portfolio price 
during the term.

These comments are applicable:
The first term would be okay if it does not change to limit us from switching 
back to utility because we have been off for one year.  The issues is whether 
the one year terms is notice or elapsed time.  This suggests time is of the 
essense in switching back to standard offer.
The 2nd term would be okay but 12 would be a lot better than 36.  And 24 is 
pretty good too. 36 is better than a kick in the head.

And a principle that, 
DA customers would have access to the existing generation, at cost, the same 
as all other industrials, should be added.

We should not sign off on this solution (if they are seeking it) unless we 
have the option to switch back to standard offer.

FYI.  Please keep this internal and confidential.  Here's where the group I 
mentioned left off last Friday.  It will be useful for our discussion this 
afternoon.  You'll note from the comments that it's anything but a done 
deal.  I'll forward the SF press mentioned in the note.

Best,
Jeff 
	Evelyn Kahl Elsesser <eke@aelaw.com>
	12/17/2000 11:05 PM
		 
A revised CESG outline is attached, updated to reflect Friday's
discussion.  While we discussed much greater detail, I have continued to
try to keep the outline more general to avoid generating a treatise at
this point.  Particularly, we discussed much greater detail around the
rate stabilization plan than is reflected in the attached outline.

SCE has committed to providing some sort of percentage or tiered term
structure for forward contracting to complete that section of the
framework (section 2).  Obviously, PG&E's ideas in this area would also
be welcome.

In Section 4 (undercollections) I have thrown in the numbers provided to
the Chronicle for the Saturday morning article describing the extent to
which the utilities may have already committed to Governor Davis to
absorb undercollections.  (Which leads to the question for John and Dan,
again, whether we are wasting our time with this exercise given the
media coverage describing the state of the IOU deal.)

Delaney has committed to provide a call-in number for tomorrow's 3:30
conference call.  Thank you all again for your efforts.

plz call--415.782.7822.  Jeff

PG&E's $2 Billion Power Grab
We've been gulled by our greedy utility 
Ken Garcia
Thursday,?September 14, 2000 
,2000 San Francisco Chronicle 
URL: 
http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/chronicle/archive/2000/09/14/T
Z110687.DTL 
SAN FRANCISC -- The executives at Pacific Gas and Electric Co. sure try hard 
to live up to their name, because I can't think of any company that has been 
more adept at giving consumers a jolt. 
The doyens of greed that rule over the California utility giant recently 
revealed that they hope to pass on to customers more than $2 billion in 
expenses -- ``unforeseen costs'' in the euphemistic view of the power 
company, but unjustifiable rate increases to those of us residing in real 
world. 
The consumer-soaking surge is apparently based on PG&E's inability to predict 
a rise in wholesale electricity prices, which is costing the company about 
$700 million a month. Yet, as usual, the utility giant wants us to forget all 
past promises and obligations, a favorite technique of energy merchants who 
see rate increases as something that can be turned on with the flick of a 
switch. 
Lest anyone forget, a utility rate increase is exactly what California's 
customers were told they would not get as a result of a deregulated power 
market, which was supposed to lower -- not raise -- energy bills because of 
an expected increase in competition. 
It shouldn't come as a surprise that our friends at PG&E were among the prime 
architects of the state's deregulation policy, which they now want to bend in 
their financial favor. This is known as having your cake and (billing) Edith 
too, because certainly she and her fellow customers wouldn't want the utility 
company's stock to fall. 
Now, I realize PG&E has been prone to blackouts over the years, but just 
because it doesn't like the deal it forged and signed a few years back, 
doesn't mean that its customers should be forced to pay for its lapses in 
judgment. If you want to dance, you have to pay the fiddler -- even if it 
turns out to be Nero and the electrical lines are burning. 
``It should be PG&E that eats the costs because they made the initial promise 
that rates would go down,'' Dan Jacobson of the California Public Interest 
Research Group told The Chronicle the other day. And he's right, even if the 
state Public Utilities Commission once again buckles under and decides to 
give PG&E a break it doesn't deserve. 
While PG&E CEO Robert Glynn was trying to assuage analysts on Wall Street 
this week that the soaring electricity rates would indeed be passed on to 
customers, The Chronicle revealed that the state Board of Equalization has 
quietly been granting utilities and giant corporations billions of dollars in 
tax breaks. Despite a booming economy, the state agency has inexplicably 
reduced the property tax assessments of PG&E, Pacific Bell and others to the 
tune of $5.3 billion in the past year alone. 
That's a lot of lost kilowatts and phone calls that could be used by 
California residents. But in the world of utilities, it's always best to 
leave the consumer in the dark. 
In effect, the equalization board is improperly granting huge tax breaks to 
companies worth billions, at the same time its assessments on homes and small 
commercial properties are skyrocketing. And if you think something smells a 
little rotten here -- well, it may just be the smoke rising from a lot of 
consumers' ears. 
You don't have to look far to see why officials at PG&E are feeling a little 
desperate in their attempts to pass along their rising costs to consumers as 
quickly as possible. Because the faster they can do it, the faster customers 
might forget that PG&E had asked the PUC for an $800 million rate increase 
earlier this year to help keep the lights in the corporate tower burning. 
The utility was granted a $450 million increase, even though an 
administrative law judge found that the company needed only half that amount 
to meet its expenses. But what's a few hundred million between friends? 
Yet the funny part is, PG&E officials said that rate increase would actually 
lower our gas and electric bills, an event that happens on our shores about 
as often as a tsunami. This energy-defying trick, which I first questioned in 
February, would take place, we were told, because of cost savings within the 
utility giant's other divisions. Yet if they were making more money, why did 
PG&E need the PUC to give it close to a half billion in bill increases? 
Well, the answer is that it would appear there are quite a few dim bulbs 
making decisions about California's energy market, and Gov. Gray Davis hasn't 
seen fit to replace them. 
So don't be shocked if PG&E again gets its way, and once again customers are 
``serviced'' by state regulators to the tune of hundreds of millions in rate 
increases, no matter how unfair or undeserved. PG&E said it would foot the 
bill when it pushed for deregulation, and now that it's taking a huge hit for 
past decisions, it wants to pass the buck. 
It takes time to build up a reputation for Power, Greed & Excess. Energy 
companies, after all, are anything but utilitarian. 
You can reach Ken Garcia at (415) 777-7152, fax him at (415) 896-1107, or 
send him an e-mail note at kgarcia@sfchronicle.com. 
,2000 San Francisco Chronicle ? Page?A17 

No thanks necessary.  My pleasure.  I'll report back with what happens this 
afternoon.

Best,
Jeff

P.S.  You run a damned good meeting.

FYI.  This article tracks well with the information we've thus far received 
and that I passed along on the call this morning. 
	Joseph Alamo
	12/19/2000 11:51 AM
		 
Utilities Want Rates To Increase About 20%
Utilities, State Wrangling Over Rate Hikes for Power 
David Lazarus, Chronicle Staff Writer
Tuesday,?December 19, 2000 
,2000 San Francisco Chronicle 
Top-secret talks between state officials and PG&E became bogged down 
yesterday over how much customers' bills should be raised to rescue the 
utility from financial ruin, sources said. 
State officials are pushing for Pacific Gas and Electric Co. and Southern 
California Edison to accept a 10 percent rate increase, while the utilities 
are asking for a rate increase almost double that amount, the sources said. 
An accord, first reported in The Chronicle on Saturday, still could be 
announced any time this week, the sources said, noting that Gov. Gray Davis 
was maintaining pressure for the two sides to come to terms as quickly as 
possible. 
However, the sources said, both sides are digging in their heels as the talks 
intensify. 
The impasse makes it unlikely that the California Public Utilities Commission 
will lift a rate freeze affecting the two utilities at its meeting on 
Thursday, even though the matter already has been placed on the commission's 
agenda. 
"Everyone is still trying to nail down different pieces of this mess," one 
source said. 
The negotiations began last week and continued through the weekend. However, 
sources familiar with the talks said PG&E and Edison were reluctant to 
compromise over how much they should be able to raise customers' bills and, 
in turn, how much of a combined $8 billion in outstanding debt the two 
utilities would have to swallow. 
Representatives of the utilities, the PUC and the governor's office declined 
to discuss the matter on the record yesterday. 
But sources said there was an increasing sense of urgency on the governor's 
part to extricate PG&E and Edison from their current financial woes and focus 
instead on California's chronic power shortages. 
State officials called a Stage 1 energy emergency yesterday afternoon as 
electricity reserves once again slipped to dangerously low levels. 
Large-scale industrial users were urged to reduce consumption. 
The governor is said to be eager to show some progress in tackling 
California's energy crisis, especially in light of measures announced by 
federal regulators on Friday that critics say do not go far enough. 
The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission announced several steps intended to 
reduce volatility in wholesale power prices, but stopped short of a long- 
sought cap on wholesale rates. 
Davis said the commission "abdicated its responsibility to the people in the 
West," while Sen. Dianne Feinstein characterized federal authorities as 
fiddling while Rome burns. 
Federal authorities will meet today in Sacramento with representatives of 
utilities and power companies, along with state politicians, to discuss ways 
to relieve California's energy shortage. 
Meanwhile, PG&E and Edison have warned of possible bankruptcy if they are 
unable to pass along to customers billions of dollars in extra costs accrued 
since wholesale power prices spiked over the summer. 
Because of the existing rate freeze, the two utilities so far have had to 
absorb all such costs as losses. 
Under terms of the deal now on the table, PG&E would absorb about half the 
roughly $5 billion in expenses it has incurred, while Edison would absorb a 
nearly equal percentage of its $3 billion in debt, sources said. 
The utilities, however, are fighting hard to pass on even more of the debt to 
customers in the form of higher rates, they said. 
PG&E held a special briefing for legislative aides in Sacramento yesterday at 
which utility officials made their case for a speedy bailout. 
"They said they need to solve this, and they need to solve it now," said one 
participant in the meeting. 
But the officials were less forthcoming about how much the utility would 
compromise to find a workable solution. "There wasn't a lot of wiggle room," 
the participant said. 
A source close to the PUC said state regulators would be ready to take up the 
matter of the rate freeze whenever a deal was reached with the utilities on 
how much customers' bills would go up. 
The source said the PUC probably would accept the utilities' argument that 
conditions for ending the rate freeze had been met months ago. The 
commissioners would then pass an emergency measure allowing rates to increase 
immediately. 
PUC President Loretta Lynch, who sources said was actively involved in the 
weekend negotiations, probably would introduce the emergency measure when a 
deal is reached. Swift approval by the five-member commission almost 
certainly would follow. 
"If some kind of accord is reached, we will be morally obligated to go 
forward," one source said. 
Still, consumer activists blasted the pending deal yesterday, calling instead 
for all parties to hold their negotiations in the public arena. 
"This is a gross violation of basic concepts of due process and fair play," 
said Nettie Hoge, executive director of The Utility Reform Network in San 
Francisco. "Utility rates in this state are supposed to be determined via a 
public process, not through back room deals between politicians and the 
utilities." 
Added John Gamboa, executive director of San Francisco's Greenlining 
Institute: "Back room deals are what led to our utility-backed deregulation 
scheme in the first place." 
E-mail David Lazarus at dlazarus@sfchronicle.com. 

	Joseph Alamo
	12/19/2000 12:05 PM
		 
Suits allege utilities conspired on prices 
ENERGY: Southern California Gas, El Paso Natural Gas, SDG&E are targeted. 
December 19, 2000 
By KATE BERRY
The Orange County Register 
Two lawsuits filed in Los Angeles on Monday allege that Southern California 
Gas and San Diego Gas & Electric conspired to manipulate the natural gas 
market in Southern California, creating an artificial shortage that caused 
electricity prices to skyrocket this year. 
The two lawsuits, both seeking class action status, were filed in Los Angeles 
Superior Court and seek billions in damages. 
The lawsuits allege that executives of SoCal Gas, SDG&E and El Paso Natural 
Gas Corp., of Houston, met in 1996 and conspired to dominate the natural gas 
market in Southern California by illegally agreeing not to compete against 
each other. 
El Paso, which owns the largest natural gas pipeline serving California, 
allegedly nixed two new pipeline projects that were planned by Tenneco Inc., 
a company it acquired in 1996, in exchange for SoCal Gas refraining from 
competing on a pipeline project in Mexico, the lawsuits claim. 
"The nature of this conspiracy is not your classic price- fixing case,'' said 
Carole Handler, an attorney with O'Donnell & Schaeffer in Los Angeles, one of 
five law firms involved in the two lawsuits. 
"This was an agreement to give each of the participants an economic advantage 
in their own marketplace so they would not have to face the rigors of 
competition. It preserved Sempra's dominance in the market.'' 
SoCal Gas, the nation's largest gas distributor with 18 million customers, 
and SDG&E, with 2.2 million electricity customers in San Diego and south 
Orange County, were both acquired by Sempra Energy, of San Diego, in 1996. 
The lawsuits also name three units of El Paso Natural Gas: El Paso Tennessee 
Pipeline Co., El Paso Merchant Energy, and El Paso Merchant Energy-Gas L.P. 
SoCal Gas and SDG&E would not comment on the lawsuits, saying they had not 
been served with the complaints. 
Andrew Berg, owner of Wave Length Hair Productions in San Diego and a 
plaintiff representing retail electricity customers, said he contacted a 
lawyer after his electricity bill doubled in June. Since then, the state 
Legislature temporarily capped electricity prices for SDG&E customers. 
Natural gas is one of the core commodities used to produce electricity. The 
spot price of natural gas on the Southern California border Monday was $19.82 
per million British thermal units, compared with $54.99 per million Btu a 
week ago. 
That's up from about $3 per million Btu last December. Gov. Gray Davis on 
Friday asked California Attorney General Bill Lockyer to launch an 
investigation into higher natural gas prices in California. 

Bob:  

I want to let you know that I stand in awe of someone who has the balls to 
open for someone as talented as Dan B.  It demonstrates that you're one 
talented guy yourself.  Congratulations.  Your show was great, and it was 
good to see you.   Best of luck on the rest of the tour.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks a million for the summary.  In the flurry, I accidentally deleted it.  
Could you re-send.  It's STILL a jungle out there.

Best,
Jeff

I've been notified that the California Commissioner has cancelled the meeting 
with stakeholders that had been scheduled for this afternoon.  He'd scheduled 
it to discuss what the order the Commission intends to issue on Thursday 
might look like.  It signals, at this point, that the utilities continue to 
have a difficult time reaching agreement with the administration.  Will get 
back with more as it develops.

Jeff

Dude, you may have taken her charger cord!  She can't find hers.  Do you have 
two now?  Ditto on your comment re: the man versus him music.  The 
personality is way, way out front.  

you bet.  Helps a lot having you identify the interests.  So please continue 
doing that.  I'll keep you up on what's happening as it happens.

	Scott Stoness@EES
	12/19/2000 04:29 PM
		
thanks jeff, I was just wanted to make sure that our interests were clear.  
Thanks for staying on top of these issues.

Thanks.  These are the portions of the deal that I've been highlighting as 
problematic for us with the settlement group for  the past few weeks.  The 
group knows that unless there's some compromise on these points in a way that 
directly addresses our concerns, we won't be signing anything.  After 
yesterday's call, at which Edison blew the meeting up, there's no deal in 
sight in the immediate term.

	Scott Stoness@EES
	12/19/2000 08:47 AM
		
If this settlement discussion is close to possible we should immediately 
starting switching customers to standard offer.  Scott

Other comments: 

This would be the critical excerpts for us:

Upon termination by a customer of the utility commitment in favor of a direct 
access arrangement, a customer could not return to the utility portfolio, 
except on a spot-price basis, for a period of [one year]; accommodations 
would be made for customers abandoned by direct access providers with no 
market alternatives.

(2) Large customers would be required to commit to a minimum service term of 
[12-36 months]; discontinuing service prior to the end of the committed term 
to engage in a direct access transaction with another supplier would result 
in a true-up of the price paid by the customer and the actual portfolio price 
during the term.

These comments are applicable:
The first term would be okay if it does not change to limit us from switching 
back to utility because we have been off for one year.  The issues is whether 
the one year terms is notice or elapsed time.  This suggests time is of the 
essense in switching back to standard offer.
The 2nd term would be okay but 12 would be a lot better than 36.  And 24 is 
pretty good too. 36 is better than a kick in the head.

And a principle that, 
DA customers would have access to the existing generation, at cost, the same 
as all other industrials, should be added.

We should not sign off on this solution (if they are seeking it) unless we 
have the option to switch back to standard offer.

FYI.  Please keep this internal and confidential.  Here's where the group I 
mentioned left off last Friday.  It will be useful for our discussion this 
afternoon.  You'll note from the comments that it's anything but a done 
deal.  I'll forward the SF press mentioned in the note.

Best,
Jeff 
	Evelyn Kahl Elsesser <eke@aelaw.com>
	12/17/2000 11:05 PM
		 
A revised CESG outline is attached, updated to reflect Friday's
discussion.  While we discussed much greater detail, I have continued to
try to keep the outline more general to avoid generating a treatise at
this point.  Particularly, we discussed much greater detail around the
rate stabilization plan than is reflected in the attached outline.

SCE has committed to providing some sort of percentage or tiered term
structure for forward contracting to complete that section of the
framework (section 2).  Obviously, PG&E's ideas in this area would also
be welcome.

In Section 4 (undercollections) I have thrown in the numbers provided to
the Chronicle for the Saturday morning article describing the extent to
which the utilities may have already committed to Governor Davis to
absorb undercollections.  (Which leads to the question for John and Dan,
again, whether we are wasting our time with this exercise given the
media coverage describing the state of the IOU deal.)

Delaney has committed to provide a call-in number for tomorrow's 3:30
conference call.  Thank you all again for your efforts.

Heres' the file.

Again, we used it, in the end, to justify having the utilities go out, now, 
and fill 10-15% of their net short position with 5 and 10 years deals.  The 
group agreed, though there's still discussions about the percentage (higher?) 
and the mix (5 and 10 year deals?; 3, 5, 10 year deals?)--you get the picture.

The guy from Edison who's been participating in the talks and agreed with our 
approach (understanding that the percentage and baskets are still negotiable) 
is John Fielder, SVP of regulatory affairs.

Good luck.

Best,
Jeff

FYI.
"Ticketing @ The Leading Edge" 
<ticketing@theleadingedge.org>@Haas.Berkeley.EDU on 09/14/2000 02:32:44 PM
Sent by: owner-evmba_social@Haas.Berkeley.EDU
The MBA Classes of 2001 and 2002
cordially invite you to join us for the 3rd annual
Leading Edge Technology Conference

Friday, Sept. 22nd and Saturday, Sept. 23rd, 2000
Haas School of Business
Ticket Cost: $50 - All Day Saturday
Ticket Cost: $10 - Friday Evening

Keynote Speakers:
* George Shaheen, CEO, WebVan
* Jim Clark, Founder, SGI, Netscape, Healtheon, myCFO, Shutterfly
* Dave Ditzel, Founder and CEO, Transmeta

Participating Speakers include:
* Tony Perkins, Chairman/Editor-in-Chief, Red Herring Communications
* Jim Ryan, President, Grainger.com
* Elan Amir, CTO, OmniSky
* Charlie Finnie, Partner, CMGI@Ventures
* Julie Smith, Senior Director of Production, Entertainment, Yahoo!
* Penelope Finnie, Co-Founder and VP of Ideas, Ask Jeeves, Inc.
* Roger Dorf, Presdident and CEO, Nortel Networks Broadband Access
* Milton Olin, Jr., COO, Napster
* Others from such leading companies as - IBM, Ariba, Commerce One, NBCi;
marchFIRST; campsix; Microsoft; McKenna Group; Cisco; Ventro; Jupiter
Communications; EarthLink, WebMD; Loudcloud, Everypath, OracleMobile,
Tellme, and many more

--- Special Note: Tickets will be by Lottery ---
* In an effort to make our limited ticket distribution more equitable,
tickets will be distributed by lottery.
* You must register between Sept 13th and Sept 18th.
* A lottery will then be conducted and ticket recipients notified by e-mail
and able to purchase tickets.
* For those unable to attend, we will have post-conference videocasting.

For complete information and to register, please see our website:
www.TheLeadingEdge.org

Thanks to Our Feature Sponsors:
* IBM and Microsoft
And Our Other Sponsors:
* Sun, Kana, Business 2.0, Red Herring
* Siebel, The Standard, Nortel, Motorola, GeoWorks, Andersen Consulting,
Angel Engineers
* Visa, Haas Management of Technology, CSC, Strategy Associates

January 5th, not December 5th.  I'm glad to see that someone besides me 
writes down the wrong date once in a while.

	Lysa Akin@ECT
	12/19/2000 06:31 PM
		 
David Thomas' office confirmed with me today that he will be the SF office on 
December 5th.  He will be there at 10:00am.  

Joseph - could you please book your conference room for the meeting?  I would 
appreciate it!

Lysa

I paged you yesterday with the info on size, construction start and 
in-service dates. You get it?

	James D Steffes
	12/19/2000 04:58 PM
		 
Please look at and comment ASAP.  Need to go out by 12/20 noon.

Jim

	Tom Briggs
	12/19/2000 10:46 AM
		 
Attached is a draft letter.  I tried to get it down to one page, but it can 
use more reduction. I also need info on when the 750MW of capacity will be in 
service.  I am leaving on holiday, so someone (like Rick) will have to 
complete the letter.

Couple of very minor suggestions, and I filled in the online date for 
Pastoria.

I don't have it.  do you need it soon?

sounds like you'll be getting a subpoena!  you co-conspirator you.

Charry?

email is:  charryl@pacbell.net

FYI.
	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	12/20/2000 12:27 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
Greetings:
This should be an interesting call.  I also have MTA working on how much
Edison and PG&E have spent each day on their print, radio, and TV ads.
Companies who have looming bankruptcies usually do not run daily
multi-million dollar ad campaigns.

Details:

TELECONFERENCE Harvey Rosenfield, NETTIE HOGE and Harry Snyder "warn against
phony bankruptcy threats, say legislature, Governor, PUC are getting
stampeded by Edison, PG&E"

1pm, 1-877-797-1770

Contact:  Doug Heller 310-392-0522 extension 309

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

I'll be out the week between Xmas and the New Year.

	Lysa Akin@ECT
	12/19/2000 03:02 PM
		 
Just as an FYI , following are vacations schedules for the rest of the year 
for the Portland Office:

Name   Vacation Days
Paul Kaufman  Dec. 27, 28 & 29
Mary Hain  Dec. 20, 21, 22, 27, 28, 29, & Jan. 2, 2001
Alan Comnes  None
Lysa Akin  Dec. 22, 27, 28 & 29

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	12/20/2000 12:27 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
Greetings:
This should be an interesting call.  I also have MTA working on how much
Edison and PG&E have spent each day on their print, radio, and TV ads.
Companies who have looming bankruptcies usually do not run daily
multi-million dollar ad campaigns.

Details:

TELECONFERENCE Harvey Rosenfield, NETTIE HOGE and Harry Snyder "warn against
phony bankruptcy threats, say legislature, Governor, PUC are getting
stampeded by Edison, PG&E"

1pm, 1-877-797-1770

Contact:  Doug Heller 310-392-0522 extension 309

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Karen Denne@ENRON
09/14/2000 06:13 PM
Peggy Mahoney@EES
09/14/2000 06:09 PM
FYI - not sure if you guys saw this!  Still looking for a corporate customer 
to go on record.
Peggy
	Enron Energy Services
	

FYI
djcustomclips@djinteractive.com on 09/14/2000 12:41:56 PM
Please respond to nobody@mail1.djnr.com
With Dereg Under Fire,Enron Calif Elec Business Heats Up
By Jason Leopold

09/14/2000
Dow Jones Energy Service
(Copyright (c) 2000, Dow Jones & Company, Inc.)

  LOS ANGELES -(Dow Jones)- While federal regulators try to find a way to
stabilize soaring wholesale electricity prices in California, Enron Corp.
(ENE) has been quietly striking up deals with some suburban communities to
sell them fixed-price power at a lower rate.

  In the past month, the Houston-based electricity service provider entered
into long-term fixed-rate contracts with the city of Roseville and is
negotiating similar deals with the cities of San Marcos and Chula Vista. Both
of those cities currently get their power from San Diego Gas & Electric Co, a
unit of Sempra Energy Inc. (SRE), and pay market rates for electricity.
  Enron has also struck a deal with Starwood Hotels & Resorts Worldwide Inc.
(HOT), one of the world's largest hospitality companies, to sell the company
electricity at a fixed rate for the next 10 years. The company has four hotels
in California, three of which buy their power from SDG&E.

  Sources close to the matter said Enron has contracted to sell the hotel
power at about 6 cents per kilowatt-hour, compared with the 22.5 cents/KWh
Starwood said it was charged by SDG&E in August.

  Neither company would disclose the terms of the deal. But Starwood said it
expects to reduce its energy costs by more than $200 million over the next 10
years.

  Enron, the largest trader of electricity and natural gas in the U.S., will
purchase power to cover such contracts on the wholesale markets and use its
experience to manage the risks, while paying a fee to utilities like SDG&E for
use of their distribution networks.

  "That really is our core strength," said Harold Buchanan, chief operating
officer for Enron Energy Services North America. "We understand how to manage
those risks."

  High Rates Driving Industrial Customers, Cities To Switch

  The growing interest in fixed-price supply contracts is fueling a comeback
of sorts for Enron.

  The Houston-based company had tried to break into California's retail power
market just after deregulation, even spending nearly $1 million to advertise
the venture during the Super Bowl. But Enron gave up trying to win residential
customers in 1998, citing disappointing response and lower-than-expected
profits.

  That was when deregulation and competitive power markets were full of
promise. Oddly enough, now that deregulation is coming under attack in
California, soaring power prices are building demand for Enron's services.

  The company is fielding calls from large industrial customers in San Diego
that have seen their utility bills triple in the past three months and are
interested in signing long-term fixed-rate contracts, Buchanan said.

  "Overall, what Enron can provide is reliability pricing in San Diego that's
written in stone," Buchanan said. "It's far cheaper than what they're paying
now with the utilities."

  A number of large industrial customers negotiating with Enron declined to
comment.

  The city of Roseville, near Sacramento, entered into a $114 million contract
with Enron last month to purchase 50 megawatts of electricity for five years
at $49 per megawatt-hour.

  Furthermore, the city has started talks with Enron about building and
operating a 750-megawatt natural gas-fired power plant that city officials
expect will contribute to lower costs for the purchase of electricity.

  Mayor Harry Crabb said the plant could protect residents from the price
spikes that have plagued customers of SDG&E since June.

  San Marcos, in San Diego County, is proposing to switch electricity service
for its 10,000 residents to Enron from SDG&E - a move the City Council said
could shave about $12 million a year off the city's power bill. Enron has said
it would offer the city terms nearly identical to those it offered Roseville.

  An SDG&E spokesman said last week that the utility supports such
arrangements, saying they're one way deregulation is supposed to work.

  Enron offered earlier this summer to sell power to SDG&E itself for four
years at a fixed rate of 5.5 cents/KWh, but the utility said the price was too
high.

  California Gov. Gray Davis signed legislation two weeks ago to cap
electricity rates for SDG&E's customers at 6.5 cents/KWh.

  -By Jason Leopold, Dow Jones Newswires; 323-658-3874;
jason.leopold@dowjones.com

Folder Name: Enron Energy Services
Relevance Score on Scale of 100: 80

______________________________________________________________________

To review or revise your folder, visit http://www.djinteractive.com or 
contact Dow Jones Customer Service by e-mail at custom.news@bis.dowjones.com 
or by phone at 800-369-7466. (Outside the U.S. and Canada, call 609-452-1511 
or contact your local sales representative.)
______________________________________________________________________

Copyright (c) 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved

thank you.  that's it!

Sorry about that.  I don't think that I'm in on the 1 pm conference call.

Best,
Jeff
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/19/2000 12:09 PM
		 
FYI.  This article tracks well with the information we've thus far received 
and that I passed along on the call this morning. 
	Joseph Alamo
	12/19/2000 11:51 AM
		 
Utilities Want Rates To Increase About 20%
Utilities, State Wrangling Over Rate Hikes for Power 
David Lazarus, Chronicle Staff Writer
Tuesday,?December 19, 2000 
,2000 San Francisco Chronicle 
Top-secret talks between state officials and PG&E became bogged down 
yesterday over how much customers' bills should be raised to rescue the 
utility from financial ruin, sources said. 
State officials are pushing for Pacific Gas and Electric Co. and Southern 
California Edison to accept a 10 percent rate increase, while the utilities 
are asking for a rate increase almost double that amount, the sources said. 
An accord, first reported in The Chronicle on Saturday, still could be 
announced any time this week, the sources said, noting that Gov. Gray Davis 
was maintaining pressure for the two sides to come to terms as quickly as 
possible. 
However, the sources said, both sides are digging in their heels as the talks 
intensify. 
The impasse makes it unlikely that the California Public Utilities Commission 
will lift a rate freeze affecting the two utilities at its meeting on 
Thursday, even though the matter already has been placed on the commission's 
agenda. 
"Everyone is still trying to nail down different pieces of this mess," one 
source said. 
The negotiations began last week and continued through the weekend. However, 
sources familiar with the talks said PG&E and Edison were reluctant to 
compromise over how much they should be able to raise customers' bills and, 
in turn, how much of a combined $8 billion in outstanding debt the two 
utilities would have to swallow. 
Representatives of the utilities, the PUC and the governor's office declined 
to discuss the matter on the record yesterday. 
But sources said there was an increasing sense of urgency on the governor's 
part to extricate PG&E and Edison from their current financial woes and focus 
instead on California's chronic power shortages. 
State officials called a Stage 1 energy emergency yesterday afternoon as 
electricity reserves once again slipped to dangerously low levels. 
Large-scale industrial users were urged to reduce consumption. 
The governor is said to be eager to show some progress in tackling 
California's energy crisis, especially in light of measures announced by 
federal regulators on Friday that critics say do not go far enough. 
The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission announced several steps intended to 
reduce volatility in wholesale power prices, but stopped short of a long- 
sought cap on wholesale rates. 
Davis said the commission "abdicated its responsibility to the people in the 
West," while Sen. Dianne Feinstein characterized federal authorities as 
fiddling while Rome burns. 
Federal authorities will meet today in Sacramento with representatives of 
utilities and power companies, along with state politicians, to discuss ways 
to relieve California's energy shortage. 
Meanwhile, PG&E and Edison have warned of possible bankruptcy if they are 
unable to pass along to customers billions of dollars in extra costs accrued 
since wholesale power prices spiked over the summer. 
Because of the existing rate freeze, the two utilities so far have had to 
absorb all such costs as losses. 
Under terms of the deal now on the table, PG&E would absorb about half the 
roughly $5 billion in expenses it has incurred, while Edison would absorb a 
nearly equal percentage of its $3 billion in debt, sources said. 
The utilities, however, are fighting hard to pass on even more of the debt to 
customers in the form of higher rates, they said. 
PG&E held a special briefing for legislative aides in Sacramento yesterday at 
which utility officials made their case for a speedy bailout. 
"They said they need to solve this, and they need to solve it now," said one 
participant in the meeting. 
But the officials were less forthcoming about how much the utility would 
compromise to find a workable solution. "There wasn't a lot of wiggle room," 
the participant said. 
A source close to the PUC said state regulators would be ready to take up the 
matter of the rate freeze whenever a deal was reached with the utilities on 
how much customers' bills would go up. 
The source said the PUC probably would accept the utilities' argument that 
conditions for ending the rate freeze had been met months ago. The 
commissioners would then pass an emergency measure allowing rates to increase 
immediately. 
PUC President Loretta Lynch, who sources said was actively involved in the 
weekend negotiations, probably would introduce the emergency measure when a 
deal is reached. Swift approval by the five-member commission almost 
certainly would follow. 
"If some kind of accord is reached, we will be morally obligated to go 
forward," one source said. 
Still, consumer activists blasted the pending deal yesterday, calling instead 
for all parties to hold their negotiations in the public arena. 
"This is a gross violation of basic concepts of due process and fair play," 
said Nettie Hoge, executive director of The Utility Reform Network in San 
Francisco. "Utility rates in this state are supposed to be determined via a 
public process, not through back room deals between politicians and the 
utilities." 
Added John Gamboa, executive director of San Francisco's Greenlining 
Institute: "Back room deals are what led to our utility-backed deregulation 
scheme in the first place." 
E-mail David Lazarus at dlazarus@sfchronicle.com. 

Mark:
Here's the info

Size = 500 MW
Purchase price = $42 MM (sold to Calpine)
Permit  status at time of sale = all permits had been obtained

One note:  while we had gas and electric interconnection agreements ready to 
execute, Calpine told us not to and they arranged those for themselves.

If there's anything else that you need don't hesitate.

Happy holidays.

Best,
Jeff

Status report:  Utility solvency
Status report:  EBS in California

Paul Kaufman phoned with the following brief report from the Western 
Governor's Association  "Energy Summit" that took place today.  Paul will 
follow up with more detail when he gets back to a computer. The governors 
issued the following recommendations:

California should immediately implement FERC's order issued last Friday and 
aggressively pursue all available DSM and conservation opportunties.
The Western region should likewise be much more aggressive in identifying and 
implementing DSM and efficiency opportunities.
Increase supply as soon as possible.
FERC should do an investigation into the potentially negative effects that 
price caps can cause in the industry.
FERC should add to its investigations an investigation into what caused the 
price spikes in the first week of December.
Work with the Bush transition team to make sure that someone from the new 
administration is focused on the issue.

Hoecker said that he is not inclined to impose a region-wide cap until 
California takes the actions it needs to take to help alleviate the situation 
(e.g., reforming regs governing utility forward contracts).

Jeff

FYI, I'm having gall bladder surgery from January 1 to February 1.

Very interesting.  Quick questions:  1) $100MM come out of our pockets?  2) 
Could we "guarantee" 500 MWs?  3) Would we identify and implement DSM at our 
customers' sites?

Jeff

	Scott Stoness@EES
	12/20/2000 04:11 PM
		
What about offering to creat 500MW of supply in CA  by spending $100m on DSM 
in the next 6 months, in exchange for equal treatment DA vs lg customers.

This idea has not been vetted by management or DSM guys, so please don't jump 
to it yet.

Scott

Attached is the URL to get to what should be a real audio broadcast of 
tomorrow's PUC business meeting.  The meeting starts at 10 AM PST.  Many who 
have tried to use the link in the past have been unable to connect, but the 
PUC may have since worked the kinks out.  I will be at the meeting and will 
report back via email.

Best,
Jeff

http://www.cpuc.ca.gov/webcast/realaudio.htm

Toes, too.

Number 5 under 'A flawed retail market"  should read "...a power INcentive"  
not DISincentive.

will do.

Mona L Petrochko
09/14/2000 06:08 PM
that's alright.  I forgot about Sandi's vacation.  Go ahead.

Jeff Dasovich
09/14/2000 03:27 PM
can you talk to sandi?  she's on vacation beginning on monday.  the idea wa=
s=20
that she and i should get together before she left (based on the call we ha=
d=20
where Rick and Paul put the ball in my and sandi's court to coordinate the=
=20
strategy).  she suggested that it would also be a good idea to grab whoever=
=20
was here tomorrow, too.  it's really just a prelim meeting to discuss the=
=20
note that sandi sent around and for me to bounce a few ideas off of her. =
=20
we'll be having many, many more, and nothing discussed in tomorrow's "kick=
=20
off" will set anything in stone.  that said, if you prefer that we wait,=20
that's ok with me.

Mona L Petrochko
09/14/2000 03:30 PM
ARM is having a full-day off-site tomorrow.  If you are going to be having =
a=20
meeting w/ GA folks on strategy development for next year, I would like to =
be=20
able to participate. =20

=09Joseph Alamo
=0909/11/2000 03:40 PM
=09

Government Affairs
Weekly Schedules
September 11-15, 2000

Paul Kaufman

Mon, 9/11 Travel to Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Tues, 9/12 GA Meetings =01) Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Wed, 9/13 GA Meetings =01) Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Thurs, 9/14  Carson City, Reno NV
Fri, 9/15  Sacramento for Meetings with SMUD/TANC or Portland (TBD)

Sue Mara

Mon, 9/11 Travel to Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Tues, 9/12 GA Meetings =01) Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Wed, 9/13 GA Meetings =01) Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Thurs, 9/14 San Francisco Office
Fri, 9/15  San Francisco Office; ARM Meeting (9:00 - 11:00 AM)

Mona Petrochko

Mon, 9/11 San Francisco Office =01) am; Travel to DC, pm
Tues, 9/12 GA Meetings =01) DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Wed, 9/13 GA Meetings =01) DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Thurs, 9/14  San Francisco Office =01) am; Travel to DC, pm
Fri, 9/15  ARM Meeting (offsite) (9:00 =01) 11:00 AM)

Jeff Dasovich

Mon, 9/11 San Diego for Congressional Hearing w/S. Kean
Tues, 9/12 San Diego - Appearing at FERC Hearing
Wed, 9/13 San Francisco Office
Thurs, 9/14 San Francisco Office - Meeting with LECG re: Study on Competiti=
on=20
vs. Command and Control
Fri, 9/15  San Francisco Office

Sandi McCubbin

Mon, 9/11 San Francisco Office
Tues, 9/12 Travel to Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Wed, 9/13 GA Meetings =01) DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Thurs, 9/14 San Francisco Office
Fri, 9/15  San Francisco Office

Marcie Milner

Mon, 9/11 Phoenix Office
Tues, 9/12 Travel to Washington DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Wed, 9/13 GA Meetings =01) DC/Ritz Carlton Tyson=01,s Corner
Thurs, 9/14=20
 day Travel to Phoenix Office
Fri, 9/15  Phoenix Office

for dow jones direct:

logon:  bgaillar
password: Ene498834

We will set up a call-in number to relay to folks any actions the Commission 
takes tomorrow.  The Commission meeting starts at 10 AM PST, but it's unclear 
when they will take up our issue.  Since the press will likely have the place 
surrounded, they may decide to do that item first.  We'll send out a notice 
with a call-in # and time as soon as we have the information.

Best,
Jeff

Will do.

	Lisa Yoho
	12/21/2000 09:31 AM
		 
Jeff -- Please keep George McClellan, Kevin McGowan and Stuart Staley 
informed of regulatory developments in California.    Thanks, and call me if 
you have any questions.

Lisa
	George McClellan@ECT
	12/18/2000 02:40 PM
		 
Lisa - I would like to be kept informed on the regulatory environment in 
California - especially with regard to bankruptcy risk for Mission, Sempra 
and PGE.  We have significant credit exposure to each company.  Are we 
following developments in this area?

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/20/2000 08:16 PM
		 
We will set up a call-in number to relay to folks any actions the Commission 
takes tomorrow.  The Commission meeting starts at 10 AM PST, but it's unclear 
when they will take up our issue.  Since the press will likely have the place 
surrounded, they may decide to do that item first.  We'll send out a notice 
with a call-in # and time as soon as we have the information.

Best,
Jeff

These folks will need to be added to the distribution list.  Lysa/Joseph:  
it's going to be a bit wacky, because, as the note indicates, I'm not sure 
what time the call will be.  Anywhere from about 11 AM to 2 PM PST.  We'll 
need to keep the number of ports as unlimited as possible, because I have a 
feeling that the note indicating that there be a meeting will get around, 
perhaps globally.  As soon as I know what time I'll want to have the call, I 
will notify Joseph, who will need to set up the call and distribute the info 
to the original list I sent around plus the names below.  If you two have 
suggestions on how you'd like to handle, like Ross Perot, I'm all ears.  
Thanks so much for your help.

Also, please make sure to add Vicki Sharpe and Michael Smith of EES on the 
list, too.

Jeff
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/21/2000 10:05 AM
		 
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/20/2000 08:16 PM
		 
We will set up a call-in number to relay to folks any actions the Commission 
takes tomorrow.  The Commission meeting starts at 10 AM PST, but it's unclear 
when they will take up our issue.  Since the press will likely have the place 
surrounded, they may decide to do that item first.  We'll send out a notice 
with a call-in # and time as soon as we have the information.

Best,
Jeff

S&P threatened publicly yesterday that unless the PUC acts decisively today 
to fix the utilities' cash flow issue, they will significantly downgrade 
California's IOUs.  I assume that's in the WSJ article Rick referenced.  As 
Rick said, more info to come in a few hours.

	Mark Schroeder@ECT
	12/21/2000 08:31 AM
		
Thanks.  I inferred from John that we may not be able to get or use 
information from our own credit people for our market making activities, that 
is why he is looking for info in the (reasonably) public domain.  mcs 

Richard Shapiro@ENRON
21/12/2000 14:24
Check out WSJ- Page A2. Also,Bill Bradford in Rick buy's group is person 
most  proficient on credit issues relative to the three calif. utilities. I 
will also get back to you this afternoon........The CPUC is scheduled to 
issue orders today at 12:00 CST that may dramatically affect credit ratings 
of the 3 utilities. 

Mark Schroeder@ECT
12/21/2000 08:13 AM
Rick/Jeff - I just spoke with John Sherriff and mentioned to him how on top 
of California you guys were.  As you may be aware, we are making markets in 
the credit of many utilities and telcomm companies, via EnronCredit.com.  
Brian Seyfried is the commercial leader for this business.  John has asked me 
to ask you, if you become aware of significant developments, in the public 
sector (not privileged/insider information), bearing on 
creditworthiness/ability to pay by California utilities, would you please 
keep us informed, as we will have a keen interest in these developments?  
Please forward to this to any others on your team(s) you think appropriate.   
thanks   mcs

	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	12/21/2000 10:34 AM
		 
Attached is Southern California Edison Company's (U 338-E) Amended Rate
Stabilization Plan Application in the above-referenced proceeding, along
with a revised Exhibit SCE-1, the Rate Stabilization Plan testimony.  An
electronic copy of revised Exhibit SCE-2, the End of Rate Freeze Tariffs,
is not available and is being served via US mail.  Versions of the amended
application and Exhibit SCE-1 showing revision marks are also available
upon request.

SCE attempted to file this amended application with the Commission today,
but the docket office would not accept it for filing because it was nearly
closing time.  SCE is serving the documents today as provided in the
Certificate of Service and will file it with the Commission when the
Commission's Los Angeles office opens at 8:00 a.m. tomorrow morning.

          (See attached file: Application.PDF)   (See attached file:
Testimony.PDF)

These files are Adobe PDF files, which can be read with the Adobe Acrobat
Reader.  If you do not have the Adobe Acrobat Reader, it can be obtained
from the following website at no charge:
http://www.adobe.com/prodindex/acrobat/readstep.html#reader.

Sincerely,

Anthony V. Archer
(626) 302-3104

From the most recent information we have, the most likely outcome appears to 
be the following:

As we've discussed this week, the administration and the utilities continue 
to have a very difficult time reaching agreement on 1) how much of the 
undercollection the IOUs should absorb and how much consumers should absorb 
and 2) how big the rate increase should be to manage the IOUs cash 
flow/credit  problems (governor wants 10%, IOUs want at least 20%). 
It remains likely that the Commission will rule today on relaxing regulations 
to make it easier for the IOUs to enter into longer-term contracts w/out 
getting 2nd and 3rd guessed by the Commission.
It is likely that the Commission will signal strongly that it will not let 
the IOUs go bankrupt but will only go so far as to outline its plan for 
considering and implementing a "rate stabilization" plan in Q1 2001.

That said, the stakes are very high and things could change dramatically 
between now and 2 PM PST.  Just talked to two SVPs with PG&E and Edison and 
they said that they don't know what the Commission will do at 2.  

Jeff

	Joseph Alamo
	12/21/2000 12:30 PM
		 
On behalf of Jeff Dasovich, please note:  

the California PUC decision will be available on 
the PUC website @ 1:00 PM PST. 

The Commission will continue the meeting @ 2:00 PM PST 
to address the issue.

Thanks,

Joseph Alamo
Sr. Admin. Asst.
Government Affairs - The Americas
San Francisco CA

will do.

	Vicki Sharp@EES
	12/21/2000 01:01 PM
		
please change mike smith's email to be mike d smith.  Thanks. 

From the most recent information we have, the most likely outcome appears to 
be the following:

As we've discussed this week, the administration and the utilities continue 
to have a very difficult time reaching agreement on 1) how much of the 
undercollection the IOUs should absorb and how much consumers should absorb 
and 2) how big the rate increase should be to manage the IOUs cash 
flow/credit  problems (governor wants 10%, IOUs want at least 20%). 
It remains likely that the Commission will rule today on relaxing regulations 
to make it easier for the IOUs to enter into longer-term contracts w/out 
getting 2nd and 3rd guessed by the Commission.
It is likely that the Commission will signal strongly that it will not let 
the IOUs go bankrupt but will only go so far as to outline its plan for 
considering and implementing a "rate stabilization" plan in Q1 2001.

That said, the stakes are very high and things could change dramatically 
between now and 2 PM PST.  Just talked to two SVPs with PG&E and Edison and 
they said that they don't know what the Commission will do at 2.  

Jeff

	Joseph Alamo
	12/21/2000 12:30 PM
		 
On behalf of Jeff Dasovich, please note:  

the California PUC decision will be available on 
the PUC website @ 1:00 PM PST. 

The Commission will continue the meeting @ 2:00 PM PST 
to address the issue.

Thanks,

Joseph Alamo
Sr. Admin. Asst.
Government Affairs - The Americas
San Francisco CA

Steffes' call is FERC related.  This one's CA PUC related.

	Joseph Alamo
	12/21/2000 01:53 PM
		 
Jeff -- would you care to field this?? I'm not aware of the 12:20 call. 
Thanks, Joseph
Alan Comnes@ECT
12/21/2000 11:23 AM
??
Joseph, is this a substitute for the 12:20 call scheduled by Steffes?

don't know.  check out the website, which is where registration is.  there's 
lots on B2B, e.g., biz models/technologies.  i registered.  if i win the 
lottery you can likely persuade me to give you my ticket, or i can try to get 
one from someone who wins but can't go, or hopefully you can register and win 
one for yourself.  check out the site.

Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com> on 09/14/2000 06:24:24 PM
Can anyone attend?

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT.COM
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

FYI.
"Ticketing @ The Leading Edge"
<ticketing@theleadingedge.org>@Haas.Berkeley.EDU
on 09/14/2000 02:32:44 PM

Sent by:  owner-evmba_social@Haas.Berkeley.EDU

The MBA Classes of 2001 and 2002
cordially invite you to join us for the 3rd annual
Leading Edge Technology Conference

Friday, Sept. 22nd and Saturday, Sept. 23rd, 2000
Haas School of Business
Ticket Cost: $50 - All Day Saturday
Ticket Cost: $10 - Friday Evening

Keynote Speakers:
* George Shaheen, CEO, WebVan
* Jim Clark, Founder, SGI, Netscape, Healtheon, myCFO, Shutterfly
* Dave Ditzel, Founder and CEO, Transmeta

Participating Speakers include:
* Tony Perkins, Chairman/Editor-in-Chief, Red Herring Communications
* Jim Ryan, President, Grainger.com
* Elan Amir, CTO, OmniSky
* Charlie Finnie, Partner, CMGI@Ventures
* Julie Smith, Senior Director of Production, Entertainment, Yahoo!
* Penelope Finnie, Co-Founder and VP of Ideas, Ask Jeeves, Inc.
* Roger Dorf, Presdident and CEO, Nortel Networks Broadband Access
* Milton Olin, Jr., COO, Napster
* Others from such leading companies as - IBM, Ariba, Commerce One, NBCi;
marchFIRST; campsix; Microsoft; McKenna Group; Cisco; Ventro; Jupiter
Communications; EarthLink, WebMD; Loudcloud, Everypath, OracleMobile,
Tellme, and many more

--- Special Note: Tickets will be by Lottery ---
* In an effort to make our limited ticket distribution more equitable,
tickets will be distributed by lottery.
* You must register between Sept 13th and Sept 18th.
* A lottery will then be conducted and ticket recipients notified by e-mail
and able to purchase tickets.
* For those unable to attend, we will have post-conference videocasting.

For complete information and to register, please see our website:
www.TheLeadingEdge.org

Thanks to Our Feature Sponsors:
* IBM and Microsoft
And Our Other Sponsors:
* Sun, Kana, Business 2.0, Red Herring
* Siebel, The Standard, Nortel, Motorola, GeoWorks, Andersen Consulting,
Angel Engineers
* Visa, Haas Management of Technology, CSC, Strategy Associates

	"Delaney Hunter" <dhunter@smithandkempton.com>
	12/21/2000 03:30 PM
	Please respond to dhunter
		 
Folks-
Hot off the net. More info as it becomes available.

Thanks,
Delaney

P.S. Happy Holidays! :-)

 

	Paul Kaufman@ECT
	12/21/2000 03:28 PM
		 
Brief summary of the proposed decision:

1. Commission will issue a final decision on rate adjustments and the end of 
the rate freeze on January 4.    To reach the final decision, the Commission 
will hold expedited hearings beginning December 27 to address:  

 a. when rate freeze will end;
 b. rate adjustments neccesary to maintain utility solvency;
 c. whether utilities should retain remaining assets;
 d. whether utilies should use their retained assets to serve native load 
(and what rate adjustments are necessary to accomplish such a result).

2. Commission will take action to maintain solvency of utilities and the 
ability of the utilities to continue to provide service at just and 
reasonable rates.

We will give a full report on the conference call scheduled below.
Alan Comnes
12/21/2000 01:11 PM
Here's the order that has just been posted.  My understanding is the CPUC 
will take this up at 2 p.m.

GAC

Joseph Alamo@ENRON
12/21/2000 10:30 AM
On behalf of Jeff Dasovich, please note:  

the California PUC decision will be available on 
the PUC website @ 1:00 PM PST. 

The Commission will continue the meeting @ 2:00 PM PST 
to address the issue.

Thanks,

Joseph Alamo
Sr. Admin. Asst.
Government Affairs - The Americas
San Francisco CA

Mike (Smith):
Since things will move pretty quickly from this point forward, we want to 
have a quick meeting to explore our legal options and how best to preserve 
them.  We'd like to have a kickoff call after the daily 10 AM (CST ) call 
that Wanda Curry handles.  Are you available after Wanda's call?  Say 11 AM 
CST?  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

Hotel res works for us.

	"Eldon Sellers" <eldon@interx.net>
	12/21/2000 05:10 PM
	Please respond to eldon
		 
This is what I received from the Westwood Marquis which has undergone a
renovation.  (I replied and told them to correct the address.)  Let me know
if this is OK.  I don't know if  we can find a cheaper place, but if you
think this rate is too high I can try.  Also, I made reservations to go to
Burbank on Dec. 31 using Southwest Airlines and leaving from Oakland at
10:40 am, arriving at 11:40.  Returning on Jan. 1 at 8:15 pm and arriving at
9:20.  However, I learned from Cameron that all but your mother and I will
be going on Dec. 30 so I  will cancel that part of the reservation.  I don't
know  what your plans are for returning so I will not be making any  other
reservations unless I hear from you.  I originally made the returning
reservation at the time I did so that if we came back to the house on Monday
to watch football games and  play games we would have some time to do that.
If we don't do that we could possibly get an earlier flight back.  Your
mother doesn't want to come  back too late, so your mother and I couldn't
possibly watch a movie if Hef has one planned for later, but you might
consider that possibility.  Our check-in time at the W is 3:00 pm,  possibly
earlier.  I assume you got my message left on the answering  machine that
everyone  has been invited to the party.

I'm going to try to attend.  Thanks a bunch for setting it up.

we'll get tuxes. 

however, folks won't be going leaving at the same time, so going to the 
airport together seems unlikely. and it being new year's eve, i would 
strongly suggest taking a cab from the airport to the hotel---gonna be a 
zoo.  but, on the other hand, if scott and cameron are in for picking folks 
up, god love 'em.

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	12/22/2000 10:09 AM
		 
Dad forgot to mention: 
DRESS CODE (strictly enforced):  Black tie or lingerie - so Jeff and Scott if 
you do not own a tux you will need to rent one or a peignoir!

I think we should all try to depart at about the same time so we can go to 
the airport together.

Can anyone pick us up at the airport when we arrive on Sunday?

Nancy 
(707) 251-4870 (phone) 
(707) 265-5446 (fax) 
"Plus je bois, mieux je chante" 

Looks like scott and cameron are indeed game.  sounds like we should rent a 
big car--lincoln town or something.  

	"Scott Laughlin" <scottwl@hotmail.com>
	12/22/2000 11:08 AM
		 
First, Eldon, I just want to tell you how psyched I am for New Year's. 
Thanks so much for arranging it. We'll have a great time--and Cameron and I 
have already ironed out a nice deal concerning eyeing the Playmates. (I 
suggest you do the same, Jeff, or are you above gawking at plastic tits?) 
Cameron says: I can stare at whoever I want! Not bad, eh?

Jeff and I have our fig leaves all picked out...

As far as fetching you at LAX... Because Cameron and I (and PP and Jeff?) 
are going down on the 30th, we should rent a car then. When Eldon and Nancy 
come in, we'll already have a car, and so we can just collect you and go 
right to the hotel. Does that sound okay? That way, you guys won't have to 
rent a car when you get in. (I'll put Eldon on as a driver so that he can 
take over behind the wheel, if he wants to do that.) What kind of car should 
I get? Do we drive to the mansion? Now that I think about it, that would 
mean we need to squeeze 6 in one car. Anyway, let me know what your thought 
are on this.

Have a great time with the Hopkins. Merry Christmas to PP and Jeff. I'll see 
the rest of you on the beach!

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

	Iris Waser@EES
	12/22/2000 11:03 AM
		 
1:45 pm (CST)

Call In #   1-888-476-3752
Participant Code: 352769
Host Code:  134203

Any questions, please call me at 713-853-9012.

Iris

Edison doesn't want to play?

Karen Denne@ENRON
09/14/2000 06:13 PM
Peggy Mahoney@EES
09/14/2000 06:09 PM
FYI - not sure if you guys saw this!  Still looking for a corporate customer 
to go on record.
Peggy
	Enron Energy Services
	

FYI
djcustomclips@djinteractive.com on 09/14/2000 12:41:56 PM
Please respond to nobody@mail1.djnr.com
With Dereg Under Fire,Enron Calif Elec Business Heats Up
By Jason Leopold

09/14/2000
Dow Jones Energy Service
(Copyright (c) 2000, Dow Jones & Company, Inc.)

  LOS ANGELES -(Dow Jones)- While federal regulators try to find a way to
stabilize soaring wholesale electricity prices in California, Enron Corp.
(ENE) has been quietly striking up deals with some suburban communities to
sell them fixed-price power at a lower rate.

  In the past month, the Houston-based electricity service provider entered
into long-term fixed-rate contracts with the city of Roseville and is
negotiating similar deals with the cities of San Marcos and Chula Vista. Both
of those cities currently get their power from San Diego Gas & Electric Co, a
unit of Sempra Energy Inc. (SRE), and pay market rates for electricity.
  Enron has also struck a deal with Starwood Hotels & Resorts Worldwide Inc.
(HOT), one of the world's largest hospitality companies, to sell the company
electricity at a fixed rate for the next 10 years. The company has four hotels
in California, three of which buy their power from SDG&E.

  Sources close to the matter said Enron has contracted to sell the hotel
power at about 6 cents per kilowatt-hour, compared with the 22.5 cents/KWh
Starwood said it was charged by SDG&E in August.

  Neither company would disclose the terms of the deal. But Starwood said it
expects to reduce its energy costs by more than $200 million over the next 10
years.

  Enron, the largest trader of electricity and natural gas in the U.S., will
purchase power to cover such contracts on the wholesale markets and use its
experience to manage the risks, while paying a fee to utilities like SDG&E for
use of their distribution networks.

  "That really is our core strength," said Harold Buchanan, chief operating
officer for Enron Energy Services North America. "We understand how to manage
those risks."

  High Rates Driving Industrial Customers, Cities To Switch

  The growing interest in fixed-price supply contracts is fueling a comeback
of sorts for Enron.

  The Houston-based company had tried to break into California's retail power
market just after deregulation, even spending nearly $1 million to advertise
the venture during the Super Bowl. But Enron gave up trying to win residential
customers in 1998, citing disappointing response and lower-than-expected
profits.

  That was when deregulation and competitive power markets were full of
promise. Oddly enough, now that deregulation is coming under attack in
California, soaring power prices are building demand for Enron's services.

  The company is fielding calls from large industrial customers in San Diego
that have seen their utility bills triple in the past three months and are
interested in signing long-term fixed-rate contracts, Buchanan said.

  "Overall, what Enron can provide is reliability pricing in San Diego that's
written in stone," Buchanan said. "It's far cheaper than what they're paying
now with the utilities."

  A number of large industrial customers negotiating with Enron declined to
comment.

  The city of Roseville, near Sacramento, entered into a $114 million contract
with Enron last month to purchase 50 megawatts of electricity for five years
at $49 per megawatt-hour.

  Furthermore, the city has started talks with Enron about building and
operating a 750-megawatt natural gas-fired power plant that city officials
expect will contribute to lower costs for the purchase of electricity.

  Mayor Harry Crabb said the plant could protect residents from the price
spikes that have plagued customers of SDG&E since June.

  San Marcos, in San Diego County, is proposing to switch electricity service
for its 10,000 residents to Enron from SDG&E - a move the City Council said
could shave about $12 million a year off the city's power bill. Enron has said
it would offer the city terms nearly identical to those it offered Roseville.

  An SDG&E spokesman said last week that the utility supports such
arrangements, saying they're one way deregulation is supposed to work.

  Enron offered earlier this summer to sell power to SDG&E itself for four
years at a fixed rate of 5.5 cents/KWh, but the utility said the price was too
high.

  California Gov. Gray Davis signed legislation two weeks ago to cap
electricity rates for SDG&E's customers at 6.5 cents/KWh.

  -By Jason Leopold, Dow Jones Newswires; 323-658-3874;
jason.leopold@dowjones.com

Folder Name: Enron Energy Services
Relevance Score on Scale of 100: 80

______________________________________________________________________

To review or revise your folder, visit http://www.djinteractive.com or 
contact Dow Jones Customer Service by e-mail at custom.news@bis.dowjones.com 
or by phone at 800-369-7466. (Outside the U.S. and Canada, call 609-452-1511 
or contact your local sales representative.)
______________________________________________________________________

Copyright (c) 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved

Very unnecessary.  Very kind.  Very much appreciated.

Thank you.

	Scott Stoness@EES
	12/22/2000 02:54 PM
		 
Call in # 1 800 713 8600  Pass=80435

Dasovich numbers:
home: 415.621.8317
pager: 888.916.7184
cell: 415.505.6633

	Scott Stoness@EES
	12/22/2000 05:56 PM
		
Scott Number:
Home 281 345 6064
Pager 888 397 3992
Cell      713 806 2667

Gordon Savage Number
Home 713 465 8394
Pager 877 638 3866
Cell 323 363 2913

Roger Yang:
Pager: 888 467 6218

	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	12/22/2000 06:28 PM
		 
 
Parties, attached is the promised ruling that provides procedural guidance
for the hearings on 12/27 and 12/28.  The ruling will also be posted on the
web site as quickly as possible.  

Thank you for your patience and I hope you can take a few moments to enjoy
the holidays. 

--Angela Minkin 
Administrative Law Judge 

<<1%P701!.doc>> 

Note that this communication is confidential, covered by CA's settlement 
rules.
	"Lindh, Frank (Law)" <FRL3@pge.com>
	12/21/2000 07:50 PM
		 
Confidential Settlement Document
Per CPUC Rule 51

Gas Accord II Settlement Participants:

Attached is PG&E's Gas Accord II (GA II) Settlement Proposal.  We believe it
addresses many of the issues and concerns you have raised in the workshops.

As an overview, this proposal:

*   Maintains the basic Gas Accord structure in place today for the
period 2003 to 2007.
*   
*   Offers end user transportation rates for 2003 lower for most
customers than rates in effect today.
*   
*   Provides for vintaged Redwood path rates for core customers.
*   
*   Offers a 7.5 cent/dth rate to large customers while minimizing rate
changes to other customers, minimizing the incentive for these customers to
seek to bypass local transmission charges and other CPUC-approved charges.
*   
*   Adopts guidelines to improve reliability and help moderate prices in
gas commodity markets, and identifies the capital projects needed to meet
these guidelines over the course of the GA II period (2003-2007).  
*   
*   Provides a high degree of rate stability, with a 3.5% escalator to
capture both inflation and the cost of needed capital projects.  The
guaranteed rates will be adjustable only for significant changes in the cost
of capital or increased costs due to governmental requirements or
catastrophic events.
*   
*   Preserves a rate differential between the Redwood and Baja paths,
although somewhat less than the current differential.
*   
*   Proposes a two-stage open season for firm transportation services
beginning in 2003, with end users receiving a first option on available
capacity.
*   
*   Maintains the core aggregation program with some adjustments.

PG&E also anticipates that the Core Procurement Incentive Mechanism (CPIM)
will be similar to today's mechanism, but will reflect the somewhat larger
capacity holdings needed to meet anticipated increases in core demand and to
meet a 1-day in 10-year cold weather event.

This also will serve as a reminder that an all-Party meeting is scheduled at
PG&E's headquarters in San Francisco on January 10 and 11, to discuss this
proposal and to respond to your questions.  We look forward to answering
your questions and receiving your feedback.

The attached documents include the GA II Settlement proposal, an Attachment
(a copy of PG&E's proposed Gas Rule 27), and a set of supporting workpapers.

Finally, please note that the Settlement document and the Attachment are in
"Word 2000" format.  We would be glad to provide the same documents in an
earlier version of Word, upon request by individual Parties.

We look forward to seeing you on January 10-11.  In the meantime, we extend
our best wishes for a safe and happy holiday season.

Frank Lindh               Ray Williams
(415) 973-2776            (415) 973-3634

 <<PG&E Gas Accord II Settlement Proposal 12-20-00.doc>>  <<Proposed Gas
Rule 27.doc>>  <<COS & Rates Workpapers for GA II 12-20-2000 Proposal.xls>> 

Greetings Judge Minkin:

This is to inform that a representative of Enron Corp would like to address 
the Commission on the issue of utility rate stabilization plans at the 
Commission's hearings scheduled for December 27th and 28th.  Thank you.

Sincerely,
Jeffrey Dasovich
Director, Enron Corp

Attached is a draft of the talking points for the Commission's hearings.  Few 
points:
Our time is likely to be limited to 5-10 minutes.
Mike Day, our outside counsel, will make the presentation on our behalf.
Mike Day is fleshing out the legal details of our presentation and he will 
forward that along for folks review later today.
Comments can be forwarded to me via email, pager (888.916.7184), voicemail 
(415.782.7822), or home (415.621.8317).
We will finalize the message points on tomorrow's daily call (10 AM CST).  
The call in number is 800.713.8600.  Code is 80435.
The Commission's hearings begin tomorrow at 10 AM (PST).

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/26/2000 03:15 PM
		
	

Attached is a draft of the talking points for the Commission's hearings.  Few 
points:
Our time is likely to be limited to 5-10 minutes.
Mike Day, our outside counsel, will make the presentation on our behalf.
Mike Day is fleshing out the legal details of our presentation and he will 
forward that along for folks review later today.
Comments can be forwarded to me via email, pager (888.916.7184), voicemail 
(415.782.7822), or home (415.621.8317).
We will finalize the message points on tomorrow's daily call (10 AM CST).  
The call in number is 800.713.8600.  Code is 80435.
The Commission's hearings begin tomorrow at 10 AM (PST).

Nice job.  Going to be a wild ride.

That's a very good point.  I'll make the change.

Best,
Jeff

	Harry Kingerski
	12/26/2000 03:33 PM
		
Jeff - instead of suggesting a specific rate increase - 10 or 15 %, I think 
we should acknowledge that a "modest" increase may be necessary and may in 
fact be desirable - but that the specific amount of increase should be 
reasoned and subject to well thought out evidence and hearings, not just 
determined by whim.  In general, we should not be overly prescriptive at this 
point and I know you agree with that.  Otherwise, I think you have captured 
the points excellently.  

We're in the process of developing a strategy to take us through the next few 
months.  But while the (otherwise perishable) thoughts are still fresh in my 
mind from the hearings on Monday and Tuesday, I wanted to throw out some 
observations for discussion in the days/weeks ahead.

OBSERVATION--The pressure to finger somebody for "price gouging" is 
increasing.

The administration is hell bent on finding a "fall guy."  The price spikes 
pose real political risks for Davis and he and his folks need and want an 
easy way out.   His press release following the hearing renewed the call for 
"refunds."  On my panel, Loretta Lynch asked Reliant and Duke to supply her 
with the details of the contracts they cut to sell their power forward to 
marketers.  And Carl Wood's remarks were extreme.
At the Barton hearing, a liberal democrat (Filner) and a conservative 
Republican (Hunter) locked arms in calling for refunds. Bilbray joined the 
"gouging" band wagon.
The utilities repeatedly called on FERC to do a "real" investigation, with 
hearings, testimony, data discovery---the works. 
On the positive side, the FERC commissioners lauded Wolak, his analysis, and 
his remarks on the panel.  Wolak said somewhat emphatically that the nature 
of California's market structure makes it impossible to single out a single 
participant as the culprit.  He also stated that just everyone's just acting 
in their own self-interest, responding to the screwed incentives embedded in 
the structure.

IMPLICATION--It seems prudent for Enron to understand better its risks of 
getting fingered.

In the best case, the clamoring for a "refund" subsides.  In which case, the 
only cost to Enron is the internal cost incurred to understand better the 
risks of getting fingered.
In the medium case, investigations find that Enron (like others) "played by 
the rules," but the rules stunk, and Enron profited at the expense of 
California consumers.  

You're right, Sue.  Rates can't go up w/out declaring the rate freeze over in 
some fashion---trying to finesse it.  Thanks very much for the comments.  
Harry also had a good comment---don't specify the amount of rate increase in 
our comments; rather note that the rate increase needs to be well-reasoned 
and based on facts and evidence.  Will make that change.

	Susan J Mara
	12/26/2000 06:43 PM
		
Jeff,

This looks good.  It comes across as moderate in tone-- although probably no 
one else will ask to leave the rate freeze in place. 

I have a legal question -- Under AB 1890, I don't see anyway that the CPUC 
can raise rates without ending the rate freeze first.  Am I missing 
something? So, how is it clear that the CCPUC can raise the rates on Feb 1?  
It's clear,however,  that once the retained assets are valued that the rates 
can be changed.

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/26/2000 01:15 PM
		
	

Attached is a draft of the talking points for the Commission's hearings.  Few 
points:
Our time is likely to be limited to 5-10 minutes.
Mike Day, our outside counsel, will make the presentation on our behalf.
Mike Day is fleshing out the legal details of our presentation and he will 
forward that along for folks review later today.
Comments can be forwarded to me via email, pager (888.916.7184), voicemail 
(415.782.7822), or home (415.621.8317).
We will finalize the message points on tomorrow's daily call (10 AM CST).  
The call in number is 800.713.8600.  Code is 80435.
The Commission's hearings begin tomorrow at 10 AM (PST).

you were on the original.  did you not get it?
	MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	12/27/2000 01:24 AM
		 
Enclosed is a draft presentation of legal issues to be presented at the CPUC
emergency hearings in conjunction with regulatory and economic arguments set
forth in the draft comments previously distributed by Jeff Dasovich.  Jeff
and I will work to merge the legal issues into the full presentation,
subject to the duscussion on the conference call tomorrow morning.  This
presentation has been prepared in anticipation of the fact that we will
likely be limited to a very short verbal presentation tomorrow.  A more
extensive legal analysis of all these points is being prepared to accompany
any briefs or written comments which we are permitted to file later.  Please
e-mail comments using the reply function to MBD at this address before the
conference call if at all possible.  Thank you.  Mike Day

 <<X19418.DOC>> 

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/26/2000 03:15 PM
		
	

Attached is a draft of the talking points for the Commission's hearings.  Few 
points:
Our time is likely to be limited to 5-10 minutes.
Mike Day, our outside counsel, will make the presentation on our behalf.
Mike Day is fleshing out the legal details of our presentation and he will 
forward that along for folks review later today.
Comments can be forwarded to me via email, pager (888.916.7184), voicemail 
(415.782.7822), or home (415.621.8317).
We will finalize the message points on tomorrow's daily call (10 AM CST).  
The call in number is 800.713.8600.  Code is 80435.
The Commission's hearings begin tomorrow at 10 AM (PST).

Thanks.  Good points.  Will make sure that we have "bad guys" issued 
covered.  You have a great holiday with your family and a safe and happy New 
Year.  

Best,
Jeff

	James D Steffes
	12/27/2000 09:29 AM
		 
Jeff --

Your notes look great.  Best of luck today with the Hearings.  Only items not 
included would be (1) information from the PX / ISO and (2) governance at the 
PX / ISO.  I don't think these will are appropriate at these hearings.

Finally, I think that if the Hearings begin to devolve into a "who are the 
bad guys", what  are you proposing Mike Day respond?  Do we have any messages 
for this situation (however unlikely)?

Jim

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/26/2000 07:05 PM
		
You're right, Sue.  Rates can't go up w/out declaring the rate freeze over in 
some fashion---trying to finesse it.  Thanks very much for the comments.  
Harry also had a good comment---don't specify the amount of rate increase in 
our comments; rather note that the rate increase needs to be well-reasoned 
and based on facts and evidence.  Will make that change.

	Susan J Mara
	12/26/2000 06:43 PM
		
Jeff,

This looks good.  It comes across as moderate in tone-- although probably no 
one else will ask to leave the rate freeze in place. 

I have a legal question -- Under AB 1890, I don't see anyway that the CPUC 
can raise rates without ending the rate freeze first.  Am I missing 
something? So, how is it clear that the CCPUC can raise the rates on Feb 1?  
It's clear,however,  that once the retained assets are valued that the rates 
can be changed.

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/26/2000 01:15 PM
		
	

Attached is a draft of the talking points for the Commission's hearings.  Few 
points:
Our time is likely to be limited to 5-10 minutes.
Mike Day, our outside counsel, will make the presentation on our behalf.
Mike Day is fleshing out the legal details of our presentation and he will 
forward that along for folks review later today.
Comments can be forwarded to me via email, pager (888.916.7184), voicemail 
(415.782.7822), or home (415.621.8317).
We will finalize the message points on tomorrow's daily call (10 AM CST).  
The call in number is 800.713.8600.  Code is 80435.
The Commission's hearings begin tomorrow at 10 AM (PST).

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/26/2000 03:15 PM
		
	

Attached is a draft of the talking points for the Commission's hearings.  Few 
points:
Our time is likely to be limited to 5-10 minutes.
Mike Day, our outside counsel, will make the presentation on our behalf.
Mike Day is fleshing out the legal details of our presentation and he will 
forward that along for folks review later today.
Comments can be forwarded to me via email, pager (888.916.7184), voicemail 
(415.782.7822), or home (415.621.8317).
We will finalize the message points on tomorrow's daily call (10 AM CST).  
The call in number is 800.713.8600.  Code is 80435.
The Commission's hearings begin tomorrow at 10 AM (PST).

Thanks Roger.  Here are the highlights of today's hearings:

 Common themes--many tracked ours pretty closely
Not a question of whether rates need to rise, but by how much.
Though some oppose any and all rate increases, the lion's share acknowledged 
that the utilities have a cash flow problem and the a rate increase is 
necessary.
Due process matters. 
If the Commission is thinking about going as far as ending rate freezes and 
increasing rates, it better provide for ample due process, or countless law 
suits will ensue.
Don't jump the gun.  
A rate increase is likely, but only the utilities benefit from adoption of 
the utilities' proposals. The Commission needs to carefully scrutinize the 
utilities' claims and take a careful look at the level of increase required 
to maintain access to capital markets.  However, as expected, the utilities 
implored the Commission to jump the gun immediately.  The utilities want the 
Commission to declare an end to the rate freeze and raise rates on Jan.4.
No more divestiture.  
The utility should keep the generating assets it retained, but the Commission 
should ensure that the assets' benefits are allocated equally among all 
customers.  One legislator recommended that the State buy the utilities' 
hydro assets, which would give the utilities the cash they need and give the 
state control over some generation.
Treat all customers equally and fairly.
The Commission should not create two classes of customers (e.g., large v. 
small; direct access v. bundled).  No customer group should be sacrificied to 
save another.
Be as narrow as possible/do as little harm as possible
The immediate problem is the utility's cash/credit crunch.  As such, the 
Commission should do only enough to solve this very specific, immediate 
problem.  A modest rate increase is all that's required and the Commission 
should do no more.

At the beginning and the end of the hearing, the President of the Commission 
asked parties to be prepared (at tomorrow's hearing) to discuss whether the 
Commission could legally use its other, broad powers to raise rates without 
declaring an end to the rate freeze.  It seems that she seems some benefit in 
raising rates, but leaving AB 1890 otherwise intact untill the Commission can 

Marketers and generators are to blame for the problem
Though not universally embraced, the theme came up repeatedly. 

A few parties (e.g., the Unions, low income consumer groups, one PUC 
commissioner) called for complete re-regulation of the industry, returning 
the utilities to vertically integrated monopolies.  But they were the 
exception rather than the rule at today's hearing.

2. Next steps
There hearings were scheduled to end on Thursay, but now will continue 
through Friday.
Tomorrow, lawyers will provide "oral" arguments on whether the Commission 
must end the rate freeze in order to increase rates.  We will argue that it 
does not have to, and should not, go through the complex and controversial 
exercise of determing whether the rate freeze is over between now and 
01.04.01.  We will argue that the Commission has the authority to raise rates 
without ending the rate freeze, and if it decides to raise rates, it should 
do so while keeping AB 1890's basic structure in place until a full and fair 
hearing of the issues is completed.   We are talking to other stakeholders to 
persuade them to take the same approach.  In terms of legal arguments, this 
is clearly a long shot, but one that seems worth taking.
After the oral argument, the utilities will present their rate proposals and 
"all interested persons" will have the opportunity to cross-examine the 
utilities (in short, tomorrow will also be a zoo).
When asked what the process will be for issuing a proposed decision and 
providing comments, the President of the Commission responded "we don't know, 
it's evolving."  In other words, the Commission is doing a poor job of 
ensuring that their Jan 4 decision is "appeal-proof."
Keep in mind that the situation remains extremely fluid and the trend is 
still toward ending the rate freeze on Jan. 4th.  We continue to aggressively 
offer alternatives to that possibility and continue to try to bring other 
stakeholders to our side.
We're doing everything necessary to preserve our appeal rights.

We can discuss further on the 10 AM (CST) call tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

	Roger Yang@EES
	12/27/2000 05:43 PM
		
Got an update from Jeff Dasovich.  No earth shattering news.  Comments have 
been all over the place.  The impression is being made by differing parties 
that the issues are very complex and would inevitably result in endless 
lawsuits.  Possible conclusion by the CPUC may be to invoke emergency powers 
to implement an emergency surcharge and avoid addressing the issue of when 
the rate freeze ends in these hearings.  However, this is just speculation.  
Jeff will return to the office by 5:00 pm PST and will send out a summary of 
today's hearings.

Roger
  

Leticia Botello
12/27/2000 06:57 AM
12/27/00

Time    Location Call In #  Pass Code

10:00 Central Standard Time  EB 2868  1-800-713-8600  80435

This is a recurring daily meeting until further notice  (this invitation will 
schedule your calendar through 1/31/01).

Time, Call In #, and Pass Code are the same for all meetings.  Conference 
room location will be changed as soon as possible to better accommodate the 
participants.  

Note:  Optional Invitees FYI Only

Please call me if you have any questions 

Leticia

x-58752

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/27/2000 08:57 PM
		
Thanks Roger.  Here are the highlights of today's hearings:

 Common themes--many tracked ours pretty closely
Not a question of whether rates need to rise, but by how much.
Though some oppose any and all rate increases, the lion's share acknowledged 
that the utilities have a cash flow problem and the a rate increase is 
necessary.
Due process matters. 
If the Commission is thinking about going as far as ending rate freezes and 
increasing rates, it better provide for ample due process, or countless law 
suits will ensue.
Don't jump the gun.  
A rate increase is likely, but only the utilities benefit from adoption of 
the utilities' proposals. The Commission needs to carefully scrutinize the 
utilities' claims and take a careful look at the level of increase required 
to maintain access to capital markets.  However, as expected, the utilities 
implored the Commission to jump the gun immediately.  The utilities want the 
Commission to declare an end to the rate freeze and raise rates on Jan.4.
No more divestiture.  
The utility should keep the generating assets it retained, but the Commission 
should ensure that the assets' benefits are allocated equally among all 
customers.  One legislator recommended that the State buy the utilities' 
hydro assets, which would give the utilities the cash they need and give the 
state control over some generation.
Treat all customers equally and fairly.
The Commission should not create two classes of customers (e.g., large v. 
small; direct access v. bundled).  No customer group should be sacrificied to 
save another.
Be as narrow as possible/do as little harm as possible
The immediate problem is the utility's cash/credit crunch.  As such, the 
Commission should do only enough to solve this very specific, immediate 
problem.  A modest rate increase is all that's required and the Commission 
should do no more.

At the beginning and the end of the hearing, the President of the Commission 
asked parties to be prepared (at tomorrow's hearing) to discuss whether the 
Commission could legally use its other, broad powers to raise rates without 
declaring an end to the rate freeze.  It seems that she seems some benefit in 
raising rates, but leaving AB 1890 otherwise intact untill the Commission can 

Marketers and generators are to blame for the problem
Though not universally embraced, the theme came up repeatedly. 

A few parties (e.g., the Unions, low income consumer groups, one PUC 
commissioner) called for complete re-regulation of the industry, returning 
the utilities to vertically integrated monopolies.  But they were the 
exception rather than the rule at today's hearing.

2. Next steps
There hearings were scheduled to end on Thursay, but now will continue 
through Friday.
Tomorrow, lawyers will provide "oral" arguments on whether the Commission 
must end the rate freeze in order to increase rates.  We will argue that it 
does not have to, and should not, go through the complex and controversial 
exercise of determing whether the rate freeze is over between now and 
01.04.01.  We will argue that the Commission has the authority to raise rates 
without ending the rate freeze, and if it decides to raise rates, it should 
do so while keeping AB 1890's basic structure in place until a full and fair 
hearing of the issues is completed.   We are talking to other stakeholders to 
persuade them to take the same approach.  In terms of legal arguments, this 
is clearly a long shot, but one that seems worth taking.
After the oral argument, the utilities will present their rate proposals and 
"all interested persons" will have the opportunity to cross-examine the 
utilities (in short, tomorrow will also be a zoo).
When asked what the process will be for issuing a proposed decision and 
providing comments, the President of the Commission responded "we don't know, 
it's evolving."  In other words, the Commission is doing a poor job of 
ensuring that their Jan 4 decision is "appeal-proof."
Keep in mind that the situation remains extremely fluid and the trend is 
still toward ending the rate freeze on Jan. 4th.  We continue to aggressively 
offer alternatives to that possibility and continue to try to bring other 
stakeholders to our side.
We're doing everything necessary to preserve our appeal rights.

We can discuss further on the 10 AM (CST) call tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

	Roger Yang@EES
	12/27/2000 05:43 PM
		
Got an update from Jeff Dasovich.  No earth shattering news.  Comments have 
been all over the place.  The impression is being made by differing parties 
that the issues are very complex and would inevitably result in endless 
lawsuits.  Possible conclusion by the CPUC may be to invoke emergency powers 
to implement an emergency surcharge and avoid addressing the issue of when 
the rate freeze ends in these hearings.  However, this is just speculation.  
Jeff will return to the office by 5:00 pm PST and will send out a summary of 
today's hearings.

Roger
  

Leticia Botello
12/27/2000 06:57 AM
12/27/00

Time    Location Call In #  Pass Code

10:00 Central Standard Time  EB 2868  1-800-713-8600  80435

This is a recurring daily meeting until further notice  (this invitation will 
schedule your calendar through 1/31/01).

Time, Call In #, and Pass Code are the same for all meetings.  Conference 
room location will be changed as soon as possible to better accommodate the 
participants.  

Note:  Optional Invitees FYI Only

Please call me if you have any questions 

Leticia

x-58752

Here is some info in advance of tomorrow's call.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/27/2000 08:57 PM
		
Thanks Roger.  Here are the highlights of today's hearings:

 Common themes--many tracked ours pretty closely
Not a question of whether rates need to rise, but by how much.
Though some oppose any and all rate increases, the lion's share acknowledged 
that the utilities have a cash flow problem and the a rate increase is 
necessary.
Due process matters. 
If the Commission is thinking about going as far as ending rate freezes and 
increasing rates, it better provide for ample due process, or countless law 
suits will ensue.
Don't jump the gun.  
A rate increase is likely, but only the utilities benefit from adoption of 
the utilities' proposals. The Commission needs to carefully scrutinize the 
utilities' claims and take a careful look at the level of increase required 
to maintain access to capital markets.  However, as expected, the utilities 
implored the Commission to jump the gun immediately.  The utilities want the 
Commission to declare an end to the rate freeze and raise rates on Jan.4.
No more divestiture.  
The utility should keep the generating assets it retained, but the Commission 
should ensure that the assets' benefits are allocated equally among all 
customers.  One legislator recommended that the State buy the utilities' 
hydro assets, which would give the utilities the cash they need and give the 
state control over some generation.
Treat all customers equally and fairly.
The Commission should not create two classes of customers (e.g., large v. 
small; direct access v. bundled).  No customer group should be sacrificied to 
save another.
Be as narrow as possible/do as little harm as possible
The immediate problem is the utility's cash/credit crunch.  As such, the 
Commission should do only enough to solve this very specific, immediate 
problem.  A modest rate increase is all that's required and the Commission 
should do no more.

At the beginning and the end of the hearing, the President of the Commission 
asked parties to be prepared (at tomorrow's hearing) to discuss whether the 
Commission could legally use its other, broad powers to raise rates without 
declaring an end to the rate freeze.  It seems that she seems some benefit in 
raising rates, but leaving AB 1890 otherwise intact untill the Commission can 

Marketers and generators are to blame for the problem
Though not universally embraced, the theme came up repeatedly. 

A few parties (e.g., the Unions, low income consumer groups, one PUC 
commissioner) called for complete re-regulation of the industry, returning 
the utilities to vertically integrated monopolies.  But they were the 
exception rather than the rule at today's hearing.

2. Next steps
There hearings were scheduled to end on Thursay, but now will continue 
through Friday.
Tomorrow, lawyers will provide "oral" arguments on whether the Commission 
must end the rate freeze in order to increase rates.  We will argue that it 
does not have to, and should not, go through the complex and controversial 
exercise of determing whether the rate freeze is over between now and 
01.04.01.  We will argue that the Commission has the authority to raise rates 
without ending the rate freeze, and if it decides to raise rates, it should 
do so while keeping AB 1890's basic structure in place until a full and fair 
hearing of the issues is completed.   We are talking to other stakeholders to 
persuade them to take the same approach.  In terms of legal arguments, this 
is clearly a long shot, but one that seems worth taking.
After the oral argument, the utilities will present their rate proposals and 
"all interested persons" will have the opportunity to cross-examine the 
utilities (in short, tomorrow will also be a zoo).
When asked what the process will be for issuing a proposed decision and 
providing comments, the President of the Commission responded "we don't know, 
it's evolving."  In other words, the Commission is doing a poor job of 
ensuring that their Jan 4 decision is "appeal-proof."
Keep in mind that the situation remains extremely fluid and the trend is 
still toward ending the rate freeze on Jan. 4th.  We continue to aggressively 
offer alternatives to that possibility and continue to try to bring other 
stakeholders to our side.
We're doing everything necessary to preserve our appeal rights.

We can discuss further on the 10 AM (CST) call tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

	Roger Yang@EES
	12/27/2000 05:43 PM
		
Got an update from Jeff Dasovich.  No earth shattering news.  Comments have 
been all over the place.  The impression is being made by differing parties 
that the issues are very complex and would inevitably result in endless 
lawsuits.  Possible conclusion by the CPUC may be to invoke emergency powers 
to implement an emergency surcharge and avoid addressing the issue of when 
the rate freeze ends in these hearings.  However, this is just speculation.  
Jeff will return to the office by 5:00 pm PST and will send out a summary of 
today's hearings.

Roger
  

Leticia Botello
12/27/2000 06:57 AM
12/27/00

Time    Location Call In #  Pass Code

10:00 Central Standard Time  EB 2868  1-800-713-8600  80435

This is a recurring daily meeting until further notice  (this invitation will 
schedule your calendar through 1/31/01).

Time, Call In #, and Pass Code are the same for all meetings.  Conference 
room location will be changed as soon as possible to better accommodate the 
participants.  

Note:  Optional Invitees FYI Only

Please call me if you have any questions 

Leticia

x-58752

will do.

	Jeremy Blachman@EES
	12/28/2000 08:09 AM
		 
FYI.

jeff/ roger, can you make sure the above folks, who head up our market facing 
activities across EES are on any and all distribution lists for this 
stuff..they need to be in the loop on what is happening in the market.

Thanks Roger.  Here are the highlights of today's hearings:

 Common themes--many tracked ours pretty closely
Not a question of whether rates need to rise, but by how much.
Though some oppose any and all rate increases, the lion's share acknowledged 
that the utilities have a cash flow problem and the a rate increase is 
necessary.
Due process matters. 
If the Commission is thinking about going as far as ending rate freezes and 
increasing rates, it better provide for ample due process, or countless law 
suits will ensue.
Don't jump the gun.  
A rate increase is likely, but only the utilities benefit from adoption of 
the utilities' proposals. The Commission needs to carefully scrutinize the 
utilities' claims and take a careful look at the level of increase required 
to maintain access to capital markets.  However, as expected, the utilities 
implored the Commission to jump the gun immediately.  The utilities want the 
Commission to declare an end to the rate freeze and raise rates on Jan.4.
No more divestiture.  
The utility should keep the generating assets it retained, but the Commission 
should ensure that the assets' benefits are allocated equally among all 
customers.  One legislator recommended that the State buy the utilities' 
hydro assets, which would give the utilities the cash they need and give the 
state control over some generation.
Treat all customers equally and fairly.
The Commission should not create two classes of customers (e.g., large v. 
small; direct access v. bundled).  No customer group should be sacrificied to 
save another.
Be as narrow as possible/do as little harm as possible
The immediate problem is the utility's cash/credit crunch.  As such, the 
Commission should do only enough to solve this very specific, immediate 
problem.  A modest rate increase is all that's required and the Commission 
should do no more.

At the beginning and the end of the hearing, the President of the Commission 
asked parties to be prepared (at tomorrow's hearing) to discuss whether the 
Commission could legally use its other, broad powers to raise rates without 
declaring an end to the rate freeze.  It seems that she seems some benefit in 
raising rates, but leaving AB 1890 otherwise intact untill the Commission can 

Marketers and generators are to blame for the problem
Though not universally embraced, the theme came up repeatedly. 

A few parties (e.g., the Unions, low income consumer groups, one PUC 
commissioner) called for complete re-regulation of the industry, returning 
the utilities to vertically integrated monopolies.  But they were the 
exception rather than the rule at today's hearing.

2. Next steps
There hearings were scheduled to end on Thursay, but now will continue 
through Friday.
Tomorrow, lawyers will provide "oral" arguments on whether the Commission 
must end the rate freeze in order to increase rates.  We will argue that it 
does not have to, and should not, go through the complex and controversial 
exercise of determing whether the rate freeze is over between now and 
01.04.01.  We will argue that the Commission has the authority to raise rates 
without ending the rate freeze, and if it decides to raise rates, it should 
do so while keeping AB 1890's basic structure in place until a full and fair 
hearing of the issues is completed.   We are talking to other stakeholders to 
persuade them to take the same approach.  In terms of legal arguments, this 
is clearly a long shot, but one that seems worth taking.
After the oral argument, the utilities will present their rate proposals and 
"all interested persons" will have the opportunity to cross-examine the 
utilities (in short, tomorrow will also be a zoo).
When asked what the process will be for issuing a proposed decision and 
providing comments, the President of the Commission responded "we don't know, 
it's evolving."  In other words, the Commission is doing a poor job of 
ensuring that their Jan 4 decision is "appeal-proof."
Keep in mind that the situation remains extremely fluid and the trend is 
still toward ending the rate freeze on Jan. 4th.  We continue to aggressively 
offer alternatives to that possibility and continue to try to bring other 
stakeholders to our side.
We're doing everything necessary to preserve our appeal rights.

We can discuss further on the 10 AM (CST) call tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

	Roger Yang@EES
	12/27/2000 05:43 PM
		
Got an update from Jeff Dasovich.  No earth shattering news.  Comments have 
been all over the place.  The impression is being made by differing parties 
that the issues are very complex and would inevitably result in endless 
lawsuits.  Possible conclusion by the CPUC may be to invoke emergency powers 
to implement an emergency surcharge and avoid addressing the issue of when 
the rate freeze ends in these hearings.  However, this is just speculation.  
Jeff will return to the office by 5:00 pm PST and will send out a summary of 
today's hearings.

Roger
  

Leticia Botello
12/27/2000 06:57 AM
12/27/00

Time    Location Call In #  Pass Code

10:00 Central Standard Time  EB 2868  1-800-713-8600  80435

This is a recurring daily meeting until further notice  (this invitation will 
schedule your calendar through 1/31/01).

Time, Call In #, and Pass Code are the same for all meetings.  Conference 
room location will be changed as soon as possible to better accommodate the 
participants.  

Note:  Optional Invitees FYI Only

Please call me if you have any questions 

Leticia

x-58752

will do.

	Dan Leff@EES
	12/27/2000 11:02 PM
		
Jeff - Thank you for the comprehensive coverage.

I know you have a lot going on, with many to communicate with / to.  If you 
could, please add Jeff Messina/HOU/EES, Douglas Huth/HOU/EES, Richard 
Leibert/HOU/EES, to your distribution lists.

Thank you again - Dan

Thanks Roger.  Here are the highlights of today's hearings:

 Common themes--many tracked ours pretty closely
Not a question of whether rates need to rise, but by how much.
Though some oppose any and all rate increases, the lion's share acknowledged 
that the utilities have a cash flow problem and the a rate increase is 
necessary.
Due process matters. 
If the Commission is thinking about going as far as ending rate freezes and 
increasing rates, it better provide for ample due process, or countless law 
suits will ensue.
Don't jump the gun.  
A rate increase is likely, but only the utilities benefit from adoption of 
the utilities' proposals. The Commission needs to carefully scrutinize the 
utilities' claims and take a careful look at the level of increase required 
to maintain access to capital markets.  However, as expected, the utilities 
implored the Commission to jump the gun immediately.  The utilities want the 
Commission to declare an end to the rate freeze and raise rates on Jan.4.
No more divestiture.  
The utility should keep the generating assets it retained, but the Commission 
should ensure that the assets' benefits are allocated equally among all 
customers.  One legislator recommended that the State buy the utilities' 
hydro assets, which would give the utilities the cash they need and give the 
state control over some generation.
Treat all customers equally and fairly.
The Commission should not create two classes of customers (e.g., large v. 
small; direct access v. bundled).  No customer group should be sacrificied to 
save another.
Be as narrow as possible/do as little harm as possible
The immediate problem is the utility's cash/credit crunch.  As such, the 
Commission should do only enough to solve this very specific, immediate 
problem.  A modest rate increase is all that's required and the Commission 
should do no more.

At the beginning and the end of the hearing, the President of the Commission 
asked parties to be prepared (at tomorrow's hearing) to discuss whether the 
Commission could legally use its other, broad powers to raise rates without 
declaring an end to the rate freeze.  It seems that she seems some benefit in 
raising rates, but leaving AB 1890 otherwise intact untill the Commission can 

Marketers and generators are to blame for the problem
Though not universally embraced, the theme came up repeatedly. 

A few parties (e.g., the Unions, low income consumer groups, one PUC 
commissioner) called for complete re-regulation of the industry, returning 
the utilities to vertically integrated monopolies.  But they were the 
exception rather than the rule at today's hearing.

2. Next steps
There hearings were scheduled to end on Thursay, but now will continue 
through Friday.
Tomorrow, lawyers will provide "oral" arguments on whether the Commission 
must end the rate freeze in order to increase rates.  We will argue that it 
does not have to, and should not, go through the complex and controversial 
exercise of determing whether the rate freeze is over between now and 
01.04.01.  We will argue that the Commission has the authority to raise rates 
without ending the rate freeze, and if it decides to raise rates, it should 
do so while keeping AB 1890's basic structure in place until a full and fair 
hearing of the issues is completed.   We are talking to other stakeholders to 
persuade them to take the same approach.  In terms of legal arguments, this 
is clearly a long shot, but one that seems worth taking.
After the oral argument, the utilities will present their rate proposals and 
"all interested persons" will have the opportunity to cross-examine the 
utilities (in short, tomorrow will also be a zoo).
When asked what the process will be for issuing a proposed decision and 
providing comments, the President of the Commission responded "we don't know, 
it's evolving."  In other words, the Commission is doing a poor job of 
ensuring that their Jan 4 decision is "appeal-proof."
Keep in mind that the situation remains extremely fluid and the trend is 
still toward ending the rate freeze on Jan. 4th.  We continue to aggressively 
offer alternatives to that possibility and continue to try to bring other 
stakeholders to our side.
We're doing everything necessary to preserve our appeal rights.

We can discuss further on the 10 AM (CST) call tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

	Roger Yang@EES
	12/27/2000 05:43 PM
		
Got an update from Jeff Dasovich.  No earth shattering news.  Comments have 
been all over the place.  The impression is being made by differing parties 
that the issues are very complex and would inevitably result in endless 
lawsuits.  Possible conclusion by the CPUC may be to invoke emergency powers 
to implement an emergency surcharge and avoid addressing the issue of when 
the rate freeze ends in these hearings.  However, this is just speculation.  
Jeff will return to the office by 5:00 pm PST and will send out a summary of 
today's hearings.

Roger
  

Leticia Botello
12/27/2000 06:57 AM
12/27/00

Time    Location Call In #  Pass Code

10:00 Central Standard Time  EB 2868  1-800-713-8600  80435

This is a recurring daily meeting until further notice  (this invitation will 
schedule your calendar through 1/31/01).

Time, Call In #, and Pass Code are the same for all meetings.  Conference 
room location will be changed as soon as possible to better accommodate the 
participants.  

Note:  Optional Invitees FYI Only

Please call me if you have any questions 

Leticia

x-58752

Needless to say, given the Governor's press release, I'm a little concerned 
about what he might want.  Carl Wood and Loretta Lynch were truly abominable 
at the FERC hearing.  Fortunately, FERC (all 4 Commissioners) really beat up 
on the them.  I'm convinced that FERC feels that they must do something 
between now and November and that if we ever had a chance to get them to be 
bold (understanding that "bold" ain't exactly in Hoecker's play book), now's 
the chance.

Thanks for the giving Heber the straight dope.  He was very gracious 
throughout, but after the panel he (very jokingly) ribbed me pretty well, 
saying, "Jeff, I let you off the hook.  I was going to ask you how in the 
hell you ever let California turn into such a mess."  I told him that we were 
exercising Herculean restraint in not making lengthy "I told you so" 
statements.

Best,
Jeff

Steven J Kean@ENRON
09/15/2000 07:54 AM
Sent by: Steven J Kean@ENRON
I'm still waiting for Davis' office to call.  The plan currently is for me to 
talk to him when and if he calls.  Sandi has been in touch with the 
governor's office.

By the way, thanks for the summary of the California proceedings.  I talked 
to Hebert yesterday and he was duly impressed with your remarks ... I had to 
remind him that you worked on the right answers for California, not the 
abomination that's in place today.

Jeff Dasovich@EES
09/13/2000 06:48 PM

	Robert C Williams@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	12/28/2000 04:18 PM
		
At Jeff's and several of your suggestion, this call has been postponed to 
tomorrow at 10:30 CST immediately following the regular call.  The call-in 
number is 1-800-713-8600; passcode 80435.  Thank you.

	Stephanie Truss @ ENRON
	12/28/2000 01:51 PM
	
The conference call has been scheduled for today, December 28, 2000 at 7:00 
p.m. CST.  The call-in number is (800) 991-9019, passcode: 6045742, 
confirmation: 3335288.  Should you have any questions regarding this 
information, please call me at (713) 345-5965.  Thank you.

Robert C Williams@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
12/28/2000 11:52 AM
Mike Day, 

I have asked my assistant to set up a conference call for this evening to 
discuss preserving our argments and rights of appeal, both generally and 
specifically (with respect to the negative CTC issue),  during and after the 
present hearing.  I know that we covered some of this in our previous call, 
and that a record on due process is being made, but I'd like for all of us to 
explore whether there is anything else we should be doing now, and what, if 
anything, we will need to do after the proceeding is concluded.  I will see 
if Larry Mollman from Brobeck can join us as well for the state court 
litigation perspective.  Stephanie will circulate the call-in information.  
Thanks.

I haven't received anything.

	Susan J Mara
	12/28/2000 02:49 PM
		 
Have we gotten an invite?
	"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
	12/27/2000 01:18 PM
	Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
		 
The Assembly and Senate Republican caucuses are holding an energy briefing
for its members on January 4th from 9 am to noon in room 126 of the Capitol.
I don't have all the details on the briefing but speakers were invited by
Assembly Member Anthony Pescetti and will be given the opportunity to speak
as well as to bring up to 10 pages of written materials to hand out to
members.

Please let me know if you have received an invite and/or are speaking at
this briefing.  So far, Williams is the only IEP member company participant
I have heard about.

THANKS.

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modsette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

ah jeez, i guess this means that you made it back safely from s.d?

	Roger Yang@EES
	12/28/2000 05:32 PM
		 
PG&E

On page 5-3 in Chapter 5 Supplemental Testimony, PG&E states, "Decision 
97-05-088 also provides that, following the end of the ICIP rate, Diablo 
Canyon shifts to a sharing mechanism under which benefits from generation 
would be shared with ratepayers through divestiture, appraisal or profit 
sharing."  Is this interpretation predicated on an end to the rate freeze?  
PG&E also states, "PG&E's proposal in the RSP for Diablo Canyon is to defer 
its 50 percent share of market revenues for two years and to apply all market 
revenues in excess of ICIP to the UCSA.  PG&E proposed to track in the 
'Diablo Canyon Deferred Debit Account ('GDDA') the shareholder revenues 
(including interest) provided to ratepayers during this two-year period so 
that they may be recovered from market revenues in years three through 
five."  What "reasonably-based market price benchmark" does PG&E propose to 
rely upon?  Based on PG&E's forward view of this benchmark for the next two 
years, what is PG&E's estimate of the 50 percent shareholder share of 
foregone market revenues that will be tracked?  On page 2-2 in Chapter 2 
Supplemental Testimony, PG&E refers to an estimated average spot power market 
price of over $180 per MWH for 2001, using this price what would PG&E's 
shareholders 50% share be for 2001?  What if it is assumed a 17 million mWh 
output, the sunk costs are recovered, and a going forward operating cost of 
$20 per mWH?  (The answer would be in excess of $1.3 billion)  Is this share 
calculated on a before- or  after-tax basis?  Does the amount that would 
receive deferred recovery be income for PG&E?

In Chapter 2 Errata and Update Testimony, PG&E proposes a "rate 
stabilization" policy.  PG&E is currently proposing to raise rates in January 
2001.  Within the next two years, are there any other factors that will cause 
rates to increase?  Can rates increase for transmission rates currently filed 
at FERC?  Can rates increase for increases to distribution rates?  How 
frequently could rates change under PG&E's proposed "trigger mechanism".

In Chapter 2 Testimony, PG&E also proposes to establish a "Unrecovered Cost 
of Service Account Rate" and in Chapter 6 Testimony proposes to recover 
ongoing CTC from all customers.  How will Direct Access customers receive the 
stranded benefits from retained generation (hydro, nuclear, and fossil) as 
well as potential stranded benefits from QF energy?

SCE

Footnote 2 In Chapter 4 Amended Testimony, " SCE states, "Reflects ending 
August 31, 2000 balance plus interest calculated through December 31, 2000.  
This footnote references going-gorsward account transfers of $666 million 
used to calculate the estimated TCBA balance on December 31, 2000.  Is this 
balance used to calculate SCE's "Deferred Energy Cost Adjustment Rate"?  Why 
does SCE exclude amounts from beginning September 1, 2000?  What is the value 
of the excluded amounts?  Is it SCE's position that going forward revenues 
from retained generation assets 

	Roger Yang@EES
	12/28/2000 05:26 PM
		 
Attached is my proposed line of questioning for PG&E and SCE, incorporating 
Scott's.  We need to talk it over.

Scott Stoness
12/28/2000 09:53 AM
Roger: Please clean up this line of questioning that shows that PG&E is 
fishing for a windfall.  And that their liquidity problem is contrived or at 
least overstated.

Q.  How many MW of generation do you have related to Nuclear?

[Expect answer] About 2160 to 2300MW

Q. What market value have you put on these assets?

[Expect much waffling and an answer close to $0, Under the settlement, PG&E 
recovered in excess $3.3 billion for sunk costs]

Q.  Would you accept, based on testimony filed by PG&E on page 2-2 of Chapter 
2 Supplemental Testimony subject to check, that 12 month forward contracts 
for CA 2001 are trading at $180/MWh?

A [Expect much wafffling but a high number]

Q.  What is the variable (non capital related costs) of nuclear units in the 
next year?

A [Expect $20/MWh]

Q.  Is it true that:

$180/MWH minus $30/MWh = $150/MWh

Q. And that 

2160 MW at 80% availability factor and 8760 hours per year = 15,137,280 MWh

Q.  And that 

15,137,280 MWh times $150 = $2.3 billion for 2001 

Q.  And would you accept subject to check that PG&E would get to keep as 
income $1.1 billion of this amount under the nuclear settlement in 2001, even 
though PG&E would defer recovery pursuant to its proposed mechanics of its 
Unrecovered Cost of Service Account?

Q.  And would you expect there to be more value in 2002 and beyond?

A Expect lots of weaseling and yes

Q.  Given this estimate for just 2001, do you believe that Diablo Canyon has 
a market value of zero?

A.  No.

Q.  How much did you value your hydro assets at this summer in your previous 
filing?

A.  Expect 2.8 b, but revised to $4.3 billion

Q.  Based on the $150/MWH gap between hydro operating costs and market prices 
for a similar amount of output in 2001 for PG&E hydro units of roughly 4000 
MW, which would result in a similar $2.3 billion amount in 2001, do you 
believe that these market value assessments for PG&E's hydro units are 
correct?

A.  I do not know.

Q.  Has PG&E determined the market value of its retained fossil generation, 
namely Hunters Point and Humboldt, under current market conditions?

A.  No

Q.  Once PG&E completes its CTC recovery for its fossil generation, what will 
be the remaining book value of these assets?

A. Zero

Q.  So is the assumed market value of these fossil assets zero?

Q.  In calculating its Unrecovered Cost of Service Account, does PG&E expect 
any revenues above costs from its fossil assets as stated in Chapter 6 Eratta 
and Updated Testimony?

A.  Yes

Q.  Do you believe that PG&E has generation assets on its books that upon 
market valuation could possibly reduce the amount of total undercollections 
PG&E has and may continue to accrue or even result in a determination of net 
stranded benefits?

A.  I do not know.

Q.  Doesn't recovery of undercollections without properly market valuing 
retained assets and netting the market value of these assets compound the 
impact of passing through current market prices to large customers, as 
proposed by PG&E?

A.  Yes

CROSS EXAMINATION FOR SCE

Q.  In Table IV-2 in Chapter 4 Amended Testimony, SCE calculates its TCBA 
Overcollection on December 31, 2000, is this correct?

A.  Yes

Q.  In footnote 2 to the entry "Going-Forward Account Transfers" in that 
table, SCE states, "Reflects ending August 31, 2000 balance plus interest 
calculated through December 31, 2000, is this correct?

A.  Yes

Q.  Why has SCE omitted overcollection amounts for September through December 
2000?

A.  SCE believes that these amounts rightfully belong to SCE shareholders?

Q.  What assets are recorded in the Going Forward Accounts?

A.  Hydro and fossil generation.

Q.  What are the net overcollections in September through December 2000, that 
SCE proposes to not transfer to the TCBA?

A.  I don't know. ($300 million for fossil and $150 million for hydro for 
September through November for fossil)

Q.  What is SCE's current market value of its fossil plants, namely Mohave 
and Four Corners?  (I understand we have sensitivities with respect to Mohave)

A.  SCE has a sell pending to AES and Pinnacle West Energy to sell SCE's 
share of Four Corners and Palo Verde Nuclear for $550 million and Mohave for 
$533 million for a total of $1.1 billion.

Q.  Is this the market value that SCE assumes for these plants and basis its 
proposal to retain the going forward net market revenues until the closing of 
the sell of these plants?

A.  Yes

Q.  What is the net overcollection as of November 30, 2001 in SCE's PX 
Revenue Memorandum Account for its fossil plants?

A.  $670 million

Q.  What has been the difference between Palo Verde Incremental Cost and 
market revenues recorded in the TCBA through November 2000?

A.  $240 million

Q.  How much capacity is SCE entitled to from Palo Verde and Four Corners?

A.  590 MW for Palo Verde and 710 MW for Four Corners?

Q.  Assuming an 80% capacity factor for 1300 MW of capacity for 2001, a 
market price of $180 for 2001 and operating costs of $30, does this result in 
net operating revenues of $1.4 billion for 2001?

A.  Yes

Q.  Would you agree there is more value in 2002 and beyond?

A.  Yes

Q.  Is it true under your proposal, such value would accrue to SCE's 
shareholders until the sell of the plant closes, when such value and all 
future will be transfered to the purchaser of the plant?

A. Yes

Q. What is the overcollection in the Hydro Generation Memo Account through 
November 30, 2000?

A. $531 million

Q.  What is SCE's current market value of its hydro generation?

A. shy of $1 billion

Q.  Does SCE anticipate an overcollection in 2001?

A.  Answer should be yes if 2000 is any indication

Q.  What ratemaking treatment does SCE propose for hydro overcollections in 
2001?

A.  Pursuant to the settlement, overcollections and undercollections are 
netted over a three year period.

Q.  Are you saying that any overcollected amounts in 2001, 2002, and 2003, 
will not be returned to ratepayers for three years upon ending the rate 
freeze and implementing the proposed settlement?

A.  Yes

Q.  If we assume that SCE's hydro assets generate 4 million mWHs in 2001 at a 
margin of $150 per mWH, would this roughly equal $600 million overcollection 
in one year?

A.  Yes, if you do not take into account the rate base impact.  

Q.  What is the market value SCE has assessed for SONGS?

A.  SCE has not assessed a market value for SONGS?

Q.  What will be the net book value of SONGS upon completion of CTC recovery 
and the end of the rate freeze?

A.  Zero

Q.  Approximately how much energy is SCE entitled to from SONGS?

A. Over 12 million mWH

Q.  If we assume 12 million mWhs in 2001 at a net profit of $150 per mWh, 
doesn't this roughly translate to a value of $1.8 billion for 2001?

A.  Yes

Q.  Would you expect more value for 2002 and beyond?

A.  Yes

Today's hearing was dominated by :
1) many lawyers arguing over whether the Commission must declare that the 
"rate freeze" is over before raising rates, or whether the Commission can 
rely on its general constitutional and statutory authority to raise rates on 
an interim basis, without addressing the issue of the rate freeze, and, 
1) an appearance by Ralph Nader.

The Legal Issue
In general, our proposal seems to have gotten some traction.  Whether it 
sticks remains to be seen, however.  We proposed that:

The Commission has the authority to raise rates without addressing the rate 
freeze issue.
The Commission will not have the facts it needs, and it won't have  provided 
the due process necessary by Jan 4th, to address all the complex issues tied 
to the rate freeze.  And if it tries, it's likely to face a flurry of law 
suits, which is in no one's best interest.
For it's Jan 4th decision, the Commission should confine itself to 
determining whether, and if so by how much, to raise rates to maintain the 
utilities' access to capital markets. (We've taken no position on whether 
there's a need to raise rates.)
setting a hearing schedule to examine the "rate freeze" and all related 
issues thoroughly and methodically.

The utilities argued that the Commission must declare an end to the rate 
freeze; otherwise any Commission decision to raise rates would be easy to 
attack in the courts.  (In reality, the utilities want the Commission to end 
the rate freeze in order to assure lenders that the Commission will permit 
the utilities to recover going-forward procurement costs.  Under the rate 
freeze, the utility is at risk for procurement costs that exceed the rate 
freeze.)

In his presentation, our outside counsel offered numerous citations to past 
Commission decision and court cases supporting the Commission's ability to 
raise rates if it found it necessary to do so.  Many other parties agreed 
with our position.  A few parties said that the issue was too murky to make a 
call.  During questioning, both the President of the Commission (Loretta 
Lynch) and the presiding judge seemed to indicate that they believe the 
Commission has ample authority to raise rates without having to address the 
rate freeze issues. 

The Ralph Factor
Apparently, having lost the Presidential election, Ralph Nader's still 
looking for work.  He showed up at the hearings today and held a very lengthy 
news conference.  From what I could hear, he targeted all of his criticism at 
the utilities for being greedy, and at the Governor for being too ready and 
willing to bail the utilities out.  Even when thrown some soft balls about 
"out of state generators," Nader stuck to bashing the Governor and the 
utilities.  But I couldn't hear the entire press conference, so he may have 
said things that I missed.

The Next Steps
The hearings that were scheduled to end today will now go into next week. 
Tomorrow, the utilities are scheduled to make their case for financial 
hardship.  Customers intend to question the utilities very aggressively (as 
does the PUC).  The utilities will also have the chance to question the 
consumer representatives who filed their own proposals and analysis with the 
Commission.
On Tuesday, the Commission is likely to take up the issue of how big any rate 
increase needs to be and how much of the increase each customer group should 
shoulder. 

More tomorrow on the call.

Best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	12/27/2000 08:57 PM
		
Thanks Roger.  Here are the highlights of today's hearings:

 Common themes--many tracked ours pretty closely
Not a question of whether rates need to rise, but by how much.
Though some oppose any and all rate increases, the lion's share acknowledged 
that the utilities have a cash flow problem and the a rate increase is 
necessary.
Due process matters. 
If the Commission is thinking about going as far as ending rate freezes and 
increasing rates, it better provide for ample due process, or countless law 
suits will ensue.
Don't jump the gun.  
A rate increase is likely, but only the utilities benefit from adoption of 
the utilities' proposals. The Commission needs to carefully scrutinize the 
utilities' claims and take a careful look at the level of increase required 
to maintain access to capital markets.  However, as expected, the utilities 
implored the Commission to jump the gun immediately.  The utilities want the 
Commission to declare an end to the rate freeze and raise rates on Jan.4.
No more divestiture.  
The utility should keep the generating assets it retained, but the Commission 
should ensure that the assets' benefits are allocated equally among all 
customers.  One legislator recommended that the State buy the utilities' 
hydro assets, which would give the utilities the cash they need and give the 
state control over some generation.
Treat all customers equally and fairly.
The Commission should not create two classes of customers (e.g., large v. 
small; direct access v. bundled).  No customer group should be sacrificied to 
save another.
Be as narrow as possible/do as little harm as possible
The immediate problem is the utility's cash/credit crunch.  As such, the 
Commission should do only enough to solve this very specific, immediate 
problem.  A modest rate increase is all that's required and the Commission 
should do no more.

At the beginning and the end of the hearing, the President of the Commission 
asked parties to be prepared (at tomorrow's hearing) to discuss whether the 
Commission could legally use its other, broad powers to raise rates without 
declaring an end to the rate freeze.  It seems that she seems some benefit in 
raising rates, but leaving AB 1890 otherwise intact untill the Commission can 

Marketers and generators are to blame for the problem
Though not universally embraced, the theme came up repeatedly. 

A few parties (e.g., the Unions, low income consumer groups, one PUC 
commissioner) called for complete re-regulation of the industry, returning 
the utilities to vertically integrated monopolies.  But they were the 
exception rather than the rule at today's hearing.

2. Next steps
There hearings were scheduled to end on Thursay, but now will continue 
through Friday.
Tomorrow, lawyers will provide "oral" arguments on whether the Commission 
must end the rate freeze in order to increase rates.  We will argue that it 
does not have to, and should not, go through the complex and controversial 
exercise of determing whether the rate freeze is over between now and 
01.04.01.  We will argue that the Commission has the authority to raise rates 
without ending the rate freeze, and if it decides to raise rates, it should 
do so while keeping AB 1890's basic structure in place until a full and fair 
hearing of the issues is completed.   We are talking to other stakeholders to 
persuade them to take the same approach.  In terms of legal arguments, this 
is clearly a long shot, but one that seems worth taking.
After the oral argument, the utilities will present their rate proposals and 
"all interested persons" will have the opportunity to cross-examine the 
utilities (in short, tomorrow will also be a zoo).
When asked what the process will be for issuing a proposed decision and 
providing comments, the President of the Commission responded "we don't know, 
it's evolving."  In other words, the Commission is doing a poor job of 
ensuring that their Jan 4 decision is "appeal-proof."
Keep in mind that the situation remains extremely fluid and the trend is 
still toward ending the rate freeze on Jan. 4th.  We continue to aggressively 
offer alternatives to that possibility and continue to try to bring other 
stakeholders to our side.
We're doing everything necessary to preserve our appeal rights.

We can discuss further on the 10 AM (CST) call tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

	Roger Yang@EES
	12/27/2000 05:43 PM
		
Got an update from Jeff Dasovich.  No earth shattering news.  Comments have 
been all over the place.  The impression is being made by differing parties 
that the issues are very complex and would inevitably result in endless 
lawsuits.  Possible conclusion by the CPUC may be to invoke emergency powers 
to implement an emergency surcharge and avoid addressing the issue of when 
the rate freeze ends in these hearings.  However, this is just speculation.  
Jeff will return to the office by 5:00 pm PST and will send out a summary of 
today's hearings.

Roger
  

Leticia Botello
12/27/2000 06:57 AM
12/27/00

Time    Location Call In #  Pass Code

10:00 Central Standard Time  EB 2868  1-800-713-8600  80435

This is a recurring daily meeting until further notice  (this invitation will 
schedule your calendar through 1/31/01).

Time, Call In #, and Pass Code are the same for all meetings.  Conference 
room location will be changed as soon as possible to better accommodate the 
participants.  

Note:  Optional Invitees FYI Only

Please call me if you have any questions 

Leticia

x-58752

All:

Please see attached materials from Steve Kean.  Ken Lay and Steve Kean met 
yesterday with the Governor of California and his policy director to discuss 
solutions to California's energy problems. The meeting was very 
constructive.  Ken Lay and Steve offered some of Enron's proposed solutions 
and the Governor discussed the options he's considering.  We've been asked to 
provide--by Tuesday--feedback on his proposals.  The turn-around time is 
tight, particularly in light of the holiday.  We'll need your feedback by COB 
Monday.  If at all possible, if folks can group their feedback, comments and 
suggestions and foward them along to me, that would be very helpful.  If 
there is anyone else that you think ought to receive this information, please 
forward along.  Thanks very much for you help.

Best,
Jeff
	Steven J Kean
	12/28/2000 09:19 PM
		 
We met with Gov Davis on Thursday evening in LA.  In attendance were Ken Lay, 
the Governor, the Governor's staff director (Kari Dohn) and myself.  The gov. 
spent over an hour and a half with us covering our suggestions and his 
ideas.  He would like some additional thoughts from us by Tuesday of next 
week as he prepares his state of the state address for the following Monday.  
Attached to the end of this memo is a list of solutions we proposed (based on 
my discussions with several of you) as well as some background materials Jeff 
Dasovich and I prepared.  Below are my notes from the meeting regarding our 
proposals, the governor's ideas, as well as my overview of the situation 
based on the governor's comments:

Overview:   We made great progress in both ensuring that he understands that 
we are different from the generators and in opening a channel for ongoing 
communication with his administration. The gov does not want the utilities to 
go bankrupt and seems predisposed to both rate relief (more modest than what 
the utilities are looking for) and credit guarantees.  His staff has more 
work to do on the latter, but he was clearly intrigued with the idea.  He 
talked mainly in terms of raising rates but not uncapping them at the retail 
level.  He also wants to use what generation he has control over for the 
benefit of California consumers, including utility-owned generation (which he 
would dedicate to consumers on a cost-plus basis) and excess muni power 
(which he estimates at 3000MW).  He foresees a mix of market oriented 
solutions as well as interventionist solutions which will allow him to fix 
the problem by '02 and provide some political cover.
Our proposals:  I have attached the outline we put in front of him (it also 
included the forward price information several of you provided).  He seemed 
interested in 1) the buy down of significant demand, 2) the state setting a 
goal of x000 MW of new generation by a date certain, 3) getting the utilities 
to gradually buy more power forward and 4) setting up a group of rate 
analysts and other "nonadvocates" to develop solutions to a number of issues 
including designing the portfolio and forward purchase terms for utilities.  
He was also quite interested in examining the incentives surrounding LDC gas 
purchases.   As already mentioned, he was also favorably disposed to finding 
some state sponsored credit support for the utilities.
His ideas:  The gov read from a list of ideas some of which were obviously 
under serious consideration and some of which were mere "brainstorming".  
Some of these ideas would require legislative action.
State may build (or make build/transfer arrangements) a "couple" of 
generation plants.  The gov feels strongly that he has to show consumers that 
they are getting something in return for bearing some rate increases.  This 
was a frequently recurring theme.
Utilities would sell the output from generation they still own on a cost-plus 
basis to consumers.
Municipal utilties would be required to sell their excess generation in 
California.
State universities (including UC/CSU and the community colleges) would more 
widely deploy distributed generation.
Expand in-state gas production.
Take state lands gas royalties in kind.
negotiate directly with tribes and state governments in the west for 
addtional gas supplies.
Empower an existing state agency to approve/coordinate power plant 
maintenance schedules to avoid having too much generation out of service at 
any one time.
Condition emissions offsets on commitments to sell power longer term in state.
Either eliminate the ISO or sharply curtail its function -- he wants to hear 
more about how Nordpool works(Jeff- someone in Schroeder's group should be 
able to help out here).
Wants to condition new generation on a commitment to sell in state.  We made 
some headway with the idea that he could instead require utilities to buy 
some portion of their forward requirements from new in-state generation 
thereby accomplishing the same thing without using a command and control 
approach with generators.
Securitize uncollected power purchase costs.
To dos: (Jeff, again I'd like to prevail on you to assemble the group's 
thoughts and get them to Kari)
He wants to see 5 year fixed power prices for peak/ off-peak and baseload -- 
not just the 5 one year strips.
He wants comments on his proposals by Tuesday.
He would like thoughts on how to pitch what consumers are getting out of the 
deal.
He wants to assemble a group of energy gurus to help sort through some of the 
forward contracting issues.
Thanks to everyone for their help.  We made some progress today.

Thanks.

	Frank W Vickers@ECT
	12/29/2000 12:46 PM
		 
Jeff, we need to add some discussion focused on QF issues in California and 
how resolution to certain items would enhance QF ownership and provide the 
utilities with optimal performance of the QF's and perhaps encourage new 
capacity development at existing QF locations.

The utilities should be motivated to enter into buyout, buydown, blend and 
extend, negotiate fixed energy prices and other restructuring transactions 
with the QF's.
The utilites have the ability to hedge the floating price currently being 
paid to the QF's.  They should be motivated to look into these structures.
Utilities should provide some clarification to the energy prices under QF 
PPA's.  There is alot of risks around SRAC and PX that affect both the 
utilities and the QF owners.  It seems like resolution to that risk is 
beneficial to both the utility as well as the QF.
QF's should have the ability to move excess capacity and energy into either 
the market and/or to the utility.  That  would create additional economic 
incentives for the QF's to run and perhaps increase their capacity.

Frank

The Hearings
The hearings have transitioned to the more traditional, courtroom-like 
environment, with lawyers engaged in detailed cross-examination of utility 
witnesses.
The hearing focused solely on the utility claims of financial hardship.
The hearings went from 9AM-5PM and only managed to make it through two PG&E 
witnesses--extensive, detailed questions on PG&E's cash management practices 
since restructuring started in 1998.
Questions to witnesses focused in particular on PG&E's use of cash for 
investment and financing activities over the past 2-3 years (e.g., 
dividend/stock repurchase activities, transfer of cash from IOU to parent and 
parent's use of that cash for investment activities).  
Questions also focused on options other than rate increases available to the 
utility (e.g., liquidate certain assets of unregulated biz units, loans from 
parent, bankruptcy).
The commissioners and the ALJ have reacted in extremely hostile manner toward 
PG&E's repeated attempts to amend and add to their proposal as the hearings 
progress.
Questioning of PG&E witnesses will continue at 10 AM on Tuesday, followed by 
Edison witness.
Unclear when the hearings will end, though the Commission is scheduled to 
issue its decision on Thursday.
At this point, it seems very unlikely that the Commission will have developed 
the record necessary to do anything other than raise rates under its general 
ratemaking authority.

Outside the Hearing
Intense negotiations between Governor's office and utility management 
continue.
Seems that the Commission/Administration is beating up on the utilities 
inside the hearing room in an attempt to soften the utilities up and gain 
some leverage in the negotiations taking place outside the hearing room.
Governor continues to try to bring consumer groups into the negotiations with 
utilities, but consumer groups continue to resist and continue to oppose any 
rate increases.
Governor seems to be attempting to set up a situation where the Commission 
absorbs the political heat for raising rates on the 4th, and the Governor 
follows-up with a more comprehensive set of proposals as part of his state of 
the state speech on the 8th.

Thanks for the articles.  Well, not quite in PJs, but yes, working from home, 
which is some consolation.  PG&E has said that a signficant share of gas 
suppliers have stopped transacting with PG&E due to credit risk.  Our 
exposure to PG&E is huge (both EES and ENA), so I wouldn't be surprised if 
we've stopped transacting with them until the Commission comes out with its 
decision on the 4th and we see how the ratings agencies respond.  I can find 
out first thing Tuesday morning.

And a very happy and safe new year to you, too.

Best,
Jeff

	Karen Denne
	12/30/2000 04:34 PM
		 
So are you in your PJs working at your computer at home?  Just teasing!  
Thought you'd be interested in these LA Times articles.  FYI, I got two calls 
yesterday (Dow Jones and Bloomberg) about us refusing to sell gas to PG&E -- 
all the traders were gone, so I couldn't get an answer and Steve didn't 
know.  Let me know if you hear anything.

Happy New Year!
:-) kd

http://www.latimes.com/business/reports/power/lat_power001230.htm

http://www.latimes.com/business/reports/power/lat_bryson001230.htm

http://www.latimes.com/business/reports/power/lat_gas001230.htm

Well, I was clearly too ambitious in setting out the schedule.  My 
apologies.  I managed to trudge through the reading and the document last 
night, but didn't not get to answering the question.  I appears that this 
will be a busy weekend.  I've a feeling that I won't get my proposed answer 
to folks until Saturday afternoon for your review.  If that poses a problem 
for anyone, please let me know.  I still intend to be the compiler of wisdom, 
so folks should feel free to distribute when they've got something drafted.

Best,
Jeff

Steve:  I'm going to give you a call.  Few things:
Got your message.  As you'll see from the document, I likely spent too much 
time over the weekend on the "what's in it for consumers" messages.  Since it 
was one of the the "to do" items, I figured that it should get some emphasis, 
but sounds like that may not be the case.
I've proposed a template for how to provide feedback on the Gov's specific 
proposals, using direct investment in power plants by the state as the 
illustrative example.  Let me know if you think it works.  I have ideas on 
each, but thought it better to await feedback from the commercial folks 
before filling out our comments in each area.
I'm finishing up a bit more detailed proposal for how the Gov might use 
"energy gurus" to help on the portfolio/procurment issues, and am also 
offering additional detail on the need for a "rate summit."
Got messages in to Schroeder re: Nordpool--expect to hear back from him today 
at some point and I can drop that info into the document soon as I get it.
Will talk to EES at 10 AM CST to discuss their proposals.  If you'd like to 
join that call, let me know and I'll forward along the call-in number, which 
I think you may already have in your email.
Have received a few comments from ENA that I'll incorporate.

Best,
Jeff

Yes, have talked to both Stoness and Sunde about it.  Thanks.

	Steven J Kean
	01/02/2001 07:15 AM
		 
Scott sent this to Marty, but I assume you already have had communications 
with him about this.
	Marty Sunde@EES
	12/28/2000 07:05 PM
		 
In case you didn't see.
Scott Stoness
12/27/2000 01:50 PM
Marty.  This is a summary of our message from this morning for you to send on 
or discuss with Keene.  I hope this is helpful.  Scott

What's important
Give solvency to the utilities by guaranteeing no banckruptcy against the 
generation assets of the utilities.  Guarantees to be recovered, if needed, 
through surcharges over 10 years.  This should give the process time for 
thoughtful solutions.  Ending the rate freeze now will give the utilities an 
undeserved windfall (3.5b alone related to nuclear assets in year 2001).
There should be thoughtful process to determine: i) how to keep deregulation 
going, ii) how existing generation assets should be used, iii) what are the 
value of existing assets, iv) when is the appropriate time for customers to 
be exposed to the market, and v) what kind of market structure would be 
appropriate going forward. 
Customers should not be dumped into the market, now or in the next year, 
while it is extremely illiquid due to many errors of the utilities.
There should not be retroactive rate making (the negative ctc should be paid 
until at least the rate freeze is ended)
All customers should be treated equally with respect to existing generation 
assets that they paid for for the past 4-30 years.
There should be a special hearing called to debate demand side prospects (ie. 
curtailment etc.)

The Governor cancelled the meeting at the last minute.  Apparently, he was 
trying to schedule a meeting with Clinton and our meeting conflicted, so we 
were bumped.  We are trying to set a new time.  I will share with the 
Governor's energy advisor the information and recommendations all of you 
helped put together.  Thanks

Another Utility Bailout Should Leave Us Cold 
George Miller
Sunday, December 31, 2000 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle 
URL: 
http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/chronicle/archive/2000/12/31/E
D134916.DTL 
OUR CURRENT energy problems are urgent and serious. But before the governor 
and the Public Utilities Commission cut yet another deal costing consumers 
billions of dollars, perhaps they should pause to ask the public what kind of 
system it wants and what it will end up with after investing billions more. 
Failure of energy deregulation could speed real deregulation that might 
benefit consumers with real capacity and real competition. But this will not 
happen if the focus is only on California utilities and their shareholders. 
The original deregulation deal was designed, as I see it, to keep competition 
out of California -- and to maximize the rates consumers would pay for every 
bad past business decision by PG&E and other California utilities. 
Similarly, current bailout discussions are about forcing California 
ratepayers to pay for the failed deregulation plan designed by the utilities 
themselves. Once again, the companies seek to maximize profits and socialize 
the losses. 
Following on the heels of California's deregulation, the state's utilities 
came to the congressional delegation and urged us to protect the plan from 
federal deregulation efforts. They argued that the deal they cut was good for 
all parties. Their executives repeated time and again that they might benefit 
from the plan's cap on consumer prices -- and that there was a risk to them 
if wholesale prices were to go up. 
This, they told us, is the marketplace. They were willing to absorb the risk. 
This was the brave new world of free markets. 
But markets are never free. From the beginning, this deregulation plan was 
designed to buy the California utilities time and advantage. Initially, 
consumers saw lower rates, but not as low as real competition might have 
provided when compared to the heavily sheltered market of the past five 
years. Now, because this rigged marketplace has failed, the utilities want 
again to put their hands into the ratepayers' pockets. 
At first, PG&E and Southern California Edison asked the Public Utilities 
Commission to have California consumers pay the entire cost of deregulation's 
risks. Their idea did not pass the smell or the laugh test. 
Now the utilities look for a way to repackage their old proposal, including a 
substantial rate increase. The rationale is that the utilities may collapse 
financially. This threat is supposed to inspire Gov. Gray Davis and the PUC 
to quickly put the ratepayer on the hook for the utilities' failures. 
During the past year, dozens of utilities have merged all across America. 
PG&E, for example, may not be worth much to its shareholders, but like AT&T, 
it may be worth something to its competitors. This is the genius of the 
American marketplace. 
PG&E shareholders bought the stock, assuming the risk. Why should the 
ratepayers be asked to insulate them from that risk? During this past year, 
tens of billions of dollars of market capitalization were lost by various 
Silicon Valley high-tech firms. Their shareholders do not get the benefit of 
going to the PUC and getting a taxpayer bailout. 
The ratepayer has already paid for this energy under a contract that 
utilities struck with the people of the state of California. Any additional 
payment by the ratepayer is a financial bailout. Any prudent investor would 
ask what the return will be before handing over billions of dollars. The 
ratepayer deserves an answer, as well as some equity or other consideration. 
George Miller is a Democratic congressman from Martinez. 

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/02/2001 09:30 AM
		 
Steve:  I'm going to give you a call.  Few things:
Got your message.  As you'll see from the document, I likely spent too much 
time over the weekend on the "what's in it for consumers" messages.  Since it 
was one of the the "to do" items, I figured that it should get some emphasis, 
but sounds like that may not be the case.
I've proposed a template for how to provide feedback on the Gov's specific 
proposals, using direct investment in power plants by the state as the 
illustrative example.  Let me know if you think it works.  I have ideas on 
each, but thought it better to await feedback from the commercial folks 
before filling out our comments in each area.
I'm finishing up a bit more detailed proposal for how the Gov might use 
"energy gurus" to help on the portfolio/procurment issues, and am also 
offering additional detail on the need for a "rate summit."
Got messages in to Schroeder re: Nordpool--expect to hear back from him today 
at some point and I can drop that info into the document soon as I get it.
Will talk to EES at 10 AM CST to discuss their proposals.  If you'd like to 
join that call, let me know and I'll forward along the call-in number, which 
I think you may already have in your email.
Have received a few comments from ENA that I'll incorporate.

Best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/02/2001 09:30 AM
		 
Steve:  I'm going to give you a call.  Few things:
I've proposed a template for how to provide feedback on the Gov's specific 
proposals, using direct investment in power plants by the state as the 
illustrative example.  Let me know if you think it works.  I have ideas on 
each, but thought it better to await feedback from the commercial folks 
before filling out our comments in each area.
I'm finishing up a bit more detailed proposal for how the Gov might use 
"energy gurus" to help on the portfolio/procurment issues, and am also 
offering additional detail on the need for a "rate summit."
Got messages in to Schroeder re: Nordpool--expect to hear back from him today 
at some point and I can drop that info into the document soon as I get it.
Will talk to EES at 10 AM CST to discuss their proposals.  If you'd like to 
join that call, let me know and I'll forward along the call-in number, which 
I think you may already have in your email.
Have received a few comments from ENA that I'll incorporate.

Best,
Jeff

	Rosalinda Tijerina@EES
	01/02/2001 11:00 AM
		 
A meeting has been set up for today to discuss the presentation to Governor 
Davis.

This meeting was called by Scott Stoness.

Time:  1:00P Central Standard Time

Location: EB-791 

Call In #: 1-800-713-8600 

Pass Code: 68266

Please call me if you have any questions.

Rosalinda Tijerina
x-39348

Thanks.  I was literally just about to call the Portland desk.  You saved me 
the trouble.  Did they say whether they have any plans to cut PG&E off (from 
gas sales) in the near future?

	Karen Denne
	01/02/2001 11:26 AM
		 
FYI, Mark just walked down to the trading floor, and we have not stopped 
selling to PG&E.  Apparently, the ISO put out another list and we're on it. kd

Thanks.  Was aware of the power/gas split, but FYI, Chris Foster on the 
Portland desk is a great source of information--Midmarket electricity trader 
and a very straightforward guy.

	Karen Denne
	01/02/2001 11:40 AM
		
Apparently their credit limit has not been reached.  They haven't been doing 
any deals, but because PG&E hasn't been online.  I didn't realize that the 
Portland office only does power sales.  Gas desk is in Houston.  I'll let you 
know if I find out anything more.

Thanks.  I was literally just about to call the Portland desk.  You saved me 
the trouble.  Did they say whether they have any plans to cut PG&E off (from 
gas sales) in the near future?

	Karen Denne
	01/02/2001 11:26 AM
		 
FYI, Mark just walked down to the trading floor, and we have not stopped 
selling to PG&E.  Apparently, the ISO put out another list and we're on it. kd

It could certainly use some doctoring, but it's getting there. I'm now 
shifting my focus to the "informal advisory group" on procurement.

In office all week.

My apologies, but as you can imagine, California's little crisis has me a bit 
preoccupied.  Would love to know what comes out of the meeting, though.

Best,
Jeff

Lamentably, I worked all week--no vacation time.  Thanks.

	Joseph Alamo
	01/02/2001 01:41 PM
		 
Sandi & Jeff,

I need to check with you both for "correct" Timekeeping concerns that I had 
input your hours correctly for last
week; that is, whether either of you ended up taking any time off last week.  
[Before I left, I had put you both 
down under "Work" hours for Wednesday through Friday (12/27 - 12/29).]

Please let me know today if I need to "adjust" any of your hours as 
referenced above.

Thanks!

Joseph
 

Thanks again for a truly fun New Year's.  I had a great time, and it was fun 
spending it with you two.  When I think of all that talent, together in one 
house---astounding!  Really fun.  Thanks.

you're a regular laugh riot

Greetings:

Attached is the draft.  I've attempted to capture everyone's comments.  The 
only piece that is not likely to go this evening is the piece providing 
comments on the Governor's specific proposals.  That will likely go first 
thing tomorrow morning.  You'll note that only one of the Governor's 
proposals currently has any comments attached to it.  Comments on the 
Governor's proposals are appreciated.  The remainder of the materials will go 
to the Governor's staff later this evening; so any and all comments on those 
portions are welcomed and appreciated.  Thanks to all for the assistance, 
particularly in light of the holiday.

Best,
Jeff

muchos gracias

are you not getting the stuff.  is there another paul smith?

I haven't forgotten the QF issues.  Going to weave them into our comments on 
the Governor's proposals.

Thanks for the input.

Scott:
Thanks very much for the comments.  On the demand buy-down, I should have 
mentioned that I got a late call from the Gov's office asking for more detail 
on that proposal, which we'll likely forward along tomorrow morning, with the 
comments on the Gov's proposals.  Will try to work the other comments in.  
Thanks again.

Best,
Jeff

	Scott Stoness@EES
	01/02/2001 06:30 PM
		 
2nd Comments:

 We are missing in Increasing Supply section
running of existing older generation combined with mitigating reductions in 
emissions.  
missing Concrete suggestions: 
California Energy Commission sponsored process to determine and implement 
actions that will:
result in 10,000 MW of new energy efficient generation being built within 
California within 2002; and 
running of existing older generation combined with mitigating reductions in 
emissions

 We are missing in decreasing load section
missing concrete suggestions: 
The California Public Utility Commission, will immediately seek bids, in the 
form of rate changes and regulatory commitments that would result in 2,000 MW 
of reduced on peak load by June 1, 2001
The California Public Utility Commission, will immediately seek bids, in the 
form of rate changes and regulatory commitments that would result in 5,000 MW 
of reduced overall load by January 1, 2002.

Scott Stoness
01/02/2001 06:18 PM
1st Comments from Scott

We are missing:

Positive spin at front
Governor Davis is committed to solving the California energy crisis by:
Developing consumer driven solutions
Protecting customers from short term market aberrations
Continuing to expand the consumers ability to choose
We are missing thoughtful Orderly Process
Maintain 1890 in interim
All customers treated the same
Would replace "maintain a reliable distribution network" with "assure 
investment community"
Assurances around forward purchases
Assurances around prudent purchases to keep lights
Assurances, if needed through increases, via tax refundable.
Maintain AB1890 until orderly process arrives with better solution
Would drop specifics arount rate increase. 

More to come......

Likewise.  Hope I'm not being to much of a pain on the calls.   Just that 
Enron---I'm quite certain---won't lend it's name to anything that's less than 
stellar.  And I'm sure GSPP would like for the conference to be all that it 
can be, too.  How'd things go in Portland?

Best,
Jeff

gramlr@pjm.com on 08/29/2000 07:12:41 AM
I got the message but not til today because our e-mail was down.  It was good 
to
talk to you last night.

I understand that we may have no choice in the matter, but 

having wtinessed Loretta Lynch's inability to define market power when asked 
to do so by Joe Barton last Monday, and, 
having heard Carl Wood declare war on capitalism at FERC's hearing on 
Tuesday, and, 
knowing that the likes of Harvey Morse (PUC FERC attorney), who has never 
come down on the side of "no market power here" in any analysis, is "heading 
up" the PUC investigation, and
seeing Gov Davis' press releases demanding refunds from the faceless, 
out-of-state suppliers

I'm, well, maybe a little nervous about them getting their paws on our data. 

Jeff

let me know if you get it this time.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/02/2001 05:28 PM
		
Greetings:

Attached is the draft.  I've attempted to capture everyone's comments.  The 
only piece that is not likely to go this evening is the piece providing 
comments on the Governor's specific proposals.  That will likely go first 
thing tomorrow morning.  You'll note that only one of the Governor's 
proposals currently has any comments attached to it.  Comments on the 
Governor's proposals are appreciated.  The remainder of the materials will go 
to the Governor's staff later this evening; so any and all comments on those 
portions are welcomed and appreciated.  Thanks to all for the assistance, 
particularly in light of the holiday.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks.  I think it makes sense to take out the reference to 15%.  It think 
the rest of it passes the "front page of the New York Times test," as the PR 
folks say.  Thanks again for your help on this.

Best,
Jeff

	kcsmith <kcsmith@gateway.net>
	01/02/2001 07:32 PM
		 
Jeff--looks good.

Is there any concern about our putting some of these thoughts in writing
and what might happen if that writing becomes public?  For instance, we
appear to advocate or at least agree with a 15% rate increase.  What
happens if that becomes public?  I will trust your and the PR group's
analysis of that issue--I just throw it out for consideration.  MDS

Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com wrote:
> 
> let me know if you get it this time.

Greetings Kari:

Attached is follow-up information from the meeting that the Governor and you 
had with Ken Lay and Steve Kean last Thursday.  Tomorrow morning I will email 
three additional pieces of information:

Our specific comments on the proposals that the Governor raised at the 
meeting.
More details on the "demand buy-down" concept.
Information on Norway's version of the ISO, "Nord Pool."

If there's anything you need, don't hesitate to contact me at 415.782.7822.

Happy New Year.

Best,
Jeff

At least there's some consistency in the world.....

	Susan J Mara
	01/02/2001 11:04 PM
		 
This was rich.
	Sandra McCubbin
	01/02/2001 09:03 AM
		
George Miller's son is a partner of Bev Hansen's, one of our lobbyists in 
Sacramento.

puh-leeze....

	Susan J Mara
	01/02/2001 10:32 PM
		
Yes, I will let you know.  Mona was the one who agreed to this for ARM, so I 
thought she mentioned it to you.

	Sandra McCubbin
	01/02/2001 11:12 AM
		
if any of the associations are meeting with legislators, could we talk about 
it before hand to see if we want to have someone there?  The Latino Caucus is 
very important, and we have our own relationship with them..we want to make 
sure that they receive consistant messages

how's the memo coming?

	Jeremy Meier <jermeier@earthlink.net>
	01/02/2001 11:56 AM
		 
Jeff:

Got your voice mail this weekend, and Steve wanted to add a couple short
items to our ICA analysis memo before sending it to you.  We should have
it to you today (soon).

Hope the New Year looks bright -

Jeremy Meier
Blumenfeld & Cohen

This is material that I received re: Nord Pool from Davies (one of 
Schroeder's guys).  If you want to take a wack at putting together a few 
bullets on what Nord Pool is, how it differs from Cal model and why it's 
preferable, that would help me immensely and free me up to focus on 1) 
comments to Gov's proposal and 2) more detail on demand buy-down.  That 
possible?  Let me know.  Greatly appreciated.

Best,
Jeff
	Philip Davies@ECT
	01/02/2001 10:46 AM
		 
Jeff,

A couple of presentations attached which give you some quick info comparing 
the Nordic market to others, notably UK.  The first is a presentation 
prepared for our Mexcian colleagues 18 months ago, drawing out key features 
and success factors in selected liberalised markets, including Nord Pool.  
The second overlaps a little with the first in terms of Nordic content and 
compares the NP arrangements to the existing and proposed new UK 
arrangements.  This one is over 2 years old now.  I would urge caution in 
using both of them to the extent that they are (particularly the latter) a 
little dated now.

One very good non-Enron comparative source (although again not completely up 
to date), (sorted by market design issue rather than by market but including 
plenty on Nord Pool) can be found at http://www.ofgem.gov.uk/elarch/aback.htm
.    Open the document dated Feb 98, comparing trading arrangements in "other 
countries" (than UK).   This was prepared by the regulator in the early phase 
of the redesign of the UK market.

Let us know if you need more help.

Regards
Philip Davies

Joseph: please forward this to Scott Govenar and let him know that it's 
confidential and that some additional information will be going to the 
Govenor this morning, which I'll forward along when it's ready.  Thanks very 
much.

Best,
Jeff

The Commission closed the hearings last night at 7 PM.
The Commission refused all attempts by the utilities'--and there were 
several--to get information on "ending the rate freeze" into the hearing 
record.
The Commission is attempting to get a draft decision out at 10 AM today (PST).
If it gets out, there will be oral argument at 12:30 today (PST), with final 
decision issued tomorrow at the Commission's regularly scheduled business 
meeting.
If it does not get out, there will be no oral argument, and the Commission 
will issue its final decision tomorrow at its regularly scheduled business 
meeting.
Anything could happen but it appears at this point that the decision will 
only address the need for a rate increase (rumors flyling furiously regarding 
how high the increase will be), with "rate freeze" issues put off for another 
day in the near future.
Yesterday, the Governor of California joined Edison's suit against FERC 
calling for region-wide, hard price caps.

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/03/2001 11:13 AM
		
The Commission closed the hearings last night at 7 PM.
The Commission refused all attempts by the utilities'--and there were 
several--to get information on "ending the rate freeze" into the hearing 
record.
The Commission is attempting to get a draft decision out at 10 AM today (PST).
If it gets out, there will be oral argument at 12:30 today (PST), with final 
decision issued tomorrow at the Commission's regularly scheduled business 
meeting.
If it does not get out, there will be no oral argument, and the Commission 
will issue its final decision tomorrow at its regularly scheduled business 
meeting.
Anything could happen but it appears at this point that the decision will 
only address the need for a rate increase (rumors flyling furiously regarding 
how high the increase will be), with "rate freeze" issues put off for another 
day in the near future.
Yesterday, the Governor of California joined Edison's suit against FERC 
calling for region-wide, hard price caps.

Thanks for the offer Ms Kupiecki, but since you carried so much of the weight 
last case, I feel obliged to compile this time round. 

FYI:  From PUC Website:

The California Public Utilities Commission intends to issue a proposed 
decision in A.00-11-038/A.00-11-056/A.00-10-028? by 11:00 AM (PST) today. The 
Proposed Decision will be e-mailed to the service list and published on the 
Commission's website (http://www.cpuc.ca.gov) simultaneously. 

Here they are.  Please review and provide comments quickly.  I'd like to get 
this off to Kari ASAP.  Thanks.

Jeff

Final oral argument in A.00-11-038/A.00-11-056/A.00-10-028 is scheduled for 
1:00 - 3:30 this afternoon in the Commission's auditorium at 505 Van Ness 
Avenue, San Francisco. ? The Commission will broadcast the final oral 
argument via phone bridge at 877-918-3008, password is 92105. 

I've had to spend a little time negotiating this AM with ENA and EES, but I'm 
confident that they'll be OK with this version.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/03/2001 12:19 PM
		 
Here they are.  Please review and provide comments quickly.  I'd like to get 
this off to Kari ASAP.  Thanks.

Jeff

Shooting to get you the balance of the info by noon.  Glad to hear it's 
useful.  Hang in there.

Best,
Jeff

	Kari Dohn <Kari.Dohn@GOV.CA.GOV>
	01/03/2001 12:43 PM
		 
Jeff, thanks so much!  Don't know how I missed this email last night.
Really appreciate it, and look forward to receiving the remaining material.
The Governor referenced the nordpool last night in a session, so this will
make our research alot easier, at least on that one!!!

Greetings Kari:

Attached is follow-up information from the meeting that the Governor and
you had with Ken Lay and Steve Kean last Thursday.  Tomorrow morning I will
email three additional pieces of information:

   Our specific comments on the proposals that the Governor raised at the
   meeting.
   More details on the "demand buy-down" concept.
   Information on Norway's version of the ISO, "Nord Pool."

If there's anything you need, don't hesitate to contact me at 415.782.7822.

Happy New Year.

Best,
Jeff

(See attached file: Follow up to Gov Davis-Ken Lay meeting0102.doc)

Copy of order to follow.  Here's a quick summary.  Does not look great for 
the utilities.  More to follow.

one cent/kwh charge for all customers--equals 9% for rez, 7% for small biz, 
12% for med commercial, 15% for large commercial and industrial
only in place for 90 days
Adopts TURN proposal for netting undercollection (from rate freeze) against 
overcollection (for CTC)
Hearings begin next Wednesday (01.10.01) to begin address all remaining 
issues (including whether rate freeze has ended and when) and to set up a 
timetable to examine the results of the auditor's report 

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/03/2001 01:13 PM
		
Copy of order to follow.  Here's a quick summary.  Does not look great for 
the utilities.  More to follow.

one cent/kwh charge for all customers--equals 9% for rez, 7% for small biz, 
12% for med commercial, 15% for large commercial and industrial
only in place for 90 days
Adopts TURN proposal for netting undercollection (from rate freeze) against 
overcollection (for CTC)
Hearings begin next Wednesday (01.10.01) to begin address all remaining 
issues (including whether rate freeze has ended and when) and to set up a 
timetable to examine the results of the auditor's report 

Here's a copy of the draft.

 - CPUC01-#86861-v1-A0011038_et_al__Minkin_Agenda_Dec___.doc

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/03/2001 01:20 PM
		
Here's a copy of the draft.

 - CPUC01-#86861-v1-A0011038_et_al__Minkin_Agenda_Dec___.doc

It works!

Thanks.  Kari just wrote me an email expressing great appreciation for the 
materials.  I told her that the rest will follow in the next hour.  You're 
about to get from me the details on the buy-down proposal.

I don't think that the bankers or the capital markets are going to swallow 
what Loretta Lynch issued today.

Will do.  That glitch in his email address has truly been my nemesis 
throughout.

I apologize. I thought that had been taken care of.  I'll take care of it.

If it's any indication, Edison was down 2.75 today.  Not pretty.

you get the 5-year block numbers from Bob?

Hi Sue:

A very happy new year to you.  Mr Kean has had me underwater since last 
Thursday night, but I'll resurface tomorrow, at which time we can catch up on 
a number of things, including bills.  But I wanted to forward along Steve's 
memo that we discussed just prior to Xmas.  Hope you had a great holiday and 
that all is well.

Best,
Jeff
	"Stephen P. Bowen" <stevebowen@earthlink.net>
	01/03/2001 03:17 PM
	Please respond to stevebowen
		 
 - ICA Overview Memo final.doc

	"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
	01/03/2001 02:24 PM
	Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
		 
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

PR01: 02
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
January 3, 2001

  GOVERNOR DAVIS CALLS SPECIAL
LEGISLATIVE SESSION ON ENERGY

SACRAMENTO - Governor Gray Davis today issued a proclamation requiring the
legislature to convene a special session to pass legislation addressing
California's energy crisis.

According to the guidelines of the proclamation, the session will focus on
legislation that:

Affects the availability, consumption, and use of energy;
Governs the finances and organization of the California Independent System
Operator (ISO) and the California Power Exchange (PX);
Addresses the operation, maintenance, and finances of California power
generators and utilities;
Affects the wholesale and retail markets for energy supplies, capacity, and
reliability; and
Protects the health and safety of Californians with respect to
power-generating facilities and transmission facilities.
"In response to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission's (FERC) failure to
meet its obligations, I am taking the extraordinary step of calling the
California Legislature into a concurrent Extraordinary Session to
immediately address the energy situation in our state," said Governor Davis.
"I will call them to do at least the following: Replace the so-called
stakeholders on the ISO Board with Californians who are more concerned about
affordable prices and reliability of power and; re-establish the authority
for the state to inspect private power plants to assure the coordination of
maintenance and operating schedules; and provide low-interest financing for
new peaking facilities or re-powering old ones to make them cleaner and more
efficient in return for committing their power to Californians at guaranteed
low rates."

Governor Davis used his constitutional power to call for the special session
(Section 3(b) Article IV). The session will begin on January 3, 2001. Each
house of the legislature will be responsible for the scheduling of hearings
and the calendar for the session.

Governor Davis called a special session on education in 1999, and the
legislature passed a series of sweeping initiatives to improve academic
performance and accountability.

# # #

> Thank you to those who have responded to the below e-mail.  We are now
aware
> of several companies who have been invited to speak. If you have been
> invited and have not responded to Julee please do so as soon as possible.
>
> In order to ensure a clear, concise, and informative message that will not
> be duplicated by the various speakers IEP will hold a conference call on
> Wednesday, January 3rd at 10:00 a.m. to discuss the meeting.
>
> The call in information is:
> 1-877-322-9654
> The code is:
> 111756
>
> If anyone has any materials they are planning to present or distribute
> please send me a copy so that we can have the information available in our
> upcoming meetings.
>
> Thanks for your attention to this matter and Happy New Year!
>
> Katie Kaplan
> Manager of State Policy Affairs
> Independent Energy Producers Association
> (916) 448-9499
>

Greetings Kari:

Forgive the delay.  Much going on today, PUC draft decision in particular.  
The draft does not look promising for the utilities' financial position.

Attached are our comments on the Governor's Proposals and some more detail on 
the demand-reduction proposal.  We continue to work on the Nord Pool research 
for you and will turn that around as quickly as we can.

Again, don't hesitate to contact me if there's anything else I can help with, 
or if there's anything else that you need. (415.782.7822)

Best,
Jeff

California Electricity Update

in office mon, tues, wed.  perhaps houston thur/fri.

two questions:
1) are we having a staff meeting tomorrow?
2) why the heck aren't you in the bonus meeting?

I forwarded this to you so that you could have a chance to take a peek at it 
before forwarding along to the rest of the group.  If you'd like me to 
forward it along to the larger group, just let me know.

Jeff
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/03/2001 03:28 PM
		 
Hi Sue:

A very happy new year to you.  Mr Kean has had me underwater since last 
Thursday night, but I'll resurface tomorrow, at which time we can catch up on 
a number of things, including bills.  But I wanted to forward along Steve's 
memo that we discussed just prior to Xmas.  Hope you had a great holiday and 
that all is well.

Best,
Jeff
	"Stephen P. Bowen" <stevebowen@earthlink.net>
	01/03/2001 03:17 PM
	Please respond to stevebowen
		 
 - ICA Overview Memo final.doc

It's hard to disagree with the fact that 1) the utilities are the ones that 
cut the deal they're living with and 2) they took all of the "stranded cost" 
money that consumers paid them and invested it in other states and 
countries.  

But you can only buy for 10 cents and sell for 5 cents for so long before 
creditors turn off the spigot.  Difficult to see how the spigot stays on with 
the draft decision issued today.  (See story attached, below.)  

With bankruptcy, the only one making any decisions is the judge, and while 
some see benefits to that, seems to us that from a political, financial and 
commercial perspective, bankruptcy creates many more problems than it solves.

That said, we're extremely sensitive to the politics of rate increases.  But 
if the increases are subject to refund, then decision makers can buy 
themselves some time by erring just slightly to the high side of a rate 
increase, which could fend off the ratings agencies and provide additional 
opportunity over the next 90 days or so to scrutinize the utilities claims 
and come up with comprehensive solutions to the bigger problems.

Well, you got my two cents.  Sorry about that.  

Best,
Jeff
Late afternoon 1/3/01 news:

USA: Calif utility ratings may fall too far on 7-15 pct hike.
By Jonathan Stempel

01/03/2001 
Reuters English News Service 
(C) Reuters Limited 2001. 

NEW YORK, Jan 3 (Reuters) - Bankruptcy may loom and the credit ratings of the 
two largest California electric utilities will likely fall too far if that 
state's Public Utilities Commission awards them an interim rate hike of 7 to 
15 percent, analysts said Wednesday.

In a draft decision on Wednesday, the CPUC proposed an immediate hike of 9 
percent for residential customers of Pacific Gas & Electric Co. and Southern 
California Edison, and hikes of seven to 15 percent for various business 
customers.

The CPUC commission is expected to issue a final decision on Thursday.

"It forces the utilities and their creditors to be limbo dancers, and skilled 
limbo dancers at that," said Shawn Burke, head of U.S. investment-grade 
research at Barclays Capital.

PG&E and SCE had requested respective rate increases of 26 percent and 30 
percent, a hike that would help them avoid imminent bankruptcy.

The utilities have also asked the regulators to remove a freeze on retail 
rates imposed under California's 1996 law that deregulated the state's 
electricity market.

On a day when most stocks roared ahead after the Federal Reserve announced 
surprise interest rate cuts, investors beat down the stocks of Pacific G&E's 
parent, San Francisco-based PG&E Corp. , and SoCal Edison's parent, Edison 
International .

PG&E shares closed Wednesday on the New York Stock Exchange at $17, down 
$2-9/16, or 13.1 percent, while Edison International shares closed at 
$12-1/4, down $2-3/4, or 18.3 percent, on the Big Board.

Bond quotations were not immediately available for the utilities' bonds, 
which in recent weeks have traded like junk.

Pacific G&E and SoCal Edison were banking on a big rate hike to allow them to 
pass on some of their soaring wholesale power costs to consumers.

The utilities, which operate under a rate freeze, have accumulated more than 
$8 billion in unrecovered costs since wholesale power prices started 
skyrocketing last summer amid a worsening electricity shortage in the state. 
They claim they are running out of money due to the price freeze, and have 
billions of dollars of bills coming due in the next six weeks.

Central to their concerns is whether credit rating agencies Moody's Investors 
Service and Standard & Poor's will cut their medium investment grades to junk 
status.

"No one knows for sure, but if we consider the average rate hike is only 
about 10 percent, it will be difficult for the companies to maintain 
investment-grade ratings," said Dorothea Matthews, a fixed-income electric 
utilities analyst for Deutsche Banc Alex. Brown.

The utilities have already been unable to tap short-term capital markets 
because of their precarious financial state.

Downgrades to junk, which the agencies have already threatened, would cement 
the door shut to these markets, and cause the utilities to default on some of 
their loans.

Late Wednesday, PG&E Chief Executive Gordon Smith said the commission's 
proposed hikes could jeopardize his utility's future loans.

Even a downgrade to the lowest investment grades - "Baa3" for long-term debt 
and "Prime-3" for short-term debt from Moody's, and "BBB-minus" and "A3" from 
S&P - would make the going very difficult for the utilities. The reason: 
short-term debt markets are often closed to companies with those ratings.

"Unless this process allows the rating agencies to keep 'A2/P2' ratings on 
the short-term debt of both companies, then this process has largely been a 
waste of everyone's time," said Burke.

Still, he said, "there is a reasonable chance, despite today's weak 
recommendation, that the situation can be salvaged with mid-'triple-B' 
ratings, which would allow a lifeline to conventional sources of liquidity."

Moody's and S&P were not available for comment.

 

Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved

	Kari Dohn <Kari.Dohn@GOV.CA.GOV>
	01/03/2001 06:30 PM
		 
thank you so much.  so the news aint great for utilities?

Greetings Kari:

Forgive the delay.  Much going on today, PUC draft decision in particular.
The draft does not look promising for the utilities' financial position.

Attached are our comments on the Governor's Proposals and some more detail
on the demand-reduction proposal.  We continue to work on the Nord Pool
research for you and will turn that around as quickly as we can.

Again, don't hesitate to contact me if there's anything else I can help
with, or if there's anything else that you need. (415.782.7822)

Best,
Jeff

(See attached file: Comments on Governor's Proposals 010301 .doc)(See
attached file: Demand buy-down proposal.doc)

Late afternoon 1/3/01 news:

USA: Calif utility ratings may fall too far on 7-15 pct hike.
By Jonathan Stempel

01/03/2001 
Reuters English News Service 
(C) Reuters Limited 2001. 

NEW YORK, Jan 3 (Reuters) - Bankruptcy may loom and the credit ratings of the 
two largest California electric utilities will likely fall too far if that 
state's Public Utilities Commission awards them an interim rate hike of 7 to 
15 percent, analysts said Wednesday.

In a draft decision on Wednesday, the CPUC proposed an immediate hike of 9 
percent for residential customers of Pacific Gas & Electric Co. and Southern 
California Edison, and hikes of seven to 15 percent for various business 
customers.

The CPUC commission is expected to issue a final decision on Thursday.

"It forces the utilities and their creditors to be limbo dancers, and skilled 
limbo dancers at that," said Shawn Burke, head of U.S. investment-grade 
research at Barclays Capital.

PG&E and SCE had requested respective rate increases of 26 percent and 30 
percent, a hike that would help them avoid imminent bankruptcy.

The utilities have also asked the regulators to remove a freeze on retail 
rates imposed under California's 1996 law that deregulated the state's 
electricity market.

On a day when most stocks roared ahead after the Federal Reserve announced 
surprise interest rate cuts, investors beat down the stocks of Pacific G&E's 
parent, San Francisco-based PG&E Corp. , and SoCal Edison's parent, Edison 
International .

PG&E shares closed Wednesday on the New York Stock Exchange at $17, down 
$2-9/16, or 13.1 percent, while Edison International shares closed at 
$12-1/4, down $2-3/4, or 18.3 percent, on the Big Board.

Bond quotations were not immediately available for the utilities' bonds, 
which in recent weeks have traded like junk.

Pacific G&E and SoCal Edison were banking on a big rate hike to allow them to 
pass on some of their soaring wholesale power costs to consumers.

The utilities, which operate under a rate freeze, have accumulated more than 
$8 billion in unrecovered costs since wholesale power prices started 
skyrocketing last summer amid a worsening electricity shortage in the state. 
They claim they are running out of money due to the price freeze, and have 
billions of dollars of bills coming due in the next six weeks.

Central to their concerns is whether credit rating agencies Moody's Investors 
Service and Standard & Poor's will cut their medium investment grades to junk 
status.

"No one knows for sure, but if we consider the average rate hike is only 
about 10 percent, it will be difficult for the companies to maintain 
investment-grade ratings," said Dorothea Matthews, a fixed-income electric 
utilities analyst for Deutsche Banc Alex. Brown.

The utilities have already been unable to tap short-term capital markets 
because of their precarious financial state.

Downgrades to junk, which the agencies have already threatened, would cement 
the door shut to these markets, and cause the utilities to default on some of 
their loans.

Late Wednesday, PG&E Chief Executive Gordon Smith said the commission's 
proposed hikes could jeopardize his utility's future loans.

Even a downgrade to the lowest investment grades - "Baa3" for long-term debt 
and "Prime-3" for short-term debt from Moody's, and "BBB-minus" and "A3" from 
S&P - would make the going very difficult for the utilities. The reason: 
short-term debt markets are often closed to companies with those ratings.

"Unless this process allows the rating agencies to keep 'A2/P2' ratings on 
the short-term debt of both companies, then this process has largely been a 
waste of everyone's time," said Burke.

Still, he said, "there is a reasonable chance, despite today's weak 
recommendation, that the situation can be salvaged with mid-'triple-B' 
ratings, which would allow a lifeline to conventional sources of liquidity."

Moody's and S&P were not available for comment.

 

Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 

FYI.  When I sent Kari Dohn some additional materials today, I mentioned in 
passing that I thought the Commission's draft decision fell short.  She 
responded by asking why.  Attached is my response, and hers.  Perhaps there's 
a glimmer of hope for the IOUs between now and tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff
	Kari Dohn <Kari.Dohn@GOV.CA.GOV>
	01/03/2001 07:03 PM
		 
Hey its worth more than two cents, and I hear you exactly.  We will be busy
tonight, that is for sure!!!

It's hard to disagree with the fact that 1) the utilities are the ones that
cut the deal they're living with and 2) they took all of the "stranded
cost" money that consumers paid them and invested it in other states and
countries.

But you can only buy for 10 cents and sell for 5 cents for so long before
creditors turn off the spigot.  Difficult to see how the spigot stays on
with the draft decision issued today.  (See story attached, below.)

With bankruptcy, the only one making any decisions is the judge, and while
some see benefits to that, seems to us that from a political, financial and
commercial perspective, bankruptcy creates many more problems than it
solves.

That said, we're extremely sensitive to the politics of rate increases.
But if the increases are subject to refund, then decision makers can buy
themselves some time by erring just slightly to the high side of a rate
increase, which could fend off the ratings agencies and provide additional
opportunity over the next 90 days or so to scrutinize the utilities claims
and come up with comprehensive solutions to the bigger problems.

Well, you got my two cents.  Sorry about that.

Best,
Jeff
Late afternoon 1/3/01 news:

USA: Calif utility ratings may fall too far on 7-15 pct hike.
By Jonathan Stempel

01/03/2001
Reuters English News Service
(C) Reuters Limited 2001.

NEW YORK, Jan 3 (Reuters) - Bankruptcy may loom and the credit ratings of
the two largest California electric utilities will likely fall too far if
that state's Public Utilities Commission awards them an interim rate hike
of 7 to 15 percent, analysts said Wednesday.

In a draft decision on Wednesday, the CPUC proposed an immediate hike of 9
percent for residential customers of Pacific Gas & Electric Co. and
Southern California Edison, and hikes of seven to 15 percent for various
business customers.

The CPUC commission is expected to issue a final decision on Thursday.

"It forces the utilities and their creditors to be limbo dancers, and
skilled limbo dancers at that," said Shawn Burke, head of U.S.
investment-grade research at Barclays Capital.

PG&E and SCE had requested respective rate increases of 26 percent and 30
percent, a hike that would help them avoid imminent bankruptcy.

The utilities have also asked the regulators to remove a freeze on retail
rates imposed under California's 1996 law that deregulated the state's
electricity market.

On a day when most stocks roared ahead after the Federal Reserve announced
surprise interest rate cuts, investors beat down the stocks of Pacific
G&E's parent, San Francisco-based PG&E Corp. , and SoCal Edison's parent,
Edison International .

PG&E shares closed Wednesday on the New York Stock Exchange at $17, down
$2-9/16, or 13.1 percent, while Edison International shares closed at
$12-1/4, down $2-3/4, or 18.3 percent, on the Big Board.

Bond quotations were not immediately available for the utilities' bonds,
which in recent weeks have traded like junk.

Pacific G&E and SoCal Edison were banking on a big rate hike to allow them
to pass on some of their soaring wholesale power costs to consumers.

The utilities, which operate under a rate freeze, have accumulated more
than $8 billion in unrecovered costs since wholesale power prices started
skyrocketing last summer amid a worsening electricity shortage in the
state. They claim they are running out of money due to the price freeze,
and have billions of dollars of bills coming due in the next six weeks.

Central to their concerns is whether credit rating agencies Moody's
Investors Service and Standard & Poor's will cut their medium investment
grades to junk status.

"No one knows for sure, but if we consider the average rate hike is only
about 10 percent, it will be difficult for the companies to maintain
investment-grade ratings," said Dorothea Matthews, a fixed-income electric
utilities analyst for Deutsche Banc Alex. Brown.

The utilities have already been unable to tap short-term capital markets
because of their precarious financial state.

Downgrades to junk, which the agencies have already threatened, would
cement the door shut to these markets, and cause the utilities to default
on some of their loans.

Late Wednesday, PG&E Chief Executive Gordon Smith said the commission's
proposed hikes could jeopardize his utility's future loans.

Even a downgrade to the lowest investment grades - "Baa3" for long-term
debt and "Prime-3" for short-term debt from Moody's, and "BBB-minus" and
"A3" from S&P - would make the going very difficult for the utilities. The
reason: short-term debt markets are often closed to companies with those
ratings.

"Unless this process allows the rating agencies to keep 'A2/P2' ratings on
the short-term debt of both companies, then this process has largely been a
waste of everyone's time," said Burke.

Still, he said, "there is a reasonable chance, despite today's weak
recommendation, that the situation can be salvaged with mid-'triple-B'
ratings, which would allow a lifeline to conventional sources of
liquidity."

Moody's and S&P were not available for comment.

Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved

 

                    Kari Dohn

                    V.CA.GOV>            <Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com>

                                         cc:

                    01/03/2001           Subject:     RE: Additional
Materials             
                    06:30 PM

 

 

thank you so much.  so the news aint great for utilities?

Greetings Kari:

Forgive the delay.  Much going on today, PUC draft decision in particular.
The draft does not look promising for the utilities' financial position.

Attached are our comments on the Governor's Proposals and some more detail
on the demand-reduction proposal.  We continue to work on the Nord Pool
research for you and will turn that around as quickly as we can.

Again, don't hesitate to contact me if there's anything else I can help
with, or if there's anything else that you need. (415.782.7822)

Best,
Jeff

(See attached file: Comments on Governor's Proposals 010301 .doc)(See
attached file: Demand buy-down proposal.doc)

Here's what we've delivered to Davis:
Message points on the "big picture"
Reasons that the Governor needs to broaden his information network (i.e., get 
better advice) and a proposal for how to do it
Comments on the Governor's proposals
Detail on how to execute the "buy-down" proposal
7X24, Peak and Off peak prices for 5-year blocks of power

The only thing left to send is the Nord Pool material, which Jim Steffes is 
help me to gather for delivery tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

Best of luck.  You've got a tough job.  Guess you'll be working that much 
harder now that John Stevens is on his way to San Francisco.

At last week's meeting, a request was made for peak and off peak prices.  
I've attached prices that we filed yesterday at FERC as part of its on-going 
proceeding of forward contracts.  Few comments:  

We'd appreciate it if you could keep the information confidential, 
particularly since the information is covered by FERC's confidentiality 
provisions.

Since we are not a "generator," we buy and sell in the market, which as you 
know is currently very volatile. Consequently, the quotes that we provide 
customers change daily to reflect changing market prices.  These prices were 
put together and filed yesterday, but you may have heard that prices were 
down today.  So quotes we made today were lower.   And quotes we makes 
tomorrow will reflect tomorrow's market conditions and will likely be 
different from today's.

Because these quotes were assembled yesterday, they are only "indicative."  
That is, if someone wanted to buy these products today, we'd have to 
recalculate prices, because the quotes established yesterday are no longer 
valid (for the reasons I mentioned above).

Hope this helps.  If you have any questions, let me know.

Best,
Jeff

Attached are the final versions of confidential materials provided to the 
Governor's office.

Best,
Jeff

Hi Sue:  

Hope all is well in the land of forward contracts.  Do we know who the 
speakers are?  Is Dave Parquet attending for us?

Thanks.
Jeff
	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	01/03/2001 07:52 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
Greetings:
For those of you attending the Republican Caucus briefing tomorrow it is in
room 126 and runs from 9-noon (from what we understand it will be close
quarters so arrive early if you have been invited to speak). This meeting is
open to those who have been invited only.

Attached please find the agenda. IEP will be handing out the Seeing the
Light document, Power Up, and the editorial from the Bee today.  We will be
following up with the FAQ's with a letter to each attendee on Friday.

I have also attached the Final FAQ and Glossary of Terms.  Please let us
know by 2:00 tomorrow if you have any changes or additions to these
documents.

Thanks!
Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

 - Rep Energy Briefing Agenda.doc
 - Final.FAQ.1.03.01.doc
 - Glossary of Terms.doc

Greetings:

Well, hope your holiday was great, because I'm back with more questions.  To 
change my direct deposit account, can I do that on line, or do I need to do 
it by other means?  Thanks, as always, and I hope you have a great 2001.

Best,
Jeff

Sorry.  They're on their way.  (P.S. It's Kean, not Kane.)  And I like to 
discuss further the points you were making on the call.  They were good 
ones.  I just didn't want to get hung up on them during that conference call.

Best,
Jeff

Jeff: As we discussed, please send me your's and Steve Kane's presentations.  
Thanks.  Ron

As you can imagine, the distribution list has almost reached the size of the 
entire company.  If you folks could distribute materials to those in your 
group that need it, that would really help out a lot. Let me know if that 
works. 

Best,
Jeff

	Susan J Mara
	01/04/2001 12:40 AM
		 
In the Room

Conference attended by all in-state generators, a few munies, the IOUs and a 
few others. One attorney from CPUC, but on phone. Barbara Barkovich attended 
for CA Large Consumers.  Nader sent someone.  No other consumers.  One other 
ESP -- Strategic Energy (only operates in San Diego).
Judge reports that only 6 offers have been submitted to FERC for sales to the 
IOUs (note; Enron submitted one of the offers). The offers total 2000 MW. The 
prices are quite divergent.  He expresses concern at the little offered.
Generators suggest that more could be offered if FERC could be more flexible 
on terms (FERC required 24/7 offers).
IOUs and others press judge to seek offers from others not present (e.g., 
BPA, other marketers, SW utilities), but judge does not offer to do so.
Barkovich says can't throw large customers into non-core market now.
Everyone agrees that we are all looking for a blended wholesale rate (part 
existing gen, part OFs, part forward contract and part spot) that meshes with 
the IOUs' ability to recover the costs in rates -- so tied to CPUC rate 
increase.
Discussion of CPUC PD -- not enough
Enron able to take low profile.
SDG&E suggested terminating the settlement talks at FERC, saying nothing 
could be achieved.
Not much happens until 4:30 pm, when judge blows up -- judge directed 
epithets at SDG&E and SCE.  SCE had refused to cooperate from the beginning.  

Out of the Room

Separate talks between PG&E and SDG&E and some of the generators.
Late in the day, Judge meets with IOUs.
Parties agree informally that forum does not work well given lack of CPUC 
involvement, but some believe that FERC is only hope for a workable 
resolution.

Next Steps -- The Judge Speaks

Judge asked everyone to consider how to "Share the Pain" for Thursday's 
meeting and said not to expect any "win:win" scenario. His view is that FERC 
is better than the CA legislature or bankruptcy court.
His focus will be on Wolak proposal to share the pain, as submitted in 
12/1/00 comments to FERC -- forces all sellers to CA to sell most of its 
supply (either generation or marketer offers) as cost-based rates in forward 
contracts, or lose ability to sell at market-based rates.  Generators oppose 
this, I believe.
Enron planning to continue low profile but to discuss options with ENA.

This touches the issues you and I discussed yesterday.  Seems important to 
have this sort of information flowing well in advance of the activity.  Have 
you or anyone else had a chance to peek at what Sam intends to present to 
legislators?  The more the right is aware of the left hand, and vice versa, 
seems the better off we'll be.  No big deal, but if we get our internal 
process in order at the outset, likely make it easier when the missiles 
really start flying.

Your pal,
Jeff

	Sandra McCubbin
	01/04/2001 10:16 AM
		
Dave is on vacation, so Sam will be speaking this am on constraints of siting 
new plants..we have all of five minutes

EES' receivables related to PX-credit payments that PG&E continues to 
withhold has grown dramatically
EES is going to meet internally to re-visit the issue of putting customers 
back on utility service (but honoring the financial terms of our contracts)
They will try to convene a meeting, as early as Tuesday to discuss the 
switch-back issue w/Steve, Mark, Blachman, Sunde, etc., similar to the 
meeting held a couple of weeks ago
Given the market's negative response to the Commission's decision, EES will 
immediately try to tie up bankruptcy counsel in anticipation of the fact that 
the utilities may be forced to file, which EES estimates will occur by end of 
next week, if it happens

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/04/2001 11:02 AM
		 
EES' receivables related to PX-credit payments that PG&E continues to 
withhold has grown dramatically
EES is going to meet internally to re-visit the issue of putting customers 
back on utility service (but honoring the financial terms of our contracts)
They will try to convene a meeting, as early as Tuesday to discuss the 
switch-back issue w/Steve, Mark, Blachman, Sunde, etc., similar to the 
meeting held a couple of weeks ago
Given the market's negative response to the Commission's decision, EES will 
immediately try to tie up bankruptcy counsel in anticipation of the fact that 
the utilities may be forced to file, which EES estimates will occur by end of 
next week, if it happens

Jennifer:  I will unfortunately not be able to make the call because I have 
to be at the California PUC for the decision that they're issuing today.  
Harry Kingerski, in Houston, might be able to join, though.

	Jennifer Rudolph@EES
	01/04/2001 09:46 AM
		 
I apologize for the extreme delay.
We are, indeed, having our weekly San Diego Call today.

Agenda

Conference Call Details
Dates	Every Thursday starting on November 16, 2000
Time	11:30 am (CST)
Phone	(800) 991-9019
Passcode	6207248
Conference Room 	EB 751

The Commission voted out the order 5-0, essentially as it appeared 
yesterday.  Three key changes:
They clarified that the surcharge applies to Direct Access customers (but the 
entire "rate freeze" structure remains intact for now).
The Commission reversed itself and chose not to adopt TURN's "netting out" of 
gen revenues and CTC collections, and said instead that the Commission will 
consider it as an option in the next phase (a move likely made in order to 
lower chances of a successful utility appeal).
The Commission added to the decision language saying that it will study the 
pros/cons of securitizating the utilities' power purchase costs.  They will 
submit a report on the issue to the Governor and Legislature.
On this last point, wire reports are rampant about the possibility that 
legislation will be introduced as early as today proposing to securitize the 
utilties' power purchase costs.  This action has reportedly been the result 
of discussions that occured through the night between the governor's office, 
the utilities and the ratings agencies in reponse to the fact that the 
decision issued by the PUC falls well short of what's needed to keep the IOUs 
credit worthy and solvent.  As a result of those wires stories, the 
utilities' stock has come back (Edison was down as low as 6.25 and is 
currently at 10 7/8; PG&E was at 8 7/8 and is currently at 11 7/8).  We're 
working with Sandi McCubbin, who heads-up our legislative activities in 
California, to get more info and will report back.
The hearing was dominated by highly charged anti-generator, anti-marketer 
rhetoric, which is likely to play a prominent role in the press accounts.  
Only FERC was demonized more.
Each of the Commissioners, including the most recent "interim" appointee,  
made strong statements regarding the undesirability of utility bankruptcy.
The Commission left open the possibility of "doing more" at their next 
meeting (two weeks from today), which means the negotiations with the 
utilities and ratings agencies are likely to continue. And if an agreement is 
reached, it could end up on the next agenda.

Yes, I'll get to Mike Day.

	Vicki Sharp@EES
	01/04/2001 04:18 PM
		
We just received a letter from the PX asking us to enter into an indemnity 
agreement with them or requiring us to post collateral for the full amount of 
the unsecured credit exposure.  We are researching this issue from the EES 
side.  Wanda and Don, we are sending this letter to you.  Can you determine 
what amounts we are talking about for EES?   This letter has also been sent 
to EPMI and Portland General and I assume will be reviewed by their legal 
team.  Bill Bradford, have you sent this on to Portland General.?
If I have missed someone that this memo should have been forwarded to, please 
forward it on. 
Jeff Dasovich, can you forward to Mike Day?

The Commission voted out the order 5-0, essentially as it appeared 
yesterday.  Three key changes:
They clarified that the surcharge applies to Direct Access customers (but the 
entire "rate freeze" structure remains intact for now).
The Commission reversed itself and chose not to adopt TURN's "netting out" of 
gen revenues and CTC collections, and said instead that the Commission will 
consider it as an option in the next phase (a move likely made in order to 
lower chances of a successful utility appeal).
The Commission added to the decision language saying that it will study the 
pros/cons of securitizating the utilities' power purchase costs.  They will 
submit a report on the issue to the Governor and Legislature.
On this last point, wire reports are rampant about the possibility that 
legislation will be introduced as early as today proposing to securitize the 
utilties' power purchase costs.  This action has reportedly been the result 
of discussions that occured through the night between the governor's office, 
the utilities and the ratings agencies in reponse to the fact that the 
decision issued by the PUC falls well short of what's needed to keep the IOUs 
credit worthy and solvent.  As a result of those wires stories, the 
utilities' stock has come back (Edison was down as low as 6.25 and is 
currently at 10 7/8; PG&E was at 8 7/8 and is currently at 11 7/8).  We're 
working with Sandi McCubbin, who heads-up our legislative activities in 
California, to get more info and will report back.
The hearing was dominated by highly charged anti-generator, anti-marketer 
rhetoric, which is likely to play a prominent role in the press accounts.  
Only FERC was demonized more.
Each of the Commissioners, including the most recent "interim" appointee,  
made strong statements regarding the undesirability of utility bankruptcy.
The Commission left open the possibility of "doing more" at their next 
meeting (two weeks from today), which means the negotiations with the 
utilities and ratings agencies are likely to continue. And if an agreement is 
reached, it could end up on the next agenda.

	Vicki Sharp@EES
	01/04/2001 04:32 PM
		
what is his email?

Yes, I'll get to Mike Day.

1) Since I'm coming, I'll likely stay a couple of days, if there's still an 
open seat available on the floor. 
2) I can get a plane that arrives at Intercontinental at 12:20.  Can I catch 
a cab and get to the Woodlands by 1?  Otherwise, I'll come out the night 
before.

Best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/04/2001 04:39 PM
		
	Vicki Sharp@EES
	01/04/2001 04:32 PM
		
what is his email?

Yes, I'll get to Mike Day.

you're a goddess.  thank you.

Vicki:

Do we need to add the PX letter to the agenda for tomorrow's 10 AM call?  If 
so, make sense to have Bracewell (Ron Carroll?) and Mike Day on as well?

Jeff

Ron Carrol works at Bracewell and he handles a lot of our FERC-related PX and 
ISO activity, including tariff activity.  Ron works for Dan Watkiss, who also 
handles a lot of that work for us .

Man, you ain't kiddin'.  Jeez.....

Greetings, Kari. =20

Today's installment includes:

Background on Nord Pool
Information on the status of de-regulation in Pennsylvania.

The rumors regarding securitization of utilities' power purchase costs had =
a=20
very positive effect on the utilities' stock today.  Congratulations.  Ther=
e=20
is conflicting information floating around, though. =20

Some wires stories say that a state senator will sponsor a securitization=
=20
bill.  Others say that it will be the Governor's bill.  Is securitization=
=20
legislation something that the Governor intends to sponsor/support?=20

Though there are clearly some challenges to securitization, we think it=20
offers a promising option.

Hope the information is useful.

Best,
Jeff

=09"PennFuture" <pennfuture@pennfuture.org>
=0901/04/2001 11:12 AM
=09Please respond to "PennFuture"
=09=09=20

PennFuture's E-cubed is a commentary biweekly email publication  concerning=
=20
the current themes and trends in the energy market.=20

?
January 4, 2001Vol. 3, No. 1
?
Price, Policy and Misperception
?
The ringing in of 2001 marks the completion of the fourth year since =20
Pennsylvania=01,s electricity competition law went into effect on January 1=
,=20
1997,  and the second year since Pennsylvania=01,s retail market was fully=
=20
opened to  customer choice on January 1, 1999. But nationwide, while=20
reliability,  environmental performance, and assistance for low-income=20
customers are crucial  factors, the price of power has alone become the mai=
n=20
standard for judging the  success or failure of competitive transition=20
policies. Near hysteria about  prices is yet another fallout of the=20
California mess where rates are a daily  nightmare for consumers.=20
?
In an effort to broaden electricity policy discussion beyond the myopic =20
focus on California, we note that competitive residential retail prices of =
=20
electricity in Pennsylvania this New Year are considerably below what=20
customers  were paying for generation and transmission service or embedded=
=20
generation on  January 1, 1997. If you doubt it, compare columns B and D=20
below. Just as  interestingly, competitive prices for 100% renewable energy=
=20
products are well  less than what customers of Duquesne Light and PECO Ener=
gy=20
paid for power  generated from mainly coal and nuclear prior to competition=
=20
(columns C and  D).
?
Comparison of Residential Unbundled Embedded Generation to Retail Power =20
Prices (in cents/kWh)A. 2000 Shopping CreditB. Lowest Retail PriceC.  100%=
=20
Green Power Prices?D. Embedded Generation & =20
Transmission??????????????????????  A.??????? B.?????  C.??????? =20
D.Duquesne?????? 4.80???  4.60??? 6.49??? 8.75GPU/Met-Ed??  4.53??? 4.60???=
=20
7.09???  5.70GPU/Penelec? 4.53??? 4.50???  7.09???  5.40PECO???????????? =
=20
5.65??? 4.65??? 6.37???  8.65PPL???????????????  4.61??? 4.30??? 7.09??? =
=20
6.26Allegheny???????  3.24??? 5.20??? 6.49???  5.30Note: 2001 shopping=20
credits will be moderately higher in some  cases.
?
In most parts of the Commonwealth, current competitive retail prices for =
=20
residential customers are 0.90 to 3.15 cents per kilowatt-hour less than=20
what  customers were paying for the same generation and transmission servic=
e=20
prior to  competition. As a result of stranded cost charges that utilities=
=20
are being  allowed to collect, these substantial competitive savings are no=
t=20
fully passed  on to consumers.
?
In fact, were it not for stranded cost charges, Pennsylvania=01,s residenti=
al =20
customers would have had their total rates (including distribution and =20
transition rates) decline by about 20% in 2000. Generation rates would have=
 =20
declined by as much as 40%. These huge price reductions are real but will=
=20
not  fully reach customers during the transition period when utilities are=
=20
allowed to  collect stranded costs.
?
Competitive retail prices are also in most cases less than Pennsylvania=01,=
s =20
default rates or shopping credits. This is important and encouraging,=20
because  Pennsylvania=01,s current residential default rates or shopping cr=
edits=20
are in  every case much less than what customers were paying for generation=
=20
service at  the start of the competitive transition. Indeed, current defaul=
t=20
rates are about  one to three cents per kilowatt-hour less than residential=
=20
customers were paying  for the same service from their local utility prior =
to=20
competition.
?
The California fiasco has meant a lot of discussion about the price of =20
electricity, but it has not meant a lot of understanding of sensible=20
competitive  policies=01, potential impact on retail prices. Instead, a gre=
at=20
deal of reporting  reflects understandable misconception of basic price=20
benchmarks. For example,  very few stories identify accurately or even at a=
ll=20
what customers were paying  for generation service prior to competition (th=
e=20
pre-competition embedded  generation rate of the incumbent utility). This=
=20
failing can be traced to the  fact that states have not prominently made th=
is=20
data available.
?
Worse yet, many press articles mistakenly assume the default rate or the =
=20
shopping credit is equal to what customers were paying the local utility fo=
r =20
generation service prior to competition, and report that competition will=
=20
lead  to price shock for customers if market prices exceed present default=
=20
rates. But  this dramatic warning is typically wrong.
?
The press=01, misunderstanding hides an important fact: current default  ra=
tes=20
or shopping credits are nearly always much less than what customers were =
=20
paying for generation service prior to competition. Total rates after the =
=20
transition to competition will not be greater than they were prior to =20
competition, unless competitive retail rates exceed the utility=01,s =20
pre-competition embedded generation rate.=20
?
Consequently, if competitive prices are higher than current default rates =
=20
but lower than a utility=01,s pre-competition embedded generation rate,=20
consumers  will have lower total rates once stranded cost charges are remov=
ed=20
and the  transition period expires. That is, they will if a state creates a=
=20
genuinely  competitive retail market that pulls through competitive prices.

E-cubed is available for reprint in newspapers and other publications. =20
Authors are available for print or broadcast. Support E-cubed by becoming a=
 =20
member of PennFuture =01* visit our secure online membership page at=20
www.pennfuture.org by clicking on =01&Support  Our Work.=018?PennFuture, wi=
th=20
offices in Harrisburg, Philadelphia and  Pittsburgh, is a statewide public=
=20
interest membership organization, which  advances policies to protect and=
=20
improve the state=01,s environment and economy.  PennFuture=01,s activities=
 include=20
litigating cases before regulatory bodies and in  local, state and federal=
=20
courts, advocating and advancing legislative action on  a state and federal=
=20
level, public education and assisting citizens in public  advocacy. ?We hop=
e=20
you found this informative and interesting.  However, if you would prefer n=
ot=20
to receive future issues, please reply to this  email and type =01&unsubscr=
ibe=018=20
in the subject line.
 - Vol3No1_10301.doc

I sent Kari Dohn some more information today--thanks, Jim, for the 
Pennsylvania info.  In the note, I asked her if the rumors about 
securitization are true, and whether the Governor, indeed, intends to push it 
actively.  

I also mentioned that we viewed it as a very promising option, particularly 
if accompanied by significant concessions by the utilities.  The response 
from Kari is very encouraging, and will hopefully help the utilities' credit 
position, though I heard PG&E was downgraded to junk by at least one credit 
agency today, but haven't confirmed it.  

Think it's prudent to keep Kari's info very close to the vest--here's 
Kari'her response:

Jeff -- thank you so much for the information!

Re:  securitization, I don't think the exact form has been decided in terms
of legislation, but its fair to say there are very active discussions at the
highest level regarding the best way to do this (with good support, between
us, it appears).  All major parties will need to be supportive.

I hear you.  Feels like I haven't slept for about a week.  

Congratulations--securitization would be an extremely constructive outcome.  
If there's anything at all that we can do to help, please don't hesitate to 
ask.  (Since folks view us as, well, somewhat controversial, we continue to 
try to do productive things away from the spot light.)  Talk to you soon.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks. See you then.  Hope it turns out that your guts are in good order.  
I'm feeling like I could use a transplant myself.

Best,
Jeff

Hmmm, sounds like the pressure's getting to Mike a bit.  A vacation might 
help.  I think you're entitled to continue on, if that's your decision.  You 
may not have the attendance you prefer, but I don't oppose moving the Gas 
Accord talks forward.

Jeff

	Mike Florio <mflorio@turn.org>
	01/04/2001 07:58 PM
		 
Once again I implore you to put at stop to this madness and hold any 
further "Gas Accord II" settlement
discussions in abeyance until the current electricity crisis has 
abated.  There is neither the time nor the mental capacity to deal with all 
of these issues at the same time.  For God's sake, STOP 
IT!!!                                                              Mike Florio

At 12:49 PM 1/4/2001 -0800, Lindh, Frank (Law) wrote:

>                         CONFIDENTIAL SETTLEMENT DOCUMENT
>                         PER CPUC RULE 51
>
>ALL INTERESTED PARTIES:
>
>This is a reminder that PG&E will hold the first Gas Accord II Workshop of
>the new year on Wednesday and Thursday, January 10 and 11.  The workshop
>will be held at PG&E headquarters in San Francisco, 77 Beale Street, in
>Conference Room 300.
>
>Our objective for this workshop is to review and explain PG&E's
>comprehensive settlement proposal, which was distributed by e-mail on
>December 21, 2000, to those parties who have explicitly agreed to abide by
>CPUC Rule 51.
>
>If you did not receive a copy of the December 21 transmittal and would like
>one, please complete the attached Rule 51 form and return it by e-mail to
>Frank Lindh (frl3@pge.com) and Geoff Bellenger (gjb2@pge.com), or by FAX to
>Geoff at 415-973-0881.
>
>Because we will be discussing the substance of PG&E's settlement proposal at
>next week's workshop, any party who wishes to attend will be required to
>have completed the Rule 51 form.  (Please note, if you received our December
>21 transmittal, then that means PG&E has your Rule 51 form on file, so there
>is no need to fill it out again.)
>
>Also attached below is a proposed Agenda for next week's workshop.  We will
>start the sessions at 9:30 a.m. on Wednesday and at 9:00 a.m. on Thursday.
>We will provide coffee and juice in the morning, and lunch each day.
>
>If you do plan to attend next week's workshop, we request that you please
>confirm your attendance, so that we can get a headcount for the food and
>drink orders.  Please e-mail a response to Darcy Morrison (D2Mr@pge.com), or
>telephone Darcy at (415) 973-6644.
>
>We look forward to seeing you next week and having a productive discussion.
>
>
>Frank Lindh                             Ray Williams
>415-973-2776                            415-973-3634
>frl3@pge.com                            rdw0@pge.com
>
>  <<Gas Accord II Information Form.doc>>  <<Agenda 1-10&11-01 Workshop.doc>>
>
>
>

Greetings:
Thanks for all the help with information.  Here's what we've sent to the 
Governor.
Best,
Jeff
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/03/2001 08:08 PM
		
Attached are the final versions of confidential materials provided to the 
Governor's office.

Best,
Jeff

You ain't kiddin'.  

	"Lindh, Frank (Law)" <FRL3@pge.com>
	01/05/2001 10:30 AM
		 
Thanks, Jeff.  Actually, these days I feel like I could use a vacation
myself!

Hmmm, sounds like the pressure's getting to Mike a bit.  A vacation might
help.  I think you're entitled to continue on, if that's your decision.
You may not have the attendance you prefer, but I don't oppose moving the
Gas Accord talks forward.

Jeff

 

                    Mike Florio

                                         cc:     "'aamirali@caiso.com'"

                    01/04/2001           <aamirali@caiso.com>,

                    07:58 PM             "'alex.sugaoka@uaecorp.com'"

                                         <alex.sugaoka@uaecorp.com>,

                                         "'askaff@energy-law-group.com'"

                                         <askaff@energy-law-group.com>,

                                         "'bbrunel@smud.org'"
<bbrunel@smud.org>,          
                                         "'bcope@ci.redding.ca.us'"

                                         <bcope@ci.redding.ca.us>,
"'bcragg@gmssr.com'"    
                                         <bcragg@gmssr.com>,
"'bhabersack@gasbiz.com'"     
                                         <bhabersack@gasbiz.com>,

                                         "'bmantz@sempra-slns.com'"

                                         <bmantz@sempra-slns.com>,
"'bobfraser@aec.ca'"    
                                         <bobfraser@aec.ca>,
"'brad.king@usa.conoco.com'"  
                                         <brad.king@usa.conoco.com>,

                                         "'bradylaw@pacbell.net'"
<bradylaw@pacbell.net>,  
                                         "'bruce.a.connell@usa.conoco.com'"

                                         <bruce.a.connell@usa.conoco.com>,

                                         "'burkee@cts.com'"
<burkee@cts.com>,              
                                         "'bwood@energy.state.ca.us'"

                                         <bwood@energy.state.ca.us>,

                                         "'cabaker@duke-energy.com'"

                                         <cabaker@duke-energy.com>,

                                         "'ceyap@earthlink.net'"
<ceyap@earthlink.net>,    
                                         "'cgoodman@energymarketers.com'"

                                         <cgoodman@energymarketers.com>,

                                         "'charles.jacobini@acnenergy.com'"

                                         <charles.jacobini@acnenergy.com>,

                                         "'chawes@txuenergy.com'"
<chawes@txuenergy.com>,  
                                         "'cprice@igservice.com'"
<cprice@igservice.com>,  
                                         "'craigc@calpine.com'"
<craigc@calpine.com>,      
                                         "'csullivan@coral-energy.com'"

                                         <csullivan@coral-energy.com>,

                                         "'dave.sloan@gt.pge.com'"

                                         <dave.sloan@gt.pge.com>,
"'davef@abag.ca.gov'"    
                                         <davef@abag.ca.gov>,
"'ddame@ncpa.com'"           
                                         <ddame@ncpa.com>, "Thomas, Dan (CGT
Dir)"         
                                         <DFT1@pge.com>,
"'djones@gasbiz.com'"             
                                         <djones@gasbiz.com>,
"'dmkellerton@ibm.net'"      
                                         <dmkellerton@ibm.net>,
"'dpk@cipa.org'"           
                                         <dpk@cipa.org>,
"'dwillis@sdge.com'"              
                                         <dwillis@sdge.com>,
"'dwswapp@duke-energy.com'"   
                                         <dwswapp@duke-energy.com>,
"'ed@clfp.com'"        
                                         <ed@clfp.com>,
"'edwardoneill@dwt.com'"           
                                         <edwardoneill@dwt.com>,
"'egw@aelaw.com'"         
                                         <egw@aelaw.com>, "'eke@aelaw.com'"

                                         <eke@aelaw.com>,
"'epoole@adplaw.com'"            
                                         <epoole@adplaw.com>,

                                         "'eric.eisenman@neg.pge.com'"

                                         <eric.eisenman@neg.pge.com>,

 
"'erin_m_delsing@reliantenergy.com'"              
                                         <erin_m_delsing@reliantenergy.com>,

                                         "'fillmotw@sce.com'"
<fillmotw@sce.com>,          
                                         "'frazier@bull.som.yale.edu'"

                                         <frazier@bull.som.yale.edu>,
"Lindh, Frank (Law)" 
                                         <FRL3@pge.com>,

 
"'girish_balachandran@city.palo-alto.ca.us'"      
 
<girish_balachandran@city.palo-alto.ca.us>,       
                                         "Bellenger, Geoffrey"
<GJB2@pge.com>,             
                                         "'gnadeau@suncor.com'"
<gnadeau@suncor.com>,      
 
"'grant_kolling@city.palo-alto.ca.us'"            
 
<grant_kolling@city.palo-alto.ca.us>,             
                                         "'gregory_hood@oxy.com'"
<gregory_hood@oxy.com>,  
                                         "'gregs@mid.org'" <gregs@mid.org>,

                                         "'gsullivan@Sempra.com'"
<gsullivan@sempra.com>,  
                                         "'gworster@txuenergy.com'"

                                         <gworster@txuenergy.com>,
"'hankd@calpine.com'"   
                                         <hankd@calpine.com>,
"'healyb@epenergy.com'"      
                                         <healyb@epenergy.com>,
"'jdasovic@enron.com'"     
                                         <jdasovic@enron.com>,
"'jerryl@abag.ca.gov'"      
                                         <jerryl@abag.ca.gov>,
"'jfawcet@enron.com'"       
                                         <jfawcet@enron.com>,
"'jfossum@westernhubs.com'"  
                                         <jfossum@westernhubs.com>,

                                         "'jgopal@energy.state.ca.us'"

                                         <jgopal@energy.state.ca.us>,
"'jhla@dynegy.com'"  
                                         <jhla@dynegy.com>,
"'jkarp@whitecase.com'"        
                                         <jkarp@whitecase.com>,
"'jleslie@luce.com'"       
                                         <jleslie@luce.com>,
"'jmartini@cipa.org'"         
                                         <jmartini@cipa.org>,
"'jnm@cpuc.ca.gov'"          
                                         <jnm@cpuc.ca.gov>,
"'joe.paul@dynegy.com'"        
                                         <joe.paul@dynegy.com>,

 
"'john_ulrich@city.palo-alto.ca.us'"              
                                         <john_ulrich@city.palo-alto.ca.us>,

                                         "'johnj@bcjlaw.com'"
<johnj@bcjlaw.com>,          
                                         "'jsuwara@sempra.com'"
<jsuwara@sempra.com>,      
                                         "'judypau@dwt.com'"
<judypau@dwt.com>,            
                                         "'justin_sutton@powerspring.com'"

                                         <justin_sutton@powerspring.com>,

                                         "'jweil@aglet.org'"
<jweil@aglet.org>,            
                                         "'jwr5532@aol.com'"
<jwr5532@aol.com>,            
                                         "'karen@klindh.com'"
<karen@klindh.com>,          
                                         "'karl@ncpa.com'" <karl@ncpa.com>,

                                         "'katie_elder@rmiinc.com'"

                                         <katie_elder@rmiinc.com>,

                                         "'keeling.robert@epenergy.com'"

                                         <keeling.robert@epenergy.com>,

                                         "'keith.brown@swgas.com'"

                                         <keith.brown@swgas.com>,

                                         "'khatz@titanenergy.com'"

                                         <khatz@titanenergy.com>,

                                         "'khensman@aeraenergy.com'"

                                         <khensman@aeraenergy.com>,
"'kl@mrwassoc.com'"    
                                         <kl@mrwassoc.com>,
"'kmagruder@newpower.com'"     
                                         <kmagruder@newpower.com>,
"'kmccrea@sablaw.com'"  
                                         <kmccrea@sablaw.com>,
"'kpurbhoo@enron.com'"      
                                         <kpurbhoo@enron.com>,
"'kzemp@lightspeed.net'"    
                                         <kzemp@lightspeed.net>,

                                         "'lbdr@powercomenergy.com'"

                                         <lbdr@powercomenergy.com>,

                                         "'lindseyhowdowning@dwt.com'"

                                         <lindseyhowdowning@dwt.com>,

                                         "'llorenz@pacent.com'"
<llorenz@pacent.com>,      
                                         "'marcel@turn.org'"
<marcel@turn.org>,            
                                         "'mbaldwin@igservice.com'"

                                         <mbaldwin@igservice.com>,

                                         "'mbornhoeft@socalgas.com'"

                                         <mbornhoeft@socalgas.com>,

                                         "'mcconnk@epenergy.com'"
<mcconnk@epenergy.com>,  
                                         "'mcollette@econone.com'"

                                         <mcollette@econone.com>,
"'mday@gmssr.com'"       
                                         <mday@gmssr.com>,
"'mdjoseph@adamsbroadwell.com'" 
                                         <mdjoseph@adamsbroadwell.com>,

                                         "'michael.alexander@sce.com'"

                                         <michael.alexander@sce.com>,
"'michael_r.         
                                         _soland@oxy.com'"
<michael_r._soland@oxy.com>,    
                                         "'mike.huk@gov.ab.ca'"
<mike.huk@gov.ab.ca>,      
                                         "'mmbr@dynegy.com'"
<mmbr@dynegy.com>,            
                                         "'mmce@dynegy.com'"
<mmce@dynegy.com>,            
                                         "'mnyberg@energy.state.ca.us'"

                                         <mnyberg@energy.state.ca.us>,

                                         "'mtbrommer@tid.org'"
<mtbrommer@tid.org>,        
                                         "'napedersen@jonesday.com'"

                                         <napedersen@jonesday.com>,

                                         "'nmcvay@socalgas.com'"
<nmcvay@socalgas.com>,    
                                         "'pat_mulhern@oxy.com'"
<pat_mulhern@oxy.com>,    
                                         "'paulamirault@aec.ca'"
<paulamirault@aec.ca>,    
                                         "'pbray@newpower.com'"
<pbray@newpower.com>,      
                                         "'pcervin@br-inc.com'"
<pcervin@br-inc.com>,      
                                         "'pete.frost@usa.conoco.com'"

                                         <pete.frost@usa.conoco.com>,

                                         "'peter.saunders@paramountres.com'"

                                         <peter.saunders@paramountres.com>,

                                         "'phil@royl.com'" <phil@royl.com>,

                                         "'pinney@capp.ca'"
<pinney@capp.ca>,              
                                         "'pkeeler@br-inc.com'"
<pkeeler@br-inc.com>,      
                                         "'plg@cpuc.ca.gov'"
<plg@cpuc.ca.gov>,            
                                         "'prescorw@bp.com'"
<prescorw@bp.com>,            
                                         "'randy_richards@powerspring.com'"

                                         <randy_richards@powerspring.com>,

 
"'raveen_maan@city.palo-alto.ca.us'"              
                                         <raveen_maan@city.palo-alto.ca.us>,

                                         "'rbetonte@socalgas.com'"

                                         <rbetonte@socalgas.com>,

                                         "'rcrowley@coral-energy.com'"

                                         <rcrowley@coral-energy.com>,
"Williams, Ray"      
                                         <RDW0@pge.com>,
"'redavis@sempra.com'"            
                                         <redavis@sempra.com>,
"'reson@venecoinc.com'"     
                                         <reson@venecoinc.com>,
"'rishikawa@socalgas.com'" 
                                         <rishikawa@socalgas.com>,
"'rliebert@cfbf.com'"   
                                         <rliebert@cfbf.com>,
"'rmp@cpuc.ca.gov'"          
                                         <rmp@cpuc.ca.gov>,
"'rnagatani@venocoinc.com'"    
                                         <rnagatani@venocoinc.com>,

                                         "'robertacohan@aol.com'"
<robertacohan@aol.com>,  
                                         "'rochmanm@cubjpa.org'"
<rochmanm@cubjpa.org>,    
                                         "'rochmanm@spurr.org'"
<rochmanm@spurr.org>,      
                                         "'rocky_rasley@oxy.com'"
<rocky_rasley@oxy.com>,  
                                         "'ron_oechsler@rmiinc.com'"

                                         <ron_oechsler@rmiinc.com>,
"'rpurves@sdge.com'"   
                                         <rpurves@sdge.com>,
"'rroth@sempra-slns.com'"     
                                         <rroth@sempra-slns.com>,
"'salleyoo@dwt.com'"     
                                         <salleyoo@dwt.com>,
"'sandra_mcdonough@pcp.ca'"   
                                         <sandra_mcdonough@pcp.ca>,
"'scohn@smud.org'"     
                                         <scohn@smud.org>,
"'slins@ci.glendale.ca.us'"     
                                         <slins@ci.glendale.ca.us>,
"'sross@state.nm.us'"  
                                         <sross@state.nm.us>,

                                         "'sslavigne@duke-energy.com'"

                                         <sslavigne@duke-energy.com>,

                                         "'steve.huhman@southernenergy.com'"

                                         <steve.huhman@southernenergy.com>,

                                         "'steve_ponder@fpl.com'"
<steve_ponder@fpl.com>,  
                                         "'susan.scott@enron.com'"

                                         <susan.scott@enron.com>,
"'swatson@socalgas.com'" 
                                         <swatson@socalgas.com>,

                                         "'tdickers@westerngas.com'"

                                         <tdickers@westerngas.com>,

                                         "'tlewis@titanenergy.com'"

                                         <tlewis@titanenergy.com>,
"'tlr@capoil.com'"      
                                         <tlr@capoil.com>,
"'tmiller@ucmohio.com'"         
                                         <tmiller@ucmohio.com>,

                                         "'tobi_rogers@vintagetul.com'"

                                         <tobi_rogers@vintagetul.com>,

                                         "'tod_bradley@powerspring.com'"

                                         <tod_bradley@powerspring.com>,

                                         "'tomb@crossborderenergy.com'"

                                         <tomb@crossborderenergy.com>,

                                         "'tpeterso@energy.state.ca.us'"

                                         <tpeterso@energy.state.ca.us>,

                                         "'tsurak@socalgas.com'"
<tsurak@socalgas.com>,    
                                         "'vhconsult@earthlink.net'"

                                         <vhconsult@earthlink.net>,
"'wng@fpl.com'"        
                                         <wng@fpl.com>, "'worthycg@bp.com'"

                                         <worthycg@bp.com>,
"'yukon95813@aol.com'"         
                                         <yukon95813@aol.com>,
"'zaiontj@bp.com'"          
                                         <zaiontj@bp.com>,
"'abb@eslawfirm.com'"           
                                         <abb@eslawfirm.com>,
"'agoldberg@lgl.twc.com'"    
                                         <agoldberg@lgl.twc.com>,

                                         "'alan_reid@pancanadian.ca'"

                                         <alan_reid@pancanadian.ca>,

                                         "'alfredo.huertas@enron.com'"

                                         <alfredo.huertas@enron.com>,

                                         "'andy.bettwy@swgas.com'"

                                         <andy.bettwy@swgas.com>,
"'ascott@sdge.com'"      
                                         <ascott@sdge.com>,
"'atrowbridge@dbsr.com'"       
                                         <atrowbridge@dbsr.com>,
"'bburns@caiso.com'"      
                                         <bburns@caiso.com>,
"'bdahncke@pcenergy.com'"     
                                         <bdahncke@pcenergy.com>,
"'benledene@aec.ca'"     
                                         <benledene@aec.ca>,
"'bfolsom@avistacorp.com'"    
                                         <bfolsom@avistacorp.com>,
"'bgaillar@enron.com'"  
                                         <bgaillar@enron.com>,

                                         "'bjeider@ci.burbank.ca.us'"

                                         <bjeider@ci.burbank.ca.us>,

                                         "'bmcc@mccarthylaw.com'"
<bmcc@mccarthylaw.com>,  
                                         "'bpedersen@igservice.com'"

                                         <bpedersen@igservice.com>,
"'bradb@calpine.com'"  
                                         <bradb@calpine.com>,
"'btheaker@caiso.com'"       
                                         <btheaker@caiso.com>,

                                         "'candjenterprises@home.com'"

                                         <candjenterprises@home.com>,

                                         "'cdoering@reconcorp.com'"

                                         <cdoering@reconcorp.com>,
"'chilen@llgm.com'"     
                                         <chilen@llgm.com>,
"'chj@aelaw.com'"              
                                         <chj@aelaw.com>,
"'chris.king@utility.com'"       
                                         <chris.king@utility.com>,

                                         "'clower@earthlink.net'"
<clower@earthlink.net>,  
                                         "'cmkehrein@ems-ca.com'"
<cmkehrein@ems-ca.com>,  
                                         "'cottlli@sf.whitecase.com'"

                                         <cottlli@sf.whitecase.com>,
"'cushnice@sce.com'"  
                                         <cushnice@sce.com>,
"'cyowell@ziagroup.com'"      
                                         <cyowell@ziagroup.com>,

                                         "'dalbers@avistacorp.com'"

                                         <dalbers@avistacorp.com>,

                                         "'david.bayless@utility.com'"

                                         <david.bayless@utility.com>,

                                         "'difellman@earthlink.net'"

                                         <difellman@earthlink.net>,
"'dlevine@caiso.com'"  
                                         <dlevine@caiso.com>,
"'douglass@arterhadden.com'" 
                                         <douglass@arterhadden.com>,

                                         "'dwswapp@duke-energy.com'"

                                         <dwswapp@duke-energy.com>,

                                         "'ecrem@ix.netcom.com'"
<ecrem@ix.netcom.com>,    
                                         "'edf@cpuc.ca.gov'"
<edf@cpuc.ca.gov>,            
                                         "'eklinkner@ci.pasadena.ca.us'"

                                         <eklinkner@ci.pasadena.ca.us>,
"'ewo@jmbm.com'"   
                                         <ewo@jmbm.com>,
"'fergusonm@epenergy.com'"        
                                         <fergusonm@epenergy.com>,

                                         "'fogelmanm@steefel.com'"

                                         <fogelmanm@steefel.com>,

 
"'furutanj@efawest.navfac.navy.mil'"              
                                         <furutanj@efawest.navfac.navy.mil>,

                                         "'ghinners@reliantenergy.com'"

                                         <ghinners@reliantenergy.com>,

                                         "'gnstillwagon@tid.org'"
<gnstillwagon@tid.org>,  
                                         "'gpickering@idahopower.com'"

                                         <gpickering@idahopower.com>,
"'gtbl@dynegy.com'"  
                                         <gtbl@dynegy.com>,
"'gwright@sempra.com'"         
                                         <gwright@sempra.com>,

                                         "'haorndorff@aeraenergy.com'"

                                         <haorndorff@aeraenergy.com>,

                                         "'hgleason@energyamerica.com'"

                                         <hgleason@energyamerica.com>,
"'iep@iepa.com'"    
                                         <iep@iepa.com>,
"'igsinc@ix.netcom.com'"          
                                         <igsinc@ix.netcom.com>,
"'inggm@sce.com'"         
                                         <inggm@sce.com>,
"'jaime.ramirez@swgas.com'"      
                                         <jaime.ramirez@swgas.com>,
"'jamesauld@aec.ca'"   
                                         <jamesauld@aec.ca>,
"'jbennett@gmssr.com'"        
                                         <jbennett@gmssr.com>,

                                         "'jcattermole@pcenergy.com'"

                                         <jcattermole@pcenergy.com>,

                                         "'jharrigan@socalgas.com'"

                                         <jharrigan@socalgas.com>,
"'jlinam@socalgas.com'" 
                                         <jlinam@socalgas.com>,
"'jmackay@unitedgas.com'"  
                                         <jmackay@unitedgas.com>,
"'jmct@gmssr.com'"       
                                         <jmct@gmssr.com>, "'jond@qstr.com'"

                                         <jond@qstr.com>, "'joseh@lif.org'"

                                         <joseh@lif.org>,
"'jpjordan@swidlaw.com'"         
                                         <jpjordan@swidlaw.com>,
"'jsqueri@gmssr.com'"     
                                         <jsqueri@gmssr.com>,
"'jsteffen@iid.com'"         
                                         <jsteffen@iid.com>,

                                         "'jtachera@energy.state.ca.us'"

                                         <jtachera@energy.state.ca.us>,

                                         "'jurewijl@sce.com'"
<jurewijl@sce.com>,          
                                         "'jvaccaro@sdge.com'"
<jvaccaro@sdge.com>,        
                                         "'jyoung@igservice.com'"
<jyoung@igservice.com>,  
                                         "'kbhensman@aeraenergy.com'"

                                         <kbhensman@aeraenergy.com>,

 
"'keith-sappenfield@reliantenergy.com'"           
 
<keith-sappenfield@reliantenergy.com>,            
                                         "'kfyip@seiworldwide.com'"

                                         <kfyip@seiworldwide.com>,

                                         "'kirk.t.morgan@wgp.twc.com'"

                                         <kirk.t.morgan@wgp.twc.com>,
"'kmills@cfbf.com'"  
                                         <kmills@cfbf.com>,
"'kpoole@adamsbroadwell.com'"  
                                         <kpoole@adamsbroadwell.com>,

                                         "'kschellin@mtpower.com'"

                                         <kschellin@mtpower.com>,
"'ljhubbard@sempra.com'" 
                                         <ljhubbard@sempra.com>,
"'lmh@eslawfirm.com'"     
                                         <lmh@eslawfirm.com>,

                                         "'lynn.g.dahlberg@wgp.twc.com'"

                                         <lynn.g.dahlberg@wgp.twc.com>,

                                         "'mark.c.moench@wgp.twc.com'"

                                         <mark.c.moench@wgp.twc.com>,

                                         "'mcclintocke@epenergy.com'"

                                         <mcclintocke@epenergy.com>,

 
"'michael-briggs@reliantenergy.com'"              
                                         <michael-briggs@reliantenergy.com>,

                                         "'mjaske@energy.state.ca.us'"

                                         <mjaske@energy.state.ca.us>,
"'mpa@aelaw.com'"    
                                         <mpa@aelaw.com>,
"'mpocino@rcgroup.com'"          
                                         <mpocino@rcgroup.com>,

                                         "'mrokose@energyamerica.com'"

                                         <mrokose@energyamerica.com>,

                                         "'mtran@energy.state.ca.us'"

                                         <mtran@energy.state.ca.us>,
"'nge@value.net'"     
                                         <nge@value.net>,
"'office@mccarthylaw.com'"       
                                         <office@mccarthylaw.com>,
"'oro@cpuc.ca.gov'"     
                                         <oro@cpuc.ca.gov>,
"'oshirock@pacbell.net'"       
                                         <oshirock@pacbell.net>,
"'paul.macavoy@yale.edu'" 
                                         <paul.macavoy@yale.edu>,
"'phanschen@mofo.com'"   
                                         <phanschen@mofo.com>,
"'phildavies@aec.ca'"       
                                         <phildavies@aec.ca>,
"'pjpowerlaw@aol.com'"       
                                         <pjpowerlaw@aol.com>,
"'plg@cpuc.ca.gov'"         
                                         <plg@cpuc.ca.gov>,
"'pmoritzburke@cera.com'"      
                                         <pmoritzburke@cera.com>,
"'porterdk@sce.com'"     
                                         <porterdk@sce.com>,
"'pstohr@dbsr.com'"           
                                         <pstohr@dbsr.com>,
"'rbw@mrwassoc.com'"           
                                         <rbw@mrwassoc.com>,
"'rcooper@usg.com'"           
                                         <rcooper@usg.com>,
"'rczahar@aol.com'"            
                                         <rczahar@aol.com>,

                                         "'regaffairs@sf.whitecase.com'"

                                         <regaffairs@sf.whitecase.com>,

                                         "'rfoss@coral-energy.com'"

                                         <rfoss@coral-energy.com>,

                                         "'rgloistein@orrick.com'"

                                         <rgloistein@orrick.com>,
"'rhc@mrwassoc.com'"     
                                         <rhc@mrwassoc.com>,
"'richard.jordan@swgas.com'"  
                                         <richard.jordan@swgas.com>,

                                         "'rick.counihan@greenmountain.com'"

                                         <rick.counihan@greenmountain.com>,
"Litteneker,   
                                         Randall (Law)" <RJL9@pge.com>,

                                         "'rmccann@cal.net'"
<rmccann@cal.net>,            
                                         "'robertg@greenlining.org'"

                                         <robertg@greenlining.org>,

                                         "'roger_tisdale@oxy.com'"

                                         <roger_tisdale@oxy.com>,
"'ronknecht@aol.com'"    
                                         <ronknecht@aol.com>,
"'rpetti@ladwp.com'"         
                                         <rpetti@ladwp.com>,
"'rshively@enerdynamics.com'" 
                                         <rshively@enerdynamics.com>,

                                         "'rtask@reliantenergy.com'"

                                         <rtask@reliantenergy.com>,
"'scarter@nrdc.org'"   
                                         <scarter@nrdc.org>,
"'sedgar@socalgas.com'"       
                                         <sedgar@socalgas.com>,
"'simonsen@rmi.net'"       
                                         <simonsen@rmi.net>,
"'skatz@sempratrading.com'"   
                                         <skatz@sempratrading.com>,

                                         "'smcfadden@igservice.com'"

                                         <smcfadden@igservice.com>,
"'sneiman483@aol.com'" 
                                         <sneiman483@aol.com>,
"'spb1@cwclaw.com'"         
                                         <spb1@cwclaw.com>,

                                         "'stomashe@energy.state.ca.us'"

                                         <stomashe@energy.state.ca.us>,

                                         "'stringham@capp.ca'"
<stringham@capp.ca>,        
                                         "'tgary@pcenergy.com'"
<tgary@pcenergy.com>,      
                                         "'thamilto@enron.com'"
<thamilto@enron.com>,      
                                         "'thompson@wrightlaw.com'"

                                         <thompson@wrightlaw.com>,

                                         "'toca@utility-savings.com'"

                                         <toca@utility-savings.com>,

                                         "'tom.roth@et.pge.com'"
<tom.roth@et.pge.com>,    
                                         "'tsolberg@spurr.org'"
<tsolberg@spurr.org>,      
                                         "Berkovitz, Trista" <TxB6@pge.com>,
"Williams,    
                                         Ray" <RDW0@pge.com>, "Buchner, Les"

                                         <LDB4@pge.com>, "Campbell,
Benjamin"              
                                         <BCC3@pge.com>, "Bellenger,
Geoffrey"             
                                         <GJB2@pge.com>, "Morrison, Darcy"
<D2Mr@pge.com>  
                                         Subject:     Re: CGT Gas Accord II
Team           
 

Once again I implore you to put at stop to this madness and hold any
further "Gas Accord II" settlement
discussions in abeyance until the current electricity crisis has
abated.  There is neither the time nor the mental capacity to deal with all

of these issues at the same time.  For God's sake, STOP
IT!!!                                                              Mike
Florio

At 12:49 PM 1/4/2001 -0800, Lindh, Frank (Law) wrote:

>                         CONFIDENTIAL SETTLEMENT DOCUMENT
>                         PER CPUC RULE 51
>
>ALL INTERESTED PARTIES:
>
>This is a reminder that PG&E will hold the first Gas Accord II Workshop of
>the new year on Wednesday and Thursday, January 10 and 11.  The workshop
>will be held at PG&E headquarters in San Francisco, 77 Beale Street, in
>Conference Room 300.
>
>Our objective for this workshop is to review and explain PG&E's
>comprehensive settlement proposal, which was distributed by e-mail on
>December 21, 2000, to those parties who have explicitly agreed to abide by
>CPUC Rule 51.
>
>If you did not receive a copy of the December 21 transmittal and would
like
>one, please complete the attached Rule 51 form and return it by e-mail to
>Frank Lindh (frl3@pge.com) and Geoff Bellenger (gjb2@pge.com), or by FAX
to
>Geoff at 415-973-0881.
>
>Because we will be discussing the substance of PG&E's settlement proposal
at
>next week's workshop, any party who wishes to attend will be required to
>have completed the Rule 51 form.  (Please note, if you received our
December
>21 transmittal, then that means PG&E has your Rule 51 form on file, so
there
>is no need to fill it out again.)
>
>Also attached below is a proposed Agenda for next week's workshop.  We
will
>start the sessions at 9:30 a.m. on Wednesday and at 9:00 a.m. on Thursday.
>We will provide coffee and juice in the morning, and lunch each day.
>
>If you do plan to attend next week's workshop, we request that you please
>confirm your attendance, so that we can get a headcount for the food and
>drink orders.  Please e-mail a response to Darcy Morrison (D2Mr@pge.com),
or
>telephone Darcy at (415) 973-6644.
>
>We look forward to seeing you next week and having a productive
discussion.
>
>
>Frank Lindh                             Ray Williams
>415-973-2776                            415-973-3634
>frl3@pge.com                            rdw0@pge.com
>
>  <<Gas Accord II Information Form.doc>>  <<Agenda 1-10&11-01
Workshop.doc>>
>
>
>

Mike:  This should offer a guide to developing legislation that narrows PUC 
review of utility purchases to approval of the competitive solicitation used 
by the utility to procure the contracts.  We have consistently argued against 
being prescriptive (i.e., the contracts should be of 3 years long, less than 
$60/MWH, etc.)

	Cynthia Sandherr
	01/05/2001 04:10 PM
		 
> Contact: Samantha Jordan
>                (202) 225-2002
> Date:      Friday, January 5, 2001
>
> Statement RE: Electricity Price Concerns in California
>
>  "Electricity restructuring, in principle, did not cause the problems
> California is experiencing -- it just exposed them more obviously to
> consumers there.  California did not deregulate properly, nor did it
> ensure a sufficient power supply.
>
>  The state framework in place in California created a situation
> allowing for almost zero growth in generation and almost zero growth in
> transmission at a time when the service region's population was growing
> substantially.  The strict process to obtain permits or new licenses
> limits interest in constructing new power plants and transmission lines.
> California's stringent environmental standards, the most rigid in the
> nation, restrict the interest of new providers wishing to enter the
> market.  The California legislation was therefore enacted in an
> environment in which consumers were not encouraged to limit usage, demand
> continued to increase and the power reserves began to deplete.  The
> surrounding states, strapped by their own growth, have been unable to
> provide additional power supplies to California at a reasonable cost.
>
>  Unfortunately, the Clinton Administration and the California
> government had an opportunity as early as last summer to foresee this
> oversight and make changes that would have helped stave off this
> situation, however they chose not to make the fundamental changes
> necessary.  The problems in the state's market were obvious months ago and
> earlier action could have avoided a crisis.  The actions now necessary did
> not need to be this painful.
>
>  Governor Davis should be looking for a practical, California-based
> solution rather than name-calling, threatening and playing politics with
> the pocketbooks of his consumers and stockholders.  It is very important
> to keep independent generators of power interested in selling to
> California -- these crucial participants should not be scared away when
> California needs power the most.
>
>  When the 107th Congress convenes for business, it is my intention to
> hold a series of hearings, focusing not only on the California situation,
> but the overall energy situation in the United States.  I have also
> requested a meeting with Bush officials to discuss these issues, and
> develop a plan of action to deal with them, as soon as the Administration
> is formally in place."
>
>
> -U.S. Representative Joe Barton (R-TX)
>
> As Chairman of the House Commerce Subcommittee on Energy & Power, Barton
> was responsible for the first comprehensive electricity deregulation
> package to pass a House Subcommittee.  He is expected to be re-appointed
> to this chairmanship in the 107th Congress, where he will have House
> jurisdiction over all energy matters.     

Thanks.  I'll touch base withJulee at IEP.

Thanks, Harry.  I want to re-enforce the switching issue, since EES is likely 
to be very focused on moving customers back to the utility on Tuesday.  
Switching would certainly reduce EES' going-forward exposure to 1) growing 
"credit receivables" that the utilities refuse to pay and 2) the risk that 
the Commission will end the rate freeze altogether---and the PX credit with 
it--as part of the hearing process that commences with the pre-hearing 
conference on Wednesday.  Reducing that exposure is clealry important to EES.

But the utilities' ability to resist taking back customers is likely to be 
significant, particularly since 90% of the volumes that we serve are on Enron 
meters.  Imagine the road blocks that the utility can/will construct over the 
"complex process"  of changing-out the meters.  In addition, when CA border 
gas prices spiked several weeks ago, many large gas customers tried to switch 
from noncore to core service on SoCalGas' system.  SoCalGas submitted an 
emergency motion at the Commission to prevent the switching and the 
Commission granted it in the wink of an eye.

It will be important for EES to drill down fairly deeply in its analysis of 
all the ways that the utility can frustrate any switching.  Otherwise, we may 
find ourselves confronting a lot of negative PR without having reduced any of 
EES' exposure.  Customers who have been unwillingly switched back to the 
utility have become very vocal about their displeasure and have turned 
negative on ESPs as a result.

Best,
Jeff

	Harry Kingerski
	01/07/2001 11:21 AM
		 
These 3 issues will be discussed at your Tuesday afternoon meeting with EES:

what to do about forcing the utilities to pay delinquent PX credits
Through December, the total arrearage is about $220M total, mostly from 
PG&E.  Neither utility is paying.  Vicki Sharpe is lining up bankruptcy 
counsel.

should the new 1 cent surcharge be passed on to our customers
Vicki has not said yet whether our contracts allow passthrough, although she 
has hinted it would require a very aggressive interpretation of the contract.
 
should we try to return our customers to utility bundled service
Aside from the modifications to our customer contracts that have to take 
place, an even stickier issue is to get the utilities to take them back.  
Even if the utilities are required to do so, forms have to be processed and 
meters have to be changed out.  (We have our own meters on our accounts.)  
This could not happen quickly.  Of course, this action mitigates against the 
risk of the rate freeze ending but does nothing for the credit problem, other 
than to keep the exposure from getting larger.

On Wednesday, there will be a pre-hearing conference at the CPUC on the next 
phase of the end-the-rate-freeze case.  Jeff and I have talked about this and 
think we can decide what our involvement will be (witnesses, positions, etc.) 
after a schedule is set.  For now, the strategy is to make sure the CPUC on 
Wednesday adopts a schedule that deals with all the issues they must deal 
with about the rate freeze. 

(Rick, I will be in San Francisco through Wednesday meeting with Mike Day and 
working with Roger Yang to identify all those issues.)
 

Greetings and Happy New Year to you both.

Eve:  Has the sub-group met since things were put on hold a few weeks ago?  
If so, I'm very interested in hearing about what's going on.  If the group is 
going to meet between now and the 16th, I'm also very interested in 
participating in those meetings.  Delaney, I'll be attending the meeting on 
the 16th.  The Angelides proposal has certainly spiced things up--just what 
we need, more David Freeman.......

Best to you and yours in the New Year.
Jeff

	"Delaney Hunter" <dhunter@smithandkempton.com>
	01/05/2001 06:19 PM
	Please respond to dhunter
		 
California Energy Solutions Group
980 Ninth Street, Suite 1560
Sacramento, CA 95814
(916) 446-5508    v     (916) 446-1499
djsmith@smithandkempton.com

~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~

?IMPORTANT MEETING NOTICE?

Date:      January 5, 2001

Our next general meeting is scheduled for:

Tuesday, January 16, 2001
9:30 a.m. - 1:30 p.m.
California Farm Bureau - Conference Room
2300 River Plaza Drive
Sacramento

We will be discussing all relevant actions of the Governor, Legislature and
CPUC as well as focusing on the draft work plan developed by the
subcommittee headed up by Evie Elsesser.  We anticipate circulating the
subcommittee draft several days before the meeting for your information.

As always, please contact us as soon as possible with any agenda items that
you would like included or any other questions and concerns regarding this
meeting.

Sounds like a good idea.  

	Vicki Sharp@EES
	01/07/2001 12:12 PM
		
Can we discuss this on the MOnday call?  

JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com> on 01/05/2001 04:21:14 PM
Something I forgot to mention in the last e-mail regarding PG&E's Advice
Letter implementing the surcharge is that they  appear to have gone a step
beyond what the Commission directed them to do.

The Commission directed them to create a balancing account to track the
revenues obtained from the surcharge (just in case, in the unlikely event,
they have to refund them).  PG&E created the balancing account for this
purpose but also stated that they would transfer (on a monthly basis) any
ongoing procurement costs which were not recovered through the TRA (i.e.,
from ongoing revenues) to this new balancing account as well.  It is unclear
what PG&E's purpose is for doing such except  maybe to stop the
undercollection in the TRA from getting any bigger and hope that they will
have a better shot of recovering undercollections in the new balancing
account.

Again let us know if you want us to comment on the advice letter with
respect to this issue and the direct access issue mentioned in the previous
e-mail.  Energy Division only has five business days to review the Advice
Filing -- so any comments/protest of the filing must go in early next week.

Jeanne Bennett

you STILL there?!

It might be a good idea to have a conference call to discuss the state 
treasurer's proposal released last Friday.  A summary is attached.  If folks 
agree that a call would be useful, does Noon PST (on Monday) work?

Best,
Jeff

FYI.  More info to follow.  I'll give you a ring (tomorrow).

Best,
Jeff
=09"Stephen P. Bowen" <stevebowen@earthlink.net>
=0901/07/2001 09:46 PM
=09Please respond to stevebowen
=09=09=20
PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION

Jeff,

Per your request, I am writing a brief note to follow up on our
telephone conversation today.  As we discussed, Enron plans to change
the structure of Enron Telecommunications, Inc. from a regular C
corporation to an LLC.  As we discussed previously, this change in
structure will require the approval of the California Public Utilities
Commission, because it is a change of control under the definitions of
the Public Utilities Code.  You indicated that someone inside Enron was
concerned that, during the course of the CPUC=01,s review of the request
for transfer of control, the CPUC could get access to the books and tax
returns of ETI=01,s parent EBS or other Enron entities, which Enron would
find unattractive.  You asked me to discuss whether this was possible.

At a general level, the CPUC in the past has asserted jurisdiction over
entities affiliated with entities regulated by the CPUC.  Depending on
the facts at hand, a variety of provisions in the PU Code grant this
jurisdiction.  However, the CPUC rarely uses its jurisdiction to look
into the books and tax returns of an affiliate of a nondominant
telecommunications carrier, unless the affiliate is the entity seeking
to acquire control of the carrier.  For nondominant telecommunications
carriers, the Commission applies a fairly light regulatory touch,
because such carriers have no market power.  You should also be aware
that there are other provisions in the PU Code that protect carrier's
financial information from public disclosure.

Thus, although it is possible that the Commission would seek to review
the books and/or tax returns of EBS or another Enron entity in
connection with the change to an LLC, it is unlikely.  ETI is a
nondominant carrier, and there is no real change in the ownership of
ETI, because EBS will still be ETI=01,s owner (i.e., EBS will own an LLC,
rather than a C corporation), nor is there any change in the management
personnel of ETI.

The one wild card is that Enron's name is quite well known to the
Commission because of Enron's presence in the energy market.  While this
logically and legally should make no difference, it could conceivably
trigger increased Commission scrutiny of the transfer of control.

Please let me know if you need more information or want to discuss
further.

SPB

Thanks again.  Apologies for bothering you over the weekend.

Best,
Jeff

=09"Stephen P. Bowen" <stevebowen@earthlink.net>
=0901/07/2001 09:46 PM
=09Please respond to stevebowen
=09=09=20
PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION

Jeff,

Per your request, I am writing a brief note to follow up on our
telephone conversation today.  As we discussed, Enron plans to change
the structure of Enron Telecommunications, Inc. from a regular C
corporation to an LLC.  As we discussed previously, this change in
structure will require the approval of the California Public Utilities
Commission, because it is a change of control under the definitions of
the Public Utilities Code.  You indicated that someone inside Enron was
concerned that, during the course of the CPUC=01,s review of the request
for transfer of control, the CPUC could get access to the books and tax
returns of ETI=01,s parent EBS or other Enron entities, which Enron would
find unattractive.  You asked me to discuss whether this was possible.

At a general level, the CPUC in the past has asserted jurisdiction over
entities affiliated with entities regulated by the CPUC.  Depending on
the facts at hand, a variety of provisions in the PU Code grant this
jurisdiction.  However, the CPUC rarely uses its jurisdiction to look
into the books and tax returns of an affiliate of a nondominant
telecommunications carrier, unless the affiliate is the entity seeking
to acquire control of the carrier.  For nondominant telecommunications
carriers, the Commission applies a fairly light regulatory touch,
because such carriers have no market power.  You should also be aware
that there are other provisions in the PU Code that protect carrier's
financial information from public disclosure.

Thus, although it is possible that the Commission would seek to review
the books and/or tax returns of EBS or another Enron entity in
connection with the change to an LLC, it is unlikely.  ETI is a
nondominant carrier, and there is no real change in the ownership of
ETI, because EBS will still be ETI=01,s owner (i.e., EBS will own an LLC,
rather than a C corporation), nor is there any change in the management
personnel of ETI.

The one wild card is that Enron's name is quite well known to the
Commission because of Enron's presence in the energy market.  While this
logically and legally should make no difference, it could conceivably
trigger increased Commission scrutiny of the transfer of control.

Please let me know if you need more information or want to discuss
further.

SPB

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/03/2001 08:08 PM
		
Attached are the final versions of confidential materials provided to the 
Governor's office.

Best,
Jeff

FYI.  It's been reported that the legislative committee intends to subpoena 
generators and marketers to testify before the committe, though nothing in 
this press release mentions any subpoenas.

Jeff
	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	01/08/2001 06:00 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
For Immediate Release:January 8, 2001
Contact: Paul Hefner
Phone:(916) 319-2408

Speaker Hertzberg Names Committee To Handle Energy Crisis. Members Will
Organize Statewide Public Hearings, Examine Financial Practices and Craft
Policy.

SACRAMENTO - Working quickly to address the state's energy crisis, Assembly
Speaker Robert M. Hertzberg (D-Van Nuys) and
Assembly Minority Leader Bill Campbell (R-Villa Park) announced today the
formation of a new committee that will hold public hearings across
the state, shape legislation and probe financial practices among utilities
and generators.

"The public deserves to know what went wrong. They deserve to know where the
money went. They deserve answers, and we are going to get
them," Speaker Hertzberg said. "In addition, members of the committee will
hold hearings around the state to assess the impact of this crisis in
every region of California."

"I applaud the Speaker's decision to form a special committee to address the
energy crisis," said Minority Leader Campbell (R-Villa Park). "He
has indicated a desire to make the committee bi-partisan and Republicans
look forward to working cooperatively to resolve the significant
energy crisis that California faces."

Aside from shaping the state's energy policy during the special session, the
Assembly Committee on Energy Costs and Availability will hold
public hearings across the state, seeking comment from ratepayers,
small-business owners and consumers on how the energy crunch is affecting
them.

"This committee's first priority regarding the setting of rates for electric
power will be price stability," said Assemblymember Roderick D. Wright
(D-South Central Los Angeles), who Speaker Hertzberg named as Chairman of
the Assembly Committee on Energy Costs and Availability.
"This deregulation experiment has been risky and expensive, and has put the
economic well-being of this state in jeopardy."

The committee will work with the staff of the Speaker's Office of Oversight
to determine how utility companies have spent the money they
received for their stranded costs, and what generators have done with their
dramatic influx of cash.

"The public has a right to know where that money has gone," said
Assemblymember Darrell Steinburg. "We will conduct a thorough
investigation to determine just that."

The Speaker noted that David Wiggs, who helped restructure the Los Angeles
Department of Water and Power in 1997, has been retained as
an advisor to the committee. Wiggs will help the committee sort through
market reforms and oversight of past utility spending. Wiggs is a retired
chairman of El Paso Electric Co. and an experienced advisor for issues
related to the electric utility industry. He is largely credited for leading
El
Paso Electric through a multi-year bankruptcy proceeding.

"There is no doubt that the state's consumers are faced with the most
serious energy crisis in decades," said Assembly Speaker pro Tem Fred
Keeley (D- Boulder Creek). "We are focused on market reforms, demand
responsiveness measures and measures to stabilize the energy
supplies. Consumers will only genuinely be protected from increasing energy
prices when substantive reforms of the market place are adopted
and take hold. Specifically we must, through legislative and regulatory
actions, reform the way electricity is bought and sold and the way we
contract for power on a long-term basis."

Speaker Hertzberg named the following additional members to the new
committee:

  Assemblymember Anthony Pescetti (R-Rancho Cordova) (Vice-chair)
  Assembly Speaker pro Tem Fred Keeley (D-Boulder Creek)
  Assemblymember Darrell Steinberg (D-Sacramento)
  Assemblymember Juan Vargas (D-National City)
  Assemblymember Jenny Oropeza (D-Long Beach)
  Assemblymember Manny Diaz (D-San Jose)
  Assemblymember Charlete Zettel (R-Poway)
  Assemblymember Keith Richman (R-Los Angeles)
  Assemblymember Richard Dickerson (R-Redding)
  Assemblymember Joe Canciamilla (D-Pittsburg)
  Assemblymember John Dutra (D-Fremont)
  Assemblymember Hannah-Beth Jackson (D-Santa Barbara)
  Assemblymember Carole Migden (D-San Francisco)
  Assemblymember Sarah Reyes (D-Fresno)
  Assemblymember Bill Leonard (R-Rancho Cucamonga)
  Assemblymember John Campbell (R-Orange County)
  Assemblymember Mike Briggs (R-Clovis)

                                                    ####

                                       ASSEMBLYMEMBER ROBERT HERTZBERG
                                            40TH ASSEMBLY DISTRICT
                             Capitol Office: P.O. Box 942849 -- Sacramento,
CA 94249-0001 -- (916) 319-2040
                        District Office: 6150 Van Nuys Boulevard, Suite
305 -- Van Nuys, CA 91401 -- (818) 376-4040

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Attached are my updates to Steve's backgrounder and solutions documents.  
I've also attached (for Rick) the summary of the CA State Treasurer's 
proposal.

Best,
Jeff

FYI.  See comments on keeping the utilities out of bankruptcy and timing.

Jeff
	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	01/09/2001 09:25 AM
		 
The New York Times
January 9, 2001 

Governor Pledges to Save California From Power Crisis
By JAMES STERNGOLD
 
SACRAMENTO, Jan. 8 * Calling California's two-year experiment in electricity 
deregulation a "colossal and dangerous failure," Gov. Gray Davis proposed 
several major steps today to reassert the state's control over its power 
market, including the creation of a new state energy authority that could buy 
generating plants from private utilities and build new plants. 

In his annual address to the California legislature, Mr. Davis, a Democrat, 
also promised that he would not allow California's two largest private 
utilities to continue their recent slide toward bankruptcy, saying that he 
would use all the state's powers, including taking control of power plants 
and transmission grids if necessary, to keep the system working. 

"We will regain control over the power that's generated in California and 
commit it to the public good," he said in his speech this evening in the 
Assembly chambers here.

Mr. Davis's proposals will now be debated by a state legislature that has 
already been considering even stronger measures to tame soaring wholesale 
electricity prices and power shortages in many parts of the state.

The governor's plans represent a startling turnaround from the mood that 
existed four years ago when the deregulation plan passed the legislature 
unanimously on promises that market forces would bring power costs down * a 
drastic miscalculation, as it turned out. 

Mr. Davis's proposals are bolder than many political experts had anticipated 
from a centrist governor who has made his mark as a cautious pragmatist more 
likely to believe in market forces than state control. But some members of 
the state's heavily Democratic legislature said they were inclined to move 
even further than the creation of a state power authority that could become a 
major electricity generator.

"That's something we've already been pushing and we'll consider other 
measures, too," said John Burton, president of the State Senate. "Drastic 
times call for bold measures."

Governor Davis suggested that, if necessary, he would consider far stronger 
measures. "Everyone should understand that there are other, more drastic 
measures that I am prepared to take if I have to," he said.

In his speech, the governor left unstated precisely what he would do in the 
short term to prop up the state's two largest utilities, Pacific Gas and 
Electric and Southern California Edison.

But, as he has in the past, he focused most of his venom at the out- of-state 
companies that sell power into the deregulated market here, as well as the 
federal government, which last month lifted the cap on wholesale prices for 
electricity. 

"I reject the irresponsible notion that we can afford to allow our major 
utilities to go bankrupt," he said. "Our fate is tied to their fate."

The power utilities have been caught in a dangerous vise as they pay soaring 
prices for power on the wholesale market but can charge consumers far less 
than their costs because of state price caps.

The utilities have said that they have lost more than $11 billion already 
because of this situation, and that the gap will drive them into bankruptcy 
if they do not receive some government relief.

Governor Davis and other state officials are scheduled to meet at the White 
House Tuesday afternoon with top federal energy and economic officials in an 
effort to win federal help in creating a new cap on wholesale power prices. 

In his speech, the governor said he would push for new laws under which power 
generators that deliberately withheld supplies from the market to force 
prices up could be criminally prosecuted.

He also said he would seek to offer utilities and other institutions low- 
cost loans to finance the refurbishment of old power plants and the 
construction of new ones. In return, he said, the producers would guarantee 
that the power would be sold within the state. He even said that all state 
universities and community colleges would build co-generating facilities, and 
become energy independent. 

One measure not in the governor's speech was a proposal sought by the 
utilitiesto have the state float bonds and use the proceeds to help finance 
the losses the power companies have been sustaining. The governor's aides 
said that the measure might still be considered but that it was not near the 
top of Mr. Davis's agenda.

In the $1 billion overall energy plan, Governor Davis suggested two possible 
paths for a new state power authority. One would create a joint authority 
with the 30 municipal power authorities already operating around California; 
the other would create a stand-alone state authority. That agency would sell 
electricity only within the state and at a small margin above the cost of 
producing it. 

Governor Davis also proposed spending $250 million for a conservation program 
aimed at consumers that would, among other things, offer rebates to encourage 
people to replace old refrigerators, air conditioners and washers with 
energy-efficient models. 

The details of most of these issues are to be worked out in a special session 
of the legislature that the governor called several days ago.

Fred Keeley, a Democrat and the No. 2 official in the State Assembly, said 
that lawmakers have what they believe is about a two- or three-week window of 
opportunity to fashion a solution that calms the financial markets, brings 
some greater long- term order to the power business and pulls the utilities 
back from the brink of bankruptcy.

The power crisis comes as the state's fiscal health is already being affected 
by the slowing economy, somewhat limiting the governor's options.

Because of the vibrant economy of the past year, the state is expected to 
produce a surplus in the fiscal year that ends June 30 of roughly $12 
billion, an unprecedented windfall. The roughly $100 billion budget that Mr. 
Davis is scheduled to deliver on Wednesday is expected to include a surplus 
of perhaps $5 billion. 

Still, the governor proposed today new spending on his signature issue, 
education, and said he would push to improve middle schools by extending the 
school year for sixth, seventh and eight grades to 210 days, from 180 days.

He is also proposing a big increase in the amount of special training 
teachers receive every year, programs to increase the number of algebra 
teachers, an initiative focused on the demands of the high- technology 
economy, and more training for principals and vice principals. 

The energy crisis has created enormous risks for Mr. Davis, a politician who 
has built his long career in public service largely on risk-aversion. Since 
being elected governor two years ago, he has worked hard to construct an 
image as a roll-up-the- sleeves new Democrat and has shrewdly avoided steps 
that would permit Republicans to brand him a liberal, much like the tactic 
President Clinton employed.

In fact, Bill Campbell, the Republican leader in the Assembly, said, Governor 
Davis had co-opted part of his party's agenda, similar to the way President 
Clinton had, by taking the lead on conservative issues like law and order.

"He ran as a centrist and he's very much tried to stay that way," said Mr. 
Campbell. "When his opponents have tried to tag him with some label, it 
doesn't work."

Before tonight's speech, however, Mr. Campbell said that, if Mr. Davis did 
advocate strong state intervention in the energy market, Republicans would 
likely criticize the move as a liberal initiative. "Oh, absolutely you'll 
hear that," he said.

The Democrats, though, control both the Assembly and the Senate and, given 
the growing public anger over rising energy prices, political experts said at 
least some Republicans were bound to follow the governor's lead.

There were other signs that the crisis could be taking a political toll on 
the governor, who has been frequently mentioned as a possible presidential 
contender in 2004. 

A recent poll by The Los Angeles Times showed the governor's approval rating 
had slipped to 49 percent now from 67 percent in February, apparently in 
large part because of the power crisis.

Mark Baldassare, a senior fellow at the Public Policy Institute of California 
who regularly surveys voter attitudes, said Governor Davis's approval rating 
in his polls was at 66 percent as recently as September. But, Mr. Baldassare 
said, he had also detected signs it was declining because of public concerns 
over the rising prices and power shortages.

Two years into his four-year term, the power crisis could thus have a deep 
impact on Governor Davis's reputation and his future prospects. He has been 
perceived as largely reactive, as well as exceptionally deliberate and slow. 

"It would be hard to find someone better prepared, if you look at his 
r,sum,," Mr. Keeley, of the Assembly, said, referring to the fact that 
Governor Davis has spent virtually his entire career in public service, as 
everything from Gov. Jerry Brown's chief of staff to the state controller to 
lieutenant governor. 

"But," Mr. Keeley added, "this is a governor who doesn't expend political 
capital without a great deal of deliberation and anguish. Until this crisis, 
that has been fine. He has focused on issues that were best dealt with that 
way. But this is a genuine crisis and it will test his leadership skills as 
nothing before has. It will test whether he can transcend his natural 
inclination to be very cautious."

The rapid pace of events has also exposed holes in government policy and 
given other politicians an opportunity to take the lead. For instance, late 
last week, Philip Angelides, the state's ambitious treasurer, proposed the 
creation of a state authority to buy power generators and intercede in the 
marketplace.

"This is on one level a complicated issue and on another a simple issue," 
said Mr. Angelides, who stressed bold action in an interview today. "It would 
be fair to characterize the state's energy policy until now as hoping for 
mild weather. That isn't going to work."

What other lawmakers here stressed was that the crisis was going to require 
close cooperation between the legislature and the governor. While Mr. Davis 
has proven a strong-willed but effective partner, some lawmakers complain 
that he has been difficult to reach face to face and can thus appear remote.

You've got my vote.

FYI.  Today Craig Barrett, CEO of Intel, publicly opposed the "state 
takeover" plan released by California's Treasurer last Friday, saying,  "I'm 
not a great fan of government getting involved in the private sector, 
especially delivering a key commodity to the private sector."
(SF Chronicle, 01.09.01)

Might be a good opportunity to try in earnest to enlist Silicon Valley in our 
efforts to get California moving in the right direction, despite itself.

Barrett said the answer is easing siting rules in order to get more power on 
line sooner and blamed officials who've opposed power plants for seriously 
exacerbating the problems in California.

Because of CA' power woes, Barrett said that he'd build new facilities 
anywhere but in California.

Jeff

	Karen Denne
	01/09/2001 03:02 PM
		 
The following is a draft reactive statement to Gov. Davis' State of the State 
address last night.  If you have any comments or changes, please let me know 
so I can route a final version.  Thanks! kd

We're disappointed with Gov. Davis' plan to address the energy crisis in 
California.  While the governor has shown some recognition of the problem, 
which is simply an issue of supply and demand, we disagree with his proposed 
solutions.  There are four problems in the California market: excess reliance 
on spot markets, insufficient demand side response, insufficient supplies, 
and financially unstable institutions.   The solutions, simply put, should be 
to decrease demand, increase supply, reduce exposure to spot prices and 
provide financial support to the utilities.  Gov. Davis' eight points do not 
address the fundamental supply and demand issue.  Furthermore, the governor's 
rhetoric detracts from implementing real solutions.  

If pressed on specifics:
Rather than mandating sales of power in-state, California would be better 
served by providing the utilities with strong incentives to enter into 
long-term contracts and by requiring them to buy some portion of their 
forward requirements from new in-state generation.  
We do not understand how Gov. Davis has the constitutionality to mandate the 
flow of electricity into California, particularly in states that export to 
California.  
The governor failed to address the credit issue of the state's two utilities 
(possible solution:near-term credit guarantees). 

Mike:
Here's the memo on PX-based pricing for QFs that we discussed.  If you have 
any questions, don't hestitate to get in touch.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks, Ginger.  I'll be on the call.  

Rick, if your schedule permits, could you participate in the first five-ten 
minutes of the daily EES call (10 AM CST) to give those folks a brief 
snapshot of what happened?  If so the call-in number is 800.713.8600, code = 
80435#.  

Alternatively, since I'll be on the call anyway, you can leave me a 
voicemail, or call me at 707.884.4608, and I can relay those points that you 
feel are most important to communicate.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks, Sandi.  Are the R's generally on-board with Davis' approach, or do 
they intend to offer their own proposals (understanding that they are greatly 
outnumbered in both houses).  I'm hearing that it's a mixed bag.

Best,
Jeff

	Sandra McCubbin
	01/09/2001 07:48 PM
		
we have been talking to haynes and the other republicans 

I'll do my darnedest.  Is Jan handling this poorly or well?

Thanks, Mike. About the best we can hope for at this point and consistent 
with our approach.  Would be very beneficial if we could ride as much as 
possible in TURN's public wake, and continue to "advise" them and work with 
others behind the scenes.

Hey buddy.  I know that you're up in Sacramento and have a much better lay of 
the land than I, but this looks a like a sure fire set up for "the man for 
all seasons" to make an appearance before the legislature.  I have deep 
concerns about us sticking our necks out at these hearings.  Again, have much 
better info, but by all accounts, "witch hunt" seems to be the operative term 
for the hearings.  We are doing very well for ourselves working behind the 
scenes and the risks to us of having someone at a public leg hearing, with 
all the cameras, and all the politicians feeling the primordial urge to 
grandstand are very high.  Let's please discuss this one long and hard before 
making an decision.  I'll be in Sac on the 16th for an AB 1890 Group meeting 
and plan to attend the hearing.

Your pal,
Jeff

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/09/2001 05:15 PM
		 
There will be an oversight subcommittee of the new committee formed to
shape energy policy in the Special Session.  In a meeting today,
Assembly Member Darryl Steinberg, who will Chair the subcommittee, told
us he expects to hold two hearings to "track the money" between
utilities, geneators and wholesalers.  He hopes to wait until after the
completion of the PUC audit, unless that audit drags on longer than the
next week or so.  He is planning a "constructive investigation" and
pledges to be fair.  The subcommttee will be staffed by the Speakers
Office of Oversight.

Also, Enron has been invited to testify at an informational hearing of
the Assembly Utilities and Commerce Committee on January 16, 2001.  The
general topiic is how supply and demand affect the California market and
what options are available for new or repowered generation in
California.

Thanks, Julee.  Sounds like a good idea.  Could you please forward me the 
call-in for the call?  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks.  Any way to observe remotely?  CSPAN?  Telephone?  Internet?  From a 
cafe in Paris?  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

Harry, I'll be on the call and I'll call you beforehand.  Mike Day has every 
financial incentive for us to have a witness, and I'm still struggling to 
find the value.  As for the "save the planet" crew....I'm as concerned as you 
are.  I'll try to make sure that Kaufman's on (who's a lawyer and is 
considerably more to our thinking than to Mike's, Roger's or Stoness'.

Best,
Jeff

	Harry Kingerski
	01/09/2001 04:18 PM
		 
Jeff - regarding the call tomorrow afternoon on witness/issue strategy, hope 
you can be on.  We talked about this today with Mike and Roger.  The single 
issue we may need to cover is DA's access to retained generation (as a proxy 
for the PX calculation issue.)  I am very sympathetic to your arguments about 
minimizing Enron face time before the Commission.  Mike does favor putting on 
witness(es) and Roger, Scott and crew think it's our opportunity to save the 
planet.  We need to have some potential witnesses in mind.  Weisenmuller?  
Any legitimate California academic types who have credibility here and could 
take the high road on this issue?  If you can talk with me prior to the call, 
page me at 888 397-3996.  I will also leave a message with Paul Kaufman to 
encourage his participation on the scheduled conference call.

Sorry to hear that it was cancelled.  Thank you for keeping me in the loop.  
Quite a way to start the new year....

Best,
Jeff

PG&E is saying publicly (and the news is reporting) that PG&E has $500 
million in cash, and it's payables are $583 M.

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	01/11/2001 09:05 AM
		 
I have been informed that PG&E announced at the CPUC hearing yesterday that 
it will not be able to make its next payment to the PX.  It owes $500+ 
million.

Run!  While there's still time.  And get on the call with Paul.  It starts in 
1 minute.

Don't mean to keep the chain of emails going, but given the cameras and the 
grand-standing politicians (who seem to have an abundance of rhetoric and 
capacity for scape-goating, and a paucity of constructive solutions or the 
will necessary to do what needs to be done), seems worth considering the pros 
and cons of throwing anyone in front of any legislative committees.  We may 
decide that the pros outweigh the cons and that there's discernable value 
having our outside counsel speak to the issues of supply and demand in 
California and the West, but seems worth spending 5 or 10 minutes on.

Best,
Jeff

	Paul Kaufman@ECT
	01/11/2001 01:30 AM
		
What the heck are you doing awake at 2:00 a.m.  

Re:  the hearing.  I'm really not sure that this hearing is worth spending 
alot of time worrying about--at least given my understanding of the scope of 
this Committee's responsibilities during the special session (i.e, the lack 
of responsibilities).   Although, Sandi may know more about the importance of 
this hearing based on discussions with the Committee folks, from our 
discssions over the past couple of days in Sacto it really seems like the 
hearing will be informational in nature.

In any event,  I don't see the downside to having Mike do the testimony.   
Mike knows enough to be helpful to the Committee.  He's easy to insert in the 
process.   While I have absolutely no problems using Robert Michaels, the 
hearing is on Tuesday--less than one week from today--and somebody would have 
to vet his testimony and work with him to prepare the document.  If we can 
make this work, I'm all for it.  It just seem a lot easier to use Mike.   

Re:  why can't we just say no.  From my standpoint there is an upside in 
participating--we continue to support Wright.  Wright has become the voice of 
reason on energy issues.  

 

Susan J Mara@ENRON
01/10/2001 10:48 PM
Can't we just say "no"?  I know Rod thinks highly of Mike, but I'm having a 
hard time seeing what he can add on the stated topic.  Mike Day is certainly 
no expert on supply and demand.  I can understand our reluctance in putting 
an Enron person on the stand, so maybe we shouldn't.  Why not pay an 
economics consultant, like Robert Michaels to represent us?  He's been in the 
media lately and has the right type of expertise.  ALso, he's just joined 
TCA, so we could easily use him.

	Paul Kaufman@ECT
	01/10/2001 10:19 PM
		 
The invitation is to participate in a meeting before the Utilities and 
Commerce Committee of the regular session.  The oversight committee is an 
entirely different matter--as of yesterday no schedule for its meetings had 
been set (timing may follow the release of the CPUC auditor's report on the 
utilities). 

As for the invitation to speak, my thought is that we ask Mike Day to speak 
on our behalf.  The issue we have been asked to address is, very generally, 
supply and demand.    Day has a lot of credibility with Wright and it's 
Wright's committee.   Just be sure, this afternoon, Sandi was following up 
with the Wright's office to get a better picture on scope of the hearing.  
With regard to this subject, I asked Alan Comnes to look through the Mary 
Hain presentation to FERC (from last summer) and pull out the slides that 
were relatively current (or not too awfully out of date).  From what we have 
seen so far, I don't think we need to get to worked up over this particularl 
hearing before the regular Utilities committee.  All the action will occur 
before the special session committees.  

If the need to discuss the hearing continues to be an issue, let's talk 
further.   Sandi please follow up with Sue on what we've discovered through 
Wright's office re:  the Tuesday hearing.  

Susan J Mara@ENRON
01/09/2001 10:50 PM
We need to discuss our response to this invitation
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/09/2001 03:15 PM
		 
There will be an oversight subcommittee of the new committee formed to
shape energy policy in the Special Session.  In a meeting today,
Assembly Member Darryl Steinberg, who will Chair the subcommittee, told
us he expects to hold two hearings to "track the money" between
utilities, geneators and wholesalers.  He hopes to wait until after the
completion of the PUC audit, unless that audit drags on longer than the
next week or so.  He is planning a "constructive investigation" and
pledges to be fair.  The subcommttee will be staffed by the Speakers
Office of Oversight.

Also, Enron has been invited to testify at an informational hearing of
the Assembly Utilities and Commerce Committee on January 16, 2001.  The
general topiic is how supply and demand affect the California market and
what options are available for new or repowered generation in
California.

Scott:  

Could you please see that Sandi gets this?  Thanks.  If folks would like to 
get Sandi information (e.g., the load curtailment proposal discussed by Gary 
yesterday), please send to Scott, who's with our lobbying firm in 
Sacramento.  Sandi, Scott (Stoness) would like to discuss this proposal on 
tomorrow's (Friday's) 8:00 AM conference call.  Thank you.

Best,
Jeff

	Scott Stoness@EES
	01/11/2001 08:26 AM
		 
1st Draft of what we should lobby for in special california legislation 
process from Scott Stoness for comment

Jeff Dasovich.  Can you please get this to Sandy McCubbin for our 10AM 
discussion.

Thanks, Karen.  And please thank Marathon for the info.  If this holds true, 
sounds like Burton plans to make things pretty messy.

	Karen Denne
	01/10/2001 09:31 PM
		 
FYI, here's info from Marathon about who potentially could carry Angelides' 
proposal.
Karen -
We believe its going to be John Burton.

We've also heard that any of these bond issue proposals are going to run
into trouble with Kathleen Connell.  They all have to go through her office
and she's not prepared to be helpful.  She's viewing it as an issue in her
Los Angeles Mayor's race since bond repayments will be spread over all state
taxpayers and she doesn't think muni customers should have to participate.
This may be moot by April 10 if she doesn't make it into the runoff, but she
can make some noise til then.

Any chance you can find out if Angelides has found someone to carry his
proposal in the Legislature?  Thanks! kd

also, diablo is also running (reportedly) at about 10% of capacity due to 
rough seas and difficulties that causes for cooling.

Not the retained assets case---Wood wants to cap prices to QFs.  Jeanne, 
could you try to get any information you can from PUC staff on how they 
intend to handle PG&E's advice letter  re: "we've stopped selling power from 
out retained assets into the PX?"  (I'm assuming that the PUC would be 
sympathetic, since it should immediately lower the utility's bill for power?)

Thanks very much,
Jeff
	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	01/10/2001 02:33 PM
		 
As you may be aware, there has been an ongoing proceeding at the CPUC  
regarding short-run avoided cost (SRAC) payments made by SCE, and the other  
utilities to QFs.? The avoided cost posting is based on a Transition  Formula 
adopted in D.96-12-028 that incorporates various border price  indices.? On 
July 28, 2000, SCE filed a petition to modify D.96-12-028 to  revise its 
Transition Formula, claiming that the existing procedure resulted in  too 
high a price.
?
The draft?decision issued by Commissioner Wood adopts a formula, to be  
updated monthly, to revise SCE's factor adopted in D.96-12-028 and adopts an  
alternative gas index to replace the Topock index adopted in D.96-12-028.?  
?
However, you may be particularly interested to see that the draft decision  
also establishes a ceiling price for payments to QFs of $67.45/MWh, based on 
the  reasonableness standard described by the FERC in its 12/15 order.
?
Dan
 - CPUC01-#87303-v1-R9911022_Wood_Comment_Dec__.doc

You know, generally, when I'm up in the morning, hanging around, getting=20
ready to start the day, I can't see any reason to put clothes on.  I am muc=
h=20
more comfortable that way.  Always been that way.

Good goal.  It would be easiest for me to have the meeting in SF.  Next=20
week's fine for me.  Monday's a day off for me.  You?  Or we could set=20
something up in the morning next week.  Just let me know.

=09Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com>
=0901/11/2001 12:16 PM
=09=09=20
Sorry for surprising you this morning!!  Nothing wrong with being
comfortable in your birthday suit.

Speaking of birthdays, I think we should have a goal to get my company
acquired by your company by May 30, 2001.  Good goal, huh??

I want to talk to you about the details I have been thinking about while yo=
u
were gone.  When should we talk??  Let=01,s set up a meeting so we make sur=
e to
move this all forward.

Welcome back.

-C

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

P.S.  Nice use of "birthday" as the segue to the deal. =20

Speaking of birthdays, Prentice has informed me that, despite my=20
protestations (being a very low-key sort of guy), there "must" be some part=
y=20
for my birthday this year (which I'm still opposed to--and I may be in=20
Houston that MONTH anyway). =20

I was thinking (cuz I hate spotlights), that it might be fun and interestin=
g,=20
since your Dad and I are both hitting interesting birthdays this year, if w=
e=20
had a joint party---double the people, double the fun.  (I don't know if he=
'd=20
rather have a solo party for his, though.)  And since my dad's met your dad=
,=20
but our mom's ain't been in the mix,  I though it might be a good (and=20
hopefully safe) atmosphere to get them together in. =20

Am I smoking crack on the whole idea?

=09Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com>
=0901/11/2001 12:16 PM
=09=09=20
Sorry for surprising you this morning!!  Nothing wrong with being
comfortable in your birthday suit.

Speaking of birthdays, I think we should have a goal to get my company
acquired by your company by May 30, 2001.  Good goal, huh??

I want to talk to you about the details I have been thinking about while yo=
u
were gone.  When should we talk??  Let=01,s set up a meeting so we make sur=
e to
move this all forward.

Welcome back.

-C

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

The playboy mansion?

	Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com>
	01/11/2001 02:22 PM
		 
I think that is a great idea.  It would be great.  Fun mix of people too.
Where should we have it???  I think it should not be at our house in Napa,
but someplace a little more special.

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

P.S.  Nice use of "birthday" as the segue to the deal.

Speaking of birthdays, Prentice has informed me that, despite my
protestations (being a very low-key sort of guy), there "must" be some
party for my birthday this year (which I'm still opposed to--and I may be
in Houston that MONTH anyway).

I was thinking (cuz I hate spotlights), that it might be fun and
interesting, since your Dad and I are both hitting interesting birthdays
this year, if we had a joint party---double the people, double the fun.  (I
don't know if he'd rather have a solo party for his, though.)  And since my
dad's met your dad, but our mom's ain't been in the mix,  I though it might
be a good (and hopefully safe) atmosphere to get them together in.

Am I smoking crack on the whole idea?

 

                    Cameron

                    <cameron@perf        <Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com>

                    ect.com>             cc:

                                         Subject:     you and me

                    01/11/2001

                    12:16 PM

 

 

Sorry for surprising you this morning!!  Nothing wrong with being
comfortable in your birthday suit.

Speaking of birthdays, I think we should have a goal to get my company
acquired by your company by May 30, 2001.  Good goal, huh??

I want to talk to you about the details I have been thinking about while
you
were gone.  When should we talk??  Let's set up a meeting so we make sure
to
move this all forward.

Welcome back.

-C

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

Greetings Mark:

Any interest?

Best,
Jeff

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	01/11/2001 03:18 PM
		 
Jeff and Sue,
 
I have a potential lead which may be of interest to Enron.  However, I don't 
know if you have any interest in Eastern European projects.  
 
Who would you suggest talking to with regard to a Bulgarian power plant 
development?  It involves a 25 year requirements contract with the national 
energy company, the retrofit of two existing units and building three new 
hydro units.  Total around 450 MW.  Party with exclusive deal with government 
wants to deal with an engineering company who could finance and do work ( @ 
$160 million).  Any suggestions on how to proceed?  My guess is that few 
engineering companies are into financing these days, particularly in emerging 
nations.  However, what are your thoughts/suggestions?
 
Thanks, and Happy New Year!
 
Dan

Yes, the utilities can pass through the gas costs. They face an "incentive 
ratemaking mechanism" that includes a "market benchmarket" that they must 
meet or beat.  The benchmark's a composite of spot indeces.  So as long as 
they buy spot, they can meet the benchmark and pass everything through.  
(Ill-conceived procurement incentive, particularly in these days when prices 
are going north, but at least there's no price cap creating gas 
undercollections like there is on the electric side.)  If you need anything 
else, just holler.

Jeff

	James D Steffes
	01/11/2001 06:25 PM
		 
Jeff --

Wanted to confirm that the Gas Utility has a PGA that allows for pass through 
of its gas purchase expense?  Is that right?

Jim

FYI.
Gary Ackerman <foothi19@idt.net> on 08/24/2000 12:39:56 PM
Please respond to foothi19@idt.net
Folks,

I thought it would be a good idea to  review what we discussed
yesterday, on August 23 in Folsom at the ISO, so there is no public
misunderstanding about our discussion, or our intent.

Yesterday's meeting at the ISO, at which WPTF had many of its members
who either have generation in the State, or import power into
California, was for market participants and the ISO to discuss how to
bring more order and price transparency to the ISO's out of market
calls.  WPTF had met on its own initiative several weeks before with
members from the California PX, and APX to identify a suitable product
that would satisfy the ISO's needs during or to avoid system
emergencies.  Also, we sought a matching service of parties willing to
sell into a super-peak firm energy market with those who are willing to
purchase.

APX and CalPX responded to our earlier discussions with specific product
proposals, and presented their proposals to the group at yesterday's
meeting.  The discussions which ensued during the course of that meeting
focused on how the ISO might utilize a product/service to reduce the
manpower requirements currently needed to satisfy its out of market
telephone calls, typically on short notice, and the interest on the part
of market participants to make bids into either the APX or CalPX's
proposed system for a super-peak firm-energy product.

There were no  commitments made by any party, simply a willingness to
work together to alleviate the problems associated with finding
sufficient electric power during high demand periods with greater
transparency, more participants, and greater market efficiency.

There was no discussion of commodity prices, price fixing, or bid
strategies.

Gary B. Ackerman

Hi.  How's things?  Long time no see.

=09"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
=0901/11/2001 07:22 PM
=09Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
=09=09=20
The new Assembly Committee on Energy Costs and Availability.(ECA) met today
and heard two bills: ABX 5 (Keeley), relating to the ISO and PX governing
boards, and ABX 6 (Dutra/Pescetti), relating to utility retention of assets=
.
Both measures passed with only one dissenting vote on ABX 6 (Asm. John
Campbell).

Although ABX 5 passed in its current form, possible amendments to be taken
in the Senate would include:  increasing the number of governing board
members, increasing the length of the terms, and addressing the issue of
Governor appointees on the EOB confirming Governor appointees on the ISO an=
d
PX.  Testifying in support of the measure were the Consumers Union, EOB,
CalPIRG, TURN, ORA and the California Utilities Employees.  The ISO
testified in opposition based on a past FERC letter which opposes an
appointed Board.

The ABX 6 debate was over the conflict in the Public Utilities Code
regarding utility asset retention (Sections 851 and 377).   The debate,
however, was not limited to this one point.  Asm. Leonard started the ball
rolling when he noted a problem when some generation in the state is
regulated (the utility generation) and some isn=01,t (the new generators).
This issue was picked up by Asms. Steinberg, Jackson, Oropeza, and Diaz, wh=
o
suggested that there may need to be legislation to regulate all the
generation in the state.  Asm. Wright did a good job pointing out that in
doing so, the state would have to offer generator owners something in retur=
n
the state isn=01,t able to afford.

When Loretta Lynch spoke in support of the bill she began with the Stage 3
alert, noting there was 15,000 megawatts off-line today and generators were
refusing to allow state inspectors into their plants.  Although the only
company she named was AES, she made every committee member believe it was
everyone.  In response to a question about long-term contracts, she said
that since August this CPUC has allowed it and the utilities are the ones
who refuse to enter into contracts.

Pete Conaty from labor repeated his statement that when the new generators
purchased these plants, they significantly reduced the labor force, ran the
plants harder than when the utilities ran them and that is why the plants
are breaking down.

Both measures will be debated on the Assembly floor next when they go into
session tomorrow morning.

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modsette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

=09Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
=0901/11/2001 05:19 PM
=09=09=20
MEMORANDUM RE FIRST EXTRAORDINARY COMMITTEE SESSION

January 11, 2001

Note: This memo will supplement the committee analysis which you will
receive by separate fax.

ABX1-5 Keeley re the governance of the ISO and PX was discussed first.
A number of possible amendments were discussed by members.  Suggested
amendments included extending the term of members beyond one year,
increasing the number of members beyond 3, whether there should be
senate confirmation of ISO and PX board members, or at least voting
representation for the legislature on the Energy Oversight Board which
will approve the ISO/PX members.  There was also discussion of whether
FERC would approve of this new governance structure.   Another
discussion centered on whether the positions should be full time, as
opposed to part time, and how to define =01&affiliated=018 in conjunction w=
ith
the bill=01,s ban on members of the ISO and PX being affiliated with a
market participant.

Support for the bill:  Consumers Union, EOB on behalf of the
administration, CalPIRG, PX, TURN, UCAN, ORA, Coalition of Utility
Employees.

Opposition:  ISO, which raised issues regarding incompatibility with
FERC orders and concern that the bill would lead to lengthy litigation.
They suggested that if the ISO and PX boards were appointed solely by
the California governor that FERC would not find that legally sufficient
to be =01&independent=018.

ABX1-6 Dutra/Pescetti  addressed retained utility generation assets and
commission regulation of same.  The bill as written is merely a clean up
to clarify that the CPUC would retain jurisdiction over utility
generation after it is valued for purposes of calculating CTC=01*until and
unless the CPUC gives permission for the plant to be sold under Section
851.    The discussion evolved into a lengthy inquiry over the different
regulatory schemes for utility and non-utility generation.  Assemblyman
Leonard questioned whether it was efficient to have a market where a
portion of the generation was regulated and another portion
unregulated.  More and more members skirted the subject of attempting to
regulate the non-utility generators within the state.  In supporting
testimony, CPUC President Lynch essentially asked for jurisdiction over
such generators, stating that CPUC inspectors were denied access to an
AES plant at Redondo Beach for 9 hours during an ISO alert yesterday.
Chmn. Wright asked Lynch to assemble a list of the regulatory powers she
would seek.

In support:  CPUC, TURN, UCAN, CUE, PG&E, SCE

PG&E agreed with Lynch and also argued that the Legislature should
revisit the exemption regulation for marketers and non-utility
generators contained in Code section 216(I).   PG& also had suggested
technical amendments, which were not released, which dealt with
confirming that Section 367 still requires market valuation and that the
CPUC can set the ratemaking for such retained assets.

We have talked with the author about meeting with him after the
amendments are available.  No amendments were voted on for any of these
bills until they are brought up in the Senate.  Thus there was only
limited discussion of amendments.

Sort of a single-minded focus.

Harry:
Tamara Johnson left me a voicemail stating that 1) she phoned Bob 
Weisenmiller requesting that he be our witness 2) there was disagreement 
internally about whether Enron should have testimony 3) she nonetheless 
wanted to try to make sure Bob was available and 4) she would call Bob back 
to discuss further on Tuesday.  Not sure that this is the best way to run a 
railroad. As you mentioned, it's quite inefficient to have EES folks 
contacting our lawyers and reg consultants directly.  I did not respond to 
Tamara's message--thought it would be better to pass along info to you.  We 
can discuss further on Tuesday.  

Best,
Jeff

	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	01/12/2001 04:33 PM
		 
I have set up a conference call for Tuesday, January 16th at 10:00 a.m. PST
to get our game plan together for testimony in the CPUC proceeding.

Dial in number is 800-403-2036
Participant Code is 298206

Jeanne Bennett

=09Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
=0901/12/2001 01:24 PM
=09=09=20
ABX 5 and ABX 6 both passed out of the Assembly this morning.

ABX 5 =01) Regarding ISO/PX governance, passed off of the Assembly floor on
a vote of 60-9.  All 9 =01&no=018 votes were cast by Republicans.  The only
legislator to speak against the bill was Assemblyman Phil Wyman who
objected to the idea of giving Governor Davis the sole authority to
appoint ISO and PX members.

ABX 6 =01) Regarding retention of IOU generation assets, passed off of the
Assembly floor on a vote of 60-10. All 10 =01&no=018 votes were cast by
Republicans.  Three legislators spoke against the bill: Assemblyman John
Campbell, who indicated that he could support the bill if it had a
sunset provision, and Assemblyman Sam Aanestad and Assemblyman Rod
Pacheco, both of whom objected to the idea of giving the CPUC more
authority.  Assemblyman Aanestad indicated that he does not believe
deregulation is the cause of our current situation, but rather, previous
decisions by the CPUC.

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/12/2001 02:58 PM
		 
Attached, please find a press release from Governor Davis regarding a
new state plan to reduce energy consumption.

http://www.governor.ca.gov/state/govsite/gov_htmlprint.jsp?BV_SessionID=@@@@04
71127219.0979338570@@@@&BV_EngineID=haljlekmfjmbemfcfkmchcgi.0&sFilePath=%2fgo
vsite%2fpress_release%2f2001_01%2f20010112_PR01017_energyconserveplan.html&sTi
tle=GOVERNOR+DAVIS+ANNOUNCES+PLAN+TO+SLASH+STATE+ENERGY+USE+%0a&sCatTitle=Pres
s+Release&iOID=12884

FYI.  Report from California's IPP trade association.
	"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
	01/12/2001 06:52 PM
	Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
		 
Date: 1/12/01
RECENT EVENTS:

-- IEP has been meeting with legislators over the past two weeks.  Jan
and//or Katie and I have been attending these meetings.  Since Jan has been
in Washington DC we have rescheduled some of the more important meetings for
when he is back in town next week.  In general the meetings fall into two
categories and seem to be defined by party affiliation.  While this may not
be everyone's experience, our experience so far has showed that many of the
Republicans have embraced our message and are offering to lend support where
they are able.  Many of the Democrats have demonstrated extreme caution, are
interested in our message, but offering little or no support.  The major
theme for them is what they can take back to their districts.

The one exception on the Democratic side so far has been Senator Machado who
has requested IEP draft language on long-term contracting.  Senator Bill
Morrow (R) has requested assistance in drafting language on the NIMBY siting
issue, which we agreed to do so.  We have agree to assist both.

From hereon, we will focus on our meeting efforts on the new Assembly ECA
committee members and "meet and greets" with the new members in both the
Assembly and the Senate.  Because this meeting list was changing on an
hourly basis, it was impossible to forward to Board members.  Please be
sure, if you haven't already, to send us a list of your representatives so
we can contact you when a meeting with them has been confirmed.

-- Assembly U&C staff organized a meeting with the CEC and generators with
repower projects.  Generators in attendance included representatives from
Duke, Dynegy, Southern, AES and Sunrise (Williams was there but didn't
speak).  After each of the participants airing their grievances, we were
tasked with developing language, getting the generating industry to support
it and supporting it in the legislative process.  We were given until Friday
to hand in bill language to the U&C staff.  Such a commitment comes with
many promises and pitfalls which shuld be discussed next week on a
conference call which IEP will be setting up.

-- As reported in an e-mail yesterday, the first two special session bills
passed out of the new Assembly Energy Costs and Availability (ECA) committee
yesterday (ABX 5 and ABX6, both attached, but amended versions not in print
yet).  Both measures also passed off the Assembly floor today and are on
their way to the Senate for consideration in the Senate Energy Committee.
Members of that committee have not yet been announced.

-- The Governor had a press conference today to announce a plan to reduce
California's energy use by at least five percent within a week.  During the
Q&A portion of the press conference the Governor suggested the three members
of the new ISO Board should be the President of the CPUC, and the Chairs of
the EOB and the CEC.

UPCOMING EVENTS:

--  The Assembly Utilities and Commerce Committee is having an informational
hearing on Tuesday, January 16th at 1:30 pm in room 4202.  IEP will be
setting up a conference call to discuss IEP's involvement in this hearing.

--end--

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modsette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - 2001 Tracking Report.doc
 - abx1_5_bill_20010109_introduced.pdf
 - abx1_6_bill_20010111_introduced.pdf

Of course, I'd love to hear that I made if off the waiting list.  Could it be 
true?  Could you let me know.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

	IzioSystem@convene.com
	01/15/2001 06:55 PM
		 
Dear Jeffrey,
                        
William Starks has just added you to their course, E210-1: Competitive 
Strategy.

If you feel that this is an error, please email them at 
willstar@haas.berkeley.edu.

If you have any suggestions or questions, please don't hesitate to write us 
at IzioSupport@convene.com.

Sincerely,

The Izio Team.
            

Mike:  Could you please forward a copy of the document listed below to Ms 
Cantrell?  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

	Rebecca W Cantrell@ECT
	01/16/2001 09:25 AM
		 
Jeff, would this document be publically available, and how could we go about 
getting a copy?  The CPUC web site doesn't go back that far, although I 
assume that copies of the filed documents aren't available online anyway -- 
just summaries.

Thanks.
Stephanie Miller@ENRON
01/16/2001 09:19 AM
Dec 27, 1999 - filed by Glen sullivan, atty for Sempra

This relates to intrastate restructuring in CA.

   
	
	

Well, I determined that it is a CPUC proceeding, but I can't find this 
document.  Can you provide a little more information, like date or who 
filed?  This is the web site that shows the last 100 documents out of the 133 
filed in this proceeding:  
http://www.cpuc.ca.gov/published/proceedings/I9907003.htm.

Stephanie Miller@ENRON
01/11/2001 03:11 PM
Can you please get a copy of the "Promising Revision to Gas Regulatory and 
Market Structure" Joint Motion for approval of Interim Settlement Enhancing 
and Enabling Competitive Markets on the Socal Gas System?

	"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
	01/16/2001 09:52 PM
	Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
		 
The Senate Energy Committee is holding a hearing Wednesday morning at 8am in 
room 4203 to debate AB 5x and AB 6x.  These are the measures that passed the 
ECA committee last week, relating to the ISO/PX governing boards, and utility 
retention of generation assets.
 
AB 1x passed out of the Assembly Appropriations Committee this evening with 
all the Dems voting for it and one Republican.  There were three amendments: 
1) a $400 million price tag was added, 2) a sunset review after 5 years was 
added, and 3) clarification was made that DWR is not permitted to get into 
the T&D business.  Rumor has it that Keeley understands that the 5.5 cents 
has to come out of the bill on the Senate side.  The floor vote is schedule 
for 8pm tonight.
 

Elizabeth Linnell@ENRON
09/08/2000 11:44 AM
Sent by: Elizabeth Linnell@ENRON
Attached is the final version.

Greetings:

See attached "meeting notice."  This could be a good opportunity to get our 
demand-side proposal on the table.  

Dennis:  If we could get some power point slides together, we could present 
our ideas to this group and the leg aides mentioned.  Let me know your 
thoughts. 

Also attached is a summary of the bill that the CA Assembly passed today.  
Please pass this along to others who might be interested. Thanks.

Jeff
	Julia Wright <jwright@smithandkempton.com>
	01/16/2001 08:21 PM
		 
Folks-- Urgent info attached for our meeting on Thursday

Thanks, Delaney Hunter

 - Meeting notice.doc
 - AB1 X1 analysis.doc

likely to go up, but whether it goes up by enough is unclear.  They've got a 
very long way to go if they hope to keep the IOUs from filing Chapter 11.

i'll give you a call today.

	"Cherry, Brian" <BKC7@pge.com>
	01/17/2001 11:35 AM
		 
Jeff -  Thought you'd be interested.? Let's try for lunch next  week.
?
??????? Brian - This is a  copy of an emergency petition to modify the gas 
accord decision that was filed  yesterday.? It basically requests that 
penalties to core customers for  diversions be waived and any diversion be 
priced at the market price up to $50  per dth.? Unfortunately, we felt it had 
to be filed because we couldn't let  the core be exposed to $100 per Dth gas 
supply when PG&E can't buy at $10  per dth.? Hopefully, the crisis will be 
resolved and petition will have no  bearing.? 

??????? It was mailed to the  Gas Accord service list and our legal division 
e-mailed to an unknown service  list which I had wished they hadn't done. (We 
are not trying to add to any  problem, but based on a worst case scenario we 
couldn't have the core exposed to  buying $100 per dth gas for all its gas 
supply)???  

? 

? 

 - CPUC01-#87842-v1-emergency_petition_on_A9212043_.doc

you're alive.  thank god.  i was wondering.  be great if you would call some 
time so that we could guffaw about all of this.  it is rich.  very rich.  
415.782.7822.  hope that you and yours are well.

that should have listened to us.  (hee hee)

best,
jeff

I agree with Harry.  In particular, we'll need to make Richard Sanders and 
ENA's outside counsel are aware.  I have been concerned, and continued to be 
concerned about, the implications of being in the case, understanding that 
our interests--and the stakes--are very high.  Continues to seem important 
that we be in, but we'll need to discuss further, and make sure that Jim and 
ENA's attorney's are in the loop.

Best,
Jeff

	Harry Kingerski
	01/18/2001 08:46 AM
		 
I think what Bob is trying to tell us, with this and another message I will 
send you shortly, is that we can expect similar questions if we dip our toes 
into the waters of this PUC case.  
Jeff - this tells me we need ENA awareness/agreement ? with our going forward 
in the CPUC case.
	"Robert Weisenmiller" <rbw@mrwassoc.com>
	01/17/2001 08:30 PM
		 
Please find enclosed UCAN and Ratepayers data request directed to Reliant 
Energy Services, Reliant Energy and Reliant Energy Power Generation.? Please 
inform me at your first opportunity if we have a discovery dispute, as that 
term is defined by ALJ Ruling 164.? Please feel free to contact me regarding 
any questions about this request.? thank you michael J. Aguirre 
 - reliantrequest01.wpd

	JWM <JMcTarnaghan@GMSSR.COM>
	01/18/2001 11:59 AM
		 
Dear Jeff and Mike:

Per your request, I have put together a draft letter to the CPUC seeking
relief from PG&E's diversions.  I drafted it so that it could be signed by a
group of suppliers and non-core customers.

This letter could also be converted relatively easy to a pleading if that
approach is determined to be preferable.

Let me know if you want to  pursue this further.

Jim McT

765-8409

 <<X20054.DOC>>

 - X20054.DOC

Was that you?  I looked at it and thought, "oh, well, they fucked up."  
That's hilarious.  Were you at Tom's?  

Dude, I'm very sorry about the check for the banjo. I spaced it.   I'll have 
it to you as soon as I get back into town.  Apologies.

	"Scott Laughlin" <scottwl@hotmail.com>
	01/18/2001 04:04 PM
		 
Must have been a real bummer getting that ticket yesterday...
_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

FYI.  Please keep very confidential. Something I received from a contact of 
mine at PG&E.  

Jeff

*****************************************************************
> This afternoon, PG&E filed an emergency application with the CPUC asking
> it to declare there is a gas supply emergency on PG&E's system, and asking
> it to compel Southern California Gas to provide mutual assistance to PG&E
> by purchasing gas for PG&E's core customers.  The filing is attached,
> along with the declarations from Kent Harvey and Kirk Johnson which
> supported it, which explain the gas supply emergency and the possible
> consequences.  After the filing was completed, PG&E received notice from
> Sempra that effective Saturday, it will be cutting off over ten percent of
> the total supply currently available to PG&E's core customers.  I added
> that late breaking news to the filing letter, which is also attached.
>
> Randy Litteneker
>
>  <<Gas Emergency App Final.doc>>   <<Gas Emergency Application KHarvey
> Final.doc>>   <<Gas Emergency Kirk Johnson Declaration Final.doc>>
>  <<CPUCDocketLtr..doc>>

 - Gas Emergency App Final.doc
 - Gas Emergency Application KHarvey Final.doc
 - Gas Emergency Kirk Johnson Declaration Final.doc
 - CPUCDocketLtr..doc

Someone from Parquet's group is very likely to be there.  Government Affairs 
hadn't planned to intend. I can give Parquet a call and find out and make 
sure that there's good coordination with Transwestern.  Or TW can call him 
directly.  Just let me know.

Best,
Jeff

yes, too busy.  very disappointed that i didn't get to see everyone.  hope 
all is well.

Xi Xi@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS

09/15/2000 06:02 PM

I was wondering why you didn't show up for the DC conference? very busy ?? 
hm...
I

	Jeff Dasovich@EES
	09/15/00 05:59 PM
		
Hi.  How's things?  Long time no see.

Dean Tyson:

It was a pleasure to see you again today. Phil, it was a pleasure to meet y=
ou=20
and I look forward to working together.  Since time is of the essence, I=20
wanted to summarize where we left off at today=01,s meeting regarding Calif=
ornia=01,
s energy crisis.  That summary is attached.  I've also attached three=20
articles from the business section of today's Chronicle that arguably bolst=
er=20
our arguments for adopting the approach that we discussed at today's meetin=
g.

 Given the fact that the legislative process is moving rapidly, bankruptcy =
is=20
a daily threat, and Dean Tyson will be attending the meetings in Davos, it=
=20
appears that our window of opportunity is very small.  It seems that succes=
s=20
requires a meeting of the principals by the end of the week, if not sooner.=
 =20
The chances of success are obviously limited, but I think that we agreed th=
at=20
all concerned have nothing to lose and everything to gain by taking a shot.=
=20
Your offer to help in the effort obviously increases the likelihood of=20
success and is greatly appreciated. =20

My apologies in advance if I have mischaracterized any of the points made a=
t=20
the meeting.  It represents a =01&first cut,=018 it will undoubtedly change=
 as the=20
details get worked out, and I=01,m sure I=01,ve missed something.  So pleas=
e don=01,t=20
hesitate to edit the draft.

Please keep in mind that I have not had a chance to discuss this proposal=
=20
internally.  As such, I can=01,t yet commit Enron to the specifics of the=
=20
proposal.  But I=01,m confident that the company can support something akin=
 to=20
this structure and can let you and Phil know first thing Monday.

In addition, given the political environment in California, Enron has playe=
d=20
a constructive role by providing low-key, behind the scenes advice and=20
analysis to policy makers.  That approach seems preferable in this effort a=
s=20
well.

Finally, Dean Tyson, I mentioned that Linda Robertson heads-up our Washingt=
on=20
D.C. office.  If she can help in any way, please don=01,t hesitate to let m=
e=20
know.  Both of you should feel free to call me at home over the weekend to=
=20
discuss things further.  My home phone is 415.621.8317.

Best,
Jeff

=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0901/20/2001 10:51 PM
=09=09=20
Dean Tyson:

It was a pleasure to see you again today. Phil, it was a pleasure to meet y=
ou=20
and I look forward to working together.  Since time is of the essence, I=20
wanted to summarize where we left off at today=01,s meeting regarding Calif=
ornia=01,
s energy crisis.  That summary is attached.  I've also attached three=20
articles from the business section of today's Chronicle that arguably bolst=
er=20
our arguments for adopting the approach that we discussed at today's meetin=
g.

 Given the fact that the legislative process is moving rapidly, bankruptcy =
is=20
a daily threat, and Dean Tyson will be attending the meetings in Davos, it=
=20
appears that our window of opportunity is very small.  It seems that succes=
s=20
requires a meeting of the principals by the end of the week, if not sooner.=
 =20
The chances of success are obviously limited, but I think that we agreed th=
at=20
all concerned have nothing to lose and everything to gain by taking a shot.=
=20
Your offer to help in the effort obviously increases the likelihood of=20
success and is greatly appreciated. =20

My apologies in advance if I have mischaracterized any of the points made a=
t=20
the meeting.  It represents a =01&first cut,=018 it will undoubtedly change=
 as the=20
details get worked out, and I=01,m sure I=01,ve missed something.  So pleas=
e don=01,t=20
hesitate to edit the draft.

Please keep in mind that I have not had a chance to discuss this proposal=
=20
internally.  As such, I can=01,t yet commit Enron to the specifics of the=
=20
proposal.  But I=01,m confident that the company can support something akin=
 to=20
this structure and can let you and Phil know first thing Monday.

In addition, given the political environment in California, Enron has playe=
d=20
a constructive role by providing low-key, behind the scenes advice and=20
analysis to policy makers.  That approach seems preferable in this effort a=
s=20
well.

Finally, Dean Tyson, I mentioned that Linda Robertson heads-up our Washingt=
on=20
D.C. office.  If she can help in any way, please don=01,t hesitate to let m=
e=20
know.  Both of you should feel free to call me at home over the weekend to=
=20
discuss things further.  My home phone is 415.621.8317.

Best,
Jeff

=09"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
=0901/19/2001 07:13 PM
=09Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
=09=09=20
Date: 1/19/01

RECENT EVENTS:

-- The first two special session bills were signed by the Governor this
week: AB 5x (Keeley), relating to reconstituting the ISO and PX governing
boards, and 6x (Pescetti/Dutra), relating to utility retention of assets.
Includes in AB 5x was language requiring the ISO to make a list of
California power plants that are out of service due to either a planned or
unplanned outage available on the Internet on a daily basis.

-- Governor Davis has announced some appointments to the new ISO Board.
They include: Michael Kahn from the EOB as chair, Maria Contreras-Sweet who
is the Secretary of Business Transportation and Housing, Carl Guardino from
the Silicon Valley Manufacturing Group, and Mike Florio from TURN.  The
fifth position still remains vacant.  It is unclear if FERC will even
approve this new makeup.

-- SB 7x (Burton) caught everyone=01,s attention this week as it was
introduced, maneuvered through the legislative process and also signed by
the Governor within a 24 hour period.  SB 7x clarifies the authority of the
Department of Water Resources on a temporary basis to purchase electricity
(in lieu of AB 1x).  It gives the agency a 12-day window to purchase
electricity and sell it at cost. The legislation specifies that no contract
may be entered into later than February 15, 2001 and it sunsets on that
date.

-- The next legislative step taken this week was to continue the progress
made in the Assembly last week on AB 1x (Keeley/Migden).  AB 1x authorizes
the Department of Water Resources to contract with any person or entity to
purchase electricity for up to 5.5. center per kWh.  The Senate Energy
Committee met Friday afternoon to debate the measure.  Committee members
themselves brought up a number of concerns, including those previously
articulated by IEP and some member companies.  Specifically, IEP opposes th=
e
5.5 cap and language that implies entities that =01&furnish=018 power would=
 be
=01&public utilities.=018  Both were highlighted in today=01,s hearing by t=
he Chair
of the committee and the author as provisions that need to be addressed
before the bill moves forward.   The committee expects to be drafting
potential amendments over the weekend  and will resume deliberations on
Monday at a time to be announced.  I am faxing the amendments proposed and
submitted to the committee by Southern for your review which address these
issues and more.

-- Senator Burton also held a press conference this week to introduce SB 6x
which would create a state power authority that has the power to, among
other things, finance the construction of additional generating capacity an=
d
provide financing for older plants to make necessary retrofits for
efficiency improvements.  Power generated from this financing will be sold
to the state at cost.  The press release is attached.

-- Still sitting on the back burner for the moment (which could change at
any moment) is any legislative play on long-term contracting and siting
changes.  IEP has provided comments on both issues and is participating in
any discussions on these issues as they arise.

-- Last but not least, the QF issues has reached the legislative arena this
week.  Asm. Keeley has been intent on getting all the parties together to
negotiate the SCE QF contracts.  Negotiations will continue through the
weekend.

UPCOMING EVENTS:

--  There will be a Senate Energy Committee hearing on Monday to continue
deliberations on AB 1x (Keeley).  So far, I have no other scheduled meeting=
s
or hearings for next week.  Stay Tuned.

--end--

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

I'm greatly indebted.  Thank you.

	Teresa Janus <tj@Haas.Berkeley.EDU>
	01/19/2001 06:53 PM
		 
Hi Jeff,

You are now registered in E222 Financial Information Analysis.  Please come 
in and pick up any books/readers for the course.

Thanks,
TJ

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/19/2001 03:58 PM
		 
ABX1 1 (Keeley) Regarding long term contracts with DWR was heard in
Senate Energy today for the purpose of considering amendments.  The
following items were discussed:

The portion of the bill that would make entities who sell to the DWR
regulated utilities will be amended.  This was not the intent of the
author.

The $.5.5 will be amended as the author and committee acknowledged that
it was completely impractical.  No indication as to what the new number
would be, although it is likely that there will be a number versus being
silent on the issue.

The bill will be amended to allow for portfolio purchases.

The bill will be amended to eliminate the prohibition on the state
owning T&D.

The five year sunset review may be reduced to a hard three year sunset.

According to the author, it is not the intent of the bill to enable IOUs
to repay past debts with surplus revenue if the state is able to buy
inexpensive power and there was room under the existing cap.  Consumer
advocates believe under this scenario there should be a rate reduction.

QF contracts are a major stumbling block as they have not been paid by
the IOUs and would prefer to have contracts with the state.  Under this
scenario, the $400 million would be far too small a number to make up
the net short.  Current negotiations with the IOUs have ground to a
halt.

Several parties suggested that the DWR also be authorized to make gas
purchases.

The Calpine proposal of 2,500 mw at 5.5 was deemed insufficient due to
its complex structure, thereby reinforcing the notion that 5.5 is not
feasible.

	"Steven Kelly" <steven@iepa.com>
	01/21/2001 05:42 AM
	Please respond to "Steven Kelly"
		 
An important conference call is scheduled for 12:30 p.m. (PST) on Sunday, 
Today, Jan 21 to discuss the status of legislative meetings on QF/SRAC 
matters.  
 
Call-In number is            888-422-7124
Particpant Code is          111756
 
 
Status Report
After a marathon 12 hour meeting with Assemplyman Keeley, Senator Battin, QF 
Parties, and SCE, a Keeley sponsored "deal" was proposed at 3:30 a.m. this 
morning.  The crux of the deal is as follows:
 
For renewables and non-gas fired QF, essentially ...
 
7.8 cents/kwh for delivered power for 5 years ["all in", i.e. includes 
capacity and energy]
1.0 on losses
no 'clawback' for wind resources which may have failed to meet fixed capacity 
obligations in the past
Applies "going forward" (presumedly Feb. 1)
 
 
For gas-fired QFs...
 
7.8 cents/kwh for five years, assuming gas is $5.60;  payment will 
increase/decrease tied to gas  (this assumes an IER of 9821)
1.0 on line losses
applies "going forward"
Caacity True-up and "forbearance" were not addressed.  Credit worthiness will 
be address in the technical conference scheduled for later today (Sunday).  
This program will require in part legislative blessing and direction, 
followed by CPUC approval of individual contract amendments.  This is 
essentially the PG&E/QF "deal" for the gas guys.  For the renewables, it is 
more of a fixed payment approach.
 
A "Technical Conference" is scheduled for Sunday (today) in Sacramento to 
work out some of the implementing details.

	JWM <JMcTarnaghan@GMSSR.COM>
	01/19/2001 08:13 PM
		 
?
Attached is an ALJ ruling shortening the time to  respond to the emergency 
petition filed by ORA and TURN to modify D.97-08-055,  the decision approving 
the Gas Accord for PG&E, and Resolution G-2388, the  resolution which 
implemented the Gas Accord.? Interested parties have until  January 26, 2001 
to file a response.

The service lists in I.99-07-003 and A.00-11-038 are  being used to 
distribute this ruling by e-mail because no e-mail service lists  are 
currently available for A.92-12-043 and the related proceedings.?  Copies are 
being mailed to the service lists in A.92-12-043, A.94-06-044, and  
A.96-08-043.

ALJ John S. Wong? <<WEBPUB-#4642-v1-_.doc>> 

 - WEBPUB-#4642-v1-_.doc

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	01/19/2001 04:45 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
Greetings:

The CPUC held an emergency meeting this morning in which they restated the 
utilities obligation to serve regardless of claims of bankruptcy or any other 
insolvency. PG&E had indicated to both the ISO and CDWR that they had only 
planned to schedule for load in which they had native generation to serve. 
PG&E's logic is?probably that they will cover folks with the?assets they 
have, but since they can't buy anything, they shouldn't?carry that 
obligation.? CPUC doesn't like that logic, although if bankruptcy happens its 
about the same effect?as?imposing that obligation on DWR.? This could be 
avoided if they would just impose the rate increase?that will cover the 
costs, subject to refund, and then get the long-term?deals in place.? At this 
point the utilities have?much less to lose.? Please find the attached 
decision.? For those of you who would like to listen to the hearing you can 
listen to a rebroadcast by logging onto the CPUC web site.

?

?

Katie Kaplan

Manager of State Policy Affairs

Independent Energy Producers Association

(916) 448-9499

?
 - keep serving_4622.doc

Thanks.  Was in Sacramento all week watching the machinations.  I'll give you 
a call this week.  Best to you and yours.

Jeff

	"McNally Temple Associates, Inc." <rmcnally@cwo.com>
	01/19/2001 03:55 PM
		 
Once again ... my sister was called by a reporter with the SF Chronicle
who's doing a story on  Enron.   The reporter heard about how my sister
escaped escalating  electricity costs in  San Diego because she switched to
Enron.  Sounds like a positive story.  May run this weekend.

Are you rethinking your decision about pulling out of the residential
market?  I would think  you could  sign most of San Diego.  When and if you
decide to reenter the market, we have some ideas we'd like to discuss.

Sue, who's handling pr for ARM?

Best to you both,

Ray

	"Steven Kelly" <steven@iepa.com>
	01/19/2001 08:45 AM
	Please respond to "Steven Kelly"
		 
In case you have not received the attachment.
> Attache is the draft Forbearance Agreement and Guantee presented by the
> Forbearance Working Group.  This is the draft QF postion related to these
> issues.  This will be the focus of the IEP conference call, previously
> scheduled, at 9:00 a.m. (PST) on Friday, January 19.  In addition, under
> separate emaiil, we are forwarding PG&E's draft Forbearance Agreement.
>
>
 - COMPARERITEREPORT-SF-1034697.DOC
 - Draft Forbearance Agreement.DOC

Thanks so much for the info.  This is very useful.  I will try to make the 
next meeting.  Hopefully the crisis out here will be over by then.  How would 
you structure it differently next time?

Best,
Jeff

	Enron Energy Services
	

The meeting went well. There was a lot of discussion regarding the current 
deals involving the env. market.  ENA global markets presented their strategy 
on trading/marketing emissions as well as compliance outsourcing 
(comprehensive services related to emissions reductions.); EES talked about 
capturing bypassed emissions from current bundled deals as well as the 
challenges of doing retail in states w/ varying mandates & reporting 
requirements; EES (Bruce Stram) talked a bit about dg;  ENA origination 
talked about a massive fuel cell project they are working on (they are 
keeping it confidential currently); ENA West Structuring talked about 
financial packages to offset intermittent risk assc. w/ wind; Michael Payne 
EWC talked about wind development in the states and the associated 
opportunities w/ renewable energy credits; New Power talked a bit about their 
rollout in NJ, PA and upcoming CA.  New Power is at a point where they need 
to get up on the curve w/ regard to renewable mandates and reporting 
standards.

Everyone seemed to agree that it makes sense for environmental strategies to 
act as the "link" between the groups w/ regard to env. market opportunities.  
There are considerable synergies involved w/ ee, renewables, air emissions 
and technology control, and as we interface across the commercial groups, 
ensure that the left hand is talking to the right (i.e. the deals are 
capturing the most value and groups are aware of what others are working 
on.)  We are rolling out an intranet page where we intend to offer business 
intelligence and env. regulation info.  In the near term, I'll be circulating 
the presentations and the contact list.  There will be some sort of follow up 
meeting that is structured completely differently than this one.

Hope this is helpful.  Have a good weekend.
Stacey

Jeff Dasovich
09/15/2000 11:35 AM
My apologies, but as you can imagine, California's little crisis has me a bit 
preoccupied.  Would love to know what comes out of the meeting, though.

Best,
Jeff

Yes, we can.  Others are considering doing the same.  Let's discuss on Monday.

	Leslie Lawner
	01/18/2001 01:18 PM
		
Jeff, Can we oppose these changes?

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/18/2001 11:32 AM
		 
	"Cherry, Brian" <BKC7@pge.com>
	01/17/2001 11:35 AM
		 
Jeff -  Thought you'd be interested.? Let's try for lunch next  week.
?
??????? Brian - This is a  copy of an emergency petition to modify the gas 
accord decision that was filed  yesterday.? It basically requests that 
penalties to core customers for  diversions be waived and any diversion be 
priced at the market price up to $50  per dth.? Unfortunately, we felt it had 
to be filed because we couldn't let  the core be exposed to $100 per Dth gas 
supply when PG&E can't buy at $10  per dth.? Hopefully, the crisis will be 
resolved and petition will have no  bearing.? 

??????? It was mailed to the  Gas Accord service list and our legal division 
e-mailed to an unknown service  list which I had wished they hadn't done. (We 
are not trying to add to any  problem, but based on a worst case scenario we 
couldn't have the core exposed to  buying $100 per dth gas for all its gas 
supply)???  

? 

? 

 - CPUC01-#87842-v1-emergency_petition_on_A9212043_.doc

will do.

	Steven J Kean
	01/21/2001 03:49 PM
		
You need to be aware that we are in the process of selling the Wind Co.  Mark 
Metts and Amit Walya are working on this.  If the price changes under the QF 
contracts it would impact the sale.  Call Amit to discuss (345-5570).

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/21/2001 10:23 AM
		 
	"Steven Kelly" <steven@iepa.com>
	01/21/2001 05:42 AM
	Please respond to "Steven Kelly"
		 
An important conference call is scheduled for 12:30 p.m. (PST) on Sunday, 
Today, Jan 21 to discuss the status of legislative meetings on QF/SRAC 
matters.  
 
Call-In number is            888-422-7124
Particpant Code is          111756
 
 
Status Report
After a marathon 12 hour meeting with Assemplyman Keeley, Senator Battin, QF 
Parties, and SCE, a Keeley sponsored "deal" was proposed at 3:30 a.m. this 
morning.  The crux of the deal is as follows:
 
For renewables and non-gas fired QF, essentially ...
 
7.8 cents/kwh for delivered power for 5 years ["all in", i.e. includes 
capacity and energy]
1.0 on losses
no 'clawback' for wind resources which may have failed to meet fixed capacity 
obligations in the past
Applies "going forward" (presumedly Feb. 1)
 
 
For gas-fired QFs...
 
7.8 cents/kwh for five years, assuming gas is $5.60;  payment will 
increase/decrease tied to gas  (this assumes an IER of 9821)
1.0 on line losses
applies "going forward"
Caacity True-up and "forbearance" were not addressed.  Credit worthiness will 
be address in the technical conference scheduled for later today (Sunday).  
This program will require in part legislative blessing and direction, 
followed by CPUC approval of individual contract amendments.  This is 
essentially the PG&E/QF "deal" for the gas guys.  For the renewables, it is 
more of a fixed payment approach.
 
A "Technical Conference" is scheduled for Sunday (today) in Sacramento to 
work out some of the implementing details.

Leslie, if it's at all possible for you to assist by coordinating with Mike 
Day and his office, that would be immensely helpful.  If not, no worries.  
Just let me know.

Best,
Jeff

	Leslie Lawner
	01/22/2001 11:17 AM
		 
Jeff/Jim-

I assume Jeff is handling the response to the ORA/TURN filing to alter the 
PG&E tariffs on gas diversions.  Let me know if you need anything from me on 
that or anything else.  Thanks.

Thoughts?
	Scott Stoness@EES
	01/22/2001 12:24 PM
		 
Advice letter says use Cal ISO Ex-Post because Px will not sell to the PG&E.

The Cal ISO Ex-Post is capped at $150.

The price they use for Px Credit should  
be uncapped Cal ISO Ex-Post or
Enron's cost of buying power in each hour.

Scott

I really apologize, but is there any way you could talk to Keith?
	Keith Miceli
	01/22/2001 10:55 AM
		 
Jeff:  I work in the International PR group in Houston, where I'm responsible 
for South America.  As you might imagine, the California crisis is receiving 
substantial media coverage in the region.  In particular, it's being used by 
opponents of deregulation to bolster their position.  My colleagues also say 
that it's receiving the same play in India and elsewhere.  In order to shed 
more light than heat on the subject and "arm" our people in Brazil with some 
useful information on the issue, I'm attempting to put together some key 
messages and Q&As.  One obvious question is:  What are Enron's business 
dealings with California?  Both Rob Bradley and Miyung Buster mentioned you 
as the "expert", so I'm hoping you could provide with the answer to the above 
question.  Regards, Keith

=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0901/20/2001 10:51 PM
=09=09=20
Dean Tyson:

It was a pleasure to see you again today. Phil, it was a pleasure to meet y=
ou=20
and I look forward to working together.  Since time is of the essence, I=20
wanted to summarize where we left off at today=01,s meeting regarding Calif=
ornia=01,
s energy crisis.  That summary is attached.  I've also attached three=20
articles from the business section of today's Chronicle that arguably bolst=
er=20
our arguments for adopting the approach that we discussed at today's meetin=
g.

 Given the fact that the legislative process is moving rapidly, bankruptcy =
is=20
a daily threat, and Dean Tyson will be attending the meetings in Davos, it=
=20
appears that our window of opportunity is very small.  It seems that succes=
s=20
requires a meeting of the principals by the end of the week, if not sooner.=
 =20
The chances of success are obviously limited, but I think that we agreed th=
at=20
all concerned have nothing to lose and everything to gain by taking a shot.=
=20
Your offer to help in the effort obviously increases the likelihood of=20
success and is greatly appreciated. =20

My apologies in advance if I have mischaracterized any of the points made a=
t=20
the meeting.  It represents a =01&first cut,=018 it will undoubtedly change=
 as the=20
details get worked out, and I=01,m sure I=01,ve missed something.  So pleas=
e don=01,t=20
hesitate to edit the draft.

Please keep in mind that I have not had a chance to discuss this proposal=
=20
internally.  As such, I can=01,t yet commit Enron to the specifics of the=
=20
proposal.  But I=01,m confident that the company can support something akin=
 to=20
this structure and can let you and Phil know first thing Monday.

In addition, given the political environment in California, Enron has playe=
d=20
a constructive role by providing low-key, behind the scenes advice and=20
analysis to policy makers.  That approach seems preferable in this effort a=
s=20
well.

Finally, Dean Tyson, I mentioned that Linda Robertson heads-up our Washingt=
on=20
D.C. office.  If she can help in any way, please don=01,t hesitate to let m=
e=20
know.  Both of you should feel free to call me at home over the weekend to=
=20
discuss things further.  My home phone is 415.621.8317.

Best,
Jeff

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	01/22/2001 01:39 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
Attached please find the ISO/CDWR agreement sent out by the ISO.  We will
keep you posted

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

 - ISO_CDWR Agreement.doc

Ain't talked to him.  His number is 415.765.8408.  Thanks so much.

Dean Tyson:
Attached is the proposal.  Your comments are welcome and appreciated.  I'd be 
happy to input any that you might have prior to forwading to Secretary 
Summers.  Phil and I will have a list of potential contacts from the business 
community to review in the next couple of hours.  If you need anything, don't 
hesitate to contact me.  Perhaps you and Phil and I could touch base later 
today or this evening to talk about next steps.  Thanks again for your 
efforts.

Best,
Jeff

415.782.7822
pager: 888.916.7184

Few things:
Linda:  Thanks very much for the call and the help.Tyson is calling John Doer 
(sp?) to try to get him in the loop. And she agreed to send the proposal to 
Summers today.  Proposal to follow.
I'm working with a guy named Phil Verleger (MIT economist type who worked in 
Ford and Carter), who I met at the meeting on Saturday, to come up with a 
list of individuals with Democratic, contributor, business community 
credientials that can be contacted to seek support for the proposal.  Any 
suggested contacts that folks have would be helpful.
John Nesslage (who works for Jim) is running some numbers to get an idea of 
the size of rate increases required to pay back the loans under a 10-year 
term structure
The UC  Berkeley econ/biz school faculty members I met with on Saturday want 
to issue a press release stating there view on "what not to do" (i.e., don't 
have the state take over anything, period).  They want to give us a copy to 
review for comments/edits before they issue it.  I should be getting tonite 
or first thing in the AM tomorrow.  May not go anywhere, but I told them that 
I'd be happy to review it.

Jeff

Congratulation, Pat. And the very best of luck.  See you soon.

Best,
Jeff

Pat Bukowski <pbukowski@acex.com> on 09/15/2000 06:35:07 PM
Dear friends. family and colleagues,

My last day at ACEx Technologies, Inc. has come. Yes, I'm moving on ...
to Clorox, also in Oakland, CA. I will be a Project Manager in the
Information Services department.

Please replace my e-mail address with the following address:
patrick_bukowski@yahoo.com

I hope to hear from you all soon at my new address!

Pat Bukowski

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/22/2001 04:50 PM
		
Dean Tyson:
Attached is the proposal.  Your comments are welcome and appreciated.  I'd be 
happy to input any that you might have prior to forwarding to Secretary 
Summers.  Phil and I will have a list of potential contacts from the business 
community to review in the next couple of hours.  If you need anything, don't 
hesitate to contact me.  Perhaps you and Phil and I could touch base later 
today or this evening to talk about next steps.  Thanks again for your 
efforts.

Best,
Jeff

415.782.7822
pager: 888.916.7184

you alive?

	Richard Shapiro
	01/22/2001 05:29 PM
		 
Thoughts?
Dan Leff@EES
01/22/2001 04:12 PM
Rick / Steve - 

Please check this out and provide some comments.

It currently does not contain a "market price".  That is being assembled now.

Please also let me know when you would like to get this to the CA Governor's 
office.

Thank you - Dan

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/22/2001 04:50 PM
		
Dean Tyson:
Attached is the proposal.  Your comments are welcome and appreciated.  I'd be 
happy to input any that you might have prior to forwading to Secretary 
Summers.  Phil and I will have a list of potential contacts from the business 
community to review in the next couple of hours.  If you need anything, don't 
hesitate to contact me.  Perhaps you and Phil and I could touch base later 
today or this evening to talk about next steps.  Thanks again for your 
efforts.

Best,
Jeff

415.782.7822
pager: 888.916.7184

	Richard Shapiro
	01/22/2001 05:29 PM
		 
Thoughts?
Dan Leff@EES
01/22/2001 04:12 PM
Rick / Steve - 

Please check this out and provide some comments.

It currently does not contain a "market price".  That is being assembled now.

Please also let me know when you would like to get this to the CA Governor's 
office.

Thank you - Dan

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/22/2001 04:50 PM
		
Dean Tyson:
Attached is the proposal.  Your comments are welcome and appreciated.  I'd be 
happy to input any that you might have prior to forwading to Secretary 
Summers.  Phil and I will have a list of potential contacts from the business 
community to review in the next couple of hours.  If you need anything, don't 
hesitate to contact me.  Perhaps you and Phil and I could touch base later 
today or this evening to talk about next steps.  Thanks again for your 
efforts.

Best,
Jeff

415.782.7822
pager: 888.916.7184

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/22/2001 04:19 PM
		 
The Senate Energy Committee met today to discuss ABX1 1.  They are not
scheduled to meet tomorrow but that is subject to change.

Senator Bowen does not intend to move the bill until the committee is
able to review the short term bids mandated in SBX1 7 this Wednesday.
Several Senators suggested that today's hearing may be moot until they
are able to get a better idea of the costs associated with a long term
contract.

Page 4, lines 20-21 - Will add language to enable the state to obtain
security interest in IOU assets.

Page 5, lines 35-40 - Legislative Counsel will review indemnification
language to determine if it is necessary in legislation, or, if can be
utilized in contracts.

Page 5, line 32, strike "or" and insert "and"

Sunset remains an issue with Republicans who are urging a sunset of the
bill's provisions instead of a sunset review.

With respect to the section of the analysis entitled "Issues Not
Addressed in Mock-Up"

1) Will not discuss bidding procedures at this time
2) Will not discuss bid evaluation process at this time
3) Will continue to discuss the sunset review provisions
4) Will not require DWR to sell excess power back to hour-ahead market
5) The financing mechanism does provide adequate assurance of repayment
6) Will not discuss additional stranded costs at this time
7) Will not discuss state contracting provisions at this time

PG&E suggested that it would make more sense for the DWR to sell power
directly to consumers.  They also want the state to assume QF contracts
(Bowen said this was a non-starter)

SCE suggested that DWR be responsible for ancillary services.  They also
suggested that DWR should, at their discretion, be able to assume
certain existing contracts.

Dynegy, in addition to the comments raised in the analysis, needs a
guarantee regarding the state's full faith of credit. They also
requested a waiver of sovereign immunity.

The only new opposition came from Women's Energy Matters who collected
10,000 signatures, all of whom refuse to pay the CPUC mandated 9%
increase.  They see no guarantee that the state will recoup its money in
the bill and advocate for condemnation of everything.

Scott

In office all week.

	Joseph Alamo
	01/22/2001 07:53 PM
		 
Please note previous e-mail for said request.  [Note to Marcie:  sorry! I see 
I inadvertently omitted you from the 
first e-mail! Mea culpa!)
Joseph Alamo
01/18/2001 02:25 PM
 
Please forward your *anticipated* schedules for next week to me, as soon as 
possible.

Thanks in advance for your assistance.

Joseph Alamo
Sr. Administrative Assistant
Government Affairs - The Americas
San Francisco CA 

 - gas emergency security filing LETTER.doc
 - gas emergency financing petition.doc
 - gas emergency financing APPEARANCE let.doc
 - 0010029PROOF.doc
 - 0010029MOTIONPROOF.doc

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/23/2001 08:01 AM
		 
Attached, please find the auction announcement from Governor Davis.

http://63.196.102.6/state/govsite/gov_htmlprint.jsp?BV_SessionID=@@@@068006609
6.0980267878@@@@&BV_EngineID=haljlleidkmbemfcfkmchcng.0&sFilePath=%2fgovsite%2
fpress_release%2f2001_01%2f20010122_pr01030_energy_auction.html&sTitle=GOVERNO
R+DAVIS+ANNOUNCES+AUCTION+FOR+LONG-TERM+ENERGY+CONTRACTS+++%0a&sCatTitle=Press
+Release&iOID=13021

Paul Kaufman@ECT
09/06/2000 07:16 PM
I'd like us to take a stab at drafting the California strategy so we can 
present initial thoughts at the meeting I'm hoping to set up next Wednesday 
in D.C.  (Discussed under separate e-mail).  To that end, I suggest the 
following outline for the strategy:

What are our specific business interests in California?  Let's be as specific 
as possible, but limit the list to "hot buttons."   In this regard, Jim 
Steffes identified "the imposition of price caps in the summer of 2001" as 
the hot button.  Are there others?  
What are the forums we expect will affect our business interests?
For each forum, how do we want to posture Enron?  Do we want to be the most 
aggressive company?  Do we want to act alone?  Do we want to work only in 
coalitions?  What about IEP?  What will motivate us to act independently?
What is our overall strategy?  Do we want to go back to our pre-1999 
rhetoric?  We can scream louder than anyone else that California didn't do it 
right..  Peace will be gone ... should we breach Steve K.'s promise to play 
nice?  Do we want to tear down AB 1890 or shore it up?  
Forum-by-forum identify our:  (a) goals; (b) strategy; (c) what we (Enron) 
want out of the forum.  For example, re:  the legislature, do we want to 
identify legislation that we will seek affirmatively?  If not, why not?

 - Protest to PG&E-cover.doc
 - Opposition-PG&E.doc
 - CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE.doc

>
>  <<ruling to shorten time to file protests or responses.doc>>

 - ruling to shorten time to file protests or responses.doc

>
 - PR01 030 energy auction.doc

go ahead and copy from this and give it a go.  you will get a few returns, 
but the rest should go.  if it completely crashes on you, let me know.  and 
thanks for the summaries and updates.  please keep them coming.  what's your 
cell phone #?best, jeff
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/23/2001 11:36 AM
		 
>
 - PR01 030 energy auction.doc

what time?

David:
Great start.  My biggest comment: needs to be shorter (thank the attention 
span of the press and the political process for that).  I talked to Phil.  
He's got an editor that he works with who can help.  I recommend that we have 
the editor try to boil it down to an "editorial" size piece.  Thoughts?

Best,
Jeff

Tyson has gotten a call-back from the governor's office.  She's going to call 
him back shortly to try to sell him on the plan (i.e., private sector to the 
rescue) and ensure that he'll come to the party.  She'll call me back as soon 
as she talks to him.

Curious--do we have any sense of whether there's much activity within the 
adminstration on this, or can we expect the wait and see approach to continue?
Best,
Jeff

Thanks.  FYI:  Tyson will also be at Davos.  Suggested list of business 
leaders to try to bring on board to follow.

	Linda Robertson
	01/23/2001 03:16 PM
		
Good.  Rick Shapiro and I have an appointment to see Larry Summers Thursday 
morning to update him on CA events.   Larry leaves later that day for Davos  
(Steve, note that Ken will also be in Davos.  Greenspan almost always goes to 
Davos as well.)    As for new Administration, they are publicly saying that 
this mess is CA's mess.  We'll see how long they can sustain this position.  
Rick and I will be meeting with Ed Gillespie Wednesday a.m.  We should know 
more then.  

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/23/2001 03:04 PM
		 
Tyson has gotten a call-back from the governor's office.  She's going to call 
him back shortly to try to sell him on the plan (i.e., private sector to the 
rescue) and ensure that he'll come to the party.  She'll call me back as soon 
as she talks to him.

Curious--do we have any sense of whether there's much activity within the 
adminstration on this, or can we expect the wait and see approach to continue?
Best,
Jeff

Though I didn't have a problem with the course agenda, I'm comfortable with 
the alternative.

great idea.

give a call. 415.782.7822.

	Jeremy Meier <jermeier@earthlink.net>
	01/23/2001 02:15 PM
		 
Jeff:

As discussed last week, we distributed the ICA Memo's to Sue and Donald and 
sent the CA tariffs to Mona in SF.   Please let me know if these documents 
need to go to anyone else at Enron. 
You had also indicated you wanted more information on "costs" for the next 
EBS (or ETI) states of Washington and Oregon (and Utah).  The state filing 
fees should not be overly significant, and we can provide specific numbers -  
though if by "costs" you refer to legal fees, perhaps Steve can best address 
that area. 
You can expect, fortunately or unfortunately, somewhat similar paper 
processes for Wa, Or, and Ut as was done in CA.  There will necessarily be 
issues that Enron will want to first discuss internally, such as disclosure 
of requested financial info. for Wa, before any filing. 
We can send you the forms for each state so you get a feel for what is 
required, or we can capsulize them in a Memo, and/or schedule a call with 
Steve and Anita to go over specific EBS concerns. Let me know your 
preference. To also confirm, you indicated WA as the first priority state, 
with Scott overseeing. 
We are otherwise proceeding as planned. Thanks, 
Jeremy Meier 
Blumenfeld & Cohen 
SF 
 

Leslie:  Jeff and Susan might be able to help with the pipeline charges.  
Susan:  I'm not ignoring you.  Of course I'll come.  Give me a call and let's 
figure out a date for me to address your illustrious group.  Jeff:  How's 
married life treating you.  Leslie:  Sorry for all the extraneous babbling.

Best,
Jeff

	Leslie Lawner
	01/23/2001 03:20 PM
		 
Mike - Here is the situation.  Between ENA and EES, we sell gas to core and 
non-core customers, and also have gas in storage as well as in the park and 
lend service.  I think we can be sympathetic to the ORA argument that the 
diversion tariff penalties did not anticipate OFOs and EFOs in situations 
such as we face here (shortages due to credit problems rather than lack of 
supply).  Assessing extreme penalties, as the OFO/EFOs would do, on users who 
are not perfectly imbalance under this situation certainly seems unfair.  
However, I think we should argue that limiting the payments to 
shippers/customers whose gas is diverted to serve core customers to a market 
index may not fully compensate for the diversion.  The pay back specifically 
does not include interstate pipeline charges, and there may be other costs as 
well to the marketer/customer who had supplies taken away.  

I need an estimate of the cost to make this filing and follow it up for the 
RCR process, and I would also like any feedback anyone has on what our 
position should be in this matter.  The response is due Friday. 

Greetings Chris and Jeff:
I'd love to, but unfortunately I'll be in New York from Sunday through 
Tuesday.  Sue, can you handle?
Best,
Jeff

	Chris Holmes@EES
	01/23/2001 04:07 PM
		 
Jeff- Sue-

On January 30 , an EES team is meeting with IBM in San Jose to cover a number 
f issues, related top the IBM contract.

It would be very helpful to the team if one of you could  attend the meeting 
and present Enrons perspective on the California situation

Could  you call  Jeff Nieland ( 713 345 9352) to let us know if you could 
participate.

We can fill you in on the details re: IBM  over the phone.

chris

the 14th and the 14th (seriously, sorry---that work)!

	Susan Scott
	01/23/2001 04:20 PM
		
Pick a first and second choice:  Feb. 8, 14 or 15.

Leslie:  Jeff and Susan might be able to help with the pipeline charges.  
Susan:  I'm not ignoring you.  Of course I'll come.  Give me a call and let's 
figure out a date for me to address your illustrious group.  Jeff:  How's 
married life treating you.  Leslie:  Sorry for all the extraneous babbling.

Best,
Jeff

	Leslie Lawner
	01/23/2001 03:20 PM
		 
Mike - Here is the situation.  Between ENA and EES, we sell gas to core and 
non-core customers, and also have gas in storage as well as in the park and 
lend service.  I think we can be sympathetic to the ORA argument that the 
diversion tariff penalties did not anticipate OFOs and EFOs in situations 
such as we face here (shortages due to credit problems rather than lack of 
supply).  Assessing extreme penalties, as the OFO/EFOs would do, on users who 
are not perfectly imbalance under this situation certainly seems unfair.  
However, I think we should argue that limiting the payments to 
shippers/customers whose gas is diverted to serve core customers to a market 
index may not fully compensate for the diversion.  The pay back specifically 
does not include interstate pipeline charges, and there may be other costs as 
well to the marketer/customer who had supplies taken away.  

I need an estimate of the cost to make this filing and follow it up for the 
RCR process, and I would also like any feedback anyone has on what our 
position should be in this matter.  The response is due Friday. 

	Susan J Mara
	01/23/2001 04:45 PM
		 
Here is the latest on the QF deal
	"CHUDSON" <carol@iepa.com>
	01/23/2001 02:42 PM
		 
 - LatestDeal.doc

Is there any migration risk, i.e., can customers choose in Connecticutt?  
That will be one of the first questions.

I forgot Bank of America:  Hugh L. McColl, Jr., Chairman and CEO

John Nesslage have any luck coming up with what sort of $/kwh we'd be looking 
at with a private sector bailout?

Here's the suggested list of business leaders to try to bring into the deal.  
All comments are welcome and appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

Here's the list.  Comments?

	Jeff Dasovich
	09/08/2000 06:44 PM
	
Sent by: Joseph Alamo
John/Gia:

You asked that we attempt to evaluate our activities.  Working with TW, I've 
valued this one.

The California Commission ruled that the "Hector Road" natural gas recent 
point in California ought to be made a primary receipt point.  This would 
have had the effect of TW losing access right to 200 MMcf/d of capacity at 
SoCalGas' Needles receipt point.

Best case scenario:  Under SFV rates, loss to TW is commodity rates (wash) 
and the fuel margin.  TW calculates the fuel margin to be $5.8MM/yr.

Bad case:  If shippers on TW try to make the case that TW is at fault for 
losing the primary access rights, then TW is at risk for the demand component 
of the contracts associated with the 200 MMcf/d.  TW calculates the demand 
charges loss to be $16.5 MM/yr.

Worse case:  In addition to actual damages listed above, shippers face 
performance penalties and other contractual damages (from their customers) 
and they try to pass those costs on to TW.

In discussions with TW, we concluded that the most likely case fell between 
"best" and "bad," somewhere in the $12-15MM/yr range (nominal).

TW believes that without the assistance of CA Gov't Affairs in the case, the 
$12-15 MM/yr would have been lost.  

Be happy to discuss with you further.

Best,
Jeff

I'm going to go ahead and send it to her.

Michael Tribolet:

In response to your question, yes, Edison did file in federal district court 
in L.A.  The filing asks the judge to force the CPUC to 1) declare that the 
rate free is over and 2) raise rates to compensate Edison for its 
undercollections.  (Recall that this filing comes on the heels of the court 
agreeing to hear Edison's case asserting that the CPUC must let Edison pass 
through the power purchase costs to customers.)

The filing is apparently very large.  The lawyers at the CPUC have a copy but 
said that it's much too large to make a copy and aren't willing to give it to 
us to make a copy for ourselves.

Question to the lawyers:  Do we have contacts in L.A. that can go to the 
courthouse and get a copy of the filing for us?  Probably a good idea to have 
that filing passed around to this distribution list.

Best,
Jeff

Mary Beth:
Thanks very much for passing these along to Laura Tyson.  There are two 
documents.  One is a word file with a suggested list of business leaders that 
we might bring into the discussions.  Please let the Dean know that it's a 
first cut and that all comments, suggestions, edits, etc. to the document are 
welcome and appreciated.  

The second is a pdf file from Credit Suisse First Boston giving CSFB's 
analysis of what's going on in California.  I think it provides further proof 
that California is still looking for, and ought to be very receptive to, a 
proposal like the one that we're working on. 

Could you let me know that you've received this?  Thanks again.

Best,
Jeff

 - powerpolitics012301.pdf

Mary Beth:
Thanks very much for passing these along to Laura Tyson.  There are two 
documents.  One is a word file with a suggested list of business leaders that 
we might bring into the discussions.  Please let the Dean know that it's a 
first cut and that all comments, suggestions, edits, etc. to the document are 
welcome and appreciated.  

The second is a pdf file from Credit Suisse First Boston giving CSFB's 
analysis of what's going on in California.  I think it provides further proof 
that California is still looking for, and ought to be very receptive to, a 
proposal like the one that we're working on. 

Could you let me know that you've received this?  Thanks again.

Best,
Jeff

 - powerpolitics012301.pdf

This looks like a job for Dave and/or Sam.

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	01/23/2001 07:29 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
Greetings:
I received a call from Senator Haynes office today and talked extensively
about siting/repowering of generation as well as other environmental issues
affecting existing plants.  They (the Senator and his staff) would like to
meet tomorrow at 2:00 and I think it would be important to have a couple
people there that have specific examples/issues.  I don't want the meeting
to get to big (I'd like to keep it limited to 5-6 people) if you are
interested please let me know tomorrow morning.  They also want to know who
is coming so I will need a response by noon tomorrow.  Thanks and I
appreciate your response. Thanks.

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

	MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	01/23/2001 07:13 PM
		 
Here is the current list of emergency actions, motions, etc. by the
utilities and other notable parties in recent days. 

1.  SCE has filed a motion for summary judgement and a motion for injunctive
relief in its "filed rate doctrine" case in Federal District Court in LA to
require the CPUC to declare the rate freeze over and for a court order
requiring the CPUC to raise Edison's rates to recover all past and current
power costs.  This is a potentially critical case.

2.  PG&E filed a motion to require SoCalGas to deliver gas to it for core
consumption under the mutual assistance statute and their agreement with
SoCalGas.  SoCalGas has strongly protested the motion.

3.  PG&E has filed a motion to permit gas suppliers to receive a security
interest in the utility's accounts receiveables (CPUC approval required
under Sec. 851) in order for such suppliers to obtain collateral from the
utility which does not require cash.  Expedited two day response time was
requested.  The ALJ will issue a ruling determining how much time we will
have to respond.

4.  PG&E has filed an advice letter seeking to replace the weighted day
ahead PX price with the ISO ex post energy price as the cost element in the
PX credit for direct access customers.

5.  ORA/TURN have filed an emergency petition seeking to modify the EFO and
OFO procedures under the PG&E gas accord, specifically seeking to waive EFO
and OFO penalties and reducing the diversion charges the core would pay when
the noncore's gas is diverted to serve core load.  The charge would be
reduced to the actual cost of gas, thereby depriving noncore customers and
their suppliers of the cost of interstate transmission and any costs
assciated with the loss of the gas supply and its effect on the customers'
operations.  CMTA has filed strong opposition.

This is what we are aware of as of today.  

Mike Day

You're a star.  I'll let you know.

Best,
Jeff

	Karen Denne
	01/23/2001 08:51 PM
		
Jeff -- If the lawyers can't, I'm sure we can ask Marathon to get the 
filing.  Let me know.  kd

P.S.  Please let Marathon know that the information they're providing is both 
greatly appreciated and highly valued and we hope that they can continue to 
poke around and fill us in on what they hear.  Great having multiple data 
points.

Best,
Jeff

	Karen Denne
	01/23/2001 08:51 PM
		
Jeff -- If the lawyers can't, I'm sure we can ask Marathon to get the 
filing.  Let me know.  kd

Dear Gang:
I don't know about you folks, but I woke up to over 100 emails from Telecom 
Reports today.  It seems to border on spam at this point.  Is anyone else 
having this experience?  The info is very valuable, but I'm wondering if 
there's a way to get, say, 3 emails a day rather than the 50 or more I'm 
currently receiving.

Wondering if the lights will stay on today,
Jeff

	Margo Reyna
	01/24/2001 09:20 AM
		 
Margo Reyna
Regulatory Analyst
Enron Corp., Government Affairs
Phone:  713-853-9191

	djcustomclips@djinteractive.com
	01/23/2001 05:56 PM
	Please respond to nobody
		 
USA: Senators renew high-speed Internet tax credit bill. 
  
01/23/2001 
Reuters English News Service 
(C) Reuters Limited 2001. 
WASHINGTON, Jan 23 (Reuters) - A bill that would encourage businesses to 
bring high-speed Internet access to underserved areas was reintroduced in the 
Senate on Tuesday, with the hopes that President Bush would include the item 
in his budget.
Computers equipped with a "broadband" or high-speed Internet connection can 
download information at a rate of up to 1.5 megabits per second, or about 25 
times faster than a standard, dial-up connection. While broadband access is 
currently available in many business districts and affluent residential 
neighborhoods, the service has not yet spread to less affluent or more 
sparsely populated areas. 
The bill would provide a five-year, 10 percent tax credit to Internet 
companies that extend broadband service to rural or underserved urban areas.
Companies who build "next generation" networks, with download speeds of up to 
22 megabits per second, would receive a 20 percent, five-year credit.
The bill was introduced by Republican senators Olympia Snowe of Maine and 
Orrin Hatch of Utah, and Democrats Jay Rockefeller of West Virginia and John 
Kerry of Massachusetts. It was co-sponsored by 32 other senators.
The 36 senators sent a letter to President Bush urging him to include the 
bill in his initial budget proposal.
The bill attracted the support of 59 senators and 115 House members last 
year, the letter claimed. 

Folder Name: Telecom Services: Broadband Services 
Relevance Score on Scale of 100: 83

______________________________________________________________________ 
To review or revise your folder, visit Dow Jones CustomClips or contact Dow 
Jones Customer Service by e-mail at custom.news@bis.dowjones.com or by phone 
at 800-369-7466. (Outside the U.S. and Canada, call 609-452-1511 or contact 
your local sales representative.) 
______________________________________________________________________ 
Copyright (c) 2001 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved 

Are we talking 10 hours worth of work for this pleading?  If so, then $2500 
seems good.

Got it.  Thanks.  I'll be sending mine around later this afternoon.

Best,
Jeff

in the attempt to delete the millions of emails i've received from Telecom 
Reports, i deleted your Western Gov update before reading it.  could you 
resend?

your pal,
jeff

will do.  thought that you were already on.

It's fun and games every day (can't wait to catch up---you will howl (or cry, 
not sure which)).  Miss you guys terribly.  Don't throw me out of the club 
for being AWOL, please.  Hope to see you soon.

Best,
Jeff

	Sue Nord
	01/24/2001 10:19 AM
		
I had the same experience.  (As if my inbox wasn't in sorry enough shape as 
it is).  I'll ask Margo to check with them to be sure the problem is 
corrected.

Hope you're having fun....

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/24/2001 10:07 AM
		
Dear Gang:
I don't know about you folks, but I woke up to over 100 emails from Telecom 
Reports today.  It seems to border on spam at this point.  Is anyone else 
having this experience?  The info is very valuable, but I'm wondering if 
there's a way to get, say, 3 emails a day rather than the 50 or more I'm 
currently receiving.

Wondering if the lights will stay on today,
Jeff

	Margo Reyna
	01/24/2001 09:20 AM
		 
Margo Reyna
Regulatory Analyst
Enron Corp., Government Affairs
Phone:  713-853-9191

	djcustomclips@djinteractive.com
	01/23/2001 05:56 PM
	Please respond to nobody
		 
USA: Senators renew high-speed Internet tax credit bill. 
  
01/23/2001 
Reuters English News Service 
(C) Reuters Limited 2001. 
WASHINGTON, Jan 23 (Reuters) - A bill that would encourage businesses to 
bring high-speed Internet access to underserved areas was reintroduced in the 
Senate on Tuesday, with the hopes that President Bush would include the item 
in his budget.
Computers equipped with a "broadband" or high-speed Internet connection can 
download information at a rate of up to 1.5 megabits per second, or about 25 
times faster than a standard, dial-up connection. While broadband access is 
currently available in many business districts and affluent residential 
neighborhoods, the service has not yet spread to less affluent or more 
sparsely populated areas. 
The bill would provide a five-year, 10 percent tax credit to Internet 
companies that extend broadband service to rural or underserved urban areas.
Companies who build "next generation" networks, with download speeds of up to 
22 megabits per second, would receive a 20 percent, five-year credit.
The bill was introduced by Republican senators Olympia Snowe of Maine and 
Orrin Hatch of Utah, and Democrats Jay Rockefeller of West Virginia and John 
Kerry of Massachusetts. It was co-sponsored by 32 other senators.
The 36 senators sent a letter to President Bush urging him to include the 
bill in his initial budget proposal.
The bill attracted the support of 59 senators and 115 House members last 
year, the letter claimed. 

Folder Name: Telecom Services: Broadband Services 
Relevance Score on Scale of 100: 83

______________________________________________________________________ 
To review or revise your folder, visit Dow Jones CustomClips or contact Dow 
Jones Customer Service by e-mail at custom.news@bis.dowjones.com or by phone 
at 800-369-7466. (Outside the U.S. and Canada, call 609-452-1511 or contact 
your local sales representative.) 
______________________________________________________________________ 
Copyright (c) 2001 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved 

most indebted.

	Tracy Cooper@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	01/24/2001 10:25 AM
		
Hi everyone

Just placed a call with TR Daily, problem should be fixed shortly -- sorry 
about the spamming!!s

Tracy J. Cooper
Please note my name has changed from McLaughlin to Cooper
Enron Broadband Services
Government Affairs 
(503) 886-0396 

	Jeff Dasovich@ENRON
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich@ENRON
	01/24/01 08:07 AM
		
Dear Gang:
I don't know about you folks, but I woke up to over 100 emails from Telecom 
Reports today.  It seems to border on spam at this point.  Is anyone else 
having this experience?  The info is very valuable, but I'm wondering if 
there's a way to get, say, 3 emails a day rather than the 50 or more I'm 
currently receiving.

Wondering if the lights will stay on today,
Jeff

	Margo Reyna
	01/24/2001 09:20 AM
		 
Margo Reyna
Regulatory Analyst
Enron Corp., Government Affairs
Phone:  713-853-9191

	djcustomclips@djinteractive.com
	01/23/2001 05:56 PM
	Please respond to nobody
		 
USA: Senators renew high-speed Internet tax credit bill. 
  
01/23/2001 
Reuters English News Service 
(C) Reuters Limited 2001. 
WASHINGTON, Jan 23 (Reuters) - A bill that would encourage businesses to 
bring high-speed Internet access to underserved areas was reintroduced in the 
Senate on Tuesday, with the hopes that President Bush would include the item 
in his budget.
Computers equipped with a "broadband" or high-speed Internet connection can 
download information at a rate of up to 1.5 megabits per second, or about 25 
times faster than a standard, dial-up connection. While broadband access is 
currently available in many business districts and affluent residential 
neighborhoods, the service has not yet spread to less affluent or more 
sparsely populated areas. 
The bill would provide a five-year, 10 percent tax credit to Internet 
companies that extend broadband service to rural or underserved urban areas.
Companies who build "next generation" networks, with download speeds of up to 
22 megabits per second, would receive a 20 percent, five-year credit.
The bill was introduced by Republican senators Olympia Snowe of Maine and 
Orrin Hatch of Utah, and Democrats Jay Rockefeller of West Virginia and John 
Kerry of Massachusetts. It was co-sponsored by 32 other senators.
The 36 senators sent a letter to President Bush urging him to include the 
bill in his initial budget proposal.
The bill attracted the support of 59 senators and 115 House members last 
year, the letter claimed. 

Folder Name: Telecom Services: Broadband Services 
Relevance Score on Scale of 100: 83

______________________________________________________________________ 
To review or revise your folder, visit Dow Jones CustomClips or contact Dow 
Jones Customer Service by e-mail at custom.news@bis.dowjones.com or by phone 
at 800-369-7466. (Outside the U.S. and Canada, call 609-452-1511 or contact 
your local sales representative.) 
______________________________________________________________________ 
Copyright (c) 2001 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved 

	Sharonda Stephens
	01/24/2001 09:39 AM
		 
	"ANN SCHMIDT, ENRON CORP." <ENRONPR@bloomberg.net>
	01/24/2001 09:37 AM
		 
               enron story

Edison Says Banks Put Off Credit Remedies to Feb. 13 (Update4)
1/24/1 10:32 (New York)

Edison Says Banks Put Off Credit Remedies to Feb. 13 (Update4)

     (Adds background on missed payments in fourth paragraph,
power alert in seventh paragraph, auction in eighth paragraph. For
more on California's electricity crisis, see {EXTRA <GO>}.)

     Rosemead, California, Jan. 24 (Bloomberg) -- Southern
California Edison Co.'s banks agreed to delay taking action
against the utility until at least Feb. 13 for defaulting on lines
of credit, an executive of its parent company said.
     ``The banks have agreed to forbear'' through that date, Ted
Craver, Edison International's chief financial officer, said in a
conference call with investors.
     The group of 23 banks have the right to demand accelerated
payments or seek other remedies after Southern California Edison,
California's second-largest utility, failed to make $230 million
of payments on maturing notes last week. That produced a ``cross-
default'' on its lines of credit.
     Both the utility and PG&E Corp.'s Pacific Gas & Electric
defaulted last week on commercial paper, a type of money-market
security. In addition, Southern California Edison failed to pay
$366 million to power generators.
     The two utilities have piled up more than $11.5 billion in
power-buying debt because rising demand and short supplies have
driven up the price they pay, and the state's deregulation law
caps the rates they can charge customers.
     For more than a week, the California Independent System
Operator has kept its highest alert in place. The Stage Three
alert is imposed by the ISO, which runs three-quarters of the
state's power grid, when reserves fall to within 1.5 percent
of demand.

                      Bankruptcy Outlook

     The state is now running an auction to solicit bids for
multiyear power contracts on behalf of the utilities. Producers
can submit offers in the auction, which ends at noon California
time, to sell power for as long as 10 years.
     Meanwhile, Southern California Edison and the banks are
getting the final paperwork ``mopped up'' on the forbearance
agreement, Craver said in yesterday's conference call.
     The utility doesn't intend to file for bankruptcy, Craver
said. ``We do not believe that solves anything,'' he said, as it
doesn't change the need for political and regulatory action to
address the utility's cash crunch.
     ``That's why we instituted this additional step of the
temporary payment suspension,'' Craver said. ``We believe we're in
a position to operate the business without running out of cash''
for at least three weeks, he said. He described the utility's net
cash flow as ``at least breakeven'' after the payment suspensions.
     Craver was asked during the teleconference about the chances
that power generators or other creditors might force the utility
into an involuntary bankruptcy.

                          Making Progress

     Generators are aware of the ``not-so-subtle threats that
bubble about'' regarding the state using eminent domain to take
control of power plants or contracts. ``It's in everybody's best
interest'' to find a way out that avoids bankruptcy, Craver said.
``That's the way everybody's operating.''
     California Governor Gray Davis and state lawmakers are
working on potential solutions, including locking in long-term
power contracts, to help keep the two utilities from bankruptcy.
The state's Department of Water Resources has an initial stake of
$400 million to buy electricity for the utilities.
     ``We're continuing to make progress and it's encouraging
that's being recognized,'' said Steve Maviglio, a spokesman for
Davis.
     ``There is now a very great deal of urgency'' among state
leaders to develop a comprehensive framework of solutions, Robert
Foster, Edison's senior vice president of public affairs, said
during the conference call.
     A framework may be in place by Feb. 1, Foster said. ``I
haven't seen anything quite this intense in 30 years'' in the
state capital, he added.

                         Paying the Bills

     Assembly Speaker Robert Hertzberg is working on a bill that
calls for Southern California Edison and Pacific Gas & Electric to
give up hydroelectric plants. In exchange, the state would sell
revenue bonds that repay past spending and finance power purchases
on their behalf.
     ``I don't think at this point we're really able to respond''
to that proposal without more details, Craver said. In response to
a question on the transfer of hydroelectric plants, utility
officials said the issues would include secured bondholders' liens
on Edison's assets.
     Utility officials said they have also been asked about who
will repay the $400 million of initial state spending on power
purchases.
     Based on the legislative intent, it is Edison's understanding
``that this power be paid for directly by the customers, not the
utilities,'' Stephen Pickett, vice president and general counsel
of Southern California Edison, said during the teleconference.
     ``It is not completely clear that that is the case,'' Pickett
said.
     Craver also stressed that Edison, the parent of the utility,
hasn't gone into default on its obligations. ``We're not having
difficulty meeting our obligations,'' he said, and its cash is
about twice the amount of commercial paper outstanding.

--Dennis Walters in Ojai, California, at (805) 646-1475, or
dwalters@bloomberg.net, through the San Francisco newsroom (415)
912-2980/pkc/cs/dw

Story illustration: For a chart comparing the performance of
Edison and PG&E with the Dow Jones Utilities for the past year,
click on {UTIL <Index> COMP D <GO>} or enter the command. Enter
EIX US <Equity> in the second box, and PCG US <Equity> in the
third. Press <GO>.

PCG US <Equity> CN
EIX US <Equity> CN
DUK US <Equity> CN
ENE US <Equity> CN
CPN US <Equity> CN
REI US <Equity> CN
NRG US <Equity> CN
WMB US <Equity> CN
SO US <Equity> CN
SOE US <Equity> CN
AES US <Equity> CN
DYN US <Equity> CN
13622Z US <Equity> CN
SRE US <Equity> CN

NI UTI
NI NRG
NI BNK
NI ELC
NI GAS
NI COS
NI LAW
NI US
NI EXE
NI GEN
NI CA
NI RULES
NI GOV
NI MUN
NI MNC
NI BCY
NI USBONDS

-0- (BN ) Jan/24/2001 15:32 GMT

let's talk about these notes prior to your drafting.  please give me a call.  
	Tamara Johnson@EES
	01/24/2001 11:11 AM
		 
Tamara Johnson
01/24/2001 11:10 AM
Additions from Jubran...

Proposed pricing mechanism:

Dow Jones Electricity Indexes, specifically their NP15/SP15 indexes.
- the indexes are based on weighted average prices and total volumes
- they measure "bilateral one-day prescheduled, financially firm transactions"
=> therefore the Dow Jones Index more accurately reflects market pricing
- Dow Jones has the right to randomly audit the data providers

why not the ex-post ISO?
- generators are not selling to California's ISO because of the $150/MWh 
price cap,
=> therefore prices coming out of the ISO do not reflect real market prices
- there are purchases above the $150 soft cap, but the pricing of the out of 
market transactions is explained to FERC only, this information is not in the 
public domain
- if generators are not selling into the market, there is no liquidity, 
therefore prices are not reflective of the prices that buyers must pay
- and generators may not be selling into the market due to the credit exposure

why not use the ex-post ISO price on an interim basis?
- because putting a false cap on the market price will result in price 
increases to DA customers, contrary to AB1890, without due process
- Decision 99-06-058 set the foundation for the PX credit to reflect real 
market prices, PG&E's proposal does not adhere to this.

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/24/2001 08:17 AM
		 
Attached, please find the security assessment legislation SBX1 13.

http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx1_13_bill_20010123_introdu
ced.pdf

Mary Beth:  

For what it's worth, I've read this, and if Laura Tyson or Larry Summers sign 
it, I have serious concerns about the effect it would have on their ability 
to play the role that we envision in moving our proposal forward 
(understanding that our odds of success are somewhat meager).  While I don't 
disagree with the language, it is strong and therefore very likely to make 
the Governor and his staff very uncomfortable.  I would recommend that they 
do not sign.

Best,
Jeff
	David Teece <teece@Haas.Berkeley.EDU>
	01/24/2001 10:56 AM
		 
TO:?? Colleagues

SUBJECT:? Final Version

I've done my best to include your very helpful comments.? The document now 
also contains a summary.

I would like your endorsement, by noon PST (Wednesday) if possible.? A number 
of you have already indicated you would sign it.? Also, Tom Campbell has 
indicated he will try to recruit Ken Arrow.? I believe one of you agreed to 
recruit Dan McFadden.? Laura is working on Larry Summers.? Solow would be a 
great addition, too.

Can we agree on the following division of labor from here out:

1.? Recruiting others:? All

2.? Media representatives:? Campbell, Tyson, Spiller, Verlerger, Wilk, 
Teece, and Hogan (This is by no means meant to preclude anyone contacting 
the media after we go public.)

??? On media, we are giving the LA Times a 24-hour exclusive.? We won't 
release to other media sources until 9:00 AM Thursday.

Many thanks for your involvement and endorsements.

 - Manifesto-final version.doc
======================================
David J. Teece, Director
Institute of Management, Innovation and Organization
F402 Haas School of Business #1930
University of California, Berkeley
Berkeley, CA  94720-1930
Phone:  (510) 642-1075
Fax:  (510) 642-2826
http://haas.berkeley.edu/~imio
======================================

I don't envy your position.  At some point, the document must be finished and 
folks need to determine whether they'll sign or not.  I greatly admire Rich 
Gilbert, but his comments (re: regulatory intervention is a good thing, and 
now this one) will surely create considerably controversy and could greatly 
upset the apple cart altogether.

Best of luck,
Jeff

Talked to Tyson.  She's really working it, which is great, and I continue to 
focus my efforts there.  My company is squarely behind her efforts.  Thanks 
again for organizing the meeting last weekend.

	"Richard J. Gilbert" <gilbert@econ.Berkeley.EDU>
	01/24/2001 01:03 PM
		 
One more thing:

No one talked about bailing out consumers when retail prices were above
spot prices (by about $40/MWh by my calculation) in the 2+ years
following deregulation.  Surely, if we bail out
the utilities by raising prices now, consumers should be credited for the
above-market prices that they paid in the past.

Rich

Greetings.  Looks like our questions (2&3) are linked.  You around to chat 
for a couple of minutes?  I'll likely eyeball the numbers to see what cash 
gives in order to answer #3.  Let me know.  Hope all's well.

Best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/23/2001 10:57 AM
		 
 - gas emergency security filing LETTER.doc
 - gas emergency financing petition.doc
 - gas emergency financing APPEARANCE let.doc
 - 0010029PROOF.doc
 - 0010029MOTIONPROOF.doc

	Mike D Smith@EES
	01/24/2001 01:51 PM
		 
Here's the latest with Maureen's comments but without anything from Peggy.  
Please comment.

Lawyers--please call or e-mail if any of the business changes have changed 
our legal position.  MDS

Haven't received anything.  Sounds like we all agree that it would be a good 
idea to do it.  I'll write the prof an email and ask him to email us the 
file.  My preference (in order to actually learn something--i'm sort of 
thick) is to work on these jointly rather than have one person do it each 
week, but i'm willing to discuss.  others have views on how we ought to write 
'em up?

Best,
Jeff

	"Mark Guinney" <Mark_Guinney@watsonwyatt.com>
	01/24/2001 09:06 AM
		 
I, too, read the case and was prepared to write a memo except for the crucial
fact that I have no idea what the prof. is looking for.  I haven't seen the
suggested questions which I assume will point us in the right direction.

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax

____________________Reply Separator____________________
I took a look at the case last night.  It is very short and appears to be
somewhat straight forward.  We may want to work on this one as insurance.

Has anyone received the files with the suggested questions and spreadsheets
yet?

Dylan

At 09:15 AM 1/24/2001 -0800, Jackson, James (JCJA) wrote:
>It sounded like if we do this one it will be best 5 out of 6.  It could take
>the pressure off of us if we do this one.  I would vote we go for it.  We
>can talk about it tonight.
>Jimmy
>
> > -----Original Message-----

Prof. Bajaj.  

Our understanding is that we'll need the electronic file you talked about on 
Monday in order to do the first (optional) case (re: helpful questions and 
spreadsheets).  But we haven't received the file yet.  Could you possibly 
forward it to us?  We're leaning strongly toward writing the first case up 
and turning it in and are anxious to get started.  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

Tyson has had conversations with the Governor's office.
The Governor's office wants more information about what the meeting would 
"look like"/attendees, and has said that the idea sounds like one worth 
pursuing (but as we know, talk is very cheap with this Governor).
In response, Tyson and her very able helper are taking the 1.5-pager that I 
sent around and modifying it to describe the meeting 
optics/logistics/attendee attributes, etc.
They will forward it to me as soon as they've got it drafted.
Tyson hopes the document will seal the deal on the Governor's participation.
In the meantime, Tyson is trading calls with Doer and trying to line up other 
business face cards to assist in getting the business community to the 
table.  Any help/suggestions we can offer gathering up business folks would 
be useful, but seems that Tyson's going to have to carry that water.
Tyson said based on her conversations with Summers, he's squarely on board.

The way we handled it last time was 1) have a quick chat about it, 2) split 
up the pieces, 3) once written, pass around the pieces to see if anyone has 
any strong feelings about what folks had pulled together, and then, for each 
case, 4) designate one person as the "assembler" of the pieces.  (We 
designated who would be responsible for which cases at the beginning of the 
semester.)  And yes, all by email (save for, say, the preliminary chat).  It 
worked well.  But I'm flexible, if folks want to try another angle.

Best,
Jeff

	"Mark Guinney" <Mark_Guinney@watsonwyatt.com>
	01/24/2001 12:19 PM
		 
Jeff,

How would you suggest it would work writing it jointly via an internet
discussion group?

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax

____________________Reply Separator____________________
Haven't received anything.  Sounds like we all agree that it would be a
good idea to do it.  I'll write the prof an email and ask him to email us
the file.  My preference (in order to actually learn something--i'm sort of
thick) is to work on these jointly rather than have one person do it each
week, but i'm willing to discuss.  others have views on how we ought to
write 'em up?

Best,
Jeff

                    "Mark Guinney"

                    wyatt.com>                  
<dwindham@uclink4.berkeley.edu>,
                                                "JCJA@chevron.com" 
<JCJA@chevron
.com>,
                    01/24/2001 09:06 AM         "dasovich@haas.berkeley.edu"

                                                <dasovich@haas.berkeley.edu>,

                                                "jjackson@haas.berkeley.edu"

                                                <jjackson@haas.berkeley.edu>

                                                cc:

                                                Subject:     Re:RE: e234

I, too, read the case and was prepared to write a memo except for the
crucial
fact that I have no idea what the prof. is looking for.  I haven't seen the
suggested questions which I assume will point us in the right direction.

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax

____________________Reply Separator____________________
I took a look at the case last night.  It is very short and appears to be
somewhat straight forward.  We may want to work on this one as insurance.

Has anyone received the files with the suggested questions and spreadsheets
yet?

Dylan

At 09:15 AM 1/24/2001 -0800, Jackson, James (JCJA) wrote:
>It sounded like if we do this one it will be best 5 out of 6.  It could
take
>the pressure off of us if we do this one.  I would vote we go for it.  We
>can talk about it tonight.
>Jimmy
>
> > -----Original Message-----

Took Kahn's place, who's now on the ISO Governing Board.

 - powerpolitics012301.pdf

OK, i'm trying this again.  Jim, please let me know if you receive this.  I'm 
attaching the previous notes.  
Tom Gros@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
01/19/2000 08:59 AM
John Yurkanin (CA ISO) is my former boss at BP Gas.  I'd be happy to talk 
with them about excess capacity.

	Jeff Dasovich@EES
	01/17/00 01:01 PM
		 
Hi Jim: 

As we discussed, your client, the California Independent System Operator, 
contracted with MCI to build a high-speed, broad band network (predominately 
OC-48?)as the platform to launch electricity deregulation in California.  
Since that time, the ISO has discovered that it has capacity substantially in 
excess of what it needs to operate the grid (and certain markets for power, 
e.g., ancillary services).  

Rather than try to re-negotiate the contract with MCI, the ISO is now looking 
at marketing the capacity.  Sounds like the capacity runs between Sacramento 
(Folsom?) and Southern California (Alhambra?).  Please correct any 
(unintended) inaccuracies I may have included in this very brief description.

Tom Gros is VP of Enron's global bandwidth trading group and can help 
determine the value/feasibility of having the ISO make use of Enron's 
bandwith trading platform.

Tom, meet Jim.  Jim, meet Tom

Best,
Jeff

FYI.
Gary Ackerman <foothi19@idt.net> on 08/24/2000 06:49:26 PM
Please respond to foothi19@idt.net
URGENT REPLY AND ACTION NEEDED

Folks,

Rebecca Smith of the Wall Street Journal called me today and asked how
she could access the bid data the ISO has for the generators in order to
do an investigative in-depth analysis of what has occurred in
California's wholesale power market.  Before I get into the details of
her request, I would urge you in the strongest way possible to consider
her request, and grant it.  We need the light of truth to shine on our
business, and the Wall Street Journal may be one of our best aids.  And
consider this, the data will be available to her  in six months, anyway.

Rebecca's intent is to study the data, and understand the true behavior
of the wholesale market for a given month.  She said July 2000 would
work.  Her hypothesis is unlikely that the hype by Gov Davis and the
State of accusing in-state and out-of-state generators of being gougers
and the guitly parties , and can be deminished by the data.  She thinks
there are plenty of people in the generation market who are playing this
straight as an arrow.  Without the data, she can't say anything
conclusive. (of course, I wonder how she will gather the UDC bid data?)

I have one question.  Did the ISO give the detailed bid data to the EOB
or the PUC?  I thought because neither the EOB nor the ISO would or
could keep the data confidential, the detailed bid data was not
released, only the aggregate data.

I asked her if she would keep the data confidential, in other words, not
pass it on to other parties.  She said she could.  I asked her if other
assocaites of the Wall Street Journal would have access to the data.
She said probably  in order to do an in depth analysis others would have
access on a need to know basis, but that the data would not leave the
Wall Street Journal's control.

Tell me what we should do, and tell me quickly.

gba

one other thing.  what's your home number?

couldn't get thru on Hoffman's cell #.  Left voice mail for Thomas.  will let 
you know as soon as anything happens.

Nice job.  Thanks.

	"Philip K. Verleger" <PVerleger@compuserve.com>
	01/24/2001 04:32 PM
		 
Jeff

I have never been accused of being subtle.  However, someone had to say it 
and it is better to say it now than to have it come out later.

Phil

Dear David:

        I am writing this note to you and not the committee.  I am worried
that too many of the signatories can be accused of trying use their
academic positions to achieve results desired by their consulting clients. 
I riase this issue because more than one person has told me that "Paul
Joscow is owned by Edison."  While such statements are generally wrong I
believe you need to be sensitive to the potential attack.  In particular, I
worry that our efforts will be undermined if too many of the individuals
signing the report have had extensive dealings with the state's three
largest utilities.  I can just see the headline "Apologists for utilities
offer solutions to state's energy problems."  

        You know we will be attacked after we issue the manifesto.  The
question is, will the attacks have merit.  If we were all white as the
driven snow there would be no problem.  However, under such circumstances
we would all be poor. 

        For this reason it is important to get independent academics and
non-academics with no connections to the utilities or generators to sign
the manifesto.  I fall into this later category as, I believe, do a number
of other individuals.  The addition of Solow would obviously help as would
Arrow or McFadden.  Dale Jorgenson would also be a great addition because
he has never worked or testified for these firms.  The same goes for Paul
Krugman.  On the other hand, Pual brings some heavy baggage.  

        I understand it is important to have as many names attached to the
manifesto as possible.  However, Paul's name may hurt.
 
Phil

Greetings Mary Beth:

I'm touching base to see how progress is coming on the document that's being 
prepared for the Governor's office.

Best,
Jeff

Sorry to hear that.  I'll give you a call in the morning.

Best,
Jeff

	Marybeth Schubert <schub@socrates.berkeley.edu>
	01/24/2001 08:57 PM
		 
FYI.  Discouraging first response from Governor's office.  More 
tomorrow.  Marybeth
 - tyson_to_davis.doc

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/24/2001 05:52 PM
		 
Assemblyman Rod Wright held another one of his informal discussions with
generators, IOUs and marketers.  This is what he said:

Assembly Speaker Robert Hertzberg is going to introduce a bill tomorrow
at 11:00 a.m. which will contain many of the same elements in ABX 1,
minus the 5.5.  This will be a more comprehensive bill which will
address arrearage, securitization and include some type of a stop loss
mechanism among other things.  It is unclear whether or not the bill
will be voted on tomorrow or held until Monday, but there will be a
hearing at 2:00 p.m.

SBX 1 will probably be heard tomorrow as well, although it is not clear
what action if any the Senate Energy Committee will take.

There are ongoing discussions about the state creating a transmission
corporation to operate but not own the transmission system.

There are ongoing discussions about allowing DWR to buy existing block
forward contracts, however the courts today issued a stay to prevent SCE
or the PX from taking any actions on the contracts until at least
February 2.

There are ongoing discussions about issuing ratepayer bonds in place of
the full faith and credit of the state which was absent from the DWR
RFB.

Sempra requested that the legislature repeal Utilities Code Section
355.2 which prevents IOUs from buying outside the PX.

Other items which arose today:

We spent the day meeting with legislators regarding expedited siting.
The response was positive, including from Senator Byron Sher who is the
key environmentalist in the legislature.  Our initial focus has been on
the trouble with getting air credits.

Governor Davis held a press conference moments ago where he indicated
that the average bid price for the DWR RFB is 6.9.   I will forward the
press release in the morning.

I have attached a press release from Governor Davis regarding the new
ISO board which includes information on the new members.

http://www.governor.ca.gov/state/govsite/gov_htmlprint.jsp?BV_SessionID=@@@@08
58855136.0980390190@@@@&BV_EngineID=faljlleidkhbemfcfkmchcgi.0&sFilePath=%2fgo
vsite%2fpress_release%2f2001_01%2f20010124_a01024_.html&sTitle=GOVERNOR+DAVIS+
ANNOUNCES+FIRST+MEETING+OF+NEW+ISO+BOARD&sCatTitle=Press+Release&iOID=13102

Scott:

Thanks.  These summaries are extremely well done and highly valued within the 
company.  Thanks for the great work.

Best,
Jeff

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/24/2001 05:52 PM
		 
Assemblyman Rod Wright held another one of his informal discussions with
generators, IOUs and marketers.  This is what he said:

Assembly Speaker Robert Hertzberg is going to introduce a bill tomorrow
at 11:00 a.m. which will contain many of the same elements in ABX 1,
minus the 5.5.  This will be a more comprehensive bill which will
address arrearage, securitization and include some type of a stop loss
mechanism among other things.  It is unclear whether or not the bill
will be voted on tomorrow or held until Monday, but there will be a
hearing at 2:00 p.m.

SBX 1 will probably be heard tomorrow as well, although it is not clear
what action if any the Senate Energy Committee will take.

There are ongoing discussions about the state creating a transmission
corporation to operate but not own the transmission system.

There are ongoing discussions about allowing DWR to buy existing block
forward contracts, however the courts today issued a stay to prevent SCE
or the PX from taking any actions on the contracts until at least
February 2.

There are ongoing discussions about issuing ratepayer bonds in place of
the full faith and credit of the state which was absent from the DWR
RFB.

Sempra requested that the legislature repeal Utilities Code Section
355.2 which prevents IOUs from buying outside the PX.

Other items which arose today:

We spent the day meeting with legislators regarding expedited siting.
The response was positive, including from Senator Byron Sher who is the
key environmentalist in the legislature.  Our initial focus has been on
the trouble with getting air credits.

Governor Davis held a press conference moments ago where he indicated
that the average bid price for the DWR RFB is 6.9.   I will forward the
press release in the morning.

I have attached a press release from Governor Davis regarding the new
ISO board which includes information on the new members.

http://www.governor.ca.gov/state/govsite/gov_htmlprint.jsp?BV_SessionID=@@@@08
58855136.0980390190@@@@&BV_EngineID=faljlleidkhbemfcfkmchcgi.0&sFilePath=%2fgo
vsite%2fpress_release%2f2001_01%2f20010124_a01024_.html&sTitle=GOVERNOR+DAVIS+
ANNOUNCES+FIRST+MEETING+OF+NEW+ISO+BOARD&sCatTitle=Press+Release&iOID=13102

we know anything about this?

	Chris Hendrix@EES
	01/25/2001 09:34 AM
		 
SDG&E made a filing Wednesday to add a $0.023/kWh bill surcharge.  If 
possible could you send Ed and me a copy of the filing?

Thanks,

Chris

	Michael Tribolet
	01/25/2001 09:08 AM
		 
FYI

	Credit Suisse First Boston <Paul_Patterson@xmr3.com>
	01/25/2001 07:33 AM
		 
Credit Suisse First Boston
Paul Patterson
Good morning,
Here are some of the recent developments in the California power crisis:
? Yesterday evening, Governor Davis revealed preliminary results of the DWR's 
auction for long-term forward power contracts. 39 bidders participated, with 
an average weighted bid of $0.069 per kWh excluding "Super Peak" periods.
? However, the governor did not discuss the quantity of power actually bid, 
the breakdown between offers for base-load, peak, and off-peak power, or 
provisions for ancillary services.  In our opinion, these are exceedingly 
important issues that need to be known to adequately determine the "success" 
of any auction.
? Republican Assembly leader Bill Campbell is reportedly working on an 
alternative bill to Speaker Hertzberg's proposed bill. Reportedly Campbell's 
bill would call for the state to arrange long-term contracts for the 
utilities, in exchange for the option to purchase ownership stakes.
? We believe that the actual results of the long-term contract auctions 
should be a key point of focus for investors and may help determine what 
headroom, if any, the utilities could have. We believe that investors should 
remain aware of the high risk still associated with shares of PCG ($9.94, 
Hold) and EIX ($9.63, Hold).

Paul Patterson, 212-325-5876
Neil Stein, 212-325-4217
Wen-Wen Chen, 212-538-0223
Emily Lao Chua, 212-325-1982

Hi Cindy:

Mark asked me to give you these to fax to Mark at the Four Seasons.  Three 
things:

Berkeley Academics "Manifesto"--very confidential
My preliminary doodlings for a talk I'm giving at an EXNET conference in New 
York on Monday
A one page "backgrounder" that Jim and I put together for the Bush transition 
team.

Thanks a million.

Jeff

 - Manifesto-final version_with modifications1.doc

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/25/2001 07:38 AM
		 
Attached, please find a transcript from Governor Davis' press conference
regarding DWR's RFB.

http://www.governor.ca.gov/state/govsite/gov_htmldisplay.jsp?BV_SessionID=@@@@
0019274483.0980440259@@@@&BV_EngineID=daljlleidjmbemfcfkmchcng.0&sCatTitle=Pre
ss+Release&sFilePath=/govsite/press_release/2001_01/20010124_pr01035_transcrip
t_DWR_Press_Conf.html&sTitle=TRANSCRIPT+OF+GOVERNOR+DAVIS+WITH+DEPARTMENT+OF+W
ATER+RESOURCES+OFFICIALS&iOID=13121

Here's my cut at #3.  I haven't had the benefit of Kim's answer, but made 
some assumptions and took a shot.  Likely to doctor it up a bit, but wanted 
to find out if folks are in agreement or if you think I've lost my mind.  Let 
me know.  #3 is somewhat at the heart of the questions, so I want to make 
sure that I get your feedback.  And my apologies for not having gotten you 
something sooner.  Be on the look out, there is a cold going around that 
really kicked my butt over the last week.

Best,
Jeff

	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	01/25/2001 11:27 AM
		 
Here is the SDG&E filing
Attached is an electronic copy of  SDG&E's Application, Testimony and Motion
for an Order Shortening Time filed today with the CPUC.

<<Application.doc>> <<McMonagle Testimon.doc>> <<Motion.doc>> <<Reed
Attachment.doc>> <<Reed Testimony.doc>> <<Sakarias Testimony.doc>>
<<Schneider Test..doc>>

<<Schneider Exhibits..xls>> <<Schneider Rate Tables.xls>>

__________________________________

 - Application.doc
 - McMonagle Testimon.doc
 - Motion.doc
 - Reed Attachment.doc
 - Reed Testimony.doc
 - Sakarias Testimony.doc
 - Schneider Test..doc
 - Schneider Exhibits..xls
 - Schneider Rate Tables.xls

	"CHUDSON" <carol@iepa.com>
	01/25/2001 11:48 AM
		 
Carol Hudson, Executive Assistance
Independent Energy Producers Assn.
1112 I Street, Suite 380
Sacramento, CA 95814
PH: 916-448-9499
FX: 916-448-0182
chudson@iepa.com

 - #1034697 v10 - Draft Forbearance Agreement.htm
 - COMPARERITEREPORT-SA-1034697.doc

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/25/2001 09:50 AM
		 
Attached, please find a press release regarding the following three new
advisors to Governor Davis:

Mike Peevey
David Freeman
Frank Zarb

http://www.governor.ca.gov/state/govsite/gov_htmlprint.jsp?BV_SessionID=@@@@06
21676693.0980447884@@@@&BV_EngineID=ealjllillhgbemfcfkmchcng.0&sFilePath=%2fgo
vsite%2fpress_release%2f2001_01%2f20010124_a01025_zarb_freeman_peevy.html&sTit
le=GOVERNOR+DAVIS+NAMES+THREE+EXPERIENCED+EXECUTIVES+AS+ADVISORS%0a&sCatTitle=
Press+Release&iOID=13101

Yes.  Mike Day:  please make sure that Mike and Bob are in the loop on any 
and all filings.  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

	Mike D Smith@EES
	01/25/2001 01:28 PM
		 
There were 3 PUC filings mentioned in today's call: 

1) response to TURN
2) response to PG&E receivables issue
3) response to PG&E PX credit calculation filing

Could Bob and I each ger  a copy of each for a quick review before filing?  
Thanks.

could you please fax this text to steve and mark?  thanks a million.  jeff
	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	01/25/2001 12:15 PM
	Please respond to kaplan
		 
            TRANSCRIPT OF GOVERNOR DAVIS WITH DEPARTMENT OF
                                   WATER RESOURCES OFFICIALS

     SACRAMENTO

     At a press conference today, Governor Gray Davis, officials from the
Department of Water Resources (DWR), and Legislators addresses the DWR
Internet based auction for long-term electricity contracts. The following is
a transcription of the governor's comments:

     Governor Davis: "For the remarks on the long-term bidding contracts, I
am going to have Director Hannigan make those comments. I want to thank the
work of the  bipartisan team standing behind me. We are tied at the hip. We
are making progress. We are keeping the lights on. We are assuring people
that prices will be affordable and we are making real progress in securing
good, well-priced long-term contracts. I am very positively inclined as a
result of these bids. It is good news, I am enthusiastic, and it tells us we
can stay within our general parameter, which is to provide power within the
rate structure consistent with aggressive conservation and aggressive
efforts to put more supply on line. This, as you know, is at least a three
corner billiards shot, it may be more difficult than that. But so far the
signs are positive, I want Director Hannigan to just give you a brief
summary of the results of the bidding process and then I will give you a
couple more comments and then I will ask the legislative leaders to add
their commentary."

     Director of the Department of Water Resources Tom Hannigan: "Thank you
Governor, as the Director of the Department of Water Resources, I am given
responsibility for trying to keep the lights on. Our fundamental
responsibility here is to purchase power at the best possible prices for
California consumers and businesses, and to protect the state's ability to
purchase power at the best price. We are only able to release general
information about the bid opening today. There were 39 bidders, the majority
of them were compliant, the weighted average which included all of the times
of the days and nights of the year except for super-peaks was 6.9 cents per
kilowatt. The useful sample across all times of the day across the spectrum
of the year and we are quite pleased with the initial results. I look
forward to looking through bids and developing some long-term contracts."

 Governor Davis: "I would like to make a further announcement of three
people who have been advising me over the last several days, one is Mike
Peevey, who is serving as my unpaid special advisor on a whole range of
matters. He has had a discussion with the CEOs of the two utilities in
question, he has sat in several meetings, he has a long history with the
energy business, of which he is no longer a participant in or a shareholder
in. His advice and counsel is very much appreciated and I thank him for his
assistance thus far and what I know will be future assistance of great
consequence.

   "I also want to announce David Freeman, the General Manager of the Los
Angeles Department of Water and Power, has agreed to serve on a short-term
basis, probably a month to six weeks, as a consultant for the Department of
Water Resources. His job, working with Mike Peevey in this instance, is to
get the very best possible deal for the ratepayers of California. His job
will be to take the most favorable bids that came in today and consummate
those into contracts to have unilateral discussions -- assuming we get the
authority to do that -- for more good bids and if necessary, to go out and
request more bids.

     "As anybody knows, in the power business you don't try and acquire all
your long-term power at once. It's done sequentially over time, that's the
methodology that assures the best price and best quantity of power for the
rate payer. Mike, I want to make clear, will be advising on a whole range of
issues, and in addition to that, he'll be working with David Freeman.
David's exclusive responsibilities will be to advise the Department of Water
Resources on additional long-term contracting and how to consummate the best
bids that were offered today.

     "Obviously if you have an average weighted price of 6.9 cents per
kilowatt hour, that means that there were some bids below that and some bids
above that. We hope we  will be able to consummate contractual relations
with some of the bids that were below the average price, as well as move
aggressively forward in the future.

 "The final name, I am very pleased to say that we have been consulting with
is Frank Zarb. Frank is the CEO and chairman of the NASDAQ and he was
President Ford's energy czar during the first oil and gas price crisis in
the 1970's. He has subsequently been the CEO of Smith Barney, and he has
years of experience in the utility business. He was tasked by Governor
Pataki last year to be the temporary CEO of the Long Island Power and Energy
Authority. He is well-versed in this area, and he will  be advising us on a
range of matters, including ways in which to keep the utilities viable in
the future and keep us appraised of market and financial expectations in
that regard. These three people have been advising us in the recent days and
will continue to do so.

     "With that I would like to call upon..." (members speak)

     Question and Answers:

     "Thank you, we'll be happy to take a few questions."

     Question: "Will these bids assure that you'll be able to provide
electricity without raising rates?"

     Governor Davis: "That has been my hope and it continues to be my
expectation. This is a very good step. Obviously we have a way to go to
finalize the best bids made
     today and to secure additional power to complete the entire profile
necessary. This is a very good step, and all of us are pleased with the
preliminary results."

     Question: "It's not an assurance though, the bids aren't so good that
you are sure that you'll be able pull this off without a rate increase."

     Governor Davis: "No, but that continues to be my hope and expectation.
There was nothing about the bidding process that discourages me, everything
encourages methat we can live within the framework we've all described.
Everyone has mentioned the three component parts -- Native Generation, QF's
and what we call the net short. And the first two are well within the rate
structure and it's our expectation that we can get the third piece within it
as well."

     Question: "Governor, was there enough power bid in the short term to
keep the lights on say to February without going into the spot market?"

     Governor Davis: "Let me ask Mr. Hannigan. As I said, I want to protect
the integrity of the bid process. That's why the only information I asked of
the Director is the information he's already described to you, so you're
going beyond my pay grade at the moment, I have to call on the Director."

     Director Hannigan: "Well as I said at the outset, I have not seen the
bids and I don't know what the numbers are. It is a sealed bid process and
we're respecting the
     integrity of that. But we have been buying power both on the day ahead
market and the real time market, hourly market, real-time market. It's a
function of trying to work
     these generators down, get them to sell us power at the cheapest price
we can get from them, and through that we hope to make it through the first
of February. I think
     we're looking a little farther than that."

     Question: "The Legislature has set aside money to get us through
February 2. My question is whether these contracted governments."

     Director Hannigan: "These contracts really don't relate to the
short-term getting through that time frame."

     Question: "When does the long-term begin?"

     Director Hannigan: "Well the long-term begins, of course, when the
contract date suggests they begin, but we don't know what that will be at
this point. It could be in a
     week, it could be shorter. Some of them it could be longer, it depends
on how long it takes to negotiate them with them and what kind of terms you
get."

     Question: "Do you think based on these numbers that you could reach the
point described frequently as 5 1/2 cents?"

     Director Hannigan: "I don't know that. That is the same question as can
you reach a point where you don't raise the rate."

     Question: "That apparently is the point in which you don't raise the
rate?"

     Director Hannigan: "Yeah, so I don't know that Dan."

     Unknown Speaker: "I don't know that that is correct. Built into that
presumption is that you don't get any relief on the QF's which we're now
paying between 16 and 19
     cents to the extent that you get relief on the QF's then that 5 1/2
cents can raise without a rate increase."

     Question: "Does that mean that, Hertzberg, you don't need your
front-loaded program which leaves the bonds up front to cover the initial
cost? You don't need the
     program at all?"

     Speaker Hertzberg: "No, I think you do in order to use revenue bonds to
pay for the near term. Obviously, yes, the answer is yes, you do need it. It
will be smaller."

     Question: "The near terms are going to need those revenue bonds?"

     Speaker Hertzberg: "Well yeah, you need them to take out that bump in
the near term. But how many bonds you issue depends upon what these prices
are. But yeah,
     you are going to need some facility clearly just as a means to collect
the money back from the customers. There still has to be some mechanism in
place to do that."

     Question: "Governor do you agree with having to use revenue bonds up
front?"

     Governor Davis: "I believe it is an appropriate mechanism, we'll have
more to say about that in the next couple of days, but we have been in
constant contact with all the
     people behind me as well as Assemblyman Campbell, who we were visiting
earlier tonight. And we understand that what we're looking forward to is
essentially price
     stabilization. So in the short-term, price paid by energy customers is
going to be less than the actual price of energy. In the long-term, the
     price of energy will fall but the price will remain constant to the
consumers. It is our collective expectation that if we can tell the business
and residential consumers of the
     state that their price will stay relatively stable over a sustained
period of time, that they will see that as a good deal. Do you understand
what I'm saying? Obviously if you
     look at the spot market, you can see today's prices considerably higher
than the 5 to 5 1/2 percent range that we originally thought was necessary
to stay within the
     current rate structure. Because the negotiations led primarily by
Senator Battin and Assemblyman Keeley were so successful in the QF part of
the equation, we have a
     little more flexibility on the long-term contracting although not a lot
more flexibility.

     Question: "Is there enough energy bids to cover the net short
positions? Especially this summer?"

     Governor Davis: "It is my understanding that we had a very
representative bid and that's the only information that we've been shared...
We had a good deal of power bid
     for and it was a very good sample and certainly one that gives us all
optimism."

     Question: "What I mean to ask is this 10,000 Kilowatts or Megawatts
that possibly the state's looking for? Is it enough to cover that gap?"

     Governor Davis: "As I said before, it would be a mistake. I'm talking
in general terms now. It would be a mistake for the state to try and acquire
all its power at once. That
     would drive up the cost and saddle the taxpayer with higher costs than
are necessary. The Department of Water Resources knows that and they are
proceeding
     appropriately."

     Question: "Governor, just for our viewers very simply, is it reasonable
to expect that some of these long-term bidding contracts will start next
week? Next month? When do
     you think?"

     Governor Davis: "We're hopeful to get authority from the Legislature
within a week to begin consummating the better proposals that were received
today. Under the
     guidance and advice from Mike Peevey and David Freeman, we expect the
Department of Water Resources to move aggressively to enter into unilateral
arrangements
     with other potential bidders, go back to ones whose bids were initially
rejected to see if we can negotiate better prices. We're on this like white
on rice, we are determined
     to get the best prices as soon as we can. But it is a mistake to try
and get it all done within a week. We'll end up paying more for it than we
have to."

     Question: "Is there any possibility that you'll run out of cash before
you sign the contract?"

     Governor Davis: "It's my expectation and hope that we will not. We have
obviously emergency authorities so we can draw upon but it is my expectation
and hope that we
     can live within the resources allocated to us on a short-term basis and
then have the authority to switch over to long-term contracting."

                                                             ###

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

	MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	01/25/2001 12:41 PM
		 
Hot Flash:

The ALJ in the case (Tim Kenney) just advised me that he is so busy that he
will not even read any responses to the PG&E petition for issuing a security
interest in accounts receiveables.  Don't ask if this is due process--it's
not.  The commission is clearly going to grant this authority at the
emergency meeting tomorrow at 1:30.  In voice mails from Travis, he
recommended voicing some concerns so that we can raise the issue later if we
feel Enron's interests have been prejudiced by how PG&E implements this.  I
also received the indication that EES and ENA were very concerned about
filing anything negative that could upset the present arrangments with PG&E
on DASR matters.  I recommend not filing.  I do not believe we need to
express any concerns to raise them later.  We are not in a formal waiver
situation, and the commission is acting before any reasonable responses were
possible.  Let me know by VOICE MAIL what you want to do.  If you want
something filed, please also advise my associate, Jeanne Bennett who will be
monitoring this issue in the office today while I am in Sacramento.  Her
direct line is 415-765-8449.   Thanks, Mike Day

To Be discussed on 10:30am call tomorrow.

Jim

                    Travis

 

 

Jim -- the following are our concerns about PG&E's proposal/possible points
to make in a response:

1.   Enron would be one of the largest unsecured creditors in the event of
a PG&E bankruptcy; our claim may become even larger  depending on the
extent to which we acquire additional claims against the utilities through
the PX or ISO.  We are therefore interested in any action that would reduce
the pool of assets available to unsecured creditors.
2.   This proposal may be to our benefit, or to our detriment.  There is
not a great deal of detail in the proposal currently on the table, and
Enron needs additional information in order to evaluate the proposal.
Certainly, we need to evaluate this in light of other developments.

3.   The proposal contemplates pledging "existing and future" receivables
to secure obligations owed to gas suppliers; PGE shows approx. $1.3 billion
in A/R as of 9/30; will that (or an amount of like magnitude) be pledged as
security under this plan?  Granting gas suppliers security may be fine with
us, but we don't have a great interest in OVER-collateralizing their
positions.  More current information on the current A/R balances and the
extent to which obligations to suppliers will be secured will be helpful.

4.   Do they intend to extend this security to ALL gas suppliers, or only
those that are refusing to supply PGE under current circumstances?

5.   Do they intend to secure obligations on a going-forward basis only, or
will they also secure their obligations with respect to payables that have
already accrued?

6.   PG&E is scheduled to make a couple of large payments to ENE tomorrow;
what is PG&E's ability to make those payments for gas already delivered?

7.   Given the extension of the DOE order, it seems that consideration of
this petition could be delayed for a few days to allow interested parties
sufficient time to evaluate its implications.

Give me a call with any questions.

In light of the DOE extension of the emergency gas supply order, there
should now be adequate time for PG&E  to respond to these points and
clarify their proposal.

Travis McCullough

The speaker introduced a bill that would:

Order the CA PUC to establish a "rate component" to permit the utilities to 
recover its "net undercollected amount" over a period of ten years.  (Sounds 
like there may be a haircut in there somewhere.)
Authorize the State Water Dept. to purchase power on behalf of utilities and 
munis.
Order the CA PUC to create a separate rate component to cover the Dept.'s 
cost of purchasing the power.
Authorize the Treasurer to issue debt, backed by ratepayers, to cover any 
difference between the price the Water Dept. buys the power for and the price 
that can be collected from ratepayers under the rate freeze.
Authorizes the State Director of Finance to "accept on behalf of the state 
any tangible asset of an electrical corporation."  (Presumably the state is 
looking to get something from the IOUs (say, the hydro assets) in exchange 
for giving the utility it's "net undercollected amount."

The bill is long and haven't yet had a chance to review it in detail.  We're 
faxing the bill.

The bill will be controversial and it is unclear who in the Legislature has 
bought into it, though the Governor signaled his general support for this 
sort of approach in a press conference last night announcing the results of 
the power auction. 

The Assembly is scheduled to have a hearing on the bill later today.

Will pass on more info as we get it.

Jeff

	"Carol Hudson" <carol@iepa.com>
	01/25/2001 03:39 PM
	Please respond to carol
		 
Dial in conference call is scheduled at 5:00 p.m. (PST) today regarding this
document and updates.  Information follows:

 1-888-422-7101, Participant Code 111756

Carol Hudson, Executive Assistant
Independent Energy Producers Assn.
1112 I Street, Suite 380
Sacramento, CA 95814
PH: 916-448-9499
FX: 916-448-0182
chudson@iepa.com

 - SCE and QF Parties Terms-Integrated Doc Jan 25 1230pm.doc

Could you please make sure that everyone in the office has this call-in 
number.  It's a daily call to discuss 
California's electricity crisis.  Thanks very much.

call-in: 800.998.2462
code: 4912753

steelers = 6
bucs = 9
eagles = 5
rams = 15 (last man standing)
bills = 4
panthers = 13
jags = 14
chiefs = 10
raiders = 2
giants = 7
pats = 3
seahawks = 11
ravens = 8
skins = 12

I'll be in NY/D.C.  I'm willing to do by phone.  Thanks.

We'll have an internal call to discuss this prior to launching any missiles.  
Jeanne, please have Mike give me a call to discuss.  Thanks.

Jeff

	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	01/25/2001 05:34 PM
		 
I just got a call from Mike Day who is up in Sacramento where they are
considering legislation which would muck around with the TRA and TCBA
accounts.  The legislation, as currently drafted, would not undertake a
wholesale adoption of the TURN proposal to transfer all undercollections
from the TRA to the TCBA. 

Mike is trying to get hold of any analysis which was done which shows what
the current balances in the TCBA and TRA would have been if TURN's proposal
had been in place from day one. I know we put a halt on undertaking that
analysis when we learned that TURN was doing it for their testimony.
However, Mike seems to think getting something like that before the
legislature in the next few days may be critical.  If we had to undertake
it, how long would it take to get a product?

I have a call into Bob Finkelstein to see if they have already done the
analysis, but have not heard back.

Jeanne    
        

yep.

Joseph:  Please contact these folks and remind them that 1) i'm not a 
lobbyist, 2) i'm not registered as a lobbyist, and 3) i don't qualify as a 
lobbyist.  thanks a million.

Jeff
	Cshieldspc@aol.com
	01/25/2001 09:59 PM
		 
 - dasovich.rl.ca.1-25-01.doc

David:  Accusing market participants of "gaming," "strategic behavoir," 
"market manipulation," and the like will be extremely controversial, and, I 
believe, unconstructive.  As you may or may not know, much of the criticism 
was placed on the utilities strategic bidding on the demand side, which many 
"economists" and "consultants" seem quite willing and able to conveniently 
ignore.

Jeff

yes.

I'll put my mind to it (what's left of it).

Tomorrow morning (Saturday), I'll take a whack at building on what Mark's 
done and distribute to everyone.  FYI,  I'm in New York on Monday so won't be 
in class.

Best,
Jeff

	Ginger Dernehl
	01/26/2001 10:48 AM
		 
The California daily conference call will continue to take place through the 
last week in February.  The time,  number, passcode and location listed below 
will remain the same.

Thanks and feel free to call if you have any questions.

gngr
713-853-7751

A  conference call, regarding the above subject, has been scheduled daily to 
provide a single place and time to review what has occurred over the last 24 
hours regarding the California crisis and what lies ahead.  The conf. call 
information will be as follows: 

Date:  Daily (beginning 1/12/01 - 1/26/01) there will not be a call on 
Monday, January 15

Time:  10:30am (CST)

Number: 1-800-998-2462
  passcode 4912753

Location: EB4701 (for those in Houston)

Please feel free to forward this information to others you feel should 
participate.

	"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
	01/26/2001 11:15 AM
	Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
		 
Attached is the newly introduced AB 18x (Hertzberg) and the committee
analysis.

AB 1x (Keeley) as amended yesterday will be available later this morning
when the Senate Appropriations Committee meets at 10 am.

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - abx1_18_bill_20010125_introduced.pdf
 - ANALYSIS.ab18x.doc

Greetings.  Here's the case with 1,3 and 4 compiled.  I took some editorial 
license with 1 and 4--hope I didn't butcher what you were conveying Jimmie 
and Dylan.  Check it out.  Still need to determine if folks are comfortable 
with my conclusion in #3, i.e., look, the biz model and the info provided in 
the 10K may be crap, but from a strictly technical perspective, Patten's 
justified in using the sales as opposed to the installment method.  Let me 
know.  Kim's up and running on #2.

Best,
Jeff

I've still got considerable work to do, but wanted to make sure all had a 
chance to review and comment well in advance of finalizing.  I'm giving a 
talk at Exnet on Monday about California.  Attached is a draft of the 
slides.  All comments welcome and appreciated.  I'm continuing to work on 
it.  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

One of the things that came out of the meeting I was at on Saturday with the 
UC economists (including Tyson and Yellen) was a "manifesto" that they 
published today (I'll have the final to distribute soon).  They're having a  
press conference in about 10 minutes at Berkeley.  In anticipation, they're 
quoted in a story in today's LA Times (that features Greenspan's comments) 
and they focus their quotes on the need to raise rates.  Most of these folks 
in the group, lamentably, earn their living by consulting for incumbents, but 
there message here should be helpful, and there are a few "right-minded" 
economists in the bunch.  (I managed to get Dr. Michaels in the group, who 
was a great voice of reason in the debate over what to say in the manifesto.) 
 It wasn't appropriate for me to play a visible role in the design of the 
manifesto, though I attempted to offer some behind the scenes suggestions.

Jeff
	"James L. Sweeney" <jim.sweeney@stanford.edu>
	01/26/2001 11:52 AM
		 
It seems this is already getting press.  Click on the following to see the 
Los Angeles Times story.  Fortunately the LA Times did not focus on any of 
the issues we are debating here.

http://www.latimes.com/business/reports/power/

Jim Sweeney

At 04:19 AM 1/26/2001, Pablo Spiller wrote:
>colleagues:
>
>we are less than 2 hrs short of the press conference.  i just got to the
>computer and saw all these e-mails. i will suggest we take our local nobel
>prize winner's suggestion and go, for the time being, as is.  we simply do
>not have the time to incorporate changes without violating the need for
>consensus.  We will release the manifesto at 11am PST, at the press
>conference that is going to take place here at haas.  Those of you from the
>east coast, feel free to release it at any time.  Those in the west coast,
>i would suggest that we do not release it until 11am, but feel free to talk
>to whoever you want about it.
>
>The version of the manifesto that is going to be released is the version
>that we sent yesterday afternoon incorporating the excellent comments by
>paul.  also is the version that includes the list of endorsees as of the 
time.
>
>if you haven't received the copy, please let me know.
>
>thanks.
>
>pablo
>
>
>
>At 11:54 AM 1/26/01 -0500, John_Chandley@LECG.com wrote:
> >
> >1.  Is the document out?  Or are we still making changes?
> >
> >2.  Is the "embargo" over?
> >
> >3.  When can we get the final, final, final for further distribution?
> >
> >John
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >David Teece <teece@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 01/25/2001 05:54:00 PM
> >
James L. Sweeney, Stanford University
Department of Management Science and Engineering
Terman Engineering Center, Room 323   Stanford, CA 94305-4026
Voice:  650-723-2847;  Fax: 650-723-1614;   Home Voice or Fax:  650-322-9835

Apologies.  I can't keep track of all the distribution lists.  Please let me 
know if you think that this will be helpful in your neck of the woods.  Rick 
relayed Summers comments re: Tyson. 

Best,
Jeff

P.S. I'm forwarding to David Lugar
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/26/2001 12:45 PM
		 
One of the things that came out of the meeting I was at on Saturday with the 
UC economists (including Tyson and Yellen) was a "manifesto" that they 
published today (I'll have the final to distribute soon).  They're having a  
press conference in about 10 minutes at Berkeley.  In anticipation, they're 
quoted in a story in today's LA Times (that features Greenspan's comments) 
and they focus their quotes on the need to raise rates.  Most of these folks 
in the group, lamentably, earn their living by consulting for incumbents, but 
there message here should be helpful, and there are a few "right-minded" 
economists in the bunch.  (I managed to get Dr. Michaels in the group, who 
was a great voice of reason in the debate over what to say in the manifesto.) 
 It wasn't appropriate for me to play a visible role in the design of the 
manifesto, though I attempted to offer some behind the scenes suggestions.

Jeff
	"James L. Sweeney" <jim.sweeney@stanford.edu>
	01/26/2001 11:52 AM
		 
It seems this is already getting press.  Click on the following to see the 
Los Angeles Times story.  Fortunately the LA Times did not focus on any of 
the issues we are debating here.

http://www.latimes.com/business/reports/power/

Jim Sweeney

At 04:19 AM 1/26/2001, Pablo Spiller wrote:
>colleagues:
>
>we are less than 2 hrs short of the press conference.  i just got to the
>computer and saw all these e-mails. i will suggest we take our local nobel
>prize winner's suggestion and go, for the time being, as is.  we simply do
>not have the time to incorporate changes without violating the need for
>consensus.  We will release the manifesto at 11am PST, at the press
>conference that is going to take place here at haas.  Those of you from the
>east coast, feel free to release it at any time.  Those in the west coast,
>i would suggest that we do not release it until 11am, but feel free to talk
>to whoever you want about it.
>
>The version of the manifesto that is going to be released is the version
>that we sent yesterday afternoon incorporating the excellent comments by
>paul.  also is the version that includes the list of endorsees as of the 
time.
>
>if you haven't received the copy, please let me know.
>
>thanks.
>
>pablo
>
>
>
>At 11:54 AM 1/26/01 -0500, John_Chandley@LECG.com wrote:
> >
> >1.  Is the document out?  Or are we still making changes?
> >
> >2.  Is the "embargo" over?
> >
> >3.  When can we get the final, final, final for further distribution?
> >
> >John
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >David Teece <teece@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 01/25/2001 05:54:00 PM
> >
James L. Sweeney, Stanford University
Department of Management Science and Engineering
Terman Engineering Center, Room 323   Stanford, CA 94305-4026
Voice:  650-723-2847;  Fax: 650-723-1614;   Home Voice or Fax:  650-322-9835

FYI.  Please let me know if you receive.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/26/2001 12:45 PM
		 
One of the things that came out of the meeting I was at on Saturday with the 
UC economists (including Tyson and Yellen) was a "manifesto" that they 
published today (I'll have the final to distribute soon).  They're having a  
press conference in about 10 minutes at Berkeley.  In anticipation, they're 
quoted in a story in today's LA Times (that features Greenspan's comments) 
and they focus their quotes on the need to raise rates.  Most of these folks 
in the group, lamentably, earn their living by consulting for incumbents, but 
there message here should be helpful, and there are a few "right-minded" 
economists in the bunch.  (I managed to get Dr. Michaels in the group, who 
was a great voice of reason in the debate over what to say in the manifesto.) 
 It wasn't appropriate for me to play a visible role in the design of the 
manifesto, though I attempted to offer some behind the scenes suggestions.

Jeff
	"James L. Sweeney" <jim.sweeney@stanford.edu>
	01/26/2001 11:52 AM
		 
It seems this is already getting press.  Click on the following to see the 
Los Angeles Times story.  Fortunately the LA Times did not focus on any of 
the issues we are debating here.

http://www.latimes.com/business/reports/power/

Jim Sweeney

At 04:19 AM 1/26/2001, Pablo Spiller wrote:
>colleagues:
>
>we are less than 2 hrs short of the press conference.  i just got to the
>computer and saw all these e-mails. i will suggest we take our local nobel
>prize winner's suggestion and go, for the time being, as is.  we simply do
>not have the time to incorporate changes without violating the need for
>consensus.  We will release the manifesto at 11am PST, at the press
>conference that is going to take place here at haas.  Those of you from the
>east coast, feel free to release it at any time.  Those in the west coast,
>i would suggest that we do not release it until 11am, but feel free to talk
>to whoever you want about it.
>
>The version of the manifesto that is going to be released is the version
>that we sent yesterday afternoon incorporating the excellent comments by
>paul.  also is the version that includes the list of endorsees as of the 
time.
>
>if you haven't received the copy, please let me know.
>
>thanks.
>
>pablo
>
>
>
>At 11:54 AM 1/26/01 -0500, John_Chandley@LECG.com wrote:
> >
> >1.  Is the document out?  Or are we still making changes?
> >
> >2.  Is the "embargo" over?
> >
> >3.  When can we get the final, final, final for further distribution?
> >
> >John
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >David Teece <teece@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 01/25/2001 05:54:00 PM
> >
James L. Sweeney, Stanford University
Department of Management Science and Engineering
Terman Engineering Center, Room 323   Stanford, CA 94305-4026
Voice:  650-723-2847;  Fax: 650-723-1614;   Home Voice or Fax:  650-322-9835

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/26/2001 12:45 PM
		 
One of the things that came out of the meeting I was at on Saturday with the 
UC economists (including Tyson and Yellen) was a "manifesto" that they 
published today (I'll have the final to distribute soon).  They're having a  
press conference in about 10 minutes at Berkeley.  In anticipation, they're 
quoted in a story in today's LA Times (that features Greenspan's comments) 
and they focus their quotes on the need to raise rates.  Most of these folks 
in the group, lamentably, earn their living by consulting for incumbents, but 
there message here should be helpful, and there are a few "right-minded" 
economists in the bunch.  (I managed to get Dr. Michaels in the group, who 
was a great voice of reason in the debate over what to say in the manifesto.) 
 It wasn't appropriate for me to play a visible role in the design of the 
manifesto, though I attempted to offer some behind the scenes suggestions.

Jeff
	"James L. Sweeney" <jim.sweeney@stanford.edu>
	01/26/2001 11:52 AM
		 
It seems this is already getting press.  Click on the following to see the 
Los Angeles Times story.  Fortunately the LA Times did not focus on any of 
the issues we are debating here.

http://www.latimes.com/business/reports/power/

Jim Sweeney

At 04:19 AM 1/26/2001, Pablo Spiller wrote:
>colleagues:
>
>we are less than 2 hrs short of the press conference.  i just got to the
>computer and saw all these e-mails. i will suggest we take our local nobel
>prize winner's suggestion and go, for the time being, as is.  we simply do
>not have the time to incorporate changes without violating the need for
>consensus.  We will release the manifesto at 11am PST, at the press
>conference that is going to take place here at haas.  Those of you from the
>east coast, feel free to release it at any time.  Those in the west coast,
>i would suggest that we do not release it until 11am, but feel free to talk
>to whoever you want about it.
>
>The version of the manifesto that is going to be released is the version
>that we sent yesterday afternoon incorporating the excellent comments by
>paul.  also is the version that includes the list of endorsees as of the 
time.
>
>if you haven't received the copy, please let me know.
>
>thanks.
>
>pablo
>
>
>
>At 11:54 AM 1/26/01 -0500, John_Chandley@LECG.com wrote:
> >
> >1.  Is the document out?  Or are we still making changes?
> >
> >2.  Is the "embargo" over?
> >
> >3.  When can we get the final, final, final for further distribution?
> >
> >John
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >
> >David Teece <teece@Haas.Berkeley.EDU> on 01/25/2001 05:54:00 PM
> >
James L. Sweeney, Stanford University
Department of Management Science and Engineering
Terman Engineering Center, Room 323   Stanford, CA 94305-4026
Voice:  650-723-2847;  Fax: 650-723-1614;   Home Voice or Fax:  650-322-9835

Dan:  

How's things?  Happy New Year.  Hope all's well with you and yours.  Could 
you please copy us on the UI details?  They will be very useful in what we're 
up to out here in electricity Disneyland.  Thanks a bunch.

Best,
Jeff

	Elizabeth Linnell
	01/26/2001 12:24 PM
		 
Steve Kean will be testifying at the Senate Energy Committee's hearing on 
Wednesday regarding California.  Steve and Jim Steffes asked me to contact 
you for the following information.  I've listed specific requests for several 
people, but am copying many more of you for your input as well.  Anything you 
can provide by sometime on Monday will be appreciated!

Dave Parquet - Siting of new power plants in California.  Any insight you can 
provide regarding the rules, the current climate, what would fix the current 
situation, etc.

Richard Sanders - Steve thinks he might be asked about whether the market was 
manipulated.  Please provide information on whether this was the case and who 
the participants likely were.  What's the current climate regarding 
sanctions, etc.?

Mary Schoen - Any information you can provide relating to air emission issues 
in California, and specific details for our recommendations regarding air 
emissions.

Steve Walton - The status on RTO West, Desert Star, Cal ISO and general 
information on RO development.   

Sue Mara - Specific ordering language requiring the utilities to buy only 
from the PX.  Was it required through legislation or the CPUC, and what 
exactly does it mean.  Who was involved in formulating the language?  
Information on block forward markets.

Alan Comnes - A copy of the CDWR response and anything they might have 
available regarding long term proposals from the government.

Dan Allegretti - We have the e-mail Jim sent regarding the UI deal.  Please 
provide more specifics on the deal, and information regarding portfolio 
management approach.

Thanks for your help!

Oh, please do fax.  415.782.7854.  And we need some more details (in addition 
to what Jim did) if possible.  thanks.

i'll be there.

	Elizabeth Linnell
	01/26/2001 12:24 PM
		 
Steve Kean will be testifying at the Senate Energy Committee's hearing on 
Wednesday regarding California.  Steve and Jim Steffes asked me to contact 
you for the following information.  I've listed specific requests for several 
people, but am copying many more of you for your input as well.  Anything you 
can provide by sometime on Monday will be appreciated!

Dave Parquet - Siting of new power plants in California.  Any insight you can 
provide regarding the rules, the current climate, what would fix the current 
situation, etc.

Richard Sanders - Steve thinks he might be asked about whether the market was 
manipulated.  Please provide information on whether this was the case and who 
the participants likely were.  What's the current climate regarding 
sanctions, etc.?

Mary Schoen - Any information you can provide relating to air emission issues 
in California, and specific details for our recommendations regarding air 
emissions.

Steve Walton - The status on RTO West, Desert Star, Cal ISO and general 
information on RO development.   

Sue Mara - Specific ordering language requiring the utilities to buy only 
from the PX.  Was it required through legislation or the CPUC, and what 
exactly does it mean.  Who was involved in formulating the language?  
Information on block forward markets.

Alan Comnes - A copy of the CDWR response and anything they might have 
available regarding long term proposals from the government.

Dan Allegretti - We have the e-mail Jim sent regarding the UI deal.  Please 
provide more specifics on the deal, and information regarding portfolio 
management approach.

Thanks for your help!

=09Mary Schoen
=0901/26/2001 04:13 PM
=09=09=20

South Coast Air Quality Management District

=09=09Jan. 26, 2001
=09=09To Help Provide Power During Energy Crisis
=09=09AQMD EXTENDS OPERATIONS LIMIT ON EMERGENCY GENERATORS
=09=09In an effort to give essential public services greater ability to res=
pond to=20
power emergencies, the region's air quality agency issued an executive orde=
r=20
today extending the amount of time that such agencies can run emergency=20
generators.
=09=09"Gov. Davis declared a state of emergency last week due to the state'=
s power=20
crisis," said Barry Wallerstein, AQMD=01,s executive officer. "In response,=
 AQMD=20
has increased the amount of time that emergency generators at hospitals,=20
police stations, fire houses and other essential public services can operat=
e."
=09=09Under AQMD's executive order, essential public service providers can =
operate=20
emergency generators up to 500 hours in a calendar year, which more than=20
doubles AQMD's Rule 1110.2 operation limit of 200 hours per year. AQMD rule=
s=20
normally limit emergency generators to 200 hours per year because they are=
=20
typically diesel-powered, have no pollution controls and emit 300 times mor=
e=20
smog-forming pollution per unit of energy than a new power plant.
=09=09Today's order allows essential public service providers to operate up=
 to 500=20
hours per year during an imminent or actual power blackout in the provider'=
s=20
area. It also promotes the use of low-sulfur diesel fuel, defined as=20
containing 15 parts per million or less of sulfur, if reasonably available.=
=20
The provisions of the order are consistent with U.S. Environmental Protecti=
on=20
Agency guidance on this issue.
=09=09The order expires on Feb. 3, 2001, but can be renewed in 10-day incre=
ments.=20
It applies to the following public services:
=09=09
=09=09

=09=09
=09=09
=09=09Police and fire fighting facilities;
=09=09
=09=09Hospitals and other health care facilities;
=09=09
=09=09Kindergarten through high schools;
=09=09
=09=09Drinking water agencies;
=09=09
=09=09Public transit agencies;
=09=09
=09=09Prisons;
=09=09
=09=09911 emergency dispatch operations;
=09=09
=09=09Publicly owned sewage treatment plants;
=09=09
=09=09Landfill gas operations; and
=09=09
=09=09Critical military operations.
=09=09
=09=09Under AQMD's Rule 118, the agency's executive officer can suspend AQM=
D rules=20
for public health and safety services for 10 days at a time in response to =
a=20
state of emergency declared by the state or federal government.
=09=09AQMD has set up a hotline, (909) 396-2660, to assist operators of bac=
kup=20
generators at non-essential public services to voluntarily apply for a=20
variance with AQMD's independent Hearing Board.
=09=09AQMD also will approve applications submitted by any emergency genera=
tor=20
operator that is not an essential public service to revise their permit to=
=20
allow up to 200 hours of operation.
=09=09"The governor has determined that the power crisis poses an extreme p=
eril to=20
public safety," Wallerstein said. "We are doing our part to ensure that=20
public health and safety agencies can keep operating during periods of=20
potential blackouts."
=09=09AQMD is the air pollution control agency for Orange County and the ur=
ban=20
portions of Los Angeles, San Bernardino and Riverside counties.

Mary Schoen
Environmental Strategies
Enron Corp
713-345-7422

check it out.  i've taken a stab at compiling 1, 3 and 4.  folks comfortable 
with my conclusion regarding sales v. installment method? 

best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/26/2001 12:22 PM
		 
I've still got considerable work to do, but wanted to make sure all had a 
chance to review and comment well in advance of finalizing.  I'm giving a 
talk at Exnet on Monday about California.  Attached is a draft of the 
slides.  All comments welcome and appreciated.  I'm continuing to work on 
it.  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

Thank you SO much.  Have a great weekend.

FYI.  
	David Teece <teece@Haas.Berkeley.EDU>
	01/26/2001 06:47 PM
		 
Dear Colleagues,

Some of you have been asking for the final version of the manifesto.  The
copy attached is the FINAL version.

David

 - Manifesto DJT 1-25-01.doc
======================================
David J. Teece, Director
Institute of Management, Innovation and Organization
F402 Haas School of Business #1930
University of California, Berkeley
Berkeley, CA  94720-1930
Phone:  (510) 642-1075
Fax:  (510) 642-2826
http://haas.berkeley.edu/~imio
======================================

One note: recall that with respect to market manipulation, one of the most 
common accusations focused on the problems caused by the PX manipulation the 
utilities engaged in thanks to their monopsony (demand-side bidding) market 
power.

Jeff

	Elizabeth Linnell
	01/26/2001 12:24 PM
		 
Steve Kean will be testifying at the Senate Energy Committee's hearing on 
Wednesday regarding California.  Steve and Jim Steffes asked me to contact 
you for the following information.  I've listed specific requests for several 
people, but am copying many more of you for your input as well.  Anything you 
can provide by sometime on Monday will be appreciated!

Dave Parquet - Siting of new power plants in California.  Any insight you can 
provide regarding the rules, the current climate, what would fix the current 
situation, etc.

Richard Sanders - Steve thinks he might be asked about whether the market was 
manipulated.  Please provide information on whether this was the case and who 
the participants likely were.  What's the current climate regarding 
sanctions, etc.?

Mary Schoen - Any information you can provide relating to air emission issues 
in California, and specific details for our recommendations regarding air 
emissions.

Steve Walton - The status on RTO West, Desert Star, Cal ISO and general 
information on RO development.   

Sue Mara - Specific ordering language requiring the utilities to buy only 
from the PX.  Was it required through legislation or the CPUC, and what 
exactly does it mean.  Who was involved in formulating the language?  
Information on block forward markets.

Alan Comnes - A copy of the CDWR response and anything they might have 
available regarding long term proposals from the government.

Dan Allegretti - We have the e-mail Jim sent regarding the UI deal.  Please 
provide more specifics on the deal, and information regarding portfolio 
management approach.

Thanks for your help!

=09"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
=0901/26/2001 07:30 PM
=09Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
=09=09=20

Date: 1/26/01

RECENT EVENTS:

-- AB 1x (Keeley), which would authorize DWR to procure power for Californi=
a
utilities and consumers, passed out of the Senate Energy Committee this
week.  The language which stated that any entity supplying power to DWR
would be considered a public utility was deleted from the bill.  After the
bibding information came in from the DWR RFP, the 5.5 cent cap was also
deleted from the bill.  In its place was inserted language stating the goal
of DWR was to procure power at the lowest price possible per kWh.  The
author and committee chair agreed this bill would not address any broader
issues associated with undercollections and stranded costs.  The measure wa=
s
heard in the Senate Appropriations today, but will not be voted on until
Monday when the committee meets again at 10 am.  The amended version is
still not in print.

-- AB 18x (Hertzberg) was introduced this week that would take the issues
addressed in AB 1x further.  This measure would also authorize DWR to enter
into contracts for the purchase or sale of electricity for California
utilities and consumers.  Additionally, however, the measure addresses
undercollections and going-forward costs.  Much of the debate in today=01,s
Assembly Energy Cost and Availability Committee was focused on whether or
not the utility has reasonable costs that should be recovered.  The
committee agreed after a lengthy debate that this bill may want to sent up =
a
mechanism for answering this question.   The most shocking statement made
during the debate was when PG&E estimated their =01&net=018 undercollection=
s was
$8.2 billion.

IEP member company generators have drafted comments and amendments on AB 18=
x
and have submitted them to the committee for consideration.  The crux of
these comments is the concern that the bill explicitly excludes amounts owe=
d
by SCE and PG&E to suppliers.  Committee staff assures us they intend to
address that issue in future amendments.  I will have these comments
available electronically for your information on Monday.

-- In question still at this time is whether AB 18x or AB 1x would be the
vehicle for the product of negotiations between the QFs and the utilities;
or, if another bill all together would carry the water.

-- Asm. Rod Wright has been holding nightly forums with energy stakeholders=
,
primarily generators, marketers and the utilities, as a general data dump t=
o
keep these groups abreast of what the ECA committee and legislative
leadership is doing and planning on doing.  Edson + Modisette has been
participating in these meetings as has many of the IEP members companies an=
d
their lobbyists.

-- Asm. Wright=01,s office is continuing to collect siting proposals.  They
have indicated that they intend to keep repower, peakers and new generation
issues separate, in separate bills.  Their immediate interest at this time
is on proposals that benefit repowers.  There is no indication what the
timeframe is on any bill, but proposals should get into his office as soon
as possible.  IEP members that have proposals separate from the IEP package
should also provide IEP a copy.

-- Attached is the most recent tracking report which includes all the
special session bills introduced to date.

UPCOMING EVENTS:

-- The Assembly ECA committee will continue debate on AB 18x on Monday and
Tuesday, hopefully concluding on Wednesday for a vote on the final package.
Time, TBA.

-- The Senate Appropriations Committee will meet and vote on AB 1x on Monda=
y
at 10 am.

--end--

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - 2001 Tracking Report.doc

please send me my login and password so that i can get into the system.  
also, please be sure that my account includes E234 and E222.  Thank you.

jeff

I'm taking Dylan's and Mark's stuff, adding a bit, and putting it into memo 
format.  As I recall in class, he doesn't expect or want us to turn in 
answers to questions, per se, just a 4-page (or so) memo.  I have that 
right?  I'll circulate the memo later today, or first thing tomorrow in the 
AM.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks, Sandi.  This tracks very well with my chat with Barbara.  Barbara's 
charcterization of "irrelevant" arguably makes sense from a customer's 
perspective, but it's very relevant to us, though I didn't give Barbara the 
details of why it's so important for us---just explained that some of our 
customers, given their contracts with us, would get hurt.  

Seems that the important take away is that 1) they are actively negotiating 
the "end" of the rate freeze, 2) customers get hurt from a retroactive "end" 
and 3) one "freeze" will the replaced with another, that is, prices will 
continue to be capped going forward (despite the "end" of the rate freeze).  

Seems that the critical issue is whether the rate freeze "ends" next month, 
or next year, which is something that we're going to want to follow very 
closely.  Do we have any information on where the negotiations between 
customers and the utilities ended up this weekend? 

Best,
Jeff

	Sandra McCubbin
	01/27/2001 08:01 PM
		 
please get back to Jeff or myself on how to respond to Barbara//thanks
	"Barbara R. Barkovich" <BRBarkovich@earthlink.net>
	01/27/2001 07:02 AM
		 
Hi, Sandi.  Per your request, I talked to Jeff yesterday early evening.
I had been in a meeting with Keeley, Wright, et al after the hearing.
Jeff's proposal was not entirely clear to me, but it seemed to focus on
specifying an end date for the rate freeze in the Hertzberg bill.  I
noted that the focus of the Friday hearing and the subsequent meeting
was on how much of the short fall the utilities should be able to
recover and agreed that we would probably go from one freeze to
another.  Therefore the date of the end of the original freeze is
rapidly becoming irrelevant unless it is used to create a back way into
the first issue.  This does not seem very likely right now.  Who knows
how this will evolve, of course, but there is a sense of urgency, at
least in the Assembly.

Take care, Barbara

OK.  Jimmie and I duplicated effort just a bit.  Attached is the memo and the 
spreadsheet.  Note that in the memo, we have a dispute about whether $750k is 
adequate.  Therefore, I've left questions 4 and 5 attached to the memo for 
you folks to reconcile (if they take advantage of discounts and get A/R and 
inventory rates back in line with '93 rates, is $750 enough?).  

Also, I've included a common-size income statement in exhibit 1, a cash flow 
statement in exhibit 2, and I, too, completed exhibit 3.  We may want to 
clean up some of the calculations in the spreadsheet, given that we'll likely 
need to turn them in as attachments.

Hope this helps.  I'd do more, but I'm off for the airport and New 
York--won't be in class tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

	JcjCal02@aol.com
	01/28/2001 01:01 AM
		 
To simplify the analysis, I completed Exhibit 3 for 1993, 94, 95 for clarkson
in the attached spreadsheet.  Whoever calculated ROA forgot to add interest
expense and used year end assets instead of average.  For ROCE again, average
instead of ending should be used.  The level of current liabilities jumps out
when you compare it to the rest of the industry.  Dylan is right the growth
in inventory is also alarming.  I will look at the data some more tomorrow.
Jimmy

 - CLARKS~1.XLS

Thanks.  Talk to you on the 8:30 call tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

i'm in mendocino:  number's 707.884.4608 if you need to chat.

best,
jeff

=09"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
=0901/28/2001 01:23 PM
=09=09=20

On Friday, the Commission issued the attached Assigned Commissioner's  Ruli=
ng=20
in the rate surcharge proceedings which does the following:
?
1.? It identifies the issues for Phase 1 as being:
?
(a) Reviewing the independent audit results of PG&E and SCE, ordered in =20
D.00-12-067 and, as part of that analysis, determining whether or not there=
=20
is a  financial necessity for other or additional relief for the utilities.=
? =20
Included here is a recognition that the utilities may make other interim =
=20
proposals and this would be included within the scope of the first phase;  =
and
?
(b) TURN=01,s accounting proposal for the proper reconciliation of the =20
Transition Revenue Account (TRA) and Transition Cost Balancing Account=20
(TCBA)  accounts and the Generation Memorandum Accounts (GMA).
?
2.? The retention of utility generating assets and the interim  ratemaking=
=20
treatment for these assets is being separately handled and hearings  will n=
ot=20
occur on this issue in Phase 1.? Parties may file testimony on  interim=20
valuation in addressing whether the rate freeze has ended on a  prospective=
=20
basis.

3.?? The Commission will consider whether the rate freeze has  ended only o=
n=20
a prospective basis in Phase I.

4.?? The Commission will address the reasonable and prudent  cost issue in =
a=20
later phase of this proceeding.

5.?? The  Commission will also consider parties=01, proposals for tiered ra=
tes=20
similar to  those discussed by Senator Bowen in the December public hearing=
s.
?
6.?? PG&E and?Edison are required to?notify the  Commission and all parties=
=20
by January 30, 2001 of the specific portions of their  testimony that are=
=20
within the scope of this phase.
7. The hearing schedule adopted is:?=20

February 5,  2001?????????????  Intervenor testimony served
February 9,  2001?????????????  Rebuttal testimony served
February 15 =01)21, 2001?????  Hearings
February 23,  2001??????????? Closing  Argument
February 27,  2001??????????? Briefs,  not to exceed 15 pages
March 23,  2001????????????????Proposed  Decision
March 26,  2001????????????????Final  Oral Argument
March 27,  2001????????????????Anticipated  Final Commission Decision
?
Please let me know if anyone feels WPTF should be involved in this phase of=
 =20
the proceeding.
?
Dan

?
 - CPUC01-#88123-v1-A0011038_ET_AL_Lynch_Walwyn_Ruling__.doc

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	01/28/2001 04:07 PM
		 
Dow Jones story

Cheney: White House Mtg Mon On Calif. Pwr Problems
01/28 10:13 (DJ)
Story 0076 (EIX, PCG, SRE)

NEW YORK (Dow Jones)--U.S. Vice President Dick Cheney said on Fox News
Sunday that the Bush Administration will hold a cabinet-level meeting Monday
on California's power problems.

Cheney also said that it wouldn't be his choice to have California take
control of the electrical industry within its borders.

"That wouldn't be my choice. I'm a believer in markets, and I think the
notion of deregulation is basically sound. What happened in California was
it was poorly executed," Cheney said.

He added that the state's regulatory scheme has undermined the financial
stability of utilities, which have run up several billion dollars in debt
without being able to recapture it.

Cheney also said California's problems are partly a result of supply,
because no new power plants have been built in the state in 10 years,
despite the fact that there has been a rapid run-up in demand.

"It's really up to California to change those laws, both to restore
financially solvency to the utilities as well as to make it possible to
start building new capacity."

Cheney said a big part of the problem is the process for siting plants,
which involves an endless appeals process. While it's relatively easy to
stop a project from going forward in the state, it's very hard to get final
approval for a project, he said.

"California is probably the toughest state in the country...in which to
build a power plant, and when you add to that the pricing scheme that is in
place, there is no incentive for anybody to go invest in additional capacity
in California. And investing in new capacity is what is ultimately going to
solve the problem."

-By Richard C. Black, Dow Jones Newswires; 201 -938 -4370;
rich.black@dowjones.com

(END) DOW JONES NEWS 01 -28 -01

10:13 AM

	Sandra McCubbin
	01/27/2001 08:01 PM
		 
please get back to Jeff or myself on how to respond to Barbara//thanks
	"Barbara R. Barkovich" <BRBarkovich@earthlink.net>
	01/27/2001 07:02 AM
		 
Hi, Sandi.  Per your request, I talked to Jeff yesterday early evening.
I had been in a meeting with Keeley, Wright, et al after the hearing.
Jeff's proposal was not entirely clear to me, but it seemed to focus on
specifying an end date for the rate freeze in the Hertzberg bill.  I
noted that the focus of the Friday hearing and the subsequent meeting
was on how much of the short fall the utilities should be able to
recover and agreed that we would probably go from one freeze to
another.  Therefore the date of the end of the original freeze is
rapidly becoming irrelevant unless it is used to create a back way into
the first issue.  This does not seem very likely right now.  Who knows
how this will evolve, of course, but there is a sense of urgency, at
least in the Assembly.

Take care, Barbara

i'll give you a call.  i'm in new york today.

best,
jeff

=09Harry Kingerski
=0901/29/2001 08:23 AM
=09=09
Jeff - we'll have to make it a priority today to come to a conclusion on th=
e=20
scope of our testimony.  Let me know your schedule.  thanks.

=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0901/28/2001 09:01 PM
=09=09=20

=09"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
=0901/28/2001 01:23 PM
=09=09=20

On Friday, the Commission issued the attached Assigned Commissioner's  Ruli=
ng=20
in the rate surcharge proceedings which does the following:
?
1.? It identifies the issues for Phase 1 as being:
?
(a) Reviewing the independent audit results of PG&E and SCE, ordered in =20
D.00-12-067 and, as part of that analysis, determining whether or not there=
=20
is a  financial necessity for other or additional relief for the utilities.=
? =20
Included here is a recognition that the utilities may make other interim =
=20
proposals and this would be included within the scope of the first phase;  =
and
?
(b) TURN=01,s accounting proposal for the proper reconciliation of the =20
Transition Revenue Account (TRA) and Transition Cost Balancing Account=20
(TCBA)  accounts and the Generation Memorandum Accounts (GMA).
?
2.? The retention of utility generating assets and the interim  ratemaking=
=20
treatment for these assets is being separately handled and hearings  will n=
ot=20
occur on this issue in Phase 1.? Parties may file testimony on  interim=20
valuation in addressing whether the rate freeze has ended on a  prospective=
=20
basis.

3.?? The Commission will consider whether the rate freeze has  ended only o=
n=20
a prospective basis in Phase I.

4.?? The Commission will address the reasonable and prudent  cost issue in =
a=20
later phase of this proceeding.

5.?? The  Commission will also consider parties=01, proposals for tiered ra=
tes=20
similar to  those discussed by Senator Bowen in the December public hearing=
s.
?
6.?? PG&E and?Edison are required to?notify the  Commission and all parties=
=20
by January 30, 2001 of the specific portions of their  testimony that are=
=20
within the scope of this phase.
7. The hearing schedule adopted is:?=20

February 5,  2001?????????????  Intervenor testimony served
February 9,  2001?????????????  Rebuttal testimony served
February 15 =01)21, 2001?????  Hearings
February 23,  2001??????????? Closing  Argument
February 27,  2001??????????? Briefs,  not to exceed 15 pages
March 23,  2001????????????????Proposed  Decision
March 26,  2001????????????????Final  Oral Argument
March 27,  2001????????????????Anticipated  Final Commission Decision
?
Please let me know if anyone feels WPTF should be involved in this phase of=
 =20
the proceeding.
?
Dan

?
 - CPUC01-#88123-v1-A0011038_ET_AL_Lynch_Walwyn_Ruling__.doc

Sorry.  I figured Sandi would have included it.  Why would I have figured 
that?
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/28/2001 09:08 PM
		 
	Sandra McCubbin
	01/27/2001 08:01 PM
		 
please get back to Jeff or myself on how to respond to Barbara//thanks
	"Barbara R. Barkovich" <BRBarkovich@earthlink.net>
	01/27/2001 07:02 AM
		 
Hi, Sandi.  Per your request, I talked to Jeff yesterday early evening.
I had been in a meeting with Keeley, Wright, et al after the hearing.
Jeff's proposal was not entirely clear to me, but it seemed to focus on
specifying an end date for the rate freeze in the Hertzberg bill.  I
noted that the focus of the Friday hearing and the subsequent meeting
was on how much of the short fall the utilities should be able to
recover and agreed that we would probably go from one freeze to
another.  Therefore the date of the end of the original freeze is
rapidly becoming irrelevant unless it is used to create a back way into
the first issue.  This does not seem very likely right now.  Who knows
how this will evolve, of course, but there is a sense of urgency, at
least in the Assembly.

Take care, Barbara

Greetings Professor.  

Regrettably, I'm on travel in New York City today and can't make it to class 
this evening.  I don't anticipate having to miss any other classes this 
semester.  

Regards,
Jeff

I've left messages describing our idea with TURN and the large 
cogenerators/marketers/producers, and I've spoken with the Farm Bureau and 
the California Manufacturers Association.  The Bureau and CMA agree with our 
idea and I've asked them to "pass the word along" to other customer groups 
and to try to ensure that its an integral part of the negotiations.  I'll be 
calling other customer groups and will report back on those conversations.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks.  No apologies necessary.  I'm in NYC, but will try to call you to=
=20
catch up.  When does the Dean get back from Davos?  Have you heard any=20
fallout from the "manifesto?"  I'm conerned that Davis & Co. will be agitat=
ed=20
by it.  Thanks a million for all your efforts.

Best,
Jeff

=09<schub@socrates.Berkeley.EDU>
=0901/29/2001 11:42 AM
=09=09=20
Dear Jeff:

Sorry I didn't get back to you last week. I was sick on Thursday and
Friday and only dealt with a couple of things.  Unfortunately, not much to
report.  Letter sent to Governor's office.  Not even a courtesy call in
return.  I spoke with Lynn Schenk on Thursday.  She told me point blank
that the Governor and his staff had already solved the energy crisis and
that it was too late to convene a meeting such as LDT was
suggesting.  Please DO NOT pass on this informationto anyone else in the
"Berkeley group."  We'll probably try to reach Schenk again
today.  Marybeth

On Wed, 24 Jan 2001 Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com wrote:

>=20
> Mary Beth:
>=20
> For what it's worth, I've read this, and if Laura Tyson or Larry Summers
> sign it, I have serious concerns about the effect it would have on their
> ability to play the role that we envision in moving our proposal forward
> (understanding that our odds of success are somewhat meager).  While I
> don't disagree with the language, it is strong and therefore very likely =
to
> make the Governor and his staff very uncomfortable.  I would recommend th=
at
> they do not sign.
>=20
> Best,
> Jeff

Those arrangements have been made.  Thank you and see you next week.

Best,
Jeff

	Mukesh_Bajaj@LECG.com
	01/29/2001 12:38 PM
		 
I understand.  Please make appropriate arrangements with your team members.

Mukesh

Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com on 01/29/2001 10:34:46 AM

Greetings Professor.

Regrettably, I'm on travel in New York City today and can't make it to
class this evening.  I don't anticipate having to miss any other classes
this semester.

Regards,
Jeff

FYI.  Teece is the economist at Berkeley who acted as the ringleader for the 
"manifesto."
	David Teece <teece@Haas.Berkeley.EDU>
	01/29/2001 02:33 PM
		 
TO:?????AD HOC GROUP ON THE ELECTRICITY CRISIS

Assemblyman Joe Nation put a bill in the hopper Friday, January 26th, which 
he believes is congruent with our thinking (see attached).? He is seeking our 
comments and possible endorsements.

Please send your comments directly to Joe Nation at <joe@joenation.com>, and 
let me know whether you believe we should work with him and consider 
endorsing his bill.

Thanks,
David Teece

 - nation memo 012601.pdf
 - nation draft bill page 2.pdf
 - nation draft bill page 3.pdf
 - nation draft bill page 4.pdf
 - nation draft bill page 1.pdf
 - nation memo 012701.pdf
======================================
David J. Teece, Director
Institute of Management, Innovation and Organization
F402 Haas School of Business #1930
University of California, Berkeley
Berkeley, CA  94720-1930
Phone:  (510) 642-1075
Fax:  (510) 642-2826
http://haas.berkeley.edu/~imio
======================================

Hey, nice spreadsheet.  Two minor questions: 

1) Isn't the provision for taxes on the income statement actually the taxes 
on the 'income' they made from using the sales method (equal to 46%), rather 
than what they pay will actually pay the IRS under the installment method?  I 
think the notes show how instead of paying the 4.1$ based on their recognized 
income, they pay some itty bitty amount based on installment.  If so, I think 
they actually get a 46%  tax break on the 1 million and change that they lose 
using a cash basis.  Still a loss, just not so big.  Anyway, I'm not sure if 
I'm thinking straight on this, but that's how I read the numbers.

2) Does the balance sheet have to change a little?  For example, does 
shareholder equity change since the income that goes to retained earnings is 
now a loss, rather than a gain?  Also, if revenue is recognized on a cash 
basis and is now much smaller, there needs to be another liability to equal 
out the decrease in revenues with the still large notes receivables on the 
asset side (as you note in the answer the notes recievables stays the same).  
Seems like they might need a liability like "deferred profits" or some such 
thing, such that the ["deferred profits" +  revenues (recognized on cash 
basis)] = notes receivables.

Anyway, I may not have this right, but thought I'd bring it up to see what 
you think.

Best,
Jeff

I'm fine and agree that it's more about the reasoning than the right answer.  
I don't feel strongly about the recommendation, just wanted to throw out 
something for folks to shoot at and to highlight that A/R and inventory 
turnover is big problem.  (Though without A/R and inventory turnover 
convenants, I don't know if I'd do the deal.)  Thanks for doing the finishing 
touches.

Best,
Jeff

=09Susan J Mara
=0901/30/2001 01:10 PM
=09=09=20

=09Susan J Mara
=0901/30/2001 10:10 AM
=09=09=20

=09"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
=0901/30/2001 08:31 AM
=09=09=20
The following are the highlights from the Executive Summary of the KPMG aud=
it=20
report on Southern California Edison:
=20
I. Cash Needs
Highlights:
SCE=01,s original cash forecast, dated as December 28, 2000, projects a com=
plete=20
cash depletion date of February 1, 2001. Since then SCE has instituted a=20
program of cash conservation that includes suspension of certain obligation=
s=20
and other measures.=20
Based on daily cash forecasts and cash conservation activities, SCE=01,s=20
available cash improved through January 19 from an original estimate of $51=
.8=20
million to $1.226 billion. The actual cash flow, given these cash=20
conservation activities, extends the cash depletion date.
II. Credit Relationships
Highlights:
SCE has exercised all available lines of credit and has not been able to=20
extend or renew credit as it has become due.
At present, there are no additional sources of credit open to SCE.
SCE=01,s loan agreements provide for specific clauses with respect to defau=
lt.=20
Generally, these agreements provide for the debt becoming immediately due a=
nd=20
payable.
SCE=01,s utility plant assets are used to secure outstanding mortgage bond=
=20
indebtedness, although there is some statutory capacity to issue more=20
indebtedness if it were feasible to do so.
Credit ratings agencies have downgraded SCE=01,s credit ratings on most of =
its=20
rated indebtedness from solid corporate ratings to below investment grade=
=20
issues within the last three weeks.
III. Energy Cost Scenarios
Highlights
This report section uses different CPUC supplied assumptions to assess=20
various price scenarios upon SCE=01,s projected cash depletion dates. Under=
 such=20
scenarios, SCE would have a positive cash balance until March 30, 2001.
IV. Cost Containment Initiatives
Highlights
SCE has adopted a $460 million Cost Reduction Plan for the year 2001.
The Plan consists of an operation and maintenance component and a capital=
=20
improvement component as follows (in millions):
Operating and maintenance costs     $ 77
Capital Improvement Costs                383
Total                                             $ 460
The Plan provides for up to 2,000 full, part-time and contract positions to=
=20
be eliminated with approximately 75% of the total staff reduction coming fr=
om=20
contract employees.
Under the Plan, Capital Improvement Costs totaling $383 million are for the=
=20
most part being deferred to a future date.
SCE dividends to its common shareholder and preferred stockholders and=20
executive bonuses have been suspended, resulting in an additional cost=20
savings of approximately $92 million.
V. Accounting Mechanisms to Track Stranded Cost Recovery (TRA and TCBA=20
Activity)
Highlights:
As of December 31, 2000, SCE reported an overcollected balance in the=20
Transition Cost Balancing Account (TCBA) Account of $494.5 million. This=20
includes an estimated market valuation of its hydro facilities of $500=20
million and accelerated revenues of $175 million.
As of December 31, 2000, SCE reported an undercollected balance in SCE=01,s=
=20
Transition Account (TRA) of $4.49 billion.
Normally, the generation memorandum accounts are credited to the TCBA at th=
e=20
end of each year. However, the current generation memorandum account credit=
=20
balance of $1.5 billion has not been credited to the TCBA, pursuant to=20
D.01-01-018.
Costs of purchasing generation are tracked in the TRA and revenues from=20
generation are tracked in the TCBA. Because these costs and revenues are=20
tracked separately, the net liability from procuring electric power, as=20
expressed in the TRA, are overstated.
TURN Proposal
As part of our review, the CPUC asked that we comment on the proposal of TU=
RN=20
to change certain aspects of the regulatory accounting for transition asset=
s.=20
Our comments are summarized as follows:
The Proposal would have no direct impact on the cash flows of SCE in that i=
t=20
would not directly generate nor use cash.
The Proposal=01,s impact on SCE=01,s balance sheet would initially be to sh=
ift=20
costs between two regulatory assets.
TURN=01,s proposal recognizes that because the costs of procuring power and=
 the=20
revenues from generating power are tracked separately, the undercollection =
in=20
the TRA is overstated.
VI. Flow of Funds Analysis
Highlights:
In the last five years, SCE had generated net income of $2.7 billion and a=
=20
positive cash flow from operations of $7 billion.
During the same time period, SCE paid dividends and other distributions to=
=20
its parent, Edison International, of approximately $4.8 billion.
Edison International used the funds from dividends to pay dividends to its=
=20
shareholders of $1.6 billion and repurchased shares of its outstanding comm=
on=20
stock of $2.7 billion, with the remaining funds being used for administrati=
ve=20
and general costs, investments, and other corporate purposes.
[there is no Section VII]
=20
VIII. Earnings of California Affiliates
SCE=01,s payments for power to its affiliates were approximately $400-$500=
=20
million annually and remained relatively stable from 1996 through 1999.=20
In 2000, the payments increased by approximately 50% to over $600 million.=
=20
This increase correlates to the increase in market prices
for natural gas for the same period.
A copy of the report is available on the Commission website at=20
www.cpuc.ca.gov.
=20
Dan

Greetings:

I'm in the group (and traveling on the East Coast, returning late tonite).  I 
can do a conference all today if folks would like.  Otherwise, I'll be 
working on it on the plane back tonite and will distribute when I get home or 
first thing in the AM.  

Best,
Jeff

	"Sama, Anil" <anil.sama@intel.com>
	01/30/2001 11:35 PM
		 
Hey Guys, 

Just sat down to read about the first write up that is due 
this Thursday, and realized that this is supposed to be a 
group assignment!!  Ooops - I had no idea... Did you ;-) 
Anyone read the case and/or taken a crack at it? Should 
we try and co-ordinate a conference call? 

Carolyn is out for the week and excused from the
assignment - just had a baby girl last Fri!!
Jeff, did you hear from teacher if OK to join ? 

-Anil 

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/30/2001 05:04 PM
		 
Note:  Please forward this note to the appropriate people within Enron.
I do not have access to all the email addresses after hours.

Today the special Wright Assembly committee held an infomational hearing
on bankruptcy procedures.  No substantive action.  However, at his
evening briefing Assmblyman Wright said that ABX -18 was now stripped
down to just the "arrearage" language and was only 4 pages.  It should
be out soon.  There is no schedule for a hearing, but the next hearing
will be to vote on  a bill.  Our proposed language on the end of the
rate freeze is under consideration.  Edison has agreed to support our
concept and wants to see a redraft of the language making it explicit
that they can recover past costs in the future.  We will provide a draft
to them tomorrow morning.

The Senate appropriations committee met all day to work over the ABX-1
bill and considered amendments and testimony.  The bill included
amendments suspending all  direct access once the DWR was buying
power.   We have a major problem in that Sen Burton, Bowen, and
Assmblyman Keeley all believe that the DWR will get lower prices and
avoid stranded contract costs in the later years of the contract if
customers are locked into the DWR market.  The witness from NYMEX
described this approach as making sure the state goes broke as soon as
possible.

We offered our amended language to preserve existing and future direct
access to staff.  After the recess the bill had not been amended. I
presented testimony supporting direct access, as did many consumer
groups, UC/CSU, and industrial customers.   The compromise from the
chair was to promis that language would be added to grandfather in
existing direct access contracts which could be retain, renegotiated or
renewed.  However, the CPUC could suspend the right to enter into new
direct access deals.  Sen. Bowen committed to introduce a "clean up"
bill tomorrow which could deal comprehensively with the issue and
perhaps detail the conditions under which customers could choose direct
access in the future.  However, as the bills are not "joined" in
legislative parlance, we have no real assurance that the Bowen bill will
be passed or signed.  We have a major selling job to do in conjunction
with the other ESPs, and customer groups in order to try to get this
fixed.  NEV tried to introduce amendments which would impose very
specific conditions on new direct access, preferring to spell out the
language in the bill  rather than risk getting an adverse decision from
the CPUC.  We indicated our unwillingness to support significant
restrictions on future industrial direct access, and they did not push
the language too hard, but we now have to have Enron get more involved
in determining ARM's position.  Aaron Thomas and Counihan will be
working on this tomorrow in Sacto.  For tomorrow, my suggested action
points are as follows:   Jim Steffes should brief Sue Mara on his
suggestions for managing direct access under the new structure, and she
should try to contact Aaron and Rick, while Sandi and I will do the same
from here.

We will advise you of any other major developments.

Mike Day

Congratulations.  Glad to hear all went well (save the emergency C-section).  
See you soon.

Best,
Jeff

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	01/31/2001 02:38 PM
		 
Wednesday January 31, 12:31 am Eastern Time

Press Release

PG&E Issues Statement Following Release of CPUC Report

SAN FRANCISCO--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Jan. 30, 2001--Pacific Gas and Electric 
Company today issued the following statement, in response to the report 
released by the California Public Utilities Commission (CPUC): 

``It is premature to comment in detail about the CPUC report issued late 
today. We plan to study and evaluate this report thoroughly. As the CPUC is 
well aware: 

Pacific Gas and Electric Company procured power for its customers in 
accordance with all CPUC requirements, despite having to make purchases at 
rates substantially higher than those that it could charge to customers. As 
the CPUC report confirms, these purchases have resulted in uncollected 
amounts of $6.7 billion as of December 31, 2000.

The transfer of approximately $4 billion from Pacific Gas and Electric 
Company to PG&E Corporation was consistent with CPUC directives. PG&E 
shareholders invested their money to build the utility's power plants, and, 
under California law, when those plants were sold under deregulation, 
shareholders were entitled to recover their investments.

CPUC rules require sharp lines between the corporation's utility and 
non-utility businesses and establish a rigorous framework to ensure that 
those lines are observed. Ratepayers are not to subsidize the growth of 
PG&E's national business -- and they have not.

The report suggests that the use of affiliate earnings and greater cash 
conservation efforts could have made a difference. That is simply not the 
case. Even if the $117 million of NEG earnings that the report attributes to 
California were used to purchase power and the utility implemented Draconian 
cash conservation measures -- including laying off every management employee, 
reducing the rank-and-file workforce by an additional one-thousand employees, 
breaking contracts and implementing a salary freeze on Union employees -- the 
total savings would amount to less than one month's worth of power at current 
prices. 

``The important objective of all parties -- the utilities, lawmakers and 
regulators including the CPUC -- should be to move expeditiously to achieve a 
constructive solution to the energy crisis, which is threatening the safety 
of Californians and the economic well-being of the state.'' 

For more information about Pacific Gas and Electric Company, please visit our 
web site at http://www.pge.com. 

     Pacific Gas and Electric
     News Department, 415/973-5930

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	01/31/2001 02:33 PM
		 
DJ Calif Asked For Revisions To Util Audit Language -Source 
Copyright , 2001 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. 

LOS ANGELES (Dow Jones)--California utility regulators sent a draft audit of 
Edison International (EIX) unit Southern California Edison's financial 
condition back to accounting firm KPMG LLP to have "conclusionary statements 
and value judgments" removed, a person working closely with the state on the 
issue said Tuesday. 

     "They made some value judgments, but their job was simply to provide an 
audit," the person said. As a result, the California Public Utilities 
Commission told the auditors "to go back and take out the value judgments and 
make their findings neutral," the person said. 

     The final audit, released late Monday, is decidedly different from an 
executive summary of a draft lawmakers held last week, according to several 
Democratic lawmakers who said they had seen a copy. 

     For one, last week's executive summary clearly stated that the utilities 
can recoup billions of dollars from consumers retroactive to August 2000, one 
Democratic senator said. 

     KPMG and the California Public Utilities Commission declined to comment. 

     The Public Utilities Commission requested independent audits of Southern 
California Edison and PG&E Corp. (PCG) unit Pacific Gas & Electric Co. in 
late December to determine the validity of their claims that soaring 
wholesale power costs would force them into bankruptcy unless their rates 
were allowed to rise. 

     The audit of Pacific Gas & Electric, being prepared by Barrington 
Wellesley Group, had yet to be released late Tuesday. 

     KPMG's final audit shed some light on the severity of Southern 
California Edison's liquidity crisis and outlined payments the utility has 
made to its parent company. But it made no recommendations on whether the 
Public Utilities Commission should grant the utility's request for a rate 
hike or declare at an end the rate freeze that has kept it from passing its 
power costs on to customers. 

     The audit says Southern California Edison has paid $4.5 billion more for 
electricity than it was allowed to charge consumers. It also says the utility 
has paid $4.8 billion to its parent company since deregulation, with the bulk 
of that sum being paid out to shareholders via dividends or share buybacks. 

     One adviser to a Democratic assemblyman said it was proper for the 
Public Utilities Commission to send the audit back to KPMG. 

     "I would have done the same thing," the adviser said. "This is a very 
charged issue." 

     -By Jason Leopold; Dow Jones Newswires; 323-658-3874; 
mailto:jason.leopold@dowjones.com 

     (END) Dow Jones Newswires 31-01-01 

     0226GMT 

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	01/31/2001 09:23 AM
		 
ABX 1 passed out of the Senate Appropriations Committee moments ago on a
vote of 7-2.  The bill received no Republican votes.  I have attached
the amended version of the bill for your review.  The bill will be taken
up on the Senate floor shortly, then will go back to the Assembly for
concurrence this afternoon.

http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/asm/ab_0001-0050/abx1_1_bill_20010130_amended_
sen.pdf

will do.

	Steven J Kean
	01/31/2001 05:50 PM
		 
Thanks to everyone for their work on the Senate hearing.  There are a couple 
of follow-up items:

Thanks to the Portland and Washington teams, Sen Wyden is very interested in 
identifying the kind of information we need from the ISO (and PX to the 
extent it's still relevant) to make the market work better.  We have written 
this up before, I think we just need to put it in letter form.  Alan -- 
please take the lead on this and get a draft to Linda.  I think we should 
identify the information and also prepare a letter for the Chairman (?) that 
could be sent to the FERC.
Murkowski (the Committee Chairman) asked for an itemized list of things the 
fed should do to expedite siting as well as anything else we feel is 
necessary  to address the California crisis.  We have identified the need for 
open access across the nation, but he is looking for what can be done in the 
2-4 month time frame.  Dave, I think your memo to me is a good start.  Sue -- 
could you please put those and any other suggestions in letter form and get 
them to Linda?
Finally, Sen Feinstein asked all of the witnesses to ask their CEOs not to 
"price gouge" -- yes, that's what she said.  She appealed to everyone's 
community spirit and asked suppliers to forbear charging high prices while 
California struggles to fix its problems.  I think we should send a response 
from Ken.  Jeff -- please take a cut and get to Linda.  I think the basic 
messages should be:  we are actively working on solutions with California 
policymakers (forward contracting was our idea after all); we are actively 
pursuing demand reduction in the state, etc.  We should also explain the 
nature of our business and pick up on some of the other solutions we 
identified in the written testimony, offer to meet to discuss further, etc.

	"Sama, Anil" <anil.sama@intel.com>
	02/01/2001 01:02 AM
		 
Hi Team,

I did not get much time to work on the case today - got 
pulled into a few meetings, and only just got back form 
class. BUT, tomorrow looks good... 

Jeff, Mark: can you send across what you have? Should 
we shoot for a conf call around 12:00? 

For Class 5 (i.e. second half tomorrow), didn't Sarah say 
she was going to send across a pdf file on email, or put 
something on Izio web site ? Did anyone receive this file?

-Anil 

Ok, Great.

I'm in class tonight, but will be working on the case today 
around lunch. Sounds like tomorrow AM may be a better 
time for a conf call - after everyone sends around their 
analysis to each other. I'll take a crack at putting it all 
together - as I am relatively free tomorrow. 

- Anil 

Greetings:

I'm in the group (and traveling on the East Coast, returning late tonite).
I can do a conference all today if folks would like.  Otherwise, I'll be
working on it on the plane back tonite and will distribute when I get home
or first thing in the AM.

Best,
Jeff

 

                    "Sama, Anil"

                                         "'chin@haas.berkeley.edu'"

                    01/30/2001           <chin@haas.berkeley.edu>,

                    11:35 PM             "'dasovich@haas.berkeley.edu'"

                                         <dasovich@haas.berkeley.edu>

                                         cc:

                                         Subject:     First Write-Up due for
Financial     
                                         Information Analysis

 

Hey Guys,

Just sat down to read about the first write up that is due
this Thursday, and realized that this is supposed to be a
group assignment!!  Ooops - I had no idea... Did you ;-)
Anyone read the case and/or taken a crack at it? Should
we try and co-ordinate a conference call?

Carolyn is out for the week and excused from the
assignment - just had a baby girl last Fri!!
Jeff, did you hear from teacher if OK to join ?

-Anil

No, I don't think I'd make a better accountant.  But I did ask a few 
questions of my accountant brother-in-law.  You did a great job.  I don't 
know how much time I'll have, but I'll see if I can throw in a bit of text 
and raise the issues.  See you tonite.

Kimberly Kupiecki <kkupiecki@arpartners.com> on 09/18/2000 09:53:30 AM
Hi Jeff,

I guess you would make a better accountant than me.  Your analysis sounds
right.  Feel free to make changes as fit.

My apologies for missing out on these items.

At 06:18 PM 9/17/00, jdasovic@enron.com wrote:

>Hey, nice spreadsheet.  Two minor questions:
>
>1) Isn't the provision for taxes on the income statement actually the taxes
>on the 'income' they made from using the sales method (equal to 46%),
>rather than what they pay will actually pay the IRS under the installment
>method?  I think the notes show how instead of paying the 4.1$ based on
>their recognized income, they pay some itty bitty amount based on
>installment.  If so, I think they actually get a 46%  tax break on the 1
>million and change that they lose using a cash basis.  Still a loss, just
>not so big.  Anyway, I'm not sure if I'm thinking straight on this, but
>that's how I read the numbers.
>
>2) Does the balance sheet have to change a little?  For example, does
>shareholder equity change since the income that goes to retained earnings
>is now a loss, rather than a gain?  Also, if revenue is recognized on a
>cash basis and is now much smaller, there needs to be another liability to
>equal out the decrease in revenues with the still large notes receivables
>on the asset side (as you note in the answer the notes recievables stays
>the same).  Seems like they might need a liability like "deferred profits"
>or some such thing, such that the ["deferred profits" +  revenues
>(recognized on cash basis)] = notes receivables.
>
>Anyway, I may not have this right, but thought I'd bring it up to see what
>you think.
>
>Best,
>Jeff

Kimberly Kupiecki
Senior Account Executive
A&R Partners
kkupiecki@arpartners.com
(650) 762 2800 main
(650) 762 2825 direct
fax (650) 762 2801

	Harry Kingerski
	02/01/2001 01:29 PM
		 
Aggregated talking points, per the call.  Jeff, will you forward to Sandi and 
lobbyists after review.  Please address comments to Jeff and myself.  Thanks.

YES!

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	02/01/2001 03:04 PM
		 
I friend of mine just told me that Domaine has a surplus of sparkling wine 
that they are making available for purchase.  They are magnums of Blanc de 
Noir that normally sell for $32.00 and they are selling them for $10.00.  I 
will be happy to organize a purchase if anyone wants some.

My proposed edits to Harry's excellent first cut.  They're quick and dirty.  
My apologies.

Best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/01/2001 03:59 PM
		
My proposed edits to Harry's excellent first cut.  They're quick and dirty.  
My apologies.

Best,
Jeff

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/01/2001 02:40 PM
		 
    We are now engaged with a large coalition of customer groups
committed to passing language in a Bowen bill (a spot bill SBX - 27 has
been introduced for this purpose by Bowen) to fix the language in ABX -1
which permits a ban on new direct access agreements.  We have committed
to Bowen to get her staff a first attempt at draft language by close of
business tomorrow.  The attachment to this email is a draft which has
been discussed by the customers group coalition.  We would like to have
input on this language by 11 am PST tomorrow if at all possible.  Please
email responses to Mike Day at mday@gmssr.com or calling 415-279-0702.

The aim of the bill is to provide specific direction to the DWR and CPUC
so that they cannot use their discretion to make customer choice more
difficult.  In addition to the language in the draft attachment, several
other issues were discussed on the call.  Please comment on these as
well if you can.

1. In sub para. (c) it was felt we should carefully define the stranded
costs DWR might face so they have to show actual damage from a customer
leaving.  CMA proposed defining these "actual costs" as "the costs that
DWR cannot reasonably avoid until one or more of its long term power
contracts expire."   Thus, if the load electing direct access fits
within the DWR short term purchases, there are no stranded costs and no
exit fee.

2. Should there a limitation on the number of times a customer can
switch into and out of the bundled service portfolio?  CMA and other
customers were willing to live with a limit of one switch a year.

3.  Should customers be required to give DWR notice of their desire to
return or the expiration of their direct access deal?  There was some
willingness to do this, balanced against a desire to not be too specific
or to do DWR's work for them.

4.  The large customers were very uncomfortable with having the
definition between small customers who could switch without restriction
and large customers who could not be 500 Kw.  That is the number the
core/noncore advocates are pushing as a dividing line.  The group would
prefer that the limit be 100 Kw, which is the limitation adopted in AB
265, the  SDG&E rate cap bill from the end of last session.  Thus the
100 kW figure has a legislative connection, but still allows a fair
number of commercial customers to have unlimited flexibility to switch.

This is detailed and prescriptive language, but the customer group
parties were strongly convinced that any effort to craft regulations at
the CPUC would be much worse, leading to the desire to limit the CPUC's
discretion with specific language.  At this stage, after hearing that
CPUC Comm. Wood hoped to use ABX -1 to end direct access ( a comment
made to NEV or Greenmountain), we tend to agree.  We will get a better
negotiated result at the legislature than at the CPUC.

Thanks in advance for your fast turnaround on this.  Mike Day

 - subscription.protocols.doc

looks like email address for you was wrong.  got returned.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/01/2001 03:59 PM
		
My proposed edits to Harry's excellent first cut.  They're quick and dirty.  
My apologies.

Best,
Jeff

PLEASE DO NOT DISTRIBUTE.  I haven't read this yet, so I don't know if it's 
good bad or indifferent.  McFadden is one of the Manifesto signers and a 
Nobel Laureate.  If folks have comments, please forward them along and I will 
get them into the mix.  Thanks a bunch.

Best,
Jeff
	Dan McFadden <mcfadden@econ.Berkeley.EDU>
	02/02/2001 04:35 PM
		 
I have prepared a statement on the California energy crisis in response to
a solicitation from the Wall Street Journal, and attach a preliminary first
draft in pdf and Wordperfect formats.  This may or may not appear in some
edited form as an op-ed piece in the WSJ.  Although this statement is in
my own words, I believe it is consistent with the Manifesto.  I would
appreciate feedback from my fellow economists if I have made statements that
contradict the Manifesto, or most critically have made arguments that they
feel are not sound economics.  I will try to incorporate suggestions in the
next draft.  Thanks for your reaction.

I am also sending copies of this draft to a couple of people in the media
other than the WSJ, and they are welcome to use the content but not the text
if they want a summary of my take on the crisis.

Dan McFadden
 - Energy.pdf
 - Energy.wpd

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/02/2001 01:46 PM
		 
Edison has agreed to support Enron's legislative language regarding the
rate freeze.  I forwarded this information to Joe Lyons in Rod Wright's
office.

Thanks very much, Jeanne.

Yes, but there's a commitment to reverse it in another bill (AB 27X) that=
=20
Debra Bowen is carrying.  There is a helluvalot of uproar about that langua=
ge=20
in the bill and just about everyone is united to fix it.  Keep your fingers=
=20
crossed, and we'll keep you posted.

Best,
Jeff

=09Douglas Condon@EES
=0902/02/2001 08:00 PM
=09=09=20

Is this statement correct?

Another flea on this legislation is the suspension of new direct access=20
customers during the time that DWR is procuring energy.? The bill states, "=
 =01(=20
the right of retail end use customers =01( to acquire service from other=20
providers shall be suspended until the department no longer supplies power=
=20
hereunder."? Voila.? Not only do we get a rate increase, but our ability to=
=20
choose an alternative energy supplier is hereby waived.? I would think the=
=20
average Californian would be outraged by that dictate.? Of course, most=20
Californians didn't know that they had a choice.? Therefore, the legislatio=
n=20
made a grand leap forward by lowering our opportunity set to be in line wit=
h?=20
expectations.=20

I wonder what the Legislature will do next week?=20

Hi:
Hope you had a nice weekend.  Sorry I missed you all in Washington.  Rick's 
asked me to attend the meeting at the Woodlands tomorrow.  Do we have a list 
of attendants/agenda?  No big deal, but would help me in preparing for the 
meeting.  I'm assuming that the meeting takes place tomorrow only?  I'm 
staying through Wednesday, nonetheless, and have booked a room at the 
Lancaster.  But if the meeting's going to continue through Wed, I was 
wondering if I should be staying at the Woodlands.  Thanks (as always) for 
you help.

Signed,
Clueless

On Friday, I attended a meeting with Ken Lay and Karen Denne that Mike Peev=
ey=20
and David Freeman requested.  Mike Peevey was President of Southern=20
California Edison before founding NEV (which he eventually sold to AES). =
=20
Freeman is General Manager of LADWP. =20

The Governor hired Peevey to be his chief energy advisor.  Freeman is the=
=20
Governor=01,s chief negotiator responsible for signing power contracts on b=
ehalf=20
of DWR now that the Legislature has passed AB1X and the Governor has signed=
=20
it.  John Burton, the leader of the State Senate, is responsible for gettin=
g=20
the Freeman the job of chief negotiator, but Peevey was clearly in charge. =
=20

Also at the meeting was Vikram Budraja, former SVP of power systems and=20
planning for Edison.  He=01,s now a private consultant that Freeman hired t=
o=20
help him with the contract negotiations.

Peevey asked for the meeting to urge Enron to respond to DWR=01,s RFP issue=
d on=20
Friday.  Peevey/Freeman want to announce a package of deals on Tuesday.  Th=
ey=20
implied that they=01,ve already got some deals done and expect to have 8+ d=
eals=20
to announce on Tuesday, though they gave no details other than to say that=
=20
they=01,ve got a deal with Calpine (as reported in the press).  Their plan =
is to=20
announce on Tuesday the names of the suppliers they=01,ve signed with, the =
total=20
number of megawatts signed, and the average price per MW.  They are concern=
ed=20
that the media will want them to make public the details of each individual=
=20
deal, which for obvious reasons they don=01,t want to do.

Peevey and Freeman also said that they don=01,t want to sign too many long-=
term=20
contracts though they recognize that there=01,s a trade-off between term an=
d=20
price.

Ken Lay told them that Enron would respond.  ENA is preparing a response.  =
He=20
also told them that EES was working on a plan to reduce demand at our=20
customers=01, facilities and that the plan would be completed and ready for=
=20
implementation very soon.

I=01,ve summarized the points that Ken Lay made and the responses from Peev=
ey=20
and Freeman:

It would be difficult to enter into contracts without some assurance that D=
WR=20
is creditworthy.

Response from Peevey/Freeman:
AB1X provides DWR the funds necessary=01*beginning on Friday, Feb 1st=01*to=
=20
purchase the power necessary to fill the utilities=01, short position.  Ken=
 Lay=20
pressed them on this point and Peevey insisted that AB1X provides the funds=
=20
needed to pay suppliers.

The RFP should give suppliers maximum flexibility in coming up with proposa=
ls.

Response from Peevey/Freeman:
Be as creative as possible.  All offers will be considered (despite the=20
language contained in the RFP).

The only customers who have been protected from California=01,s failed=20
restructuring law are customers who chose another provider under Direct=20
Access.  In addition, one of the quickest ways to help solve California=01,=
s=20
shortage is to work with customers to reduce demand and develop on-site=20
generation.  Taking away Direct Access and access to customers generally=01=
*as=20
AB1X does=01*is therefore a dumb idea and must be reversed.

Response from Peevey:
He agreed but said that it was impossible to remove it from the bill.  He=
=20
affirmed what we already know=01*that the head of the Senate oversight comm=
ittee=01*
Debra Bowen=01*is working on a =01&clean-up=018 bill to remove the prohibit=
ion.  In=20
response to Ken Lay=01,s points that California needed to make sure that ut=
ility=20
interconnection and stand-by rates didn=01,t continue to impede on-site=20
generation, Peevey and Freeman said that the Governor understood the proble=
m=20
and was prepared to fix it.

Siting laws have got to be streamlined and California (i.e., the Governor)=
=20
has got to credibly commit to the swift development of new power plants in=
=20
order to push the forward curve down.

Response from Peevey/Freeman:
The Governor is scheduled to offer a plan this week that is targeted at=20
expediting siting and development.

DWR should accept demand reduction bids at the same time that it accepts=20
supply-side bids.

Response from Peevey/Freeman:
They agreed but said that there is extreme political pressure to announce t=
he=20
signing of some supply deals on Tuesday in order to prove to legislators th=
at=20
DWR will be able to keep the lights on, and at a =01&reasonable=018 price. =
 They=20
also need to sign some deals in light of the fact that the feds are very=20
unlikely to extend the DOE order forcing suppliers to sell to the IOUs.  On=
ce=20
they=01,ve shown that they can manage the supply side, Peevey and Freeman s=
aid=20
they want to quickly turn their attention to demand-side bidding.

These are the highlights.  I=01,d be happy to give more details on the Mond=
ay=20
morning \call.

Best,
Jeff

Jim:
Got your message.  Be happy to be on a call today to discuss California's gas 
structure.  Just let me know when.

Best to all, 
Jeff

	Steve Montovano
	02/05/2001 09:12 AM
		
Here is a summary of AGL prepared by Tom Chapman.

	

I wanted to follow-up with everyone following yesterday's meeting. 

It appears to me that we need to develop (1) a better analysis of the four 
market models - AGL (Steve M), Columbia of Ohio (Janine), Socal Gas (Jeff), 
NICOR (Roy) - based on some key elements and (2) the key Influence parties in 
Illinois with 5 layer Influence Circles that we need to be thinking about in 
this discussion.

It would be great if we could get this to Laura for distribution by end of 
day Friday (realize it's tight).

Key elements for Market Models --

1. Direct Access Allowed?  For What customers?  What timeline?
2. Upstream Capacity resolution - assignment or otherwise?  Are there assets 
left to optimize
3. Retail pricing - Fixed price vs. PBR (how?) vs. something else?
4. Role of Wholesale Outsourcing Agent (would ENA sell to marketers or 
utilities or both?)
5. Other Issues

Thanks,

Jim

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/04/2001 06:18 PM
		 
Commissioner Lynch and ALJ Cooke have each issued proposed decisions which  
adopt differing guidelines for bilateral power purchase contracts entered 
into  by the utilities.? 
?
If the utilities follow these guidelines, the Commission will forego  
reasonableness reviews of the contracts.? Attached is a  memorandum?which 
summarizes the filings made by interested parties  and?highlights the major 
elements of the two draft decisions.
?
This matter will be voted on at the February 8 Commission meeting.
?
Dan
 - 2-4-01 Memo re Draft Decisions.doc

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/04/2001 01:22 PM
		 
Commentary: The Ongoing California Saga
In the continuing electrical soap opera in California, the role of villain 
has been seized by the executive branch of the state government, 
specifically, Gov. Gray Davis and his hand-picked head of the California 
Public Utilities Commission, Loretta Lynch. Neither Davis nor Lynch are 
contributing to solving the crisis, in either the short or the long run. They 
are making things worse.
Their chief response to the electric catastrophe has been a search for 
demons: the power generators and marketers, the federal government, the 
utilities themselves, anybody but the politicians or the regulators. They 
have mightily resisted measures that are clearly necessary to right the 
sinking ship, including rate increases.
Columnist Dan Waters in the Sacramento Bee recently did a political scorecard 
of California politicians. On Davis, he wrote, "A poll indicates that nearly 
two-thirds of Californians believe the governor has performed poorly on the 
crisis, and while some of the negative feeling may simply reflect their own 
anxiety, much of it is well founded. Davis is essentially a passive, reactive 
and self-protective politician, and his tendencies served him - and the store 
- poorly when the crisis first arose last summer. Rather than recognize the 
peril and spend some political capital, Davis played for time, hoping that 
conditions would improve on their own and/or the federal government would 
come to his rescue with price-cap orders and other actions. But he 
miscalculated on both." 
Of Lynch, Waters said, "Legislators from both parties are ready to lynch the 
president of the state Public Utilities Commission for, they say, 
consistently refusing to cooperate and feeding them blatantly false accounts. 
Lynch, her critics say, appears to be more interested in protecting the PUC's 
sorry reputation on utility regulation - its decrees caused many of the 
problems - than in solving the crisis and may have misled Davis, who 
appointed her. Southern California Edison took the extraordinary step of 
issuing a highly detailed critique that stopped just short of accusing Lynch 
of lying, and the legislature's chief auditor is ready to sue her to obtain 
information on the PUC's role."
Both Davis and Lynch seem to have an information problem. I'm reminded of an 
old Shoe cartoon by the late Jeff MacNelly, in which a heavy-set politician 
stands at a podium in a news conference and makes the accusation, "You in the 
media are playin' fast and loose with the facts." One of the stogie-smoking 
hacks responds, "How's that? What did we do to the facts?" The politician 
replies, "You printed the dang things!"
Davis demonstrated his rather loose, Clintonian, connection with the truth 
late last month when he proudly announced that bids for long-term electricity 
supply in response to the state's solicitation had come in an at "weighted 
average" of $69/MWh. Some kind of weighting. The $69 price, it turns out, 
didn't include high-priced bids for peaking power. Nor would the governor or 
his lackeys tell us what the average was if the peak bids were included.
Lynch has been beating on, and berating, SCE and PG&E for their insistence 
that they need financial relief and the ability to pass costs on to their 
customers. The most outrageous act from Lynch was the 2-1decision by the CPUC 
to issue restraining orders forbidding the two utilities from withdrawing 
from their obligation to serve. She billed the move as a way to prevent 
unilateral blackouts imposed by the utilities.
But both companies already had told the CPUC they had no intention of cutting 
off service to customers. Calling the action "an abuse of power," SCE CEO 
John Bryson said the order is "an insult to the ethic of the 13,000 employees 
of SCE who have worked to keep the lights on for their customers. In fact, 
SCE has borrowed billions of dollars, which threatens the company's solvency, 
through 8
 months of inaction and delay by the CPUC, in order to continue to 
serve its customers."
Commissioner Henry Duque, who voted against the measure, cleared exposed the 
move as gratuitous utility-bashing. "The obligation to serve is already in 
California law," he said. "I fear that the order would simply poison the 
atmosphere between government and the utilities, thereby making 
communications even more difficult in this time of crisis. In my view, it may 
even make a bankruptcy filing more likely."

will do.  sorry for the mix-up.

Thursday, usual time?

=09Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
=0902/05/2001 04:29 PM
=09=09=20

Assemblyman Dave Cogdill (R-Modesto) was joined earlier today by other
Republican legislators during a press conference announcing the introductio=
n
of ACR2x - a resolution encouraging the Governor to exercise his emergency
authority to solve the energy crisis. The main message of the news
conference was "It's the supply stupid."

Following are the legislators who attended:

Cogdill Dickerson, Pescetti, Strickland, Daucher, Wyman, Runner, Mountjoy,
La Suer, Maddox, Ashburn, Cox, Aanestad, Richmon, Leonard, Bob Pacheco)

The resolution specifically calls for Davis to:

=14 ?  Ease environmental regulations that have hampered electricity genera=
tion
=14 ?? Requests the Secretary of Resources, Energy Commission, the PUC and
others to explore their options to increase CA energy supply
=14 ?  Specifically mentions siting and permit issues for the Metcalf Plant=
 and
Huntington Beach

Attached is a copy of the press release and Cogdill statement.

Thanks,
Jean

--
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

 - Assy Cogdill Press Conference

We haven't been to the PUC about re-sourcing our customers.  Sue mentioned 
that this morning.  Good idea to get over there.  Mike's going to the PUC 
tomorrow to make the rounds.  

Is there legislation on DSM and expedited siting?  I haven't seen anything 
we've provided on DSM or expedited siting-related legislation.

	Sandra McCubbin
	02/05/2001 05:30 PM
		 
Loretta, in testimony at an unrelated hearing at the Assembly, trashed Enron 
for leaving the state.  Has anyone b riefed the CPUC?

Jeff SKilling will be in Silicon Valley for the next  few days...Rick asked 
that we prepare talking points for the legislative arena for the Silicon 
Valley.  We are working on talking points with the coalition on direct 
access, but we need info on demand side management, and expidited 
siting....have we already provided anything to him on these subjects?

Found 'em.  

My understanding is that PG&E is in active talks to cut a deal with 
legislators and the Governor, but I have no details.  Mona, does it make 
sense to have S. Govenor poke around is Sacramento to see what he can find 
out?

Roger Yang
09/18/2000 11:04 AM
Has anybody seen this article?  Do you have any intelligence about this?

Roger

	Enron Energy Services
	

Roger:

There is an article in WSJ today on "PG&E pushing to lift the retail rate 
freeze". I thought you ought to know.  

FYI,

Sanjay K. Agarwal

Hi.  Apologies.  Things have just been nuts.  I will get you that access code 
to EnronOnline just as soon as I can.  Hopefully today.  Hope all is well.

Best,
Jeff

	Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com>
	02/05/2001 07:17 PM
		 
This is something Colleen's brother told me about today.  We talk
periodically and we always end up talking about bluegrass.  He's playing the
fiddle.  He really wants us to go to this camp.  It's not bluegrass oriented
enough for me, but it is interesting.  Close to the dome too.

Cameron Sellers
Vice President, Business Development
PERFECT
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210
Palo Alto, CA 94303
cameron@perfect.com
650.798.3366 (direct dial)
650.269.3366 (cell)
650.858.1095 (fax)

This looks too cool - wish I could go this year.  Let me know if your little
combo goes - maybe we'll make it a family event next year.
Nice chatting with you today.
Kevin

BACK TO CAMP: IT'S A LARK!  by Irene D. Thomas "What's the difference
between a fiddle and a violin?" teased one of the little signs posted to a
tree every 50 yards or so. Whether put there to slow us down on this dusty
washboard of a dirt road or to keep first timers hopeful that they were on
the right road to music camp, we never were entirely sure. But being a
second timer to Lark camp, I had looked forward to the whacko riddles and
the answer coming up just around the bend: "You don't care if someone spills
beer on a fiddle!" 
"Lark in the Morning" music camp provides real and wannabe musicians a
week-long escape into the redwood forest near Mendocino for merry
music-making, and more. And then some. The camp's organizer and founder,
Mickie Zekley, and his wife Elizabeth affectionately call Lark a "musical
party with educational overtones." Actually, he explained to me later, it
began with just one clear focus: partying. When the party grew to be 100 or
more and outgrew his house, he rented the Mendocino Woodlands campground for
a weekend each year, sharing the cost and potluck meals with 250 of his best
friends. 
At first there was no plan or schedule, but then people began teaching each
other new instruments and new dances. And that's where the "educational
overtones" came in. Although Mickie and his friends' taste run to Celtic and
American folk music, (he is the proprietor of Lark in the Morning music shop
in Mendocino) the ethnic variety of musicians and instruments began running
wildly all over the map, much to the benefit of the 400 or so campers today.
In one week I, for one, would personally sample or take part in Bulgarian
singing, Greek dancing, Mariachi vocals, swing singing with a band, dumbek
drumming, Russian folksongs, Cajun dance, clogging, and "non-threatening
beginning guitar." For people like me, middle aged overachievers who never
took the time to go to camp or play an instrument---but whose inner child
was alive and well--- this was heaven. 
In fact, heaven is where I thought I had died and gone when I woke up that
first morning with the forest canopy light dappling my tent, the smell of
turkish coffee scenting the redwood-laced air, and celestial Andean harp
music wafting somewhere nearby like a glorious call to a musical beyond. The
only serious decision to be made in this makeshift heaven was whether to sip
coffee and nibble pastries at the Tunisian Cafe set up in this section of
"quiet camp" or to take the shuttle bus into main camp for a full breakfast
and lively conversation around the campfire. Newly dubbed the "not so quiet
camp" because the presence of the cafe encouraged late night, impromptu jams
of middle eastern drumming, fluting and even some belly dancing, this part
of camp still provided an oasis away from crowds when one wanted it. I found
it relaxing to be able to retreat here to my tent with a book and flashlight
after a full day of musical socializing. 
Many others though-more obsessed, even more greedy not to miss a
thing---carried camp on deep into the night, arriving at breakfast late with
silly grins and squinted eyes, like hangovers from their musical hightimes.
They might have gone to both dances the night before, maybe to Cajun dancing
at nine and then Contra dancing at 11, followed by a jam with their favorite
group or any group that might have formed itself after midnight in the
dining room or on one of the porches. For me, one dance per night was
enough, thank you. 
The exception was Balkan and Greek night, where the hypnotic, sensuous,
often frenetic strains of exotic, mideastern-tinged music grabbed my soul
and urged my feet to dance, no matter what. Gotta dance. The rhythm bounces,
jerks, syncopates. Step, cross, brush, lift, our leader modelled the steps
as we alternately circled or snaked through the dance hall, the music
picking up in pace and forcing us to do the same. Glowing with sweat myself,
I spied equally sweaty faces grinning wildly back at me, and others with
eyes closed in ecstacy. I wondered what scholars of dance have to say about
why this style of dance prevailed in so many cultures. Was it the communal
urge? A way to share the thrill of music as an act of cultural cohesion? Or
was it a primal form of safe, communal sex for the underaged and already
marrieds----the circular moving together to music that stirs and satisfies
and finally exhausts its partners? 
Whatever theory one prefers, hey, this joint is really jumping. Gradually,
reluctantly, the crowd disperses, flashlights bouncing in time to the music
left behind, humming on the way to tents or cabins or campers. Some teens
never seem to turn up at their parents campsites. One of the beauties of
this place is that no one worries. Repeat visitors seemed clear about
it-Lark camp is a safe place for kids. 
For those who could rise the next morning after a night like that, there
were lots more choices to be made after breakfast. Just outside the dining
hall you could see a knot of people pondering the list of offerings on the
chalkboard, a 6 by 10 timetable on which staff members had listed their
workshop offerings. (Mickie points out that there is no essential separation
between staff and campers, and I found that to be true.) Those who came with
one instrument and one style to master had the easier time of it. Devout
fiddlers went off to their Irish, or Greek, Cape Breton, gypsy, Yugoslav.
They had their plan and they stuck to it. We dilletantes, on the other hand,
could be driven crazy by the palette-which color should we dip our musical
brush into today? 
To keep my sanity, I committed a schedule to paper and more or less stayed
with it through the week. First thing after breakfast was non-threatening
beginning guitar. After guitar I was happy enough to sing and dance my way
around the musical map, ending each day with swing singing, led by Piper
Heisig of the San Francisco group "Cats and Jammers." There in the dining
room, punctuated with the arhythmic pot-banging of kitchen workers getting
dinner together, we crooned oldies like "Slow Boat to China" and tried to
put our own spin on "Satin Doll." Local friends Olaf Palm and Madge Strong
kept up the rhythm section. 
In between sessions I would move between locations to sample what I could
not squeeze into my own schedule. Like a spectator at a many-ringed musical
circus, I struggled to hold my focus on each happening. Moving from flamenco
guitars to klezmer might require a schizoid brain shift but one I was quite
willing to make. Inevitably I would linger at Slavko's Yugoslav session
outside the dining hall. Mostly string players, they would be unsmilingly
intent on the selection he had brought to work on-like last year's, a
haunting melange of Slavic folk and classical styles, this one slated for a
performance to benefit refugees from his homeland. Slavko was a Sarajevan.
He felt and played his music deeply, and there was always a crowd standing
nearby, eyes wet, seemingly stunned by the images his music aroused. 
One of my sweetest nonmusical memories of camp was meeting Slavko's mother
and wife in the dining hall. Overhearing them speaking what sounded like
Croatian, I introduced myself in Czech-my own ancestral language-and we had
fun comparing our common wordstock. Cynthia, his wife, was an American who
learned Serbo-Croation in order to communicate with her mother-in-law, whom
they had brought here a few years ago. After that, I noticed= them often
around camp, Mama leaning heavily on Cynthia's arm, Cynthia translating in
whispers what was being said or sung. Cynthia had confessed that first night
I met her that mama had left her country reluctantly. "Why didn't you leave
me there?" the elder had asked. Why indeed, I thought, even though I
understand well the gut-wrenching ties an old woman would feel watching her
world come to an end. All of this-the personal tragedy, the Slavic
melancholy, the love for mama was caught up on Slavko's face as he directed
his devoted little impromptu orchestra. 
Every moment is a learning experience at Lark. For example, one can deduce
from being there that the accordian is probably the most versatile
instrument of all. ("Play an accordian and go to camp!" reads one of Lark's
souvenir buttons.) Perhaps it qualifies for the most multicultural of
instruments as well, cutting across all ethnic lines from Cajun to Greek to
Argentine tango to French country to Slavic and around the world again. An
accordian also can turn out totally hot jazz, I found out, especially in
concert with jazz fiddle and bass. 
What else did I learn from camp? The dumbek is really fun for unleashing
timid drummers. Next year I will work it into my schedule. Maybe it will
take the place of clogging which I found was harder on the legs than tap
dancing. Food, I learned, though it plays second fiddle to the musical menu,
is a major component of Lark camp's pleasures, not only because having it
prepared for you gives you more time for music, but also because Lark food
is uniformly great. (Baked salmon and tondoori chicken and vegetable lasagna
were typical dinner fare.) And the setting-in amongst redwoods and firs,
lush meadows and small streams that feed the Big River-ties all the
pleasures together, sealing us off from the irrelevant busyness we were
retreating from. 
There's nothing quite like a week spent around people who don't talk about
their day jobs. Not once can I remember anyone asking me what I did out in
the real world. I liked that. We were there to make music, not to do P.R. or
plumbing repair or professorial chitchat. Wherever we came from, and
whatever tune we came to hum, we all sensed the shared humanity of our
tunes. We were exhilirated, focussed, and leveled to our highest common
denominator. Camp dust settled on us all equally. 
I also liked what the guitar teacher (the one with enough patience to teach
non threatening guitar) said when he talked about the place of music in his
life. "We live in a society," he said, "that relies on things outside of
ourselves for entertainment. Maybe we've forgotten how much fun it is to
entertain ourselves." If we've forgotten, maybe it's Lark Camp that will
remind us. 
p.s. Here is a sampling of this year's whacko camp riddles (they get better
every year). "What do you get when you play new age music backwards?"
answer: new age music. "How do you know when a bagpipe is out of tune?"
answer: when someone is blowing on it. "How do you know it's your lead
singer knocking at the door?" answer: he always loses the key and comes in
late. "What's the difference between an accordian and an uzi?" answer: an
uzi stops after 20 rounds. Why do bagpipers walk while playing?" answer:
It's harder to miss a moving target.

Kevin Silva
Vice President, Corporate Development
Silvaris Corporation
Tel: 206-328-0185
Email: kevins@silvaris.com
www.silvaris.com

415.782.7822.

Best,
Jeff

	Kimberly Parrish@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	02/05/2001 05:39 PM
		 
Jeff
I'm unable to find your telephone number and would like to speak with you 
regarding Sempra and Global Photon.
Please call or send me your number when you have a moment.
Thanks
Kimberly

Kimberly Parrish
Manager, Bandwidth Origination
Enron Broadband Services, Inc.
http://www.enron.net

(702) 562-9063 Office
(702) 682-2612 Cell

Hey darlin'.  Long time, no see.  How are ya?  What's the price per magnum?  
How many am I allowed to get?  And what are the dates for Mazatlan?  Hope to 
see you guys soon.

Best,
Jeff

I've heard nothing about any relief granted.  I will check and get back to 
you.

	Nancy Hetrick
	02/06/2001 06:55 AM
		 
Can we get some information on this as soon as possible.  We are getting 
calls from customers, etc., and we need the information in order to make the 
necessary decisions on billing.  Please include Diann Huddleson on any 
responses.  Thanks.
	
	

Do we have anything on this?  Thanks.

Diann Huddleson@EES
02/02/2001 04:42 PM
Nancy, do you know anything about  a Order from CA Governor on I6 rate 
relief?  If the customers are being granted some relief, I need to know so we 
can exempt these charges from the bills.

Thanks.
Diann, per Tom's request I have copied the SR  in an e-mail to you.  Let me 
know if you need additional information.

  SR Customer (Tim Ball) received  January invoice for delivered service 
11/20 -12/20 2000 with interruptible penalty charges. He wants know should he 
pay the full amount or deduct the penalty and pay for the delivered 
services?  This is according to his interpretation of the California 
governor's order on I6 rate relief
Len Pettis  CEM
Enron Energy Services
611 Anton Boulevard
Suite 700
Costa Mesa, CA 92626

Toll Free  800-522-1802 x 242
Voice      714-429-8166
Pager      877-452-1224
Pager e-mail 8774521224@skytel.com
e-mail          lpettis@enron.com

Mike, Jeanne:
Have you heard anything about any relief on penalties that the PUC might have 
recently granted interruptible customers?  (Recall that Loretta has refused 
to allow folks on interruptible to get off those contracts.)  Could you let 
me know as soon as you find something out?  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff
	Nancy Hetrick
	02/06/2001 06:55 AM
		 
Can we get some information on this as soon as possible.  We are getting 
calls from customers, etc., and we need the information in order to make the 
necessary decisions on billing.  Please include Diann Huddleson on any 
responses.  Thanks.
	
	

Do we have anything on this?  Thanks.

Diann Huddleson@EES
02/02/2001 04:42 PM
Nancy, do you know anything about  a Order from CA Governor on I6 rate 
relief?  If the customers are being granted some relief, I need to know so we 
can exempt these charges from the bills.

Thanks.
Diann, per Tom's request I have copied the SR  in an e-mail to you.  Let me 
know if you need additional information.

  SR Customer (Tim Ball) received  January invoice for delivered service 
11/20 -12/20 2000 with interruptible penalty charges. He wants know should he 
pay the full amount or deduct the penalty and pay for the delivered 
services?  This is according to his interpretation of the California 
governor's order on I6 rate relief
Len Pettis  CEM
Enron Energy Services
611 Anton Boulevard
Suite 700
Costa Mesa, CA 92626

Toll Free  800-522-1802 x 242
Voice      714-429-8166
Pager      877-452-1224
Pager e-mail 8774521224@skytel.com
e-mail          lpettis@enron.com

we can all use the tax break that bush wants to give us and give to NPR!

We should be able to pull it together.  Mike, I don't have any information 
about siting or DSM bills.  Could you please add some very brief bullets to 
your original ones (factual ones rather than advocacy ones) that describe 1) 
what siting reform bills are out there, what they say, what the chances are 
for passing, and what the timing for passage seems to be at this point, and 
2) same info for DSM.  Thanks a bunch.

Jeff

	Sandra McCubbin
	02/06/2001 10:15 AM
		
there is expedited siting legislation proposed on the republican side..am 
going to iep this am to work on more...as far as dsm I have been waiting for 
more information internally...possiblility that it may go into sher's 
bill...could you and Sue finalize the talking points from Mike for 
Skilling..I am back toback in meetings, and I am comfortable with what he has 
in there  thanks

	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	02/06/2001 11:28 AM
		 
On January 26, 2001, the Commission voted out an order which "suspends",
effective as of that date, all penalties that companies on interruptible
programs could incur as a result of failing to cut back on electricity when
called to do so by the UDC. By suspension, the commission means that the
appropriate portions of the tariffs are withdrawn.  As a result, the UDCs
will not bill customers for penalties nor track them for potential future
payment.    The order continues by stating that the UDC can continue to
notify customers of times when an interruptible curtailment would occur. The
Commission expects such customers to do so to the extent feasible.  But if
they don't, there will be no penalty.

The rationale behind the order was that customers on interruptible rate
schedules have been faced with an increasingly irreconcilable dilemma;
either curtail their electric service or pay large penalties, "either of
which cause increasingly deleterious effects on themselves and the
California economy."

If you have any quesitons about the order, give me a call. 

Jeanne

I'll put my suggested edits directly into the document and send to you for 
review.

Jeff

don't remind me.  i'll go ballistic.

	Susan J Mara
	02/06/2001 12:25 PM
		 
when Sandi said that Keeley was a nobody from Santa Cruz who was not a player

Gary Ackerman <foothi19@idt.net> on 08/25/2000 11:09:33 AM
Please respond to foothi19@idt.net
I have received several comments about the WSJ data request.

Enron's Tim Beldon wrote me that he would consider it.  The PX's Gene
Waas was concerned based on previous experiences of letting data go to
the WSJ.  I talked with Dynegy's Lynn Lednicky this morning and he
suggested that the PX has aggregated data for several days, and that
releasing the aggregate data with individual bid data from our members
would give the WSJ a better window into the issues.  That is, simply
releasing your bid data will not tell the WSJ anything of value.

I know that Rebecca would insist that the dates for which any data are
polled our at her choice, not ours.  It must be necessary to assure
there is no possibility of bias.  I am wondering if the PX would be
willing to assist us by putting together aggregate data for days which
the WSJ selects, and then give us the opportunity to release our
individual data for the same days?

I am also wondering if we shouldn't have an off-the-record
teleconference call with the WSJ whereby both sides can get a better
understanding of what the WSJ wants, and how we can best provide it.
Would anyone be interested in me setting up such a meeting for next
week, say Wednesday or Thursday?

gba

Immensely helpful.  Thanks so much.  That's all I'll need.  FYI.  My plane 
lands at 12:20 and I'll be going directly to the Woodlands.  Oh, one thing.  
If you could get info to Joseph on where the Woodlands is and where I need to 
go once I arrive there, I'd be eternally indebted.

Best,
Jeff

Ginger Dernehl@ENRON
09/18/2000 11:53 AM
I am in the process of putting something together right now.  It looks like 
the meeting will begin tomorrow at 1pm and continue through the evening (if 
necessary).  Rick has only made arrangements for the one day (Tuesday).  I do 
not have an agenda, but Rick and Jim have asked that a notebook be put 
together with information (e:mails, attachments, etc...) from way back when 
to the present.  Also, just FYI, I have made arrangements for a deli lunch to 
be provided in the room beginning at 12:30pm.  (detailed e:mail to follow)

I hope this helps and please call me if you have any questions.

gngr

Jeff Dasovich@EES
09/18/2000 11:18 AM
Hi:
Hope you had a nice weekend.  Sorry I missed you all in Washington.  Rick's 
asked me to attend the meeting at the Woodlands tomorrow.  Do we have a list 
of attendants/agenda?  No big deal, but would help me in preparing for the 
meeting.  I'm assuming that the meeting takes place tomorrow only?  I'm 
staying through Wednesday, nonetheless, and have booked a room at the 
Lancaster.  But if the meeting's going to continue through Wed, I was 
wondering if I should be staying at the Woodlands.  Thanks (as always) for 
you help.

Signed,
Clueless

you're welcome.

	Susan J Mara
	02/06/2001 12:28 PM
		 

Apologies. It's quick and dirty.

Jeff

Karen Denne has asked me to go along to the meetings tomorrow, which I've 
agreed to do, but wanted to run it by you two first.  Thoughts?

Best,
Jeff

Here are my (very minor) suggestions.  I understand that the plan is to have 
the letter come from Ken Lay.  Given the current tone and structure of the 
letter, might be more appropriate to come from Chris, as originally drafted, 
but I've modified so that it comes from Ken Lay. 

Best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/06/2001 01:54 PM
		
Here are my (very minor) suggestions.  I understand that the plan is to have 
the letter come from Ken Lay.  Given the current tone and structure of the 
letter, might be more appropriate to come from Chris, as originally drafted, 
but I've modified so that it comes from Ken Lay. 

Best,
Jeff

Be happy to talk tonite about how to pull this together.  Can't do it until 
8:30-9PM tonite, though.  That too late?  And, if that's not enough, I don't 
have conferencing capability from home.  Suggestions?

Best,
Jeff

	"Mark Guinney" <Mark_Guinney@watsonwyatt.com>
	02/06/2001 10:22 AM
		 
FYI-

Tasker has approved my assumptions for the cash flow statement so we are free 
to
answer the questions.

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax

____________________Forward Header_____________________
Mark - I apologize for the delay in responding.  I had to fly back East due
to a family illness and had problems accessing my email from there.  Your
assumptions are fine.  As to your previous email, I think the additional
B/S data on pp 9-47 and 9-48 gives you what you need for prior years.

Hope that helps - sorry again for the delay!

Sarah Tasker

At 06:45 PM 2/4/01 -0500, you wrote:
>Professor Tasker:
>
>I've constructed a pro forma cash flow statement for the next fiscal year for
>Home Depot.  I wanted to solicit your input to see if I'm making some
incorrect
>assumptions.  I've included my work in the attached spreadsheet
(applicable work
>is shaded in gray).  The assumptions that I'm questioning are as followed:
>
>Instead of estimating net income I calculated EBIT; I did this since interest
>expense is a variable that could change given financing needs undertaken
>Taxes paid are difficult to calculate; I used previous years taxes from the
>income statement and increase it by 30% (assumed growth rate); the tax
credits
>the company enjoyed from previous years are difficult to assume
>At a minimum, I assumed that the company would have to pay for PPE on the
order
>of last year's depreciation plus 30%; I would consider this maintanence of
>assets as opposed to purchase of new assets, construction, etc.
>I calculated an additional PPE expense for 9 new stores and subtracted out
the
>$28 million in "construction in progress" from the previous year's balance
sheet
>(I assumed that this line item was construction for the new 9 sites)
>
>These are my main adjustments that I wanted to get some validation either
way so
>my group doesn't base our strategy and answers on incorrect assumptions.
>
>
>
>**********************************************
>Mark D. Guinney, CFA
>Consultant
>Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
>345 California Street, Ste. 1400
>San Francisco, CA  94104
>(415) 733-4487 ph.
>(415) 733-4190 fax
>Attachment Converted: "c:\eudora\attach\HD.xls"
>

Just to add:  Evie represents (largely) the oil companies.  She represented 
that the suppliers that she represents are negotiating the terms of the 
agreement with PG&E. She finished by saying that she was fairly confident 
that those negotiations would result in the gas suppliers that she represents 
signing PG&E's agreement and supplying gas under those agreements. 

Best,
Jeff

	Susan J Mara
	02/06/2001 02:13 PM
		
Jeff and I heard in a conference call of many parties just now from the large 
oil co rep (Evie Elsesser) that:
 "There are several parties willing to sign PG&E's securitization agreement 
right now."

	Karen Denne
	02/06/2001 12:12 PM
		 
Statement regarding PG&E's securitization agreement:

Enron does not plan to sign PG&E's securitization agreement at this time for 
several reasons.  PG&E has included in the agreement an obligation by 
suppliers to negotiate in good faith to provide additional supplies.  This 
would potentially expand our exposure to PG&E, and there is no way to 
determine that exposure at this time.  PG&E is also asking us to suspend 
certain provisions in our existing agreements that allow us to terminate or 
suspend service in the event of a bankruptcy or failure to pay debts.  This 
limits our flexibility to deal with our different exposures to PG&E.  We are 
continuing to perform on our existing contracts with PG&E.

Thanks, Carolyn.  I can take a crack at the expansion questions, though 
someone else may want to also take a look at it, just to keep me honest.  
I'll try to distribute first thing in the AM tomorrow.

Best,
Jeff

	"Vavrek, Carolyn (US - San Francisco)" <cvavrek@deloitte.com>
	02/06/2001 02:01 PM
		 
I just spoke live with Mark about the case write-up.  Hope the following 
works for everyone.  
I will take a shot at comparing the following for questions (a) and (b): 
(1) Home Depot's strategy (low margin, high turnover, high service, best 
quality products) with their financial ratios. (2) Home Depot's strategy with 
Hechinger's (upscale stores with high profit margins) by comparing their 
financial ratios. 
(Understand that I have not had the benefit of attending the last two 
classes, but hope to watch them on video tape before I send out my answers.) 
Mark has already addressed question (c), we just need to make clear in the 
memo the assumptions he used.  Mark - perhaps you could write those up so we 
can drop them into the memo?
The other big issue is with Home Depot's expansion strategy - should they 
continue to build the 9 new stores, and if so, how should they finance the 
expansion?  They could use their line of credit or go to the equity market.  
Obviously with the line of credit we need to make sure that they can cover 
the interest expense and with the equity market we need to be careful of 
their depressed stock price.  Can someone else volunteer to look at the 
expansion efforts and financing (question d)?
I am going to work on this today and hope to e-mail it out by 9am tomorrow.  
Can we set a time on Wednesday to discuss this live?  
- Carolyn 

Carolyn M. Vavrek 
Manager - Human Capital Advisory Services 
Deloitte & Touche 
50 Fremont Street 
San Francisco, CA  94105 
phone: 415-783-5137 
fax: 415-783-8760 
e-mail: cvavrek@deloitte.com 

Jeff was kind enough to show me where to get the additional balance sheet 
items I needed to finish the financial ratio time sheet analysis (I missed 
the selected financial statement table).  Please see the revised spreadsheet 
that has both the financial ratios and the pro forma cash flow statement for 
the next fiscal year. 
  
********************************************** 
Mark D. Guinney, CFA 
Consultant 
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting 
345 California Street, Ste. 1400 
San Francisco, CA  94104 
(415) 733-4487 ph. 
(415) 733-4190 fax 

This message (including any attachments) contains confidential information 
intended for a specific individual and purpose, and is protected by law.  If 
you are not the intended recipient, you should delete this message and are 
hereby notified that any disclosure, copying, or distribution of this 
message, or the taking of any action based on it, is strictly prohibited.

	David Parquet@ECT
	02/06/2001 02:40 PM
		 
Long article...Mentions Calpine offering 1000 MW at slightly higher than 5.5 
cents/kwh.

	"Cole Frates" <cfrates@azurix.com>
	02/06/2001 12:24 PM
	Please respond to cfrates
		 
Tuesday, February 6, 2001 |  </cgi-bin/print.cgi> Print this story
</cgi-bin/print.cgi>

Davis Vows Plan for Edison, PG&E

 The governor says that by the end of the week he will have a strategy to
help the utilities avoid bankruptcy.

By DAN MORAIN and NANCY RIVERA BROOKS, Times Staff Writers

SACRAMENTO--Gov. Gray Davis said Monday he and legislative leaders would
have a plan by week's end to avert the bankruptcy of the state's two
biggest
utilities by trading ratepayer-backed bond money for utility assets.
"The drop-dead date is clearly Feb. 12," Davis said. That is when a federal
judge is set to hear a lawsuit by Southern California Edison, joined by
Pacific Gas & Electric, that could lead to sharp rate hikes for consumers
unless a rescue plan is in place.
Momentum has been building for a plan in which the state would get control
of the utility transmission lines in return for issuing bonds to give the
utilities a cash infusion.
But Senate President Pro Tem John Burton (D-San Francisco), who argues that
California should take control of the transmission grid, said he did not
share Davis' urgency to cut a deal this week.
The wrangling comes as the state faces the end early Wednesday of what
likely is the last federal emergency order requiring that independent power
generators sell electricity in California. The Bush administration insists
it will not extend the order.
"We're not even asking," Davis spokesman Steven Maviglio said.
Several such orders issued in the past two months have forced power
generators to keep electricity flowing to California, even though Edison
and
PG&E were unable to pay the skyrocketing wholesale costs of electricity.
But the federal emergency orders are less vital now that California has
relieved the utilities of having to buy power--at a cost to taxpayers of
roughly $45 million a day.
Davis, meanwhile, plans to announce today that California has entered into
its first long-term contracts to buy power from independent generators,
thereby beginning its shift away from the reliance on spot markets.
At least one firm, Calpine Corp., was on the verge late Monday of signing a
deal to provide the state with up to 1,000 megawatts for roughly 10 years.
One megawatt is enough to serve roughly 1,000 homes. The cost could not be
determined, but it is believed to be slightly above the 5.5 cents per
kilowatt-hour that Davis had hoped for.
"Clearly, we are no longer waiting for someone else to solve our problem or
do something to bail us out," Davis said at a Capitol news conference
Monday.
"We are doing everything within our power as a state to right this ship.
We're not waiting for someone to throw us a long pass. We're going to solve
it ourselves."
Davis said he will confer with Democratic and Republican legislative
leaders
this week to resolve the complex and controversial issue of providing "a
cash infusion to the utilities so they can be viable," in exchange for
utility assets.
The Democratic governor said he is not sure how the state will help the
financially hobbled companies. It may sell bonds, or guarantee bonds that
the utilities might sell.
Either way, the bonds would give the utilities cash to help them pay down
their debt, estimated at between $6 billion and $12 billion.
"It cannot be done without assistance from the state," Davis said.
Though Burton favors taking over the transmission grid, Davis supports
taking equity stakes in the companies themselves in the form of warrants,
similar to stock options. The warrants could be cashed in after the
utilities regain their stability and used to lower the cost of electricity
for consumers, or to soften future rate hikes.
"That state assistance, no matter what form it comes in, has a value,"
Davis
said. "It is my goal to make sure that whatever the state receives in
return
has comparable value."
Davis signed legislation last week allowing the state to sell an estimated
$10 billion worth of bonds to buy power in the future. The bonds would be
purchased by investors, who would be repaid over time by the ratepayers.
By selling bonds, the state in essence will be subsidizing consumers for
the
high prices of electricity in the first year or two. But consumers will pay
higher prices in later years when the cost of electricity is likely to drop
as more power plants are built.
In addition to selling bonds to pay for power in the future, Davis said,
the
state likely will sell bonds to help the utilities defray the past cost of
power.
State Treasurer Phil Angelides, who will oversee the bond process, said in
an interview that the state had little choice but to sell bonds for future
power purchases. But he said resolving the "past debts of the utilities" is
a tougher problem.
"There is no magic money here. Bonds require a repayment source," Angelides
said. "It needs to be a buyout versus a bailout."
The Democratic treasurer said that only after coming up with their own
reorganization plan should the utilities seek state assistance.
"At the end of the day, if there are some assets of value that we are
interested in as a buyer . . . that should be on the table."
Edison and PG&E have run up billions in debt in recent months as they paid
record high prices for wholesale power, yet were unable to pass on the full
cost of it to consumers.
On Monday, a federal judge in Los Angeles is scheduled to rule on Edison's
suit alleging that the California Public Utilities Commission must allow
the
utilities to pass on the multibillion-dollar cost of buying power.
Assemblyman Fred Keeley (D-Boulder Creek), among the lawmakers most
involved
in the Legislature's response to the energy crisis, said that if utilities
win the suit and are allowed to pass on the full cost of their power
purchases, consumers could be hit with an 86% rate increase.
"I don't think we can roll the dice and let that happen," said Keeley, who
along with Assembly Speaker Bob Hertzberg (D-Sherman Oaks) has been pushing
for an early settlement of the Edison lawsuit.
However, Burton, the Legislature's most influential member, shrugged off
the
Monday deadline.
"Trial courts rule. Appellate courts rule. Supreme Courts rule, and it's
three or four years down the road," Burton said.
In other developments Monday:
* Davis again used his emergency authority to claim $150 million worth of
contracts held by PG&E, shortly before they would have been taken by one of
the utility's creditors.
PG&E had defaulted on payments to the California Power Exchange, and the
entity, a sort of commodities market for electricity, wanted to auction off
the contracts. Davis took similar action with Edison contracts Friday.
The PG&E contracts will supply between 100 and 500 megawatts of electricity
for the remainder of 2001. The price of the power will be determined in
proceedings before the state Board of Control. But the state may find
itself
paying significantly more than the relative low prices specified in the
contracts.
* Edison revealed that one of its bank accounts was seized last month by a
creditor, General ReFinancial Products Corp., which contends it is owed
$8.8
million for early termination of a financial arrangement during the
utility's debt crisis.
Edison said in a filing with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
that it has asked the federal court that gave the creditor permission to
attach the account to reverse course and stop the action. The account, with
a New York bank, contains $1.5 million, Edison said.
Edison noted in the same filing that it had $1.36 billion in cash on
Monday,
but has defaulted on several million dollars' worth of debt payments and
has
"deferred" payments totaling $743 million through Monday to electricity
suppliers.
If the Rosemead utility had made all of its debt and electricity payments
as
they came due, it would have run out of cash last Friday, Edison said. In
contrast, its parent company, Edison International is paying all of its
bills.
* Shares of Edison International rose 22 cents to close at $13.23 per share
Monday and PG&E Corp. fell 14 cents to close at $13.60 per share. Both
trade
on the New York Stock Exchange.
Standard & Poor's, a large credit rating agency, reaffirmed that
California's strong rating remains on its "Credit Watch Negative" list
following Thursday's passage by the Legislature of a bill giving the state
Department of Water Resources $500 million more to buy electricity for the
state.
California's general obligation bonds carry a rating of double-A.
* S&P also downgraded to "D"--or junk-bond level--the "issuer credit
rating"
of the California Independent System Operator, reflecting the fact that the
utilities are no longer paying their electricity bills.
The downgrade does not affect any operating funds of Cal-ISO, which are
generated by transmission fees, and does not include debt issued by the
state for Cal-ISO, which retains "insured triple-A" and "A-1 plus" ratings.

(See attached file: Picture)
(See attached file: Picture)
(See attached file: Picture)
(See attached file: Picture)
(See attached file: Picture)
 - Picture
 - Picture
 - Picture
 - Picture
 - Picture

I'd be honored.

	Janel Guerrero
	02/06/2001 03:43 PM
		 
Hi.  Will you add me to your CA distribution list for emails etc ?  thanks

Rick called and asked me to sit in on a meeting on enegy issues that he's 
having tomorrow in Houston.  Wants me to bring to the table information on 
gas issues, particularly in light of the SoCalGas settlement here in 
California.  I'll be leaving at the crack of dawn tomorrow monring and will 
be in Houston on Tuesday/Wednesday and back in the office on Thursday.

No comments.  Chris, I'll have the summary to you shortly.

Jeff

	Susan J Mara
	02/06/2001 06:12 PM
		 
Here is a link to the governor's press release.  He is billing it as 5,000 MW 
of contracts, but then he says that there is only 500 available immediately.  
WIth the remainder available from 3 to 10 years.

http://www.governor.ca.gov/state/govsite/gov_htmldisplay.jsp?BV_SessionID=@@@@
1673762879.0981503886@@@@&BV_EngineID=falkdgkgfmhbemfcfkmchcng.0&sCatTitle=Pre
ss+Release&sFilePath=/govsite/press_release/2001_02/20010206_PR01049_longtermc
ontracts.html&sTitle=GOVERNOR+DAVIS+ANNOUNCES+LONG+TERM+POWER+SUPPLY&iOID=1325
0

	Christopher F Calger@ECT
	02/06/2001 06:38 PM
		 
I made one adjustment - Pastoria offer is $58.80.

Hi Rosalee:
Attached is a summary of the proposal that ENA filed today in response to the 
RFP for power and gas issued by California's DWR.  Also attached is a copy of 
the complete proposal.  Steve Kean asked that I forward it along to you.  
Could you please print out a copy and forward it along to Ken Lay prior to 
his departure for Washington D.C.?  Thanks very much.

All the best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/06/2001 07:15 PM
		 
Hi Rosalee:
Attached is a summary of the proposal that ENA filed today in response to the 
RFP for power and gas issued by California's DWR.  Also attached is a copy of 
the complete proposal.  Steve Kean asked that I forward it along to you.  
Could you please print out a copy and forward it along to Ken Lay prior to 
his departure for Washington D.C.?  Thanks very much.

All the best,
Jeff

Told him the proposal is on his fax machine.  He thanked me and said he'd get 
back to us. He was in a meeting.  That was the sum total of the call.  Thanks 
for all your help.  Real cat-herding exercise.

Best,
Jeff

	Alan Comnes@ECT
	02/06/2001 09:30 PM
		
Good morning !

Judge Orders Supplier To Continue Selling Power To Calif
  
02/06/2001 
Dow Jones Energy Service 
(Copyright (c) 2001, Dow Jones & Company, Inc.) 

SACRAMENTO, Calif. (AP)--A U.S. judge Tuesday temporarily ordered an 
electricity supplier to continue selling power to the state, effectively 
extending an emergency federal directive. Two other suppliers agreed they 
would continue sales as well. 

U.S. District Judge Frank Damrell, citing the possibility of "obvious 
irreparable harm to the public," said Tuesday his temporary order requires 
Reliant Energy Services Inc. to continue sales at least until a further 
hearing on Wednesday.

Wholesalers AES Pacific Inc. and Dynegy Power Corp., not covered under the 
temporary injunction, said they would continue sales until that hearing as 
well. 

The suppliers provide enough electricity to serve 4 million homes. 
Electricity grid officials said losing that source could have produced 
rolling blackouts like the ones that hit the state twice last month. 

The Independent System Operator, which maintains the state's power grid, 
sought the restraining order on an emergency basis as the federal directive 
neared its midnight PST Tuesday expiration. 

President Bush had said his administration would not renew the orders, which 
were first issued by the Clinton administration and were extended by Spencer 
Abraham, Bush's energy secretary. 

Reliant filed a lawsuit against the system operator last week after receiving 
a letter it sent to 140 power generators asking them to agree to continue 
selling power after the expiration. The Houston-based company said it should 
not have to bear the cost of California's energy crisis. 

Reliant representatives did not immediately return calls for comment Tuesday.

 

  
Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 

Thanks TJ.  Unfortunately, I presumed that I wouldn't get in, so didn't 
attend.  No problem, though, since the two classes that I did get into are 
great.  Thanks again.

Best,
Jeff

Hi folks:

Since we have only one page, the write up for number 4 will have to be very=
=20
brief.  Before writing it, though, I wanted to offer a few bullets regardin=
g=20
what angle we might take, and let folks respond, comment, counter, etc.=20
before writing it up.  I'll clean and beef up once we've agreed to the=20
approach we'd like to take to question #4.  Finally, I can work from my=20
office on this this evening, which means that I can use the conference call=
=20
capability of my office phone to patch everyone in if we'd like to do a=20
conference call. If that's what folks would like to do, I'd prefer to do th=
e=20
call at around 7 PM.  Just let me know. =20

Best,
Jeff

The question for #4 is:

Stock price is down 23%, significant debt has already been tapped to suppor=
t=20
massive growth and covenants on that debt restrict taking on a lot more=20
debt. =20

What should HD do w.r.t. current operations and future growth strategy?
 In the near term focus less on growth and more on getting margins and EBIT=
=20
growth back in line with results from previous years.  (Management=01,s Let=
ter=20
to Shareholders alludes to this, but it=01,s difficult to determine whether=
=20
management is just paying lip service to the need to capitalize on the grow=
th=20
spurt and grown earnings, or continue on the growth effort.)

 With respect to funding future (more moderate growth), the company does ha=
ve=20
some room to increase long-term debt (e.g., current ratio for 1986 =3D 2.26=
). =20
It seems that HD would get better terms and have increased flexibility by=
=20
issuing additional debt rather than relying on lines of credit.  As such, H=
D=20
ought to look those sources of funding and fill in any =01&funding gaps=018=
 with=20
funds from the line of credit.

 Given the significant drop in stock price, HD is likely better off in the=
=20
near term 1) moderating growth, 2) improving performance to generate cash=
=20
internally, and 3) using long-term debt issuance to provide the funds=20
needed.  Once performance and stock price improves, then HD should consider=
 a=20
stock issuance.

How can company improve operating performance?
Reduce selling, store operating expenses and pre-opening expenses
Improve receivables turnover
Improve inventory turnover
Improve per store/sales
Consider closing poor-performing stores
All of which will improve margins
=20
Should company change its strategy?  If so how?
Shift from meteoric growth to moderate, targeted growth, and focus on=20
generating positive cash flow from operations
Focus on improving performance at existing stores; specifically focus on=20
controlling costs and asset turnover and productivity
Consider another debt issuance rather than rely extensively on credit line =
in=20
order to decrease cost of funds and increase flexibility

Agreed 100%--call me an engineer.

Kimberly Kupiecki <kkupiecki@arpartners.com> on 09/18/2000 11:41:52 AM
Hi Jeff,

I think we got the jist, even if the numbers aren't perfect - guess I am
still and engineer, estimations work well for me.

At 08:44 AM 9/18/00, jdasovic@enron.com wrote:

>No, I don't think I'd make a better accountant.  But I did ask a few
>questions of my accountant brother-in-law.  You did a great job.  I don't
>know how much time I'll have, but I'll see if I can throw in a bit of text
>and raise the issues.  See you tonite.
>
>
>
>
>Kimberly Kupiecki <kkupiecki@arpartners.com> on 09/18/2000 09:53:30 AM
>
Kimberly Kupiecki
Senior Account Executive
A&R Partners
kkupiecki@arpartners.com
(650) 762 2800 main
(650) 762 2825 direct
fax (650) 762 2801

Here is the gas settlement from California that we discussed on the 
conference call yesterday.

Best,
Jeff
	MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	02/07/2001 12:14 PM
		 
 <<APRILB~1.DOC>>

Here is the summary of the GIR settlement

 <<LD2D-#~2.DOC>>
Here is the settlement, and below are the attachments

 <<PRIMAR~1.DOC>>  <<LD2D-#~2.XLS>>  <<LD2D-#~5.DOC>>  <<LD2D-#~1.XLS>>
<<LD2D-#~4.DOC>>  <<LD2D-#~3.DOC>>

 - APRILB~1.DOC
 - LD2D-#~2.DOC
 - PRIMAR~1.DOC
 - LD2D-#~2.XLS
 - LD2D-#~5.DOC
 - LD2D-#~1.XLS
 - LD2D-#~4.DOC
 - LD2D-#~3.DOC

Ok, we're on for 7 pm. i've got carolyn's and Mark's #s please pass along 
others and i'll originate the call from here.
mark, all of your points are good one's, less discuss them on teh call.
best,
jeff

	"Vavrek, Carolyn (US - San Francisco)" <cvavrek@deloitte.com>
	02/07/2001 12:25 PM
		 
I like your ideas - much better developed than in the draft memo.  I'm free 
at 7pm.  My home number is 285-7385.  Just patch me in.
- cv 
Carolyn M. Vavrek 
Manager - Human Capital Advisory Services 
Deloitte & Touche 
50 Fremont Street 
San Francisco, CA  94105 
phone: 415-783-5137 
fax: 415-783-8760 
e-mail: cvavrek@deloitte.com 

Hi folks: 
Since we have only one page, the write up for number 4 will have to be very 
brief.  Before writing it, though, I wanted to offer a few bullets 
regarding what angle we might take, and let folks respond, comment, 
counter, etc. before writing it up.  I'll clean and beef up once we've 
agreed to the approach we'd like to take to question #4.  Finally, I can 
work from my office on this this evening, which means that I can use the 
conference call capability of my office phone to patch everyone in if we'd 
like to do a conference call. If that's what folks would like to do, I'd 
prefer to do the call at around 7 PM.  Just let me know. 
Best, 
Jeff 
The question for #4 is: 
Stock price is down 23%, significant debt has already been tapped to 
support massive growth and covenants on that debt restrict taking on a lot 
more debt. 
What should HD do w.r.t. current operations and future growth strategy? 
     In the near term focus less on growth and more on getting margins and 
EBIT growth back in line with results from previous years.  (Management's 
Letter to Shareholders alludes to this, but it's difficult to determine 
whether management is just paying lip service to the need to capitalize on 
the growth spurt and grown earnings, or continue on the growth effort.) 
     With respect to funding future (more moderate growth), the company 
does have some room to increase long-term debt (e.g., current ratio for 
1986 = 2.26).  It seems that HD would get better terms and have increased 
flexibility by issuing additional debt rather than relying on lines of 
credit.  As such, HD ought to look those sources of funding and fill in any 
"funding gaps" with funds from the line of credit. 
     Given the significant drop in stock price, HD is likely better off in 
the near term 1) moderating growth, 2) improving performance to generate 
cash internally, and 3) using long-term debt issuance to provide the funds 
needed.  Once performance and stock price improves, then HD should consider 
a stock issuance. 
How can company improve operating performance? 
   Reduce selling, store operating expenses and pre-opening expenses 
   Improve receivables turnover 
   Improve inventory turnover 
   Improve per store/sales 
   Consider closing poor-performing stores 
   All of which will improve margins 
Should company change its strategy?  If so how? 
   Shift from meteoric growth to moderate, targeted growth, and focus on 
   generating positive cash flow from operations 
   Focus on improving performance at existing stores; specifically focus on 
   controlling costs and asset turnover and productivity 
   Consider another debt issuance rather than rely extensively on credit 
   line in order to decrease cost of funds and increase flexibility 

This message (including any attachments) contains confidential information 
intended for a specific individual and purpose, and is protected by law.  If 
you are not the intended recipient, you should delete this message and are 
hereby notified that any disclosure, copying, or distribution of this 
message, or the taking of any action based on it, is strictly prohibited.

u see my previous note?  sorry, i've been out of the office all day and just 
got in.

Just wanted to send a note to say that I'm very sorry that I couldn't make it 
to the meeting, miss catching up with folks, and hope that all's going well.  
Hope to see you very soon.

Best,
Jeff

check it out.  see george w. and al rap.  very funny, indeed.
	Ryan Deane@ECT
	02/07/2001 07:01 PM
		 
www.jibjab.com

Go to the 'archives'...

whaddya mean?  you mean software?

	Ryan Deane@ECT
	02/07/2001 07:01 PM
		 
www.jibjab.com

Go to the 'archives'...

	James D Steffes
	02/07/2001 08:14 PM
		 
	Richard Shapiro
	02/07/2001 08:50 AM
		 
Ray Alvarez@TRANSREDES
02/07/2001 07:42 AM
Rick, thought you might enjoy this alternative theory on the root cause of 
Cal's problem.  Ray

Steve Hopper
02/07/2001 08:47 AM

Feb. 2, 2001, 8:06PM

The rest of us should tell California to go fly a kite 

By DAVE BARRY  

When we consider the serious electricity shortage in California, our  
reaction, as concerned Americans, is: Ha ha!  

No, seriously, we are alarmed. Because history teaches us that whatever  
happens to California -- smog, road rage, tofu, coffee that is mainly air, 
cell  phones, the belief that abdominal muscles are attractive, Shirley 
MacLaine,  people taking in-line skating seriously, grandmothers sporting new 
and  flagrantly inappropriate bosoms -- eventually happens to the rest of the 
nation.  Thus it is vital that we analyze the California electricity shortage 
and see if  we can develop a workable solution before we become bored and 
change the  subject.  

Our first question is: What, exactly, is electricity? When we look in our  
Microsoft Encarta encyclopedia, we see that "electricity" is defined  as a 
"class of physical phenomena resulting from the existence of charge  and from 
the interaction of charges." What does this mean, in lay-person's  terms?  

It means that whoever wrote the Microsoft Encarta encyclopedia is a big, fat  
dope. Because we know from our junior-high-school science training that  
electricity is actually a fast-moving herd of electrons, which are tiny  
one-celled animals that can survive in almost any environment except inside 
a  double-A battery, where they die within minutes.  

Electrons are formed when clouds rub together and become excited. This was  
proved in the famous experiment wherein Benjamin Franklin flew a kite during 
a  thunderstorm and was almost killed. Encouraged by this success, Franklin 
went on  to conduct many more electrical experiments, including rolling a 
hoop in a  thunderstorm, playing hopscotch in a thunderstorm and doing 
somersaults in a  thunderstorm.  

Finally one night he was caught wearing only a bonnet and playing Mister  
Pooter Rides the Pony in a thunderstorm, leaving the authorities with no 
choice  but to arrest him and make him ambassador to France.  Nevertheless, 
Franklin had proved an important scientific point, which is  that electricity 
originates inside clouds. There it forms into lightning, which  is attracted 
to the earth by golfers.  

After entering the ground, the electricity hardens into coal, which, when 
dug  up by power companies and burned in big ovens called "generators,"  
turns back into electricity, which is sent in the form of "volts"  (also 
known as "watts," or "rpm" for short) through special  wires with birds 
sitting on them to consumers' homes, where it is transformed by  TV sets into 
commercials for beer, which passes through the consumers and back  into the 
ground, thus completing what is known as a "circuit."  

But enough technical talk. The problem is that California is running out of  
electricity. The situation is so bad that in some hospitals, they don't have  
enough electricity to power those electric-shock paddles that get people's  
hearts started again; instead, the doctors and nurses have to hold hands, 
scuff  their feet across the carpet in unison, then shout "CLEAR!" as they  
touch the patient's chest.  

Who is responsible for California's electricity shortage? You could blame 
the  power companies; or you could blame environmental wackos; or you could 
blame the  entertainment industry, which uses more than 750 billion watts of 
electricity  per day just to blow-dry the hair of the cast of Dawson's Creek; 
or you  could blame (why not?) the Firestone tire company. But you would be 
wrong.  Because obviously the real cause of the California electricity 
shortage is:  college students.  

I base this statement on widespread observation of my son, who is a college  
student, and who personally consumes more electricity than Belgium. If my son 
is  in a room, then every electrical device within 200 yards of that room -- 
every  light, computer, television, stereo, video game, microwave oven, etc. 
-- will be  running. My son doesn't even have to turn the devices on; they 
activate  themselves spontaneously in response to his presence.  

Now take my son and multiply him by the number of college students in  
California, which according to my research is (EDITOR: Please insert number 
of  college students in California) and you see my point, which is (EDITOR: 
Please  insert my point).  

The question is: What can the rest of us do to help our fellow 
countrypersons  in California? The answer is that we can send them our spare 
electricity. Just  imagine what would happen if all the households in this 
great and generous  nation got out their extension cords and connected them 
together, forming a  giant electrical "chain of helping" across the fruited 
plain to the  Golden State! Millions of people would be turned into generous 
smoking lumps of  carbon, that's what. So maybe we should go with Plan B. 
This involves building a  really, really, really big kite.  

Knight-Ridder Tribune  

	Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
	02/07/2001 07:45 PM
		 
Greetings...Senator Sher and his bipartisan Senate Coalition held a press
conference endorsing SB28X, the powerplant streamlining bill.

Jan was available to respond to press on behalf of IEP following the press
conference -- commending the legislature for their efforts in promoting the
streamlining of siting power plants.

IEP will be suggesting amendments to this bill.

Thanks,
Jean

--
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

____________________________________________
SENATOR BYRON SHER
11th District

BIPARTISAN SENATE COALITION

ENDORSES POWERPLANT STREAMLINING BILL

Contact: Kip Lipper
916/445-6747

A bipartisan group of key senators announced their support today for
legislation to speed up powerplant siting without compromising environmental
protections. The legislation, SB 28X, jointly authored by Senators Byron
Sher (D-Stanford), Debra Bowen (D-Marina Del Rey), and Jim Battin (R-La
Quinta), is an important element of the Senate's comprehensive proposals
designed to help address the state's ongoing energy crisis.

"This measure is an important and urgent step forward in our efforts to
increase electricity supply in the state without sacrificing public health
and environmental protections," Sher said. "I'm pleased that our colleagues
from the other side of the aisle have agreed to work together in a
bipartisan effort to ensure that California's energy needs can be met
quickly and efficiently."

SB 28X enacts into law a series of changes designed to streamline siting of
new generation while ensuring full compliance with key environmental laws
and regulations (see attached summary).

The bill will be heard in the Senate early next week.

#     #     #

SB 28x, as proposed to be amended:

1. Establishes expedited siting process for so-called "repowers" of existing
powerplants to generate new emissions offsets and to meet state energy
demand.

2. Establishes expedited siting process for single-cycle peaker power plants
which can be brought on line quickly to meet state energy demand.

3. Allows powerplant approval process to begin while air emission offsets
are being obtained for powerplants needed to meet state energy demand.

4. Eliminate standby charges for distributed generation needed to meet state
energy demand.

5. Requires State to backfill 100% of property tax to local jurisdictions
that site new generating facilities sited to meet state energy demand.

6. Establishes an expedited process for retrofitting existing generation
facilities to
generate new offsets so that these facilities may run more frequently
without
violating air quality laws.

7. Establishes new process allowing air districts to postpone offset
requirements on powerplants provided the owners/operators of the plants post
funding to mitigate air emissions and agree to obtain emissions by the
earliest feasibledate.

8. Directs the state Air Resources Board to develop a statewide Air
Pollution Offset Bank and make information on the offsets available to
powerplant developers and other interested parties.

9.Requires air districts to establish expedited permit processes for the
permitting of standby electrical generation facilities and distributed
generation facilities.

10.Requires local agencies to provide initial written comments on proposed
powerplants within 45 days after filing of a siting application and final
comments within 90 days (current law sets no statutory deadline for such
comments).

11. Requires the CEC to take into account positive environmental, economic,
and system reliability benefits of new powerplants.

12.Provides that the State Supreme Court shall be the court of original
jurisdiction for legal challenges to CEC.

13.Requires the CEC to adopt by regulation an ex parte rule which provides
greater flexibility for communication among the public and parties to siting
proceedings provided such communications are disclosed on the record.

 - Sher/Senate Press Conference 

	Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
	02/07/2001 07:45 PM
		 
Greetings...Senator Sher and his bipartisan Senate Coalition held a press
conference endorsing SB28X, the powerplant streamlining bill.

Jan was available to respond to press on behalf of IEP following the press
conference -- commending the legislature for their efforts in promoting the
streamlining of siting power plants.

IEP will be suggesting amendments to this bill.

Thanks,
Jean

--
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

____________________________________________
SENATOR BYRON SHER
11th District

BIPARTISAN SENATE COALITION

ENDORSES POWERPLANT STREAMLINING BILL

Contact: Kip Lipper
916/445-6747

A bipartisan group of key senators announced their support today for
legislation to speed up powerplant siting without compromising environmental
protections. The legislation, SB 28X, jointly authored by Senators Byron
Sher (D-Stanford), Debra Bowen (D-Marina Del Rey), and Jim Battin (R-La
Quinta), is an important element of the Senate's comprehensive proposals
designed to help address the state's ongoing energy crisis.

"This measure is an important and urgent step forward in our efforts to
increase electricity supply in the state without sacrificing public health
and environmental protections," Sher said. "I'm pleased that our colleagues
from the other side of the aisle have agreed to work together in a
bipartisan effort to ensure that California's energy needs can be met
quickly and efficiently."

SB 28X enacts into law a series of changes designed to streamline siting of
new generation while ensuring full compliance with key environmental laws
and regulations (see attached summary).

The bill will be heard in the Senate early next week.

#     #     #

SB 28x, as proposed to be amended:

1. Establishes expedited siting process for so-called "repowers" of existing
powerplants to generate new emissions offsets and to meet state energy
demand.

2. Establishes expedited siting process for single-cycle peaker power plants
which can be brought on line quickly to meet state energy demand.

3. Allows powerplant approval process to begin while air emission offsets
are being obtained for powerplants needed to meet state energy demand.

4. Eliminate standby charges for distributed generation needed to meet state
energy demand.

5. Requires State to backfill 100% of property tax to local jurisdictions
that site new generating facilities sited to meet state energy demand.

6. Establishes an expedited process for retrofitting existing generation
facilities to
generate new offsets so that these facilities may run more frequently
without
violating air quality laws.

7. Establishes new process allowing air districts to postpone offset
requirements on powerplants provided the owners/operators of the plants post
funding to mitigate air emissions and agree to obtain emissions by the
earliest feasibledate.

8. Directs the state Air Resources Board to develop a statewide Air
Pollution Offset Bank and make information on the offsets available to
powerplant developers and other interested parties.

9.Requires air districts to establish expedited permit processes for the
permitting of standby electrical generation facilities and distributed
generation facilities.

10.Requires local agencies to provide initial written comments on proposed
powerplants within 45 days after filing of a siting application and final
comments within 90 days (current law sets no statutory deadline for such
comments).

11. Requires the CEC to take into account positive environmental, economic,
and system reliability benefits of new powerplants.

12.Provides that the State Supreme Court shall be the court of original
jurisdiction for legal challenges to CEC.

13.Requires the CEC to adopt by regulation an ex parte rule which provides
greater flexibility for communication among the public and parties to siting
proceedings provided such communications are disclosed on the record.

 - Sher/Senate Press Conference 

Our signature should not be on the letter.  I'll check and see.  I didn't 
hear back from anyone but you.

James D Steffes
09/16/2000 07:51 PM
What ended up happening?

Jim

Jeff Dasovich
09/13/2000 12:48 PM
FYI.  Please take a look.  I would not be inclined to sign the letter.  
Thoughts?

Best,
Jeff
Folks-
At today's meeting, those Group members who attended agreed that we should
indeed send the letter with changes reflecting the new legislation. Attached
is the newest draft of such a letter. We need to send this letter out FRIDAY
so in order to do that please look over the letter carefully and let me know
if your organization wishes to be included as a signatory. I need every set
of eyes out there to look this letter over for spelling, grammar and
content -- my eyes have seen it too many times and are apt to miss things.
So, here is the process ---

Let me know of any minor changes ASAP. If there are content changes please
email them to the ENTIRE group for sign off. Please understand that we want
to send this FRIDAY so we do not have a lot of time to make changes. When I
have a final draft I will ask people to fax signatures or send originals to
me by Friday.Thank you all for your help with this letter. We could not have
done it with out you.

We will be scheduling our next general meeting for mid October. Also, we
have finalized the dates for the Annual Retreat and will be sending out
packets with all the details next week. DJ and I are working on the agenda
so if you have a specific topic you would like covered please let us know.
As always, please send me an email or give me a call if you have any
concerns or questions about the letter or any other matter.

Thanks,
Delaney

 - ltr to governor -- options list.doc

Gang:
Quick question.  Does the lease-buy-back free up $50M of funds for 1987?  
Mark, is that captured in the 1987 cash flows?  Don't think that should 
change our recommendation, but ran across it in the case and was wondering if 
we captured it.

Best,
Jeff

	Susan J Mara
	02/08/2001 12:47 AM
		 
Good story on retail -- as a direct result of ARM's hiring of Edelman.  Some 
good Lay and Robert Michaels' quotes.
	"Counihan, Rick" <rick.counihan@greenmountain.com>
	02/07/2001 01:09 PM
		 
This story is fantastic!!  It is the best single piece I have seen on the
retail market in California and it is in the newspaper of record.  I think
we should make copies and hand them out in our press packets and all
meetings we have.  I think this is a concrete example of a payoff from
working with Edelman.

http://www.latimes.com/business/reports/power/lat_retail010207.htm

This piece ran front page of this morning's LA Times. It refers to provision
of AB1X we are concerned about. Also, Enron gets a lot of attention. I will
have this forwarded to the entire team later this morning. Thanks. 

Stevan

PS - Bryson is having a news conference this morning in Sac. Will keep you
posted.

Deregulation Didn't Foster Competition 

By NICHOLAS RICCARDI and STEVE BERRY, Times Staff Writers 

The way people scrambled for a stake in California's power market three
years ago, you'd have thought it was the second coming of the Gold Rush.
Politicians and free marketers boasted that they were freeing millions of
customers from their monopolistic utilities so they could shop for cheaper
electricity. The state ordered an $87-million publicity campaign, promising
a brave new energy world bustling with competition.
But those dreams of capitalism unleashed never materialized, dashed by
provisions in the 1996 deregulation law that effectively undermined
competition and gave the utilities a substantial edge over newcomers. In the
end, only 1.7% of the utilities' residential users switched to other
providers, many opting to pay more for "green" energy.
Although the chaos swirling around California's electricity crisis has
chiefly focused on soaring wholesale prices, the virtual absence of
competition at the consumer level has played a key role in deregulation's
undoing.
Had competition among retailers flourished, garnering the millions of
customers deregulators expected, prices might never have reached today's
unprecedented peaks and the turmoil might have been tempered, economists and
retailers say. 
Retail competition "would not have prevented a crisis, but it would have
toned it down," said Richard Counihan, spokesman for Green Mountain Energy,
which has returned most of its 50,000 customers to the utilities' ranks.
Now even the prospect of competition is gone. A measure enacted by the
Legislature last week, which made state government the biggest electricity
buyer in California, suspended further retail competition, preventing anyone
from underbidding the state.
"That buries us," said Tony Wayne, president of UtiliSource of Brea, which,
under the new law, can keep its relatively small number of customers but is
barred from entering into new contracts.
Few thought it would come to this.

High Hopes Collide With Reality
Almost 300 firms registered with the state to sell electricity to consumers.
Many of them, quick-buck hucksters or small-time operations, were scared off
by background checks, fingerprinting and the $25,000 deposit required to
enter the market.
But then there were the likes of giant Enron Corp., which predicted that the
new market would pull 700,000 customers from the utilities in the first few
weeks. Another firm deployed 400 salespeople, nabbing residential and
business prospects by the thousands.
They quickly discovered that the structure of California's landmark
deregulation effort erected protective barriers preventing most retailers
from beating the prices of the big three utilities--Southern California
Edison, Pacific Gas & Electric and San Diego Gas & Electric.
For example, deregulation law allowed the utilities to keep their 9 million
customers until each took the initiative to switch. Any ratepayer who used a
moderate amount of energy and wanted to change companies had to pay $600 for
a new meter--unless the retailer wanted to eat the cost itself.
In contrast, Pennsylvania, where deregulation has been more successful than
in California, requires most of its utilities to surrender some of their
customers. Last year, 300,000 customers of one utility were auctioned off to
the retailer who could promise them the most savings. All together, close to
1 million customers have switched from utilities to retailers, with savings
estimates ranging from a few dollars to $15 per month.
In California, the next barrier was expressly designed by deregulation
architects to keep new retailers at bay, at least temporarily.
Before throwing utilities into a free-for-all, lawmakers felt obligated to
give them time to pay off debts that would hurt their ability to offer
competitive prices. The Legislature froze customer prices at 1996 levels,
well above what the utilities were then paying for electricity. The
difference would be used to pay their debts.
The hitch for prospective retailers was that their customers--like those
remaining with utilities--would be charged the extra amount too. That
seriously hurt the retailers' ability to shave prices for their customers
without taking a hit themselves.
Utility executives say the so-called competition transition charge
accomplished its intent: providing some protection against new players until
the utilities could shed their debt and compete on an even field.
According to those executives, the plan went awry when wholesale electricity
prices soared before the special debt charge was lifted and competition had
a chance to flourish.
"We haven't had enough time for this market to work," said Denise Grant,
director of the Edison division that works with retailers. She said Edison
expected to lose 150,000 customers annually--a far cry from what has
happened.
Retailers say they faced other obstacles that seemed designed to help the
utilities keep as many of their customers as possible.
One of the biggest was a newly created energy marketplace called the Power
Exchange.
Under the exchange's rules, all buyers--little guys with a few hundred
customers and mammoth utilities with millions--paid the same price for
electricity. Once again, retailers were stymied in their search for ways to
cut their customers' bills.
Retailers had no place else to shop for energy because suppliers could make
more money selling in high volume to billion-dollar utilities on the Power
Exchange, rather than cutting small deals with upstart companies.
Wayne, the president of UtiliSource, learned the hard way. He was peddling
electricity in California in early 1997, before the state created the Power
Exchange. After arranging a good, but informal, deal with a Washington
generator, he sent out hundreds of salespeople, took to the road himself and
soon cornered 10,000 customers.
But the birth of the exchange caused the death of his deal, Wayne said. The
generators pulled out when they realized how much money they could make
selling on the open market.
"That was an oh-my-god. They said, 'Why should we give you a discount when
we can sell it to the Power Exchange ourselves?' " he said.
Retailers say the state protects the utilities in subtler but no less
damaging ways. That includes billing customers who switch companies for
certain overhead costs of their old utilities, such as weather forecasters
and accountants involved in procuring electricity.
In late 1999, a coalition of retailers filed a complaint with the Public
Utilities Commission arguing that their customers should not be forced to
pay costs for utilities they had decided to leave.
Earlier this month, the PUC finally reached a decision that favors the
retailers' argument but accepts the utilities' calculations of the expenses
borne by retailers, an amount critics say is far too low.
In dissenting, Commissioner Richard A. Bilas called the decision's paltry
award to retailers another strike against them.
"We cannot keep stymieing retail competition if we are seeking rational
markets," he said. "Energy service providers [retailers] have left the state
in droves. . . . They need all the encouragement we can give them."

Retailers Found Little Opportunity
Be they multinational giants or kitchen-table entrepreneurs, retailers are
dismayed by their experiences with deregulation.
Enron spent $5 million trying to sell electricity in 1997 and the spring of
1998. But, unable to offer enticing discounts, the firm picked up only
30,000 customers.
In a recent meeting with reporters and editors at The Times, Enron Chief
Executive Kenneth Lay suggested that the framers of deregulation kept market
forces pinned down in the retail sector. As a result, there was little money
to be made and little incentive to stick around.
"The more customers you signed up," Lay said, "the more [money] you lost."
Last week, Enron returned a number of its remaining electricity contracts to
PG&E. "In the end," Lay said, "we couldn't change the rules and we pulled
out."
On the other end of the spectrum, Paul Oshideri is now a one-man operation
since he laid off his seven employees during his unprofitable two years
trying to entice customers to Cucamonga Energy.
"You don't have that many options," said Oshideri, who is still holding on
to his 250 customers and vows not to quit. "What can you do? You can't do
anything right now."
Only when it came to businesses and big institutions such as universities
were retailers able to make a dent in the market. The small price reductions
they offered translated into huge savings for those large users of
electricity. The retailers also offered a variety of other services,
including aid to help businesses become more energy efficient.
Although fewer than 2% of all residential customers have switched to new
energy companies, 13% of industrial users have done so, according to the
Public Utilities Commission.
"If they'd structured this differently they would have had households able
to make big savings just like industrials," said Cal State Fullerton
economist Robert Michaels.
There is some dispute among deregulation critics over whether legislators
designed the law to protect the utilities from an onslaught of competition,
or it just turned out that way.
Jesse Knight, a former member of the Public Utilities Commission who
dissented on the panel's deregulation plan, said the law is biased against
retail competition.
"But I don't think it was the legislation's intent to protect the monopoly,"
Knight said.
There is general agreement, however, that not enough attention was paid to
the mechanics of the retail market.
Much of the deregulation legislation deals with generation, transmission and
wholesale prices of electricity. The only provisions on the retail end
simply allow consumers to shop for deals.
Lay, the Enron executive, recalled that the utilities fought hard to
maintain their customer base. The irony is that, with wholesale prices
skyrocketing over the last six months, buying electricity for all those
customers has driven the utilities to the brink of insolvency.
"With 20-20 hindsight, I expect they wish they'd agreed to more choice at
the customer level," Lay said. "Then maybe they wouldn't be in the
circumstances they're in."
   News </news> Politics </news/politics> Entertainment
<http://www.calendarlive.com> music <http://www.calendarlive.com/music>,
movies <http://www.calendarlive.com/movies/>, art
<http://www.calendarlive.com/art/>, TV <http://www.calendarlive.com/tvent/>,
restaurants
<http://www.calendarlive.com/top/1,1419,L-LATimes-Restaurants-X!Front,00.htm
l>    <<...OLE_Obj...>>    Business </business> Travel </travel>
Classifieds </class> jobs </class/employ>, homes </class/realestate>, cars
<http://www.cars.com/carsapp/latimes/?srv=parser&act=display&tf=/index-defau
lt.tmpl>, rentals </class/rentals>    <<...OLE_Obj...>>    Sports
<http://sports.latimes.com> Commentary </news/comment/> Shopping
<http://www.latimes.com/class/2shop/menus/>     <<...OLE_Obj...>>    
 <<...OLE_Obj...>> 
Copyright 2001 Los Angeles Times 

STEVAN ALLEN
Vice President
Edelman Public Relations Worldwide
1215 K Street - Suite 970
Sacramento, CA 95814

916/442-2331 - phone
916/447-8509 - fax
stevan.allen@edelman.com
 <<Allen, Stevan.vcf>> 

Yeah, but my name's not in it.

I haven't heard  that, but I was running around quite a bit yesterday.  
Governor Backbone has however been recently attempting to appeal to the Nader 
(noisy) wing of the party, so it wouldn't be altogether surprising.  We can 
poke around.

Best,
Jeff

	Susan J Mara
	02/08/2001 10:15 AM
		
I was mystified by that as well.  I'm not convinced that he was referring to 
AB 1X.  

Jeff or Sandi,

Have you heard the Governor making this reference?

Sue

	Mike D Smith@EES
	02/08/2001 06:42 AM
		
I'm curious about the Gov's statement that he has "eliminated" deregulation.  
Is he referring to the direct access ssupension language in AB 1X?  Can you 
shed some light on this?

I was thinking that it gives them $50M up front (the sale), and then they'll 
only have to make installment payments for the leases.

Sounds great.  When do we sign up?

Best,
Jeff

	Christopher F Calger@ECT
	02/08/2001 11:23 AM
		 
Gentlemen:

I have spoken with CDWR several times since we submitted our proposal.  They 
are immediately interested in a 5 year power sale and then want to discuss 
Pastoria.  I updated a price for Freeman for 200MW Peak SP-15 5 Year 
($124/MWh).  I also spoke with their lawyers a couple of times to start 
trading comments.  I volunteered to send a team to LA today or tomorrow, but 
so far they prefer to discuss by phone.   Their lawyers acknowledge that the 
primary issue for suppliers is credit.  They are working on an agreement with 
CPUC that would ensure that CDWR would have an adequate revenue stream to 
support the contracts.  Their intent is to make the supply contracts have 
priority over the bonds.  Until that happens, we maintain that we require a 
cash prepayment or letter of credit to support any deal.  I expect to hear 
from them again later today.  I will keep you posted.

Regards,

Chris

"In addition, we are pursuing sale-and-leaseback negotitations for an 
aggregate of approximately $50 million for ten of our stores.  These sources 
of additional funds, along with internally generated cash flow (what 
internally generated cash flow???), will provide us with an ample financial 
foundation to continue to underwrite our growth over the next several years."

Exhibit 4, "A Letter to Our Shareholders."  Top of second column of page.

Best,
Jeff

	"Mark Guinney" <Mark_Guinney@watsonwyatt.com>
	02/08/2001 09:51 AM
		 
Where are you getting this $50m figure?

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax

____________________Reply Separator____________________
I was thinking that it gives them $50M up front (the sale), and then
they'll only have to make installment payments for the leases.

No apologies needed.  Thanks so much for doing so much.  Also, heads up.  
Mark and I are having a teensy discussion about a possible $50 in additional 
cash we may need to consider (see letter to shareholders, exhibit 4, top of 
second column).

Best,
Jeff

I am SO excited about going up and about seeing you guys.  We're going to try 
(fingers crossed) to leave tomorrow afternoon.  Can you guys bring Annie?  
(please?).

Will do.

James D Steffes
09/16/2000 07:34 PM
Everyone --

Please contact Miyung to update the calendar of activities.  We need to make 
sure that it is kept up to date.  SImply put a note on the e-mail to have an 
update.

Jim

Jim,

Starting on Friday the 15th, Miyung Buster will be handling the calendar as 
well as the website for the California issue. 

Thanks,

Gavin

hi.  how's things.  my cars getting fixed as we speak!  it'll be ready next 
tues/wed.  I'm very excited about going to the dome this weekend and looking 
forward to seeing you guys.  can you please bring annie with you?

one small request:  i'm pretty frazzled with work, school, etc. and am 
looking forward to relaxing and hanging out with you guys.  it would be great 
to talk about anything other than 1) the electricity crisis and 2) george w. 
bush.  i figure we can talk for hours about how to get the railing done on 
the deck!

best,
jeff

=09Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
=0902/08/2001 02:32 PM
=09=09=20

Attached are press materials from the Hertzberg press conference held
earlier today.

Just FYI, this press conference was originally going to include Republican
members -- and was originally scheduled for last week.

Thanks,
Jean

--
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

______________________________________________________________________
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE                    CONTACT: Paul Hefner
February 8, 2001                                  (916) 319-2408

ASSEMBLY DEMOCRATS PUSH TO IMPROVE ENERGY OUTLOOK
Legislative Package Would Increase Supply and Provide Immediate Energy
Savings

SACRAMENTO dAssembly Speaker Robert M. Hertzberg and a coalition of Assembl=
y
Members announced today a package of bills aimed at increasing the supply o=
f
electricity and cutting down on demand through energy efficiency.

     "While working to protect consumers in the short term, we have also
been looking for long-term solutions to provide reliable power for
California," said Hertzberg (D-Van Nuys). "Today, we are taking the next
step d proposing realistic ways to meet the energy needs of the world?s
sixth largest economy d and offering sound proposals to help Californians
use energy wisely."

    Joined at a news conference by Assemblymembers Christine Kehoe (D-San
Diego) and Carole Migden (D-San Francisco), leaders of the working groups
the Speaker established earlier this year, and other Members of his caucus,
Hertzberg said that the package being introduced will produce more than 750
megawatts and save 1,200 megawatts over the next couple of years.

    "It?s important that we look for ways to end this energy crisis on all
fronts d both using short-term solutions to =01@keep the lights on? d as we=
ll
as long-term solutions to stabilize the energy market," said Kehoe, the lea=
d
author of the energy efficiency package.  "By providing incentives to make
California?s homes, schools and businesses more energy efficient, we can
save in just a couple of short years enough energy to supplant two or three
new and expensive power plants."

    Kehoe said that, by this summer, the energy efficiency package may save
as many as 500 megawatts, equivalent to a new power plant.

    Assemblymember Carole Migden agreed, but added, "We know that reducing
demand will not by itself solve our energy crisis.  We also have to address
the supply side of the energy equation as well."

    The Democrats presented a four bill package aimed at rapidly increasing
and stabilizing the supply of power available to the demands of residents
and businesses.  The bills would:

=14 ? Provide $50 million to establish an incentives program to encourage
businesses to install clean and modern on-site generation;
=14 ?? Provide $150 million to develop clean and efficient renewable energy
supply;
=14 ? Allow plants up to 100 megawatts to be cited by local government and =
not
through the more time-consuming Energy Commission review;
=14 ??Ensure power for Californians by requiring new power plants to enter =
into
purchasing agreements with the state.

    The Assembly Democrats? proposal also includes an energy efficiency
package of five bills, which would provide funding to, among other things:

=14 ??Replace energy inefficient appliances like refrigerators and air
conditioners;
=14 ? Give schools grants and loans to decrease consumption;
=14 ? Provide 50 percent grants and 50 percent loans to local governments t=
o
retrofit government buildings;
=14 ? Establish a Mobile Efficiency Brigade with $100 million in grants to
nonprofits to hire a team of people to not only distribute low-energy
lightbulbs to residences, saving 125 megawatts, but also to help the other
conservation programs get started well before the summer by providing peopl=
e
to do the work while learning new skills.

"We have reshaped this house," Hertzberg said, "using every resource
available to address this problem.  Throughout this effort, our focus has
been on protecting taxpayers, consumers and the future of this great state.

"Today, I am proud to stand with members of my caucus as we take the next
step," the Speaker concluded.

Assembly Democratic Caucus begins today to address the short and mid-term
implications of the ongoing energy needs of the state.  The following bills
are the first in a series of proposals the Caucus will be offering to
address the supply and conservation needs of our residential and commercial
energy consumers.

Supply

1. On-site and Distributed Generation.  Requires the CEC to design an
incentives program to promote the installment of clean and modern on-site
generation technologies as defined in SB 1298 (Bowen, 2000) including
eliminating standby and installment fees charged by electrical corporations=
.
$50 million shall be allocated to the CEC to subsidize the development of
on-site distributed generation through this program.
Provides: 20 MWs clean power the first year d additive in out years. Also
reduces demand on the grid in peak periods.
(Frommer, Alquist & Wiggins)

2. Renewable Sources of Power.  Provides $150 million to establish a loan
guarantee program for underwriting joint venture agreements to develop clea=
n
and efficient renewable energy supply.
Provides: 1,000 MWs over four years.
(Jackson, Aroner & Pavley)

3. Expedited Power Plant Permitting. Increases from 50 to 100 MW generation
facilities subject to local instead of CEC review and approval. Impacts
seven applicants who have withdrawn their applications because of the CEC
review. Provides: 634 MWs.
(Cardoza, Calderon & Salinas)

4. Ensuring Power for Californians. Requires, as a condition of receiving a
permit for plant construction, that developers enter into power purchasing
agreements with the state to ensure that a significant amount of the energy
output is available to the state.
Provides: 6,000 MWs  (Hertzberg and Caucus)

TOTAL SUPPLY ADDED: 7,654 MWs over the next four years
 Energy Efficiency

1. Residential & Small Business Energy Efficiency Program (AB 29X).
Appropriates $375 million and requires the commission:
=14 ? To pay the costs of installation of an interval meter to a small busi=
ness
that voluntarily reduces its electric consumption.
=14 ? To administer a grant program for the replacement of energy inefficie=
nt
appliances.
=14 ? To administer a grant and loan program for eligible construction or
retrofit projects.
=14 ? Expand the Emerging Renewables Buy-Down Program for renewable energy
systems such as photovoltaics (PVs).
Savings: About 400 MWs
(Kehoe, Cedillo, Nakano, Shelley & Wesson)

2. Schools 2001.  Appropriates $250 million for grants and loans to make
2001 schools more energy efficient, including 750 older year-round schools
by June 30, 2001.
Savings: 250 MWs
(Kehoe)

3. 50-50 Local Government Program.  Appropriates $350 million as a matching
grant to local governments to make local government buildings energy
efficient.
Savings: 400 MWs
(Steinberg & Oropeza)

4. Mobile Efficiency Brigade.  Provide $100 million (50% grants/50% loans)
to nonprofits to distribute energy efficient light bulbs and to assist in
getting all the other programs announced in this package up and running
quickly to achieve as much energy savings as possible by this summer.
Savings: 125 MWs (in addition to the MWs, the Brigade will help us save in
the other elements of the package).
(Correa & Cedillo)

5. Shopping Center Program. Provide $50 million in low-cost loans to
shopping centers to install energy-saving lighting devices.
Savings: 60 MWs
(Lowenthal, Thomson & Nakano)

TOTAL SUPPLY SAVED: 1,235 MWs
500 MWs BY SUMMER

 - ASSY Dem Supply/Cons  Memo

should we point out in memo?  think it's too late to revise?

hi jean:  incidentally, you're coverage of the mess via email, etc. has been 
unequaled.  can't thank you enough.  were there any materials giving more 
specifics of what the governor proposed today?

thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

	Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
	02/08/2001 03:09 PM
		 
Governor Davis held a press conference earlier today at the Calpine Sutter
Power Plant project where he unveiled his plan to increase generating
capacity by boosting output at existing power facilities, accelerating power
plant construction, streamlining the review process for new facilities, and
providing incentives for distributed and renewable generation.

In addition, Governor Davis appointed Larry Hamlin of Fountain Valley as
California's energy construction czar. Mr. Hamlin is on a leave of absence
from Southern California Edison where he serves as Vice President of Power
Production and Operations and Maintenance Services.

IEP is releasing a statement in response which I will forward shortly.

Thanks,
Jean

----
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

 - 8

=09Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
=0902/08/2001 03:20 PM
=09=09=20

Attached is IEP's response to Governor Davis.

Thanks,
Jean

----
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

_____________________

Contact:  Jean Munoz                FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
         916-447-8186                February 8, 2001

Statement by Jan Smutny-Jones,
Executive Director of Independent Energy Providers,
in Response to Today?s News Conference by Governor Davis

 "We applaud the Governor?s plan to increase electric generating capacity i=
n
California.

"Despite dramatic population growth, no major power plants
have been built in California for ten years -- making it impossible to keep
up with the demand for power and driving up the cost of electricity.

"We are working with the Governor, legislators and regulators to help solve
the problem =01. and we?ve made heroic efforts to keep our plants running a=
t
capacity to provide power during this crisis.

"Rather than using tax money, we?re investing billions of private-sector
dollars to buy, modernize and build new power plants to provide California
with clean, reliable and affordable electricity.

    "Meanwhile, we urge California electricity users to do everything
possible to conserve electricity at home and work."

#        #        #

 - 8
 - IEP/Davis Response 2/8

It is EXTREMELY useful.  Please continue.  And on behalf of freedom-loving 
people everywhere, thank you, jean.

Best,
Jeff

Vikram Budraja
cell 818.414.5998

S. David Freeman
cell 213.792.4900

L.A. Office
213.897.0006

FYI.  Calger is in active talks with Freeman and DWR lawyers about the offer 
letter we submitted on Tuesday.  Freeman's very anxious to do a deal for 200 
MWs from the West Desk and then start talking about a deal for power from 
Parquet's Pastoria plant.  Credit is of course the issue and Calger's told 
them that unless the credit issue is bulletproof it's not going to work.  See 
Chris' comments below.  It looks like progress is being made, but the details 
will make it or break it.  Any thoughts?  Might make sense to discuss on the 
call.  Please forward along to others.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff
	Christopher F Calger@ECT
	02/08/2001 06:11 PM
		 
CDWR is proposing to all potential suppliers the following security package 
for new PPA's:

1) Irrevocable PUC Order / Agreement that "locks in the revenue stream" for 
CDWR to cover the PPA costs.

2) PPA covenant that the power supplier has payment priority over any debt, 
including the contemplated debt issue
  - the concept is that the supply is the operating cost and any debt would 
be subordinate

3) PPA Covenant that their is a uniform package to all suppliers; no more 
favorable terms or priority to ayone, no L/C, etc.

Subject to definitive language, CDWR is trying to get people to buy into this 
general plan.  What do people think?  Please try to shoot holes in this.  
Please forward to the appropriate legal, regulatory and credit folks to air 
this out.

Thanks,

Chris

I'm holding up just fine.  Thanks a bunch for caring.  Have a great time in 
the Virgin Islands!  Is it a Survivor gig?

	Susan M Landwehr
	02/08/2001 07:52 PM
		
We missed you too.  Everybody is kind of worried about you....and hoping that 
you're holding out o.k..  Barbara wasn't able to make it and Marchris was 
hanging out with Governor Jeb, so we had a smaller group.  I just got back to 
Mpls and am heading off to the Virgin Islands on Saturday.  

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/07/2001 07:04 PM
		
Just wanted to send a note to say that I'm very sorry that I couldn't make it 
to the meeting, miss catching up with folks, and hope that all's going well.  
Hope to see you very soon.

Best,
Jeff

Sandi's on vacation this week.  There are rumors that PG&E's actively seeking 
a negotiated solution with legislators and the Governor, but I can't verify 
and don't have details on what the negotiated agreement might look like.  
While's Sandi's away, have asked Mona to check in with our Sacramento 
lobbyists to poke around for information.  Will report back soon as we get 
more info.

James D Steffes
09/16/2000 01:12 PM
What is going on with this issue politically?  If PG&E gets its rate cap 
removed, we need to make sure that this doesn't create more problems for 
wholesale markets?

Jim

___________________________________________________________-  

California's largest utility is pushing to end a four-year-old retail rate
freeze that has protected millions of Northern Californians from the price
volatility in the wholesale electricity market that  rocked San Diego this
summer.  PG&E Corp. wants to end the price freeze imposed in 1996 by the
state legislature because it is losing money under the arrangement.  PG&E's
move is going to set the stage for a major confrontation between the utility
and state regulators -- the California Public Utilities Commission will have
to balance conflicting needs: the utility's desire to protect its
shareholders from huge losses and the commission's duty as a regulator to
protect the public from a flawed market that appears incapable of delivering
"just and reasonable rates required by law."  California legislators fear
that the state could fall into a recession if electricity prices do not drop
soon.  California's 1996 deregulation law required all investor-owned
utilities to freeze rates at seemingly high levels.  Utilities were allowed
to use surplus revenues to pay down generation-related debts that regulators
said would render them uncompetitive in a deregulated world.  It seemed to
work well until this summer in California  --  wholesale prices for
electricity went up suddenly -- and the average price of power consumed
today -- for example -- is $ 200 a megawatt hour or nearly four times the
amount that PG&E can bill its customers.  State Senator Debra Bowen,
chairwoman of the California Senate utilities committee commented that the
legislature is reluctant to become involved -- she said further, " [T]he
legislature feels like somebody who's fallen into poison oak enough times
that all we have to do is walk past a bush and we break out in a rash.
That's the way we react to these energy issues."

Neat.

	Susan M Landwehr
	02/09/2001 06:38 AM
		 
Good morning.  One of my contacts at RGA sent me a copy of a letter that went 
to DOE Secretary Abraham this week, thanking him for his participation in the 
WGA conference in Portland.  It stated, in part :

 "We now believe it is imperative, given the importance of encouraging the 
development of and investment in new plant construction, that you NOTextend 
the Department of Energy orders requiring the sale of electricity and natural 
gas, and a cap on those prices."

The general tone of the overall letter was that they want Davis to continue 
fixing his own problem.   The letter was copied to Dick Cheney and Chairman 
Hebert.  I'll send a copy along via fax later today.  The signing Governors 
were:  Hull, Owens, Kempthorne, Martz, Guinn, Gary Johnson, Leavitt, 
Geringer--all republicans.

Thanks very much.

	Robert Neustaedter@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	02/09/2001 09:39 AM
		 
Jeff - 

Just to circle back with you with regard to the question whether EES can 
continue to enroll customers (raised in yesterday's SDGE meeting).  While 
still somewhat vague, it is the opinion of Legal that EES may continue to 
enroll new customers until there is commission action making effective that 
section of ABX1 suspending direct access.  One issue requiring further legal 
review is whether the commission can retroactively suspend direct access to 
the effective date of ABX1.  This was communicated to the EES folks in a 
subsequent meeting yesterday.

Robert  

My techie pals showed me the feature on Enron in the most recent version of 
eCompany.  What a great feature.  Congratulations.

Best,
Jeff

	Karen Denne
	02/09/2001 09:12 AM
		 
This is in today's online "Future Boy" column in eCompany Now -- we had a 
great meeting with them on Wednesday!

Future Boy

Bringing Opto-Electronics Out of the Stone Age

By Erick Schonfeld at http://www.ecompany.com

Optical networks. It sounds so cutting edge. Billions of bits of
data riding on beams of light. The most important, most urgent,
information in the world encapsulated within photonic pulses. Yet
the components that go into optical gear are often still assembled
by hand. Go into a factory where optical equipment is made and
you'll find acres of work benches manned by technicians in white
lab coats. There is not even an assembly line. It's labor-intensive
and practically preindustrial.

If optical networks, and ultimately optical computing, are ever
going to rival their electronic predecessors, the companies that
manufacture the components that make them possible must first
master the art of mass production. As simple as this may sound, it
is in fact extremely challenging. Photonic components -- such as
laser pump diodes, specialty fibers, and optical chips with
so-called waveguides that direct light through controlled channels
-- are typically made from materials that are not well understood,
in contrast to the silicon-based chips used in computers, routers,
and switches. "Every industry has to go through an evolution of
materials knowledge and an experience curve that just takes time,"
explains Rick Tompane, CEO of Gemfire, a startup that is figuring
out how to make optical-integrated circuits using standard
semiconductor equipment.

There's a big difference between making components that are
designed to move electrons, and manufacturing components that move
pulses of light. An electronic chip, for instance, consists of
circuits of metal etched onto silicon. In contrast, an optical chip
is usually made from more exotic materials, such as lithium
niobate. And instead of metal circuits, it has channels, or
waveguides, that guide light passing through it to a desired strand
of optical fiber. Rather than etched grooves, these tiny channels
are solid veins with a different refractive index than the
surrounding material. Learning how to adapt electronic chip-making
techniques to produce waveguides and other components in mass
quantities has been difficult -- and yet optical-networking
companies have to figure this out, if only because the current
system is so arduous and antiquated. Many pieces of optical
equipment require dozens of laser diodes, which often have to be
manually connected to other components. For instance, dense wave
division multiplexing (DWDM) boxes, which allow telecom companies
to send 32, 40, or even 96 wavelengths of light down a single
fiber-optic strand, require different laser diodes that each emit
light at slightly different wavelengths. If each of these diodes is
inserted by hand, too many opportunities exist for things to go
wrong.

But companies such as Gemfire and U.K.-based Southampton Photonics
are beginning to automate the manufacture of key optical
components. Gemfire has figured out a way to combine diode arrays
and waveguides into optical integrated circuits that can be
produced using automated equipment. Theoretically, these circuits
could be used in DWDM boxes, eliminating the need to have 40
separate laser diodes and to connect each one by hand to a
waveguide chip. For now, Gemfire is trying to get these chips into
the optical amplifiers that regenerate fading light signals after
they've traveled long distances. Gemfire has developed a diode
array integrated with eight waveguides that would replace eight
separate amplifiers, and thus could amplify eight separate strands
of fiber. Over time, Gemfire will combine even more elements into
its optical integrated circuits, including traditional electronic
circuitry, so that conversion from the optical to the electrical
domain can happen right on the chip. It is this approach that has
allowed the private company to attract heavyweight investors such
as Cisco Systems, Corning, Intel, and Kleiner Perkins. Floyd
Kvamme, a partner from Kleiner who sits on Gemfire's board, was one
of the founders of National Semiconductor. "So much of what we are
doing reminds him of what they did in the early days of National
Semiconductor," says Tompane.

Southampton Photonics offers a similar amplifier product. It, too,
has invented an amplifier that can handle eight separate strands,
except that its shares diodes between them. But Southampton is also
branching out into some more daring pursuits -- as one might expect
from a company co-founded by David Payne, who 15 years ago led the
team that invented the erbium-doped fiber amplifier, the basis of
most of today's optical amplifiers. Payne is now looking into other
ways to control and manipulate light. One of the more intriguing
solutions is a specialty fiber, known as a Bragg grating, that acts
as a filter because its index of refraction changes along its
length. Working with these fibers, equipment-makers might no longer
have to build DWDM boxes with 40 specialty diodes. Instead, they
could simply stock a box with a product from Southampton that
combines standard, off-the-shelf diodes with these Bragg gratings,
which are stuck in front of the diodes to get whatever wavelengths
may be desired. Southampton Photonics makes these fiber filters
through an automated, computer-controlled process that can create
custom filters for clients in a matter of days rather than weeks.
And the process is so fine-tuned that it will allow DWDM
manufacturers to reduce the separation between the wavelengths
going down a single fiber to 25 GHz, as opposed to the 50 to 100
GHz intervals that are considered state-of-the-art today.
Wavelengths must be separated by intervals because when they are
too close together, the signals can get confused and distorted; by
reducing these intervals, DWDM boxes will be able to cram 160
different light beams down a single fiber.

In a way, it's appropriate that Southampton Photonics is based in
England. It was there, after all, that the Industrial Revolution
took hold, first introducing the notions of automation and mass
production. Thanks to Payne and his ilk, the optical-equipment
industry -- a high-tech sector trapped in a low-tech method of
production -- is about to be dragged into the 21st century.

Lagniappe:

Last month, I wrote a feature on Enron in the January/February
issue of eCompany Now titled "The Power Brokers." So guess what
Business Week's current cover story on Enron is called? "The Power
Broker." Now, you'd think the editors at Busy Week could come up
with their own headline -- sorry, dropping the "s" does not count
as an original thought.

Anyway, Enron's soon-to-be CEO, and Busy Week cover boy, Jeff
Skilling stopped by our San Francisco office Wednesday. And one of
the things that really stood out from the conversation (after I
just barely beat him at a game of foosball) is that he is
particularly gloomy on the economy's prospects. Not a good sign
coming from the guy who runs one of the 20 largest companies in
America (Enron's 2000 revenues totaled $101 billion). "I think we
are headed for a recession," he says. "Look at credit spreads for
companies. You can't get money. That says the marketplace expects
big defaults." If companies can't get money, Skilling reasons,
"what you will see is a big slowdown in the deployment of
technology." And he does not think this slowdown is a mere
inventory correction that will pass in a couple of quarters. The
situation reminds him of the bust in the oil and gas industries
during the 1980s, which followed a similar boom in capital spending
to produce more oil. "It took decades to chew through all that
extra capacity," he remembers. This time, the capital spending has
been on routers, servers, and telecom equipment. And the companies
who make that Internet plumbing may not have seen the worst of it
yet. "All of these guys are going to hit the wall," predicts
Skilling. The smart thing to do would be to cut back production to
match lowered demand. But the danger is that, just like the oil and
gas companies of yesteryear, "instead of producing less, they will
produce more to keep their creditors at bay. And it will feed on
itself."

Skilling also fears that there is little the government can do.
"Even if the Fed continues to lower interest rates, that only
decreases the cost of good credit. The spreads on bad credit [i.e.,
the kind most companies need to purchase more Internet equipment]
continue to rise. And tax cuts go to consumers' pockets. The one
thing that could help is if the government changes the depreciation
rates it allows companies to recognize for capital equipment."
Washington, are you listening?

****************** Newsletters at eCompany.com ******************
Today at eCompany - Sign up now to receive the latest eCompany.com
headlines and stories delivered daily. Begins February 13th.
http://tm0.com/sbct.cgi?s=118309364&i=295984&d=1007265
*****************************************************************

*****************************************************************
You are subscribed to 'Future Boy' with the address:
meredith@enron.com.  If you would like to unsubscribe, simply reply
to this message with the word 'unsubscribe' in the subject line.
If you would like to send feedback to the author, please send an
email to future_boy@ecompany.com.
*****************************************************************

FYI.  Note that TURN sez that the Commission should use the enactment date of 
AB1X as the date that the rate freeze ended.
	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	02/09/2001 10:45 AM
		 
Yesterday (the 8th) was the day for parties to file testimony in the Rate
Stabilization Proceeding.  I have done a quick review of TURN's testimony,
and they did not submit tables which go back and calculate the impact of
adopting its proposed accounting changes on transition cost recovery and the
TRA undercollection balance.  In its testimony, TURN stated that it tried to
do such a calculation, but that the numerous adjustments which the UDCs had
made to their regulatory accounts since last summer made the task alot more
difficult than anticipated.  TURN estimates, however that PG&E's TCBA
balance as of 12/31/01 would be approximately $5.1 billion, while SCE's
would be $2.9 billion.  TURN states that they have requested through a data
request that the UDCs do the tables for them, but that if they do not
comply, that the commission should direct the UDCs to provide the tables.

Also, TURN has taken the position that the enactment of AB X 1 has
effectively ended the rate freeze and the date of the enactment of the
statute  is the one the Commission should pick for purposes of declaring the
rate freeze over.

I have not gone through other parties testimony yet, but wanted to let you
know what TURN has done (or not done).

Jeanne Bennett          

	"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
	02/08/2001 05:01 PM
	Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
		 
Attached are the Governor's Executive Orders and letters to FERC and Bush
signed today, in one document.

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - EXECUTIVE ORDERs.doc

Here is the very quick and dirty that I did on the fly for Justin yesterday.  
You should feel free to edit away!

Best,
Jeff
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/08/2001 01:41 PM
		 

Mike:  Please call me ASAP on this issue on my cell phone 415.505.6633. Got 
an idea.  Appreciate it.

Best,
Jeff

Karen:  Harry's done some more recent work on the numbers we need to fill in, 
so he'll fill them in.  Harry:  the numbers we've thrown around over the last 
couple of months are:

From 1996 to 1999, peak demand increased by 5,522 megawatts, but only 672 
megawatts of new capacity was added.  Meanwhile, electricity is growing over 
5% per year.
	Karen Denne
	02/09/2001 11:11 AM
		 
Jeff -- Attached is the draft op-ed for the SF Chronicle.  Ken Lay has made 
some revisions, and it's ready to go, but I need you to fill in the blanks.  
Dave Parquet has signed off on the peaker info.  I need to do a quick 
turnaround, so as soon as you can get it to me, I can get it to Ken for final 
approval.

Thanks!
kd

I'll be on the call as will Mike Day, out outside counsel who's been helping 
us negotiate a fix to the DA prohibition in AB 1X.

Best,
Jeff

Thank you very much.

	Michele Curtis/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange
	02/09/2001 12:29 PM
		 
Please join Tom Riley in a conference call today re:  FB27X.  The call is 
scheduled for 11:15am PST.  To join the call, please use the following:

call in number:  888-329-7124
passcode:  46150

If you experience any trouble with the call, please call the MCI Conference 
Center at 1-800-475-4700 and refer to confirmation number 2663402.

Thanks,
Michele
925-543-3716

Hey gang:
I think that we should do the case.  I'm willing to help draft, and willing 
to take a first crack at putting some bullets together about the direction I 
think the memo ought to take and distribute that by about 5 PM tomorrow.  
Though it would be good for other folks to do same and then we could compare 
notes.  Makes sense?  Thoughts?  Suggestions?

Best,
Jeff

FYI.  From my "buddy" Verleger.
	"Philip K. Verleger" <PVerleger@compuserve.com>
	02/09/2001 12:40 PM
		 
Jeff - twenty years ago Hogan and I wrote long papers on "disruption
tariffs" to offset OPEC market power.    I even published a book on the
subject (Oil Markets in Turmoil)..  The United States never tried them but
the European's did and they have been quite effective.

In today's LA Times I have an op ed which suggests the state may want to
use them as a tool to deal with the electricity crisis.  I did not mention
the manifesto in the op ed because the idea was not discussed in our
meeting or the paper.

I suspect the op ed will not be welcomed in Houston - but you should be
aware of it.

Phil Verleger

No problem.  Just wanted to throw some thoughts into the hopper. If you've 
gotten them from Vicky and Tom, then we're set.  Good luck.  
Best,
Jeff

	MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	02/09/2001 12:12 PM
		 
 <<subscription_.doc>>

Jeff, here is the latest version of the coalition's language.  There is a
call at 3pm to day with the coalition to discuss presenting it to Bowen.
Mike

 - subscription_.doc

Just wanted to let you know that I'll be out of the office beginning at 1PM 
but will be checking voicemail and will be available by cell phone and pager.

Best,
Jeff

PS  I'm listening to the leg hearings by phone.  Legislators are making 
Bryson and Mission head Al Fohr (Steve, he was the guy at the meeting we had 
with the Governor's staff) explain in excruciating detail all of the 
transactions that have taken place since AB 1890 passed (e.g., midwest power 
plants buys, New Zealand disco buy).  Also interrogating Harold Ray explain 
Edison's purchasing practices over the past couple of years (i.e., staying 
short in the market).  Edison's not coming off looking great.  Bryson's 
trying to do some major triage---and blaming Loretta for keeping Edison short.

Hi:
Hope you're well.  Based on your note, I faxed my Direct Deposit change to 
Renee Kelso a week or so ago and wanted to check with her to see that she'd 
received it and that it was in process, but I can't find her name in email.  
Any suggestions on how I can check in and see how progress is going?  As 
always, thanks a bunch.

Best,
Jeff

Hi Justin:

As we discussed, this is the most recent version of the proposed "fix" to the 
Direct Access prohibition included in AB1X that the coalition of customer 
groups have been working on.  They intend to give it to Debra Bowen first 
thing next week.  Take a look at it and if you have any questions, please let 
me know and I can explain the concept and how it is intended to work.  I have 
notified the coalition that it would be a good thing to include you on their 
distribution list, but I didn't want to do that until I checked with you. Let 
me know if that's something that you would like to do.

Best,
Jeff
 - subscription_.doc

Thank you.  For what it's worth, this tracks well with what I'm hearing.
Best,
Jeff

	James D Steffes
	02/09/2001 02:19 PM
		 
FYI
	Robert Johnston@ECT
	02/09/2001 11:12 AM
		 
The following information is from sensitive sources.  Please treat with 
discretion.

Contact Robert Johnston (x39934) or Kristin Walsh (x39510) for questions or 
additional info.

Bankruptcy
Early this week, there was a closed door meeting held by the Western Power 
Trading Forum in Arizona.  The meeting took place outside California to avoid 
press coverage and allow IPPs to maintain a low profile.  Association 
representatives believe that regardless of what happens with the PUC vs. 
Utilities ruling expected on Monday, some IPPs will take the utilities into 
involuntary bankruptcy.   Our source expects that absent a significant last 
minute breakthrough, the filing will happen within the next two weeks, and 
"probably" next week.  As stated in yesterdays report, the IPPs are very low 
on cash and are not able to cover the debts of the PG&E and Socal.  Only 
three creditors are needed with uncollected debts of more than $10,000 to 
file involuntary bankruptcy.

Bail Out
Davis has been meeting with the chief executives of both utilities in a last 
ditch effort to make a deal prior to Monday's court ruling.  The most likely 
scenario is for state ownership of the utilities transmissions assets.  
However, coming to an agreed upon price will be very challenging.   In 
addition, PG&E and Edison appear to have competing agendas in pursuing a bail 
out plan.  Davis is expect to continue meetings through out the weekend in 
hopes of reaching an agreement before Monday.

Thanks a million.  Please keep me posted.  See you next week!

Best,
Jeff

Holy moly and hee haw, how the heck are ya, and what are you up to?

Your boy had the quote of the day in the NY Times.

"Show me a kid who's not sneaking into R-rated movies and I'll show you
a failure.  All the future CEO's of this country are sneaking into
R-rated movies."

Happy Monday,
 - jdw

OK, it's settled.  We will NOT turn in the case this Monday.  Good call, 
Dylan.

Best,
Jeff

	Dylan Windham <dwindham@uclink4.berkeley.edu>
	02/10/2001 02:53 PM
		 
Jeff:

We are not scheduled to turn this in and I don't think it will help at all 
with grading.  I have looked at the case but frankly I have to work both 
days this weekend and probably will not have a lot of time to 
contribute.  But if the group decides we want to pursue this I will help 
all I can.

Dylan

At 12:34 PM 2/9/2001 -0600, Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com wrote:

>Hey gang:
>I think that we should do the case.  I'm willing to help draft, and willing
>to take a first crack at putting some bullets together about the direction
>I think the memo ought to take and distribute that by about 5 PM tomorrow.
>Though it would be good for other folks to do same and then we could
>compare notes.  Makes sense?  Thoughts?  Suggestions?
>
>Best,
>Jeff

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/09/2001 02:09 PM
		 
SBX 6 (Burton) was added to the Senate Energy Committee calendar for
Tuesday.   This bill would establish a state power authority.

This appears to be a note that was sent a very long time ago and just showed 
up in your in-box.  I'm thinking it was the decision to raise rates that 
happened beginning of January.

Best,
Jeff

Greetings:
My apologies.  I was out of town over the weekend and while I thought I'd 
have network access, I didn't.  Here's the presentation from the talk I gave 
in New York on 01.29.01.  I'll be updating it, but will work from these 
slides (as notes--no formal presentation).

If you have any questions, just give a holler.  415.782.7822.  Look forward 
to meeting on Wednesday.

Best,
Jeff

Yes, please ticket.

Great to see you guys, and despite all the excitement, it was alot of fun.  
Hope that you made it back safely.  Couple of things:

I'd like to talk to several vineyard consultants, so if it ain't too much 
trouble, and you've got a name, I'd love to check around.
Can I order two cases of coastal zin?
What about the champagne?  How much per magnum is it?

Best,
Jeff

Thanks again for your help, advice and Cristina's phone #.  We'll see where 
it goes from here.  But I'm shocked.  I called Cristina, and NO answering 
machine.  I didn't think that happened anymore.  Any way of leaving her a 
message?  Thanks again.

Best,
Jeff

On the various matters currently before the California PUC:
The Commission order stating that the utilities should absorb any difference 
between DWR's cost of power and the retail rate freeze is still technically 
in effect.  (The order only applies, however, to the power purchased under 
the Governor's emergency order giving the State the authority to buy power.)
The utilities have petitioned to modify the decision telling the Commission 
that the easiest way to remedy the problem would be to vacate the order 
altogether, but if the Commission didn't want to vacate the order, it would 
need to change the decision so that the IOUs don't eat any shortfalls.
The Commission can act on the petition to modify whenever it chooses.  In 
addition, it has a continuation meeting scheduled for this Thursday and a 
regularly scheduled business meeting next week.  So the opportunity to act 
and fix the Order is there if the Commission wants to take it.
With respect to the cost of utility generation (i.e., retained generating 
assets and QF contracts), the Commission has a set up a schedule that 
foresses a Commission decision adopting an "interim" procurement charge on 
March 27th.  There is another "workshop" scheduled for tomorrow to discuss 
the utilities' proposals, after which the utilities will be required to file 
formal "advice  letters" with the Commission.  Those advice letters will form 
the basis of the process that the Commission will use to ultimately arrive at 
a decision on the 27th.
Everyone participating in the workshops takes the view that  customers will 
see a separate line item on their bills to cover the going forward costs that 
DWR incurs to buy power.  Everyone participating in the workshops also takes 
the view that customers will be on the hook for DWR's costs and the 
Commission will, if necessary, raise rates to ensure that DWR is made whole.  
(Unfortunately, the Commission is not currently sending signals to show that 
it concurs with the folks participating in the workshops.  And until there is 
clarity on whether the Commission will agree to "pass through" those costs, 
Enron and others will continue to have problems with DWR's credit as it 
applies to the RFP that we and others responded to last week.)
Next week begins the hearings to address the issues that Commission started 
to examine began in the emergency hearings held over the holidays, i.e., the 
utilities financial position, TURN's proposal to "net out" the utilitities' 
generation-related revenues with the undercollection caused by the rate cap, 
the date on which the rate has (or will) end, etc.    Recently, TURN modified 
its testimony in response to the passage of AB1X.  TURN's new position is 
that the Commission should find that the rate freeze ended on February 1st, 
the effective date of AB1X.   EES will need to quickly determine how and if 
it wants to respond to TURN's latest stance on the end of the rate freeze.
We continue to try to persuade stakeholders and the Commission that DA 
customers must be compensated for the fact that they paid for the utilities' 
stranded generating assets.  That compensation could come in one of two 
forms:  1) access to a proportionate share of the utilities' retained, 
cost-based generating assets, or 2) a credit representing the difference 
between the "market" value of the retained generating assets and the book 
value of those assets.  We are not getting much traction thus far.
The Commission is scheduled to issue a separate decision addressing the rate 
freeze issue, the issue of whether to net out generating-related revenues 
against the undercollection, etc. on March 27.  So both sets of issues (the 
procurement charges and the "end of the rate freeze) are scheduled to be 
"finalized" on March 27, albeit in separate orders.
With respect to the Block Foward issue, our lawyers had a pretty good meeting 
on Friday with the DWR general counsel and other DWR lawyers.  However, it 
has become clear that despite those efforts, FERC's decision on "charge 
backs" will have a significant effect on the resolution of the Block Forward 
issue.

Best,
Jeff

Hi Tom:

From our contact with the Governor's office, seems that Kari Dohn, formerly 
in the Governor's office, and recently appointed Chair of the Electricity 
Oversight Board, would be the hands-down best candidate.

Best,
Jeff

	Tom Riley/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange
	02/12/2001 01:02 PM
		 
If any of you have ideas on this, please respond ASAP.  As you may know, I 
sit on the CSU Foundation Board of Governors, accountable to Chancellor 
Reed.  Anything we can do to support the upcoming meeting will go a long way.

Regards, Tom

Greetings Tom, in preparation for our upcoming Board of Governors' meeting,
I would like to ask you for your help in getting a speaker for the evening.
The March 11 (Sunday) Board meeting in Sacramento is focused around CSU
Legislative Day scheduled for Monday, March 12.  The Board meeting is
scheduled to begin at 4:00 pm followed by a dinner.  We will invite the CSU
Trustees to attend the dinner along with other key CSU leaders; we normally
have about 30-40 individuals attend the dinner.

This year, we would like to invite someone from the Governor's office to
come and talk a little about the energy crises in California.  Can you help
us identify someone in Davis' administration that may be interested in
speaking to this distinguished group of individuals?

Again, briefly,
Meeting date/time:  Sunday, March 11, 2001 at 4:00 pm; dinner is scheduled
for 6:45pm; in Sacramento.

I look forward to hearing from you soon.

Patricia Castillo Linn, CFRE
Senior Director, Advancement Programs
 and Vice President, CSU Foundation
The California State University
Office of the Chancellor
401 Golden Shore, 6th Floor
Long Beach, California 90802-4210
562/951-4821
562/951-4983 FAX

 - winmail.dat

1)  In Nancy's absence, I'd thought I'd keep the 
interesting-quotes-sharing-practice alive.  This one's from John Waters in 
the NYT:

"Show me a kid who's not sneaking into R-rated movies and I'll show you
a failure.  All the future CEO's of this country are sneaking into
R-rated movies."

2) Cameron, you are a football pool GENIUS!

No problem.  My pleasure.

Best,
Jeff

George:
If you get a minute, could you call to de-brief on the meeting we had the 
Gruma?  Just want to touch base in the event that there's any follow up.  
Hope that it was helpful.

Best,
Jeff

	George Tocquigny@EES
	02/11/2001 10:15 AM
		
thanks, Jeff.  It will be 1:30 cst.  Kathy will advise a dial-in number.
George

Just let me know the time of the call.  I'll adjust my schedule as needed on 
Monday.  

Jeff

	George Tocquigny@EES
	02/09/2001 03:03 PM
		
Jeff,
Thanks for your responsiveness....your willingness to adjust your schedule as 
necessary is appreciated.  Here's an update on meeting with Gruma.
I've learned that Gruma's Irwin Gordon is in town only Monday before he 
leaves for Europe, so assuming he still wants to participate, we will try to 
do Monday via conf. call.  Please advise any conflicts you have on Monday.  
Steve Brunner, Gruma's SVP is supposed to let me know asap.

Craig Sutter and I (at least) will be at Gruma's offices Mon. afternoon for a 
previously scheduled meeting.

I will let you know as soon as I learn of Gruma's preferences.
George
303-663-1964

Don't even worry about it.  Thanks for being sensitive to the issue. Good to 
see you guys this weekend, despite all the excitement.

Best,
Jeff

	"Eldon Sellers" <eldon@interx.net>
	02/12/2001 12:24 PM
	Please respond to eldon
		 
I didn't get this e-mail until today  (I mean I hadn't downloaded anything
for a couple of days and therefore didn't even know it was there).  If I had
seen it, I wouldn't have made the comments I made at the dome about wanting
to hear what you had to say about the very things you specified in your
e-mail you didn't want to hear.  You must have thought I was deliberately
going against your wishes and I apologize for that.  If you remember, the
last time we had talked about the problem re energy, you were not reluctant
to discuss it so I thought something had happened at the dome that needed to
be straightened out.  So, as I stated above, if I had seen your e-mail
before going to the dome, I would have understood what was going on.

hi.  how's things.  my cars getting fixed as we speak!  it'll be ready next
tues/wed.  I'm very excited about going to the dome this weekend and
looking forward to seeing you guys.  can you please bring annie with you?

one small request:  i'm pretty frazzled with work, school, etc. and am
looking forward to relaxing and hanging out with you guys.  it would be
great to talk about anything other than 1) the electricity crisis and 2)
george w. bush.  i figure we can talk for hours about how to get the
railing done on the deck!

best,
jeff

you ain't kidding.

	Evelyn Kahl Elsesser <eke@aelaw.com>
	02/12/2001 12:26 PM
		 
it's scary in cyberspace....

Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com wrote:

> This appears to be a note that was sent a very long time ago and just
> showed up in your in-box.  I'm thinking it was the decision to raise rates
> that happened beginning of January.
>
> Best,
> Jeff

I think that it would be best for the Chancellor's office to make the 
contact/request, but if you need us to help, then Steve Kean, Rick Shapiro or 
I can make a go of it; but again, I think that it would best for the 
Chancellor's office to make the invite.

Best,
Jeff

	Tom Riley/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange
	02/12/2001 02:58 PM
		 
Jeff,

Thank you - Kari certainly seems to be an ideal candidate.  Who would the 
appropriate person be from Enron to initiate contact with Kari regarding the 
request?  Once initial contact is made, I can follow up with details.

Tom

Hi Tom:

From our contact with the Governor's office, seems that Kari Dohn, formerly 
in the Governor's office, and recently appointed Chair of the Electricity 
Oversight Board, would be the hands-down best candidate.

Best,
Jeff

 Tom Riley/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange 02/12/2001 01:02 PM    
If any of you have ideas on this, please respond ASAP.  As you may know, I 
sit on the CSU Foundation Board of Governors, accountable to Chancellor 
Reed.  Anything we can do to support the upcoming meeting will go a long way.

Regards, Tom

Greetings Tom, in preparation for our upcoming Board of Governors' meeting,
I would like to ask you for your help in getting a speaker for the evening.
The March 11 (Sunday) Board meeting in Sacramento is focused around CSU
Legislative Day scheduled for Monday, March 12.  The Board meeting is
scheduled to begin at 4:00 pm followed by a dinner.  We will invite the CSU
Trustees to attend the dinner along with other key CSU leaders; we normally
have about 30-40 individuals attend the dinner.

This year, we would like to invite someone from the Governor's office to
come and talk a little about the energy crises in California.  Can you help
us identify someone in Davis' administration that may be interested in
speaking to this distinguished group of individuals?

Again, briefly,
Meeting date/time:  Sunday, March 11, 2001 at 4:00 pm; dinner is scheduled
for 6:45pm; in Sacramento.

I look forward to hearing from you soon.

Patricia Castillo Linn, CFRE
Senior Director, Advancement Programs
 and Vice President, CSU Foundation
The California State University
Office of the Chancellor
401 Golden Shore, 6th Floor
Long Beach, California 90802-4210
562/951-4821
562/951-4983 FAX

 - winmail.dat << File: winmail.dat >> 

Thanks.  I'll take 12 magnums.  And please order 2 cases of Coastal zin.  I 
think that we'll likely come by either before or after the dome trip this 
weekend.  I can pay you then.  

I'm not looking to make money on the grapes.  Just looking for someone to 
finance the development of my land.  And I'd have a vineyard to look at all 
the time!  That'd be enough for me.  Thanks for all your help.

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	02/12/2001 02:47 PM
		 
The champagne is $10 per magnum. 
Of course you can order the zin - when do you want to pick it up? 
Thank you for making me laugh a lot. 
I have asked our vineyard guy for some names and he will be getting back to 
me shortly.  He thinks the best person is probably someone from KJ who does a 
lot of stuff up there.  Should have it soon.  He was not overly encouraging 
in terms of making money!
Great to see you guys, and despite all the excitement, it was alot of fun. 
Hope that you made it back safely.  Couple of things: 
   I'd like to talk to several vineyard consultants, so if it ain't too 
   much trouble, and you've got a name, I'd love to check around. 
   Can I order two cases of coastal zin? 
   What about the champagne?  How much per magnum is it? 
Best, 
Jeff 

	"Carol Hudson" <carol@iepa.com>
	02/09/2001 06:54 PM
	Please respond to carol
		 
Steven has arranged for a conference call, regarding the following, on
Monday, February 12, 2001:
 Time:   3:00 pm (PST)
 Call-In #:  1-877-322-9648
 Part. Code:  111756

Date: 2/9/01
The Senate Energy Committee is having a hearing on Tuesday afternoon. They
will be hearing testimony on SB 6x (Burton), which would establish a state
power authority; and SB 33x (Burton), which would create the California
Transmission Authority.  Attached is a memo from Andy Brown on SB 6x, and I
requested something similar from him on SB 33x.  IEP needs to decide what
position, if any, it is going to take on these measures.

Also, since last Friday's siting meeting ended-up focusing primarily on SB
28x (Sher) and AB (Wright), participants never had the opportunity to
comment on and develop a comprehensive plan for siting issues. IEP has its
list of 8 issues (attached) that member developers would like to see in
legislation, but this list is incomplete.  As siting bills are introduced
and heard, IEP should be able to stand before committees with this template
of a perfect siting bill that encourages continued development of
electricity supply in California.

IEP may want to consider scheduling a conference call Monday afternoon to
discuss these issues with members.

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - 010118_sbx6_abbcmts_r2.doc
 - siting legislation (revised)2.doc

On the 21st, Tauzin and Barton are holding separate meetings with executives 
from the respective stakeholder groups in Southern California to have "frank" 
discussions about California.  Steve Kean will attend for Enron.  At Steve's 
meetings will be other gas and electric marketers, and generators.  Linda 
Robertson would like to talk with us tomorrow about getting Steve prep-ed for 
the meeting.  She'd like to have the call at 3 PM California time.  Her 
assistant will be sending details very soon.

Best,
Jeff

you're a doll.  thanks. on this one, feel free to control!  even if Cameron 
doesn't go up, prentice and i likely will, which means that we'll be stopping 
by napa (if you guys don't mind).

Kari Dohn.  916.324.3501.

	Tom Riley/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange
	02/12/2001 04:02 PM
		 
Thanks Jeff - do you have Kari's contact information?

Tom

I think that it would be best for the Chancellor's office to make the 
contact/request, but if you need us to help, then Steve Kean, Rick Shapiro or 
I can make a go of it; but again, I think that it would best for the 
Chancellor's office to make the invite.

Best,
Jeff

 Tom Riley/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange 02/12/2001 02:58 PM    
Jeff,

Thank you - Kari certainly seems to be an ideal candidate.  Who would the 
appropriate person be from Enron to initiate contact with Kari regarding the 
request?  Once initial contact is made, I can follow up with details.

Tom

Hi Tom:

From our contact with the Governor's office, seems that Kari Dohn, formerly 
in the Governor's office, and recently appointed Chair of the Electricity 
Oversight Board, would be the hands-down best candidate.

Best,
Jeff

 Tom Riley/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange 02/12/2001 01:02 PM    
If any of you have ideas on this, please respond ASAP.  As you may know, I 
sit on the CSU Foundation Board of Governors, accountable to Chancellor 
Reed.  Anything we can do to support the upcoming meeting will go a long way.

Regards, Tom

Greetings Tom, in preparation for our upcoming Board of Governors' meeting,
I would like to ask you for your help in getting a speaker for the evening.
The March 11 (Sunday) Board meeting in Sacramento is focused around CSU
Legislative Day scheduled for Monday, March 12.  The Board meeting is
scheduled to begin at 4:00 pm followed by a dinner.  We will invite the CSU
Trustees to attend the dinner along with other key CSU leaders; we normally
have about 30-40 individuals attend the dinner.

This year, we would like to invite someone from the Governor's office to
come and talk a little about the energy crises in California.  Can you help
us identify someone in Davis' administration that may be interested in
speaking to this distinguished group of individuals?

Again, briefly,
Meeting date/time:  Sunday, March 11, 2001 at 4:00 pm; dinner is scheduled
for 6:45pm; in Sacramento.

I look forward to hearing from you soon.

Patricia Castillo Linn, CFRE
Senior Director, Advancement Programs
 and Vice President, CSU Foundation
The California State University
Office of the Chancellor
401 Golden Shore, 6th Floor
Long Beach, California 90802-4210
562/951-4821
562/951-4983 FAX

 - winmail.dat << File: winmail.dat >> 

Oops.  I forgot to plug your phone back in after I used my computer this 
morning.  Sorry.  Could you call me when you get a chance?

	Mike D Smith@EES
	02/12/2001 03:48 PM
		 
SCE's motion for preliminary injunction seeking an order permitting 
recoupment of past and future undercollections was denied today.   It appears 
that the case will now be scheduled for a future hearing after the parties 
have had a chance to develop any relevant facts and fully brief the legal 
issues.  

Below is a summary of what occurred today: 

________________________________________________

     Motion for Preliminary Injunction:  The Court denied SCE's Motion for a 
Preliminary Injunction on the merits.  Judge Lew stated that the Motion was 
"wholly inappropriate" and that granting it would violate the 11th 
Amendment.  The Court stated that mandatory injunctions, such as the one 
requested here, are "strongly disfavored" and involve a heightened standard 
that SCE failed to meet.  The Court also said it was constrained by the 
matters put at issue in the pleadings, and that here the Motion sought relief 
in excess of that requested in the complaint.

     While the Court let defense counsel argue for about 15-30 minutes, he 
mostly appeared disinterested in what they were saying.  Plaintiff's counsel 
did not make any oral argument.

    The Court also said that this case turns on the Pike County exception, 
which depends on whether there were alternative markets available; and that 
if the exception applies, there is no preemption claim.  The Court said that 
there were certain narrow issues before it which is all that it will address, 
and that the Court is not a "do it all" problem solver for the parties.  The 
Court did not indicate whether it was predisposed to rule for any side.

     Motion for Order Specifying Facts without Substantial Controversy:  The 
Court granted the motion as to facts 1-10, 12, and denied it as to facts 1, 
13.  The Court found that these particular facts were not substantially 
disputed by the defendants, and that further discovery was not needed for the 
Court to determine them. (Since I do not have a copy of the filings, I am 
unable to provide further comment.  Please let me know if you want me to 
obtain copies of the filings.)

     Motions to Intervene:  The Court granted the Motions to Intervene 
(permissive intervention) filed by Los Angeles County and the Utility Reform 
Network on the ground that their participation would assist the court in 
hearing the complex matters presented.

     Motion to Specially Appear:  The Court denied the California Attorney 
General's motion to "specially appear" as inappropriate, but without 
prejudice to filing a motion for permissive intervention.

     Criticism of Counsel:   The Judge castigated SCE's counsel in several 
instances.  He called the preliminary injunction motion "wholly 
inappropriate."  He criticized SCE's description in briefs of his ruling on 
January 8, 2001, which the Judge said was "flatly wrong."  (He said his 
January 8 order did not hold that the filed rate doctrine permits the 
plaintiff to recover recoupment costs.)  With respect to the Motion for Order 
Specifying Facts, he said he was "not fooled" by SCE's "creative arguments."  
The Court also gave a general admonishment about "spinning" his rulings 
outside of the courtroom.  Reading between the lines, the Judge seemed 
bothered by media reports.  I do not know if the Judge was aware, but SCE had 
a public relations person mingling in the court room with the many reporters 
present.

     Calendar:  The Court advanced the March 19, 2001 Scheduling Conference 
to March 5 at 9:00.  The Conference will address matters including discovery 
practice, motion deadlines and the trial date.  The Judge said he would 
consider SCE's request for an early trial date.  However, he also said that 
it appeared that the primary disputed issues were legal, not factual, and 
therefore he expected that summary judgment motions would be filed by both 
sides.

     Consolidation with PG&E matter:  The Court initially expressed concern 
that the PG&E case was transferred from Northern California, saying he had 
doubts that this was the proper venue.  Later, however, the Judge seemed 
placated when PG&E's counsel told him that the company had substantial assets 
in this district.  One counsel also told the Court that the parties had 
stipulated to consolidate the PG&E matter with the SCE matter, though the 
Court did not say whether he would order consolidation.

    Impression of Judge:  This was my first time observing Judge Lew.  He 
seems extremely strict, straightforward and no-nonsense.  He seemed very well 
prepared on the substance and not at all shy about ruling on the merits.  In 
the SCE matter and preceding non-related matters, the Judge frequently 
cut-off counsel's arguments to focus on narrow issues of law, and made 
counsel either answer very specific questions or stop talking completely.  
Here, the Judge acknowledged this case's importance and said he does not take 
this matter lightly.

I'm glad that Enron is in such stellar company.  We did not get out early 
last night.  See you soon.

	"Kelly, Jacqueline" <Jacqueline.Kelly@schwab.com>
	02/12/2001 04:54 PM
		 
Hey Jeff,
Did we get out early last Monday?  Let me know, I am thinking of going home
to get my car and driving tonight.  If I do, I can give you a ride.

Here is a quote from Fortune's List of America's most admired
article...you're steppin' on our toes Jeff...
In the eight key areas of reputation by which the companies are ranked,
Schwab shone the most in "innovativeness," where it was second only to
Enron. ... 

Jacqueline Kelly
Treasury
Charles Schwab & Co, Inc
(415) 667-3915

Warning: All e-mail sent to or from this address will be received or
otherwise  
recorded by the Charles Schwab corporate e-mail system and is subject to
archival, monitoring or review by, and/or disclosure to, someone other than
the
recipient.

Here are some minor edits.  What's the timing of the release? I can work on 
it a bit more tomorrow on the plane to Houston if that would be useful.

Best,
Jeff

	Leslie Lawner
	02/12/2001 03:20 PM
		 
Here is the revised letter.  I changed the last sentence in the 1st paragraph 
to reflect Mike Day's comments.  I guess if it is okay with everyone, we will 
have Mike Day and Sandy come up with a mailing list.

Thanks. See you tonite.  Looking forward to it.

Best,
Jeff

FYI.

Best,
Jeff
		

CERA: Study Says Long-Term Power Contracts `No Solution'
  
02/12/2001 
Dow Jones Energy Service 
(Copyright (c) 2001, Dow Jones & Company, Inc.) 

HOUSTON -(Dow Jones)- Californians will likely see 20 hours of rolling 
blackouts spread across the state this summer, as short-term solutions to the 
state's ongoing power crisis come too late, according to a report from the 
Cambridge Energy Research Associates. 

CERA, an international energy consulting company, estimates California will 
be short 5,000 megawatts this summer, which will force the state's 
independent grid operator to declare some stage of emergency for 200 hours.

However, if consumer rates are allowed to increase before summer, 
Californians will likely cut consumption by 1,500 MW, or one-third of the 
predicted shortfall, Larry Makovich, a senior director of CERA, said Monday 
at a press briefing in Houston. 

A California Public Utilities commissioner agreed with the report. "It will 
be bad," said Richard Bilas. "We've had no additional generating capacity, 
and until we have price signals, it won't get better." 

     
CERA experts said long-term steps California must take to create a 
functioning wholesale market include: establishing a capacity requirement and 
payment method; streamlining plant siting and approval; resolving the credit 
crisis the state's utilities face; ending the consumer rate freeze; avoiding 
tinkering with market rules; creating a positive investment climate, and 
restructuring the regional transmission grid. 

In addition, CERA said California utilities should move to portfolio buying 
over the next three years, rather than contracting long-term supplies now. 

"Long-term contracts aren't a solution," Makovich said. He added that 
utilities could contract for huge volumes of power that will be above the 
market price in as little as 18 months, as natural-gas drilling increases, 
improving tight gas supply. 

One of the problems that led California to restructure its power industry was 
the large amount of power under contract under federal law at above-market 
prices. 

With long-term contracts being discussed at $70.00 a megawatt-hour "we run 
the risk of creating a bigger problem," should natural gas prices retreat 
over time to around $3.00 a thousand cubic feet, Makovich said. 

In addition to the obvious move to improve the state's power supply by 
allowing construction of new generating units, the CERA study urged the state 
to take several short-term steps to help reduce supply problems this summer, 
including: expanding load curtailment programs; encouraging conservation; 
providing flexible emission restrictions; coordinating plant outages on an 
emergency basis, and providing for flexible hydroelectric facility operations.

"The biggest problem is that we are running out of time," said Steve Kean, 
executive vice president at Enron Corp. (ENE), at the briefing on the first 
day of CERA's five-day energy conference in Houston. 

While the state Legislature has taken steps to restore the credit situation 
facing California utilities, the recent disclosure that the Department of 
Water Resources isn't buying all the power the state needs "isn't a good way 
to keep the lights on," said Joe Bob Perkins, president of Reliant Energy 
Inc.'s (REI) Wholesale Group, which owns generation in California. He called 
the credit situation "increasingly fragile." 

And while California's governor and lawmakers stepped in when the two largest 
California utilities appeared headed for bankruptcy, Bilas said a bankruptcy 
proceeding might be a way to end rate freezes for California consumers - an 
unpopular move that other parties have been unwilling to forcefully pursue. 

"A bankruptcy judge will say rates have to go up, costs have to be cut," 
Bilas said. "It's a way to say rates have to go up, but I didn't do it." 

   -By Eileen O'Grady; Dow Jones Newswires, 713-547-9213;
eileen.ogrady@dowjones.com

 

  
Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	02/13/2001 08:40 AM
		 
Automated Power Exchange Appoints John Yurkanin New Chief Executive Officer

Former CalPX Executive Promises To Be Key Player in Global Power Arena

SANTA CLARA, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Feb. 12, 2001--Automated Power 
Exchangec Inc. (APXc), a leading provider of online markets for the electric 
power industry, today announced that John Yurkanin has joined APX as its new 
president and chief executive officer (CEO). Yurkanin, former chief operating 
officer of the California Power Exchange (CalPX), has two decades of 
experience in the energy industry, including oil, gas, and electric power. 

``I am very pleased to be taking the helm of APX,'' said Yurkanin. ``The APX 
approach - using the Internet to foster open and neutral markets for power 
trading and delivery - is just what the U.S. and international markets of 
today and tomorrow need. APX has assembled an exceptionally talented group of 
people who are developing the leading Internet-based marketplace for the 
electric power industry.'' 

Yurkanin, a career energy industry executive, brings an international, 
multi-commodity perspective to his new role at APX, from his past roles at 
British Petroleum, Louisville Gas and Electric, and most recently CalPX. He 
had served as executive vice president and chief operating officer for the 
CalPX since December 1998 with responsibility for internal operations. This 
included all trading operations, market services, settlement operations, 
marketing, and information technology efforts. 

``APX, as a provider of open markets, is an important part of the resolution 
of California's volatile electricity market, as well as aiding other 
deregulating markets around the globe,'' said Yurkanin. ``This is important 
not only on a regional, but also on a global level, for the lessons being 
learned in California will shape the course of markets around the world. In 
joining APX, I am able to bring my recent public sector experience back into 
the private sector, where I have spent most of my career.'' 

Prior to joining CalPX, Yurkanin served as Louisville Gas and Electric Energy 
Corp.'s (LG&E) senior vice president for marketing and operations in its 
non-regulated businesses with responsibility for operating assets associated 
with the 24-hour power operations and gas control facilities. He also 
directed LG&E's retail marketing, regulatory strategy, and products and 
services development for emerging power and gas markets. 

Yurkanin also was a principal in two energy consulting firms for two years 
after his lengthy tenure with British Petroleum (BP), which extended from 
1981 until 1994. At BP, he advanced through a number of positions associated 
with crude oil trading, and North American and European oil and gas 
marketing. From 1992 to 1994, he served as vice president for BP Gas, with 
responsibilities for the start-up of U.S. commodity marketing and trading 
operations to manage BP's equity production of gas and liquid hydrocarbons. 

Richard Amen, who had served as APX CEO since May 2000, will resume his role 
as managing partner of Venture Management Associates (VMA), which provides 
investment capital and management assistance for rapidly growing technology 
companies. 

Yurkanin earned a master of business administration, with emphasis in finance 
and management, from Xavier University of Ohio, and holds a bachelor of 
science degree in chemistry from the University of Cincinnati. 

About Automated Power Exchange 

Automated Power Exchange operates Internet-based markets for the buying and 
selling of electric power, renewable power, and related products and provides 
the market and scheduling technologies needed to support power system 
administration. A privately held company with approximately 100 employees, 
APX has its world headquarters in Santa Clara, Calif., and its European 
headquarters in London. More information is available at www.apx.com. 

     APX
     Lynn Fisher, 408/517-2134
     lfisher@apx.com 
        or
     Hill and Knowlton
     John Grubb, 415/955-2137

Bill:
Yes, I can be available to do the call.

Best,
Jeff

Thank you very much for your help.

Best,
Jeff

Hi Laura:
I'll be forwarding you additional information per your phone call with 
Steve.  You can expect it either later this evening or first thing in the 
morning.  And please feel free to contact me at the following numbers:

direct dial: 415.782.7822
pager:  888.916.7184
cell phone: 415.505.6633

Best,
Jeff

Hi Leslie:

The proposal that ENA submitted to Peevey/Freeman includes a proposal to 
reduce demand by 400 MWs if the state implements financial incentives for 
such reductions (i.e., if the state is willing to pay, say, 7 cents/kwh to 
"produce," it ought to willing to pay 7 cents to "reduce.")  That proposal 
was distributed to the usual, company wide email distribution list last week 
when it was submitted.  We can discuss further on the phone call this morning.

Best,
Jeff

	Leslie Lawner
	02/13/2001 06:53 PM
		 
Apparently there are rumors that Ken Lay promised to make some kind of 
investment in California when he was talking to folks in the state ($300 
million in DSM?)  Do any of you know what this commitment might be?  Sandy 
needs to be filled in on this.  Let me know as soon as you can.

Gary Ackerman <foothi19@idt.net> on 08/26/2000 04:21:58 PM
Please respond to foothi19@idt.net
Folks,

Late Friday afternoon Ziad called me.  The ISO Governing Board earlier
the same day turned down the ISO management's request to force SCs to
place 95% of their scheduled load in the DA market.  That leaves the ISO
little choice but to venture into the energy markets to procure power to
cover their peak hours on hot days.

Terry gave Ziad the OK to proceed with placing both the APX and
California PX screens for this new product/matching-service.  I am
working with the two vendors and the ISO to make this happen quickly.
We anticipate that the market will open on Tuesday, September 5, or
earlier.

Key people who you may need to contact:
ISO - Ziad Alaywan  916-351-2140 (Nancy Traweek and Jim McIntosh are
also in the loop)
PX - Ken Czarnecki 626-537-3123
PX - John Yurkanin 626-537-3124
APX - Denice Cazalet 408-517-2123
APX - Michael Heinrich 408-517-2159

Please feel free to contact me with your questions.  Several of you have
not had the opportunity to attend the pre-design meetings we had at the
California PX and APX a few weeks ago, nor were you aware of the joint
WPTF/ISO meeting held last week.  But in essence, what this
product/matching-service will allow you to do is post bids to sell, or
buy a 6-hour block of capacity at a firm energy price across the hours
of HE13 to HE18.  You can bid at COB, Mead, PV, SP15 or NP15.  You can
utilize either the CalPX or APX to post your bids, because the ISO will
be watching both screens.  The block sizes are (supposed to be) 25MW.
The seller is responsible for arranging transmission to the delivery
point, and the buyer (e.g., ISO) is responsible for arranging
transmission service from the delivery point.  The ISO will make its
purchase decisions for the day-of at or before 8:00 a.m.  The ISO will
send out a general notice when it needs offers to sell on the super-peak
market.  I expect that bids for either buy or sell will be able to be
posted at any time, 24 hours.  The screens should allow parties to post
buy or sell bids at least 60 days forward of the trade day.

You are not limited to a price cap in these markets, but the ISO as a
buyer has the right to not purchase at prices above it's price cap.

I think WPTF members should be very proud that we were able to quickly
work together, and with the ISO to create this market. I have no doubt
the ISO will be offering bids to purchase starting Sept 5, and going
forward 60 days.  However, who among you will be willing and able to
post bids to sell?

gba

Some EES folks just popped into my office and asked me to pop into their 
meeting, which starts at noon.  I'm not sure precisely what the meeting's 
about, but Mona I noticed you've got it on your weekly schedule.  How do you 
want to handle?  I'd be happy to pop in at noon for the meet and greet part, 
but likely need to leave in order to work on the draft strategy---Paul wants 
me to distribute whatever I've got done by COB today, which I think is a good 
idea.

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/13/2001 03:29 PM
		 
The following bills passed out of the Senate Energy, Utilities and
Communications Committee today.  All of the bills were amended
substantially.  I will forward amendments as soon as they become
available.

SBX 5 (Sher) passed on a vote of 7-0 - $1.2 billion energy efficiency
and conservation measure
SBX 6 (Burton) passed on a vote of 6-0 - State Transco
SBX 33 (Burton) passed on a vote of 6-3 - Public power authority

One thing:  remember we are "cautiously" optimistic.  That qualifier is 
extremely important, given the lunacy that's underway in California.

Best,
Jeff

FYI.  From yesterday's editorial page in the WSJ. McFadden's one of the folks 
that signed the "manifesto."

Best,
Jeff
	Elizabeth Linnell
	02/14/2001 08:17 AM
		 
California Needs Deregulation Done Right
By Daniel McFadden

02/13/2001
The Wall Street Journal
A26
(Copyright (c) 2001, Dow Jones & Company, Inc.)

The electricity market in California has swung over its history from 
monopolization by industrialists in its early days to comprehensive 
regulation, then to partial deregulation in the 1990s, and now back toward 
substantial regulation and government intervention. In the past, each swing 
of the pendulum came from public frustration with the way this market 
operated, and each produced a result that the public again found 
unsatisfactory. 
But the memory of politicians and the public is short. The state is poised to 
repeat the mistakes of the last cycle of regulation. Measures passed by the 
California Legislature this month are an ill-conceived intervention that will 
lock the state into high energy costs and put it at a competitive 
disadvantage for years to come.
Unless there is further action, the state will maintain subsidized retail 
prices that discourage conservation, while capping in-state wholesale prices 
in a manner that discourages construction of new in-state generation capacity 
and leaves Californians at the mercy of out-of-state generators. Government 
subsidization of electricity consumption will drain tax revenues that might 
be better used for education and other needs, encumber California's children 
with debt to pay the state's energy bills, and threaten the state's future 
ability to sell bonds for public projects. The immediate political cost of 
consumer outrage from higher electricity rates may be postponed, but the real 
economic cost promises to be massive. 
The sad thing is that this is all unnecessary. 
The source of the crisis was rigid regulation of retail prices in the face of 
rapid increases in wholesale prices driven by increased fuel prices and 
increased demand in the national electricity market. The only effective 
solution to the crisis is to make retail price regulation more flexible, so 
that consumers see the real economic cost of electricity and respond to high 
prices through conservation efforts that reduce demand and push prices down. 
On the supply side, the state should encourage construction of new in-state 
generation capacity through the right market signals, giving producers the 
opportunity to site plants and sell power under conditions comparable to 
other states. 
It's true that state action was needed to stabilize the electricity market, 
avoid immediate bankruptcy of the distribution companies, and assure 
continued delivery of energy. But this step will only postpone the day of 
reckoning unless sensible electricity pricing is introduced as well. 
To limit the impact of high prices on the poor, increasing block-rate tariffs 
can be used in which the rates for "lifeline" electricity use are kept low. 
These were effective in limiting demand for water during California's last 
drought, and are already used to promote energy conservation. A more 
aggressive version that pushes the rates in high-usage blocks to the real 
load-linked economic cost of electricity would provide an incentive that 
would stimulate conservation at the precise points that will do the most to 
moderate demand and push down wholesale prices. 
Consumers should have the opportunity to hedge against price spikes and 
average their payments to ease the pain of price volatility. The installation 
of load-sensitive meters should be accelerated so that consumers can respond 
to the economic price of the electricity they are consuming. This is new 
technology for U.S. utilities, but has operated well in France for years. 
On the supply side, the state and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission 
could use their regulatory power to require that existing generators redirect 
excess profits to finance lifeline rates for retail customers and work off 
the hangover from previous electricity purchased and not paid for. 
However, care should be taken in dealing with generators to assure that every 
kilowatt hour that any generation facility can produce at less than the 
national wholesale price of electricity is in fact delivered to the market. 
The state needs to be very cautious about getting into the power business as 
an intermediary between generators and distributors. Government bureaucracies 
rarely show dexterity in dealing with private suppliers, and access to 
general government revenues dulls their incentive to operate efficiently. 
Negotiating long-term contracts right now, when California is in a weak 
market position and the out-of-state generators are in the driver's seat, is 
likely to put the state at a future competitive disadvantage. 
Consumers need to be reminded that money passed through the government to 
subsidize electricity comes out of their pockets just as surely as price 
increases, without the mitigating benefits of demand reduction.The lessons of 
history suggest that in making the Hobson's choice between a dysfunctional 
partially deregulated market and a fully-regulated one that promises to be 
even more dysfunctional, California is picking the greater of the two evils. 
If it fails to move to sensible electricity pricing in which both consumers 
and suppliers see the real economic price at the margin, it will face 
another, even more serious crisis in the not too distant future. 
--- 
Mr. McFadden, a professor of economics at the University of California, 
Berkeley, received the Nobel Prize in Economics last year.

Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 

Thanks, but for some reason they didn't come across.  Could you resend?  
Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

I'm on 47.  Please call at 415.505.6633.  Thanks.

thanks.  got it.

Hi sorry to bother you, but could you please print this out for me?  Thanks a 
bunch.

Jeff
	bbailey@duke-energy.com
	02/14/2001 09:28 AM
		 
I'll try it again.  See you in a few hours.

(See attached file: Harris County EBA Speech (1-12 Draft).doc)

Brent Bailey
713-627-5307 (p)
713-627-5550 (fax)
bbailey@duke-energy.com
 - Harris County EBA Speech (1-12 Draft).doc

Hi Laura:  I've attached three things, but first wanted to give you a bit of 
an update on events transpiring in Sacramento and at the Public Utilities 
Commission.  

Move to Prohibit Customer Choice
As you may know, AB1X, the bill that the Legislature recently passed and the 
Governor signed, gives the California Department of Water Resources the 
authority to buy power on behalf of the utilities.  Included in that bill, 
however, is a provision that prohibits "Direct Access,"  California's term 
for customer choice.  

In sum, the bill, in its current form, prohibits businesses and consumers 
from chosing an alternative energy service provider, like Enron.  Our 
understanding is that the Department of Finance called for the prohibition.  
Their reasoning is that they need a "captive" customer base to pay for the 
bonds that the State will issue in order to finance DWR's power purchases.

Customer choice was of course the foundation of California's restructuring 
law, AB 1890, and is arguably the only bright spot in an otherwise fatally 
flawed plan.  For example, the only businesses and consumers that were 
protected in San Diego when rates were deregulated last year were those 
businesses and consumers that had signed fixed price power deals with 
competitive service providers.  Ironically, the recently passed legislation 
takes choices away from consumers and diminishes their ability to manage 
their energy costs.  Before AB 1890, consumers and businesses had one 
choice--the monopoly  utility.  With the passage of AB 1X, they again will 
have one choice. But this time their only choice will be to buy from a 
government agency DWR.

A broad coalition of consumer groups has expressed its opposition to the 
prohibition and Senator Debra Bowen (a key player on the Senate side), and 
Fred Keeley (a key player on the Assembly side), have promised to "fix" the 
prohibition in another bill "SB27X."  I'll forward in another email the 
language that the coalition has drafted and hopes Bowen and Keeley will carry.

Unfortunately, we are now hearing rumors that the Governor intends to direct 
the California Public Utilities to immediately implement the provisions of 
AB1X prohibiting Direct Access, despite the fact that a large coalition of 
consumers and service providers are actively working with Bown and Keeley to 
amend the prohibition language.

It would be extremely useful if the folks participating in the meeting on 
Thursday with the Governor let him know that taking choices away from 
businesses and customers is the wrong way to go and that he and the 
legislative leaders need to work with the coalition to fix it.  You'll note 
in the language developed by the coalition that the proposal strikes a 
reasonable balance between the Dept of Finance's concerns about recouping 
DWR's costs of buying power, and the need to give consumers and businesses 
maximum flexible in managing their energy costs.

Move to Have the State Take Over the Electric Industry in California

John Burton, the Democratic leader of the Senate, insists that, "if 
California is going to 'bail out' the utilities, the State needs to get 
something in return."  Burton wants the state to buy and operate PG&E's and 
Edison's transmission system and create a state power authority that would 
get in the business of (among other things) developing, financing, 
constructing and operating power plants and natural gas pipelines.  Burton 
got both of these bills designed to take over the industry passd out of his 
committee yesterday (SB6X and SB33X).  It is unclear how much support he has 
in the full Senate or in the Assembly, but the possibility of passage is 
certainly greater than zero at this juncture.

Others experts are offering a better alternative.  When the federal 
government helped Chrysler out of its financial difficulties 20 years ago, 
the federal government received stock warrants in return.  Until recently, 
the Governor favored warrants, but more recently he has waivered in his 
statements regarding a state take over.  Burton appears to have negotiating 
leverage with the Governor and appears to be using it.

Again, it would be extremely useful for folks to let the Govenor know in the 
meetings on Thursday that a State take over of the industry is an extreme 
move and bad public policy.  I will forward to you in a separate email 
letters that we sent to Burton expressing our opposition to his bills and the 
reasons for our opposition.  In brief, there is no shortage of private 
capital ready and willing to invest in California's energy infrastructure 
(i.e., power plants, electric transmission lines, gas pipelines).  All 
California needs to do is create the investment climate necessary to attract 
the capital.  In addition, history shows that the State is extremely 
ill-equipped to become California's mega-utility. 

Here are the attachments:

A demand buy-down proposal.  We made this proposal to the Governor (and 
continue to propose it to policymakers in Sacramento, Washington D.C. and 
just about everywhere else).  In short, the notion is that, if the market is 
willing to pay power producers, say, 7 cents/kwh to "produce" power, then the 
market ought to be willing to pay businesses and consumers 7 cents/kwh to 
"reduce" power consumption.  

This approach is critical for two reasons:  first, it provides businesses and 
consumers the financial incentives necessary (and that California currently 
lacks) to conserve energy and use energy more efficiently.  Second, because 
California delayed identifying and implementing a solution to California's 
energy crisis, its options for addressing the severe shortages that are 
likely occur this summer are very limited.  Reducing demand represents one of 
the few options that can help to immediately reduce the gap between supply 
and demand.  Putting financial incentives in place now to reduce demand and 
"free up" electrons is an investment with significant payback.

A "manifesto" recently released by a group of Berkeley and Stanford 
economists and industry experts urging the Govenor to pursue a 
"market-oriented" solution to California's energy crisis.

An editorial in yesterday's Wall Street Journal by Dan McFadden, a nobel 
prize-winning economist from Berkeley echoing the proposal advanced in the 
"manifesto."  McFadden was one of the manifesto's signatories.

Finally, we are working on "model Legislation" proposing a market-based 
solution that we will share with you soon and that we hope the business 
community--and the Valley in particular--can embrace and advocate.

I realize that this is a lot of information and I apologize for the length of 
this note, but I wanted to try to make sure that you're up-to-date.  Please 
don't hesitate to give me a call if you'd like to discuss further.

Best,
Jeff

 - Manifesto-final version.doc

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	01/23/2001 01:49 PM
		 

Hey, groom-to-be, what happened?  So sorry I missed you.  The buzz about B. 
Cherry going to PG&E is starting to get louder. Hope all's well.  
Best, Jeff

FYI.  This was floating around yesterday.

Best,
Jeff

What happened to the Governor's "commitment?"
	Susan J Mara
	02/14/2001 01:20 AM
		 
More depressing news from CA, We should discuss at mroning call if we want to 
take any action on this.

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854
	"Les Spahnn" <spahnn@hnks.com>
	02/13/2001 08:02 PM
		 
All:
It is my understanding, from good sources in the Govs office that the Gov
will order Loretta Lynch to expeditiously implement the provision to suspend
all parties auhtority to enter into direct access contracts.  The premise
with which the administartion is acting is that if they expeditiously
suspend everyone's right to bilateral contracts quickly, it sets up a
barrier which the direct access coalition must break through.  In other
words the table is set.  Deal your meal from where the dishes are located.
I.E. the Davis Administration wants to place all direct access advocates in
the position of having to justify why each and every party should be the
exception to the suspension rather than have a general rule concerning how
direct access should work for all parties.  It clearly gives the Admin a
very strong upper hand to control who when and where direct access can occur
without having to say that they oppose direct access.  Power be where power
lies.
> Hello All:
>
> I have just heard that there is a rumor that the CPUC may act this week
under
> AB 1X to enact the Direct Access suspension.
>
> Has anyone else heard this rumor?
>
> Thanks,
>
> Dian Grueneich
> Grueneich Resource Advocates
> tel: (415) 834-2300
> fax: (415) 834-2310
>
> Aaron Thomas wrote:
>
> > Hello All
> >
> > Sorry for the delay in getting the revisions we discussed on the call
> > earlier this week and the revisions that Karen and Dorthy worked out to
> > completely separate this issue from a customer's right to self generate
> > (disconnected or parallel).  I have also included the edit that Calpine
> > suggested via e-mail regarding the department's right to payment for
power
> > sold.
> >
> > We were told by Bowen's office that there will be no meeting on
Friday --
> > they did not say when they were planning to pull together the all party
> > meeting.
> >
> > A number of us have been approached by the Restaurant Association
> > regarding their problems with the 100 kW threshold.
> >
> > I think it would be a good idea for us together by conference call to
> > discuss the Restaurant Association's concerns.  Additionally, I would
like
> > to make sure we have gotten everyone's edits and discuss the questions
> > that came up at the CESG meeting or any last comments or suggestions.
> >
> > For example, I would like to raise a problem I see with section d and I
> > would like to discuss the concept of municipal aggregation for commodity
> > service in the context of Bowen's bill.
> >
> > I have set up a conference call for Friday at 3 PM.
> >
> > HOST/LEADER:                    Aaron Thomas
> > DATE:                                   February 9, 2001
> > TIME:                                   3:00PM (PST)
> > IN-DIAL NUMBER:                 415-217-0050
> > PASSCODE:                               NO PASSCODE NECESSARY
>

 - Manifesto-final version.doc

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/14/2001 10:02 AM
		
Hi Laura:  I've attached three things, but first wanted to give you a bit of 
an update on events transpiring in Sacramento and at the Public Utilities 
Commission.  

Move to Prohibit Customer Choice
As you may know, AB1X, the bill that the Legislature recently passed and the 
Governor signed, gives the California Department of Water Resources the 
authority to buy power on behalf of the utilities.  Included in that bill, 
however, is a provision that prohibits "Direct Access,"  California's term 
for customer choice.  

In sum, the bill, in its current form, prohibits businesses and consumers 
from chosing an alternative energy service provider, like Enron.  Our 
understanding is that the Department of Finance called for the prohibition.  
Their reasoning is that they need a "captive" customer base to pay for the 
bonds that the State will issue in order to finance DWR's power purchases.

Customer choice was of course the foundation of California's restructuring 
law, AB 1890, and is arguably the only bright spot in an otherwise fatally 
flawed plan.  For example, the only businesses and consumers that were 
protected in San Diego when rates were deregulated last year were those 
businesses and consumers that had signed fixed price power deals with 
competitive service providers.  Ironically, the recently passed legislation 
takes choices away from consumers and diminishes their ability to manage 
their energy costs.  Before AB 1890, consumers and businesses had one 
choice--the monopoly  utility.  With the passage of AB 1X, they again will 
have one choice. But this time their only choice will be to buy from a 
government agency DWR.

A broad coalition of consumer groups has expressed its opposition to the 
prohibition and Senator Debra Bowen (a key player on the Senate side), and 
Fred Keeley (a key player on the Assembly side), have promised to "fix" the 
prohibition in another bill "SB27X."  I'll forward in another email the 
language that the coalition has drafted and hopes Bowen and Keeley will carry.

Unfortunately, we are now hearing rumors that the Governor intends to direct 
the California Public Utilities to immediately implement the provisions of 
AB1X prohibiting Direct Access, despite the fact that a large coalition of 
consumers and service providers are actively working with Bown and Keeley to 
amend the prohibition language.

It would be extremely useful if the folks participating in the meeting on 
Thursday with the Governor let him know that taking choices away from 
businesses and customers is the wrong way to go and that he and the 
legislative leaders need to work with the coalition to fix it.  You'll note 
in the language developed by the coalition that the proposal strikes a 
reasonable balance between the Dept of Finance's concerns about recouping 
DWR's costs of buying power, and the need to give consumers and businesses 
maximum flexible in managing their energy costs.

Move to Have the State Take Over the Electric Industry in California

John Burton, the Democratic leader of the Senate, insists that, "if 
California is going to 'bail out' the utilities, the State needs to get 
something in return."  Burton wants the state to buy and operate PG&E's and 
Edison's transmission system and create a state power authority that would 
get in the business of (among other things) developing, financing, 
constructing and operating power plants and natural gas pipelines.  Burton 
got both of these bills designed to take over the industry passd out of his 
committee yesterday (SB6X and SB33X).  It is unclear how much support he has 
in the full Senate or in the Assembly, but the possibility of passage is 
certainly greater than zero at this juncture.

Others experts are offering a better alternative.  When the federal 
government helped Chrysler out of its financial difficulties 20 years ago, 
the federal government received stock warrants in return.  Until recently, 
the Governor favored warrants, but more recently he has waivered in his 
statements regarding a state take over.  Burton appears to have negotiating 
leverage with the Governor and appears to be using it.

Again, it would be extremely useful for folks to let the Govenor know in the 
meetings on Thursday that a State take over of the industry is an extreme 
move and bad public policy.  I will forward to you in a separate email 
letters that we sent to Burton expressing our opposition to his bills and the 
reasons for our opposition.  In brief, there is no shortage of private 
capital ready and willing to invest in California's energy infrastructure 
(i.e., power plants, electric transmission lines, gas pipelines).  All 
California needs to do is create the investment climate necessary to attract 
the capital.  In addition, history shows that the State is extremely 
ill-equipped to become California's mega-utility. 

Here are the attachments:

A demand buy-down proposal.  We made this proposal to the Governor (and 
continue to propose it to policymakers in Sacramento, Washington D.C. and 
just about everywhere else).  In short, the notion is that, if the market is 
willing to pay power producers, say, 7 cents/kwh to "produce" power, then the 
market ought to be willing to pay businesses and consumers 7 cents/kwh to 
"reduce" power consumption.  

This approach is critical for two reasons:  first, it provides businesses and 
consumers the financial incentives necessary (and that California currently 
lacks) to conserve energy and use energy more efficiently.  Second, because 
California delayed identifying and implementing a solution to California's 
energy crisis, its options for addressing the severe shortages that are 
likely occur this summer are very limited.  Reducing demand represents one of 
the few options that can help to immediately reduce the gap between supply 
and demand.  Putting financial incentives in place now to reduce demand and 
"free up" electrons is an investment with significant payback.

A "manifesto" recently released by a group of Berkeley and Stanford 
economists and industry experts urging the Govenor to pursue a 
"market-oriented" solution to California's energy crisis.

An editorial in yesterday's Wall Street Journal by Dan McFadden, a nobel 
prize-winning economist from Berkeley echoing the proposal advanced in the 
"manifesto."  McFadden was one of the manifesto's signatories.

Finally, we are working on "model Legislation" proposing a market-based 
solution that we will share with you soon and that we hope the business 
community--and the Valley in particular--can embrace and advocate.

I realize that this is a lot of information and I apologize for the length of 
this note, but I wanted to try to make sure that you're up-to-date.  Please 
don't hesitate to give me a call if you'd like to discuss further.

Best,
Jeff

 - Manifesto-final version.doc

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/14/2001 06:36 AM
		 
Attached, please find the amended version of SBX 6.  We have the amended
version of SBX 33 in hard copy only.  Please let us know if you would
like it faxed to you.  The amended version of SBX 5 won't be available
until tomorrow.

http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx1_6_bill_20010213_amended_
sen.pdf

Laura:
Attached are the letters that I referenced in the previous email.  The 
letters:

oppose SBX33--Burton (state takeover of the private electric utilities' 
transmission lines)
oppose  SBX6--Burton (state takes significant position in generation, gas & 
electric transmission, energy conservation, renewable resources, real-time 
meters
support SBX5--Sher (increase funding for energy efficiency)

Again, if you have any questions don't hesitate to contact me at 415.782.7822.

Best,
Jeff

 - sbx 33 oppose letter revised.doc
 - sbx5 support letter.doc
 - sbx 6 oppose letter

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	02/14/2001 10:24 AM
		 
SoCal Edison unsure banks will extend deadline

NEW YORK, Feb 13 (Reuters) - Embattled California utility Southern California 
Edison said on Tuesday it didn't know whether its bank lenders will extend 
their Tuesday deadline for the utility to clear up its credit line defaults.

``We don't have any indication'' the banks will extend their ``forbearance,'' 
said Ted Craver, chief financial officer of SoCal Edison parent Edison 
International (NYSE:EIX - news) in an investor conference call Tuesday 
afternoon.

Craver said the utility formally asked for an extension in a Tuesday morning 
conference call. Failure to get one could tip the utility much closer to 
bankruptcy, though Craver said the banks aren't looking to worsen the power 
crisis.

``My view of the relationship with the banks is that it's strong, and that 
they are, generally speaking, looking for ways to be cooperative and 
constructive in this process,'' he said.

SoCal Edison, California's No. 2 utility, and Pacific Gas & Electric Co., the 
No. 1 utility and unit of San Francisco-based PG&E Corp. (NYSE:PCG - news), 
are trying to avoid bankruptcy.

They have been unable to recover about $12 billion because of a rate freeze 
imposed under California's 1996 utility deregulation law, which has left them 
unable to pass on their soaring wholesale power costs to consumers.

SoCal Edison has about $800 million of debts due this week. On Thursday a 
grace period to pay about $206 million of principal and interest on a 
five-year note issue expires.

Pacific G&E and its parent are also in default of various credit lines.

Creditors including independent power suppliers Dynegy Inc. (NYSE:DYN - 
news), Mirant Corp. (NYSE:MIR - news) and Reliant Energy Inc. (NYSE:REI - 
news), meanwhile, are threatening to send both utilities into bankruptcy if 
they don't pay their debts.

Gov. Gray Davis and the state legislature are expected soon to create a plan 
that could allow the utilities to pay down some of their debt. Craver said 
``we're not betting the farm on getting a proposal'' by Friday.

Shares of Edison International, which is based in Rosemead, Calif., closed 
Tuesday on the New York Stock Exchange at $12.10, down 43 cents. PG&E shares 
closed on the Big Board at $12.30, down 25 cents.

Several bank lenders declined on Tuesday to discuss how they plan to address 
the utilities' defaults.

Bank One Corp. (NYSE:ONE - news), Citigroup Inc. (NYSE:C - news) and J.P. 
Morgan Chase & Co. (NYSE:JPM - news) are among PG&E's lenders, while Bank of 
America Corp. (NYSE:BAC - news), Citigroup and J.P. Morgan Chase are among 
the lenders to SoCal Edison and its parent.

``We do not comment on customer relations,'' said Bank One spokesman Tom 
Kelly. J.P. Morgan Chase declined to discuss the matter. Bank of America and 
Citigroup did not return phone calls. 

=09"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
=0902/14/2001 11:26 AM
=09Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
=09=09=20

The Senate Energy Committee met yesterday afternoon and passed two very
important bills.

SB 6x (Burton/Bowen), as amended, would establish a state power and
financing authority. The measure passed on a party-line vote with no
Republican votes.  What makes SB 6x interesting to IEP members is that is
provides financing through the Authority for environmental improvements to
existing powerplants 30 years or older.  IEP testified in support of the
bill if it was amended to bind Authority=01,s eminent domain powers.  Senat=
or
Burton agreed and IEP is currently drafting language on this issue.
Similarly, Burton agreed to work with Senator Morrow on language that would
limit the Authority to only supplementing private power generation and not
building power plants where they are not needed.   The amended version is
attached.

SB 33x, as amended, would authorize the Governor to enter into negotiations
with the IOUs to purchase their transmission system.  The Governor=01,s pla=
n
would have to be approved by the Legislature by only a majority vote.  If
approved the Treasurer would have the authority to issue revenue bonds to
pay for the transmission system.  This measure also passed on a party-line
vote.  IEP submitted written opposition to the bill as introduced, but will
continue to voice its concern with the state being both a market participan=
t
and owning the transmission system as the bill moves through the legislativ=
e
process.  The amended version is not in print yet.

Please contact me if you have any questions.

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - sbx1_6_bill_20010213_amended_sen.pdf

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/14/2001 01:39 PM
		 
Attached, please find a press release from Governor Davis regarding
distributed generation, renewable energy and co-generation.  Please
note, the Governor is advocating the elimination of stand-by charges.

http://www.governor.ca.gov/state/govsite/gov_htmlprint.jsp?BV_SessionID=@@@@11
72525339.0982192452@@@@&BV_EngineID=halkdjlkkhebemfcfkmchcng.0&sFilePath=%2fgo
vsite%2fpress_release%2f2001_02%2f20010214_pr054_distributed_generation.html&s
Title=GOVERNOR+DAVIS+ANNOUNCES+BILL+PACKAGE+TO+INCREASE+RENEWABLE+ENERGY,+DIST
RIBUTED+GENERATION+AND+CO-GENERATION&sCatTitle=Press+Release&iOID=13343

Greetings!  

Couple of things.

1) From the notes flying around, it looks like the "word-smithing" of the 
letter to the Governor continues.  We think you folks are doing exactly the 
right thing in sending a letter.  We intend to play an energetic and 
constructive role in the months ahead to help California come up with 
solutions that make competition work for everyone.  But for a variety of 
reasons I won't bore you with in this email, we're going to decline signing 
the letter.  If you'd like to discuss, feel free to give me a call at 
415.782.7822.

2) When's the next meeting, and when's the "annual retreat?"

All the best,
Jeff

yes.

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	02/14/2001 04:04 PM
		 
I am going to order the last of the 12 bottle units that I can order (per 
this memo below) but I do not want all 12 - do you guys want to share in this 
allocation?

<<...OLE_Obj...>> 

MEMORANDUM
1/24/01
* Please Post for those without Email *
TO:             Employees of Opus One, Robert Mondavi and Baron Philippe de 
Rothschild 
FROM:   Peter Ventura 
RE:             E&G Purchases of Opus One 

While demand for Opus One has grown significantly, case production has 
remained level if in fact not declined-and will decline further for the 1998 
vintage. This has lead to very strict allocations in the marketplace and a 
need to conserve. 
Please note as of March 1, 2001, for all employees and growers of Opus One, 
Robert Mondavi Winery and Baron Philippe de Rothschild, purchase limits on 
the current vintage of Opus One will change from twelve to six 750 ml. 
bottles per person.  We expect to offer the current vintage, the 1997, until 
October of this year, at which time the 1998 will be released.
Thank you in advance for your understanding and cooperation. 

Wow.  This guy sounds impressive!  I agree with Prentice's assessment (of 
course, I always agree with Prentice's assessment).

Best,
Jeff

Happy Valentine's Day to all.

	Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU>
	02/14/2001 01:59 PM
		 
This guy sounds like he knows what he's talking about.  I suggest we get 
the repairs done immediately and leave the tile for later.  Can you find 
out if he can finish before next weekend whatever needs to be done to have 
a fire safely?  I've been planning a trip with two friends of mine from 
school for a long time and it would really be a bummer to have to cancel 
it.  Thanks for working on this.

Also, about the $$, mom should have put aside $10,000 from grandpa ($5,000 
from me and Cameron each) that was supposed to go for replacing the 
roof.  This is much more important, so I suggest using that money.

Finally, we can get Jeff's friend Karen to help us with the tiles.  We will 
talk to her.

At 01:43 PM 2/14/2001 -0800, you wrote:
>Dotty:  Thought you and Jack might be interested in this report.
>
>Jeff: How do we go about getting  in touch with the person you mentioned to
>do the tiles?
>
>-----Original Message-----

Bill:  

Here's the coalition's proposed language to "fix" the Direct Access problem.

Best,
Jeff
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/14/2001 11:58 AM
		 
Jeff,

As requested, here is the direct access coalition language.

Speak to you soon.

Scott

 - DA Coalition.doc

Yes.  I'll be on the call.  FYI:  I'm here in Houston!  Best,Jeff

	Jennifer Rudolph@EES
	02/14/2001 02:59 PM
		 
Dial In: 800-991-9019
Passcode: 6207248
Time:  11:30 (CST)

Do you want me to page you with this call-in info?

Thanks a million.  You're very kind.  Whatever happens, happens, but it sure 
will be fun and exciting exploring the vine possibilities!  Happy Valentine's 
Day.

All the best,
Jeff

	"Dotty Hopkins" <dottyhop@napanet.net>
	02/12/2001 04:58 PM
		 
Yes, sorry I should have given you all her numbers .  Pager/vm 1 800
971-8798, cell 213 300-8463.
  Sure enjoyed our time with you.  Good luck with the vines.
Dotty
>
> Thanks again for your help, advice and Cristina's phone #.  We'll see
where
> it goes from here.  But I'm shocked.  I called Cristina, and NO answering
> machine.  I didn't think that happened anymore.  Any way of leaving her a
> message?  Thanks again.
>
> Best,
> Jeff
>

sure.  what's the price tag?

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	02/14/2001 07:02 PM
		 
4 for each of us?? 
yes. 

                                                                              
                       
                    Nancy 
Sellers                                                                    
<scottwl@hotmail.com>                             
                                                   cc:                        
                       
                                                   Subject:     FW: E & G 
Purchases of Opus One      
                                                                              
                       

I am going to order the last of the 12 bottle units that I can order (per 
this memo below) but I do not want all 12 - do you guys want to share in 
this allocation? 

                             <<...OLE_Obj...>> 

                                MEMORANDUM 

                                  1/24/01 

                  * Please Post for those without Email * 

TO:             Employees of Opus One, Robert Mondavi and Baron Philippe de 
Rothschild 

FROM:   Peter Ventura 

RE:             E&G Purchases of Opus One 

While demand for Opus One has grown significantly, case production has 
remained level if in fact not declined-and will decline further for the 
1998 vintage. This has lead to very strict allocations in the marketplace 
and a need to conserve. 

Please note as of March 1, 2001, for all employees and growers of Opus One, 
Robert Mondavi Winery and Baron Philippe de Rothschild, purchase limits on 
the current vintage of Opus One will change from twelve to six 750 ml. 
bottles per person.  We expect to offer the current vintage, the 1997, 
until October of this year, at which time the 1998 will be released. 

Thank you in advance for your understanding and cooperation. 

Sorry, but could you please print these out for me?  If the "eei.doc" is too 
long, please just print out the other two.  Thanks a million.

Best,
Jeff
	Christian Yoder@ECT
	02/14/2001 05:00 PM
		 
Christian Yoder

02/14/2001 02:57 PM
John,
For the call at 4, here are some contractual provisions, and a piece on CPUC 
talking points.  These are very much still in process and we reserve the 
right to modify our language or add new terms, but wanted to show you where 
we are in our thinking at this point. ----cgy

Hi Vicki:
I'll try to track it down.
Jeff

I'm told that APS filed against PG&E and "APEC"? also filed against PG&E.

Best,
Jeff

	Vicki Sharp@EES
	02/14/2001 07:17 PM
		 
FYI, the attached PGE filing makes mention of two complaints filed with the 
CPUC seeking collection of unpaid PX credits.  Peggy, if the press tracks 
these complaints down, you may get several press inquiries tomorrow. 
Jeff, can we figure out who filed  the other complaint?
Please forward as appropriate. 
Per your request, please see the attached.

	Mike D Smith@EES
	02/14/2001 05:37 PM
		 
Please see the bold language in the article below about PG&E's recent SEC 
filing.  Sounds like our "negative CTC's."  

Michael--do you have a copy of that SEC filing?  MDS

NEW YORK (Reuters) - PG&E Corp.(NYSE:PCG - news), embattled parent of Pacific 
Gas & Electric Co., said on Wednesday it is examining a restructuring of its 
bank loans and commercial paper, and that bank lenders on a $1 billion 
revolving credit facility to its California electric utility unit won't act 
upon that unit's previously announced default until March 6. 
San Francisco-based PG&E made the disclosures in a filing late Wednesday with 
the Securities and Exchange Commission (news - web sites) (SEC). The utility 
had about $1 billion in cash as of Tuesday, PG&E said. 
A similar bank deadline affecting credit lines of Southern California Edison 
(news - web sites), that state's No. 2 utility and a unit of Rosemead, 
Calif.-based Edison International(NYSE:EIX - news), was to expire on Tuesday. 
PG&E also said in its filing that as of Monday, Pacific G&E, California's No. 
1 utility, may not have paid as much as $433 million of ``energy credits'' to 
customers who have chosen to buy their electric energy from a provider other 
than Pacific G&E. The utility is required under state regulations to offer 
the credits, it said. 
Pacific G&E and SoCal Edison have been unable to recover about $12 billion 
because of a rate freeze imposed under California's 1996 utility deregulation 
law, which has left them unable to pass on their soaring wholesale power 
costs to consumers. 

OK, the powers that be have phoned.  I am to be there tomorrow and Wed.  
Tomorrow I'm huddle at the Woodlands all day.  But Wednesday I'll be in the 
office.  Perhaps coffee or lunch?  Could you forward to the lovely Ms Scott, 
since every time I type her name in, I get someone from ECT.  Can't wait to 
hear more about Herr Cherr-y.

Best,
Jeff

will do.  thanks.

	"Dotty Hopkins" <dottyhop@napanet.net>
	02/14/2001 07:18 PM
		 
She's at the farm equipment show in some god forsaven place for 2 days, so
use the cell #.
D

>
> Thanks a million.  You're very kind.  Whatever happens, happens, but it
> sure will be fun and exciting exploring the vine possibilities!  Happy
> Valentine's Day.
>
> All the best,
> Jeff
>
>
>
>                     "Dotty

you done good, fella.  how's life at 50 treating you?  it was great to see=
=20
you, and between you and me, i don't think that anyone would come close to=
=20
guessing that you're fifty.  i want you to know that i'm constantly trying =
to=20
figure out how i can get down to s.d. to spend some time together. it's=20
something that i very much look forward to, but i gotta tell you, man,=20
working for enron and attending UC's evening mba program is kicking my butt=
! =20

the good news is that enron has seen fit to promote me (senior director---o=
ne=20
notch below v.p.), and i didn't even have to move to houston....and cross=
=20
your fingers---if things work out i may sign a contract with a winemaker to=
=20
buy grapes from 10 acres of vines on the land that i bought on the=20
sonoma/mendocino coast (vines ain't planted yet; way it works is you get th=
e=20
contract from the winemaker and use the contract to finance the development=
=20
of the vines).  anything but a slam dunk, but i'm going to work hard (and=
=20
have fun) trying to make it happen.

it was great to see you in Oakland and thanks very much for the kind note. =
=20
you will always be an very dear friend and you can count on me showing up o=
n=20
your doorstep soon.  give jessica a hug and a kiss.

all the best,
jeff

p.s. confidentially, and i know you'd never take it, but ken lay's been=20
throwing your name around quite a bit as the "top choice" for a FERC=20
position.  also, (and i'll tell you more when we get together), i was on a=
=20
panel in new york with dan fessler!  he was the same, though arguably a=20
beaten, dejected man, based on what he did to California.

=09Jessie Knight <JKnight@sdchamber.org>
=0902/14/2001 08:34 PM
=09=09=20
Well,  Jessica is a different "kid" now.  How time flies.  Jessie
=20
Jessie J. Knight Jr.=20
President & CEO=20
San Diego Regional Chamber of Commerce=20
Look at what my boss wrote about me!
Carol H. Williams Management Team,

As most of you know, Jessica Knight is a part-time employee here at the=20
agency and has been a member of the Nissan Team for past 6 months. As part =
of=20
her development and education, starting Monday (February 19, 2001) Jessica=
=20
will become a =01&floater=018 here at the agency. This means that she will =
be=20
available to work on other accounts and projects where her skills and=20
abilities are needed. Jessica is skilled at using MS Word, MS Excel, MS=20
PowerPoint and searching the internet for information. Jessica has also=20
proven herself to be very bright and open to learning new advertising=20
processes.=20

To best manage this process, Jerry Scott and I will manage Jessica=01,s wor=
kload=20
and help set priority when necessary. Jessica is available Mondays and=20
Wednesdays (16 hour work week).=20

Please feel free to request Jessica=01,s assistance whenever you feel it is=
=20
needed.

Theodore Brown=20

Bill:  Here's some more info re: the direct access coalition.  Also, the 
contact information for our lobbyist in Sacramento is:

Scott Govenar
Governmental Advocates
916.448.8240

Best,
Jeff
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/14/2001 03:37 PM
		 
Attached, please find message points from the direct access coalition.

 - dacoalition.summary.doc

Yes, I'll put it on my calendar.  Can you come to SF?

FYI. 
	Susan J Mara
	02/15/2001 12:59 AM
		 
Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854
	"Beiser, Megan" <Megan.Beiser@edelman.com>
	02/14/2001 04:06 PM
		 
> The Governor held his press conference today at the co-generation plant at
> the University of California Medical Center in Sacramento.
> 
> All local TV, print and radio news media outlets sent representatives.
> 
> Although the focus of the news conference was supposed to be introduction
> of a legislative package promoting renewable energy, distributed
> generation and co-generation, it quickly turned to how the Governor will
> deal with the possible bankruptcy of the utilities.  The Governor said
> that it has "become increasingly obvious" to him that the best solution to
> the utilities' financial problems is the "acquisition of transmission
> lines."  He noted that the transmission lines are the utilities "most
> significant asset" and would be something the public would be able to get
> value from "in perpetuity."  He said the arrangement will likely be a
> "lease" of the utilities' lines, with the companies continuing to maintain
> them, "to capture [the utilities'] expertise."  Details of this plan will
> be announced on Friday, the Governor said.  The time and place for this
> announcement have yet to be released.
> 
> The Governor later said he felt the utilities' parent/holding companies
> should "be part of the solution" so there would be "shared pain" in
> reaching a solution.
> 
> The Governor said he suspected that acquisition of the transmission lines
> will involve the sale of revenue bonds, but he "didn't have enough wisdom"
> when asked about it to give a firm answer.  He said he believed he would
> have that wisdom on Friday. 
> 
> The Governor also commented on his plan to police and/or fine business
> establishments that keep their lights on after business hours.  He said he
> would announce a finalized plan on or around Mar. 15, a specific program
> to reduce by 50-70% the amount of energy used by retailers after-hours.
> 
> The Governor did outline the legislative package designed to promote
> renewable energy, distributed generation and co-generation through
> incentives, rebates and tax credits.  
> 
> The package contains:
> 1.) "Rebate Increase Bill": "Emerging Renewable Resources Account of the
> Renewable Resource Trust Fund" = $50 million to increase rebates for
> renewable distributed generation systems smaller than 10 kilowatts (this
> money will come from the General Fund)
> 
> 2.) Tax Credit Bill: SB 17X (Brulte): A 50% tax credit for the purchase
> and installation of renewable distributed generation systems larger than
> 10 kilowatts and up to 200 kilowatts for large facilities such as
> apartment complexes and businesses. 
> 
> 3.) Renewable Energy Loan Guarantee Program: AB 53X (Reyes): $50 million
> for a commercial loan guarantee program for renewable power systems,
> distributed generation and co-generation facilities. 
> 
> 4.)Retrofitting of Distributed Generation Facilities: This proposal will
> provide $20 million to achieve 40 MW of reduced peak load through
> retrofitting of natural gas distributed generation units at municipal
> water districts to improve environmental performance.  This involves
> retrofitting diesel and dirty natural gas generators with clean natural
> gas technology. 
> 
> 5.)Legislation to Exempt Microgeneration and Renewable Facilities Less
> than 1 MW from Standby Charges: Elimination of the standby charges paid by
> distributed generation end-use customers to the Investor Owned Utilities.
> This includes small co-generation facilities and only applies to units
> that generate less than one megawatt. 
> 
> ***********************************
> 
> Please find the text of the Governor's press release for this news
> conference below:
> 
> FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
> 02/14/2001 2:00 pm 
> 
> GOVERNOR DAVIS ANNOUNCES BILL PACKAGE TO INCREASE RENEWABLE ENERGY,
> DISTRIBUTED GENERATION AND CO-GENERATION 
> 
> SACRAMENTO 
> 
> Governor Gray Davis today announced a legislative package to provide
> incentives to power up more renewable energy, distributed generation and
> co-generation to help meet California's energy challenge.
> 
> "By investing in renewable energy sources, clean distributed generation
> and co-generation, we can increase our energy supply without taking power
> away from the grid," Governor Davis said. "My generation plan contains the
> most ambitious renewable energy program in the nation."
> 
> Distributed generation and co-generation are powerful tools for meeting
> California's power needs. These types of facilities reduce demand on the
> state power grid. They also provide energy independence from the
> Independent Systems Operator and the volatile spot market; advanced
> technology that creates jobs as well as power; and reliable energy sources
> that respect the environment.
> 
> Governor Davis' legislative package for distributed generation,
> co-generation and renewable energy includes:
> 
> 
> 1.   $50 million to increase rebates for renewable distributed generation
> systems smaller than ten kilowatts. 
> 2.   A 50% tax credit for the purchase and installation of renewable
> distributed generation systems larger than 10 kilowatts and up to 200
> kilowatts for large facilities such as apartment complexes and businesses.
> This will be carried in SB 17x by Senator Jim Brulte (R-Cucamonga). 
> 3.   $50 million for a commercial loan guarantee program for renewable
> power systems, distributed generation and co-generation facilities. This
> will be carried in AB 53x by Assemblymember Sarah Reyes (D-Fresno). 
> 4.   $20 million for retrofit of distributed generation owned by
> municipal water districts to improve environmental performance. This
> involves retrofitting diesel and dirty natural gas generators with clean
> natural gas technology. 
> 5.   Elimination of the standby charges paid by distributed generation
> end-use customers to the Investor Owned Utilities. This includes small
> co-generation facilities and only applies to units that generate less than
> one megawatt. 
> 
> 
> The Davis Administration will work closely with legislators to pass
> legislation to implement these proposals.
> 
> Co-generation is the simultaneous generation of electricity and heat or
> steam, usually on an industrial site. Typically, the electricity is sold
> to the grid and the heat or steam is used onsite in the industrial process
> 
> Distributed generation is a term used for a decentralized approach to
> generating electricity. Generally, the electricity is generated on the
> site where it is being used. It can include renewables (such as solar or
> wind power), fuel cells, and micro-generators.
> 
> Governor Davis made his announcement at the UC Davis Medical Center
> Co-Generation Plant in Sacramento. The plant supplies not only all of the
> electricity for the but all of the heating and cooling, for the UC Davis
> Medical Center. It produces 26 MW of power. Since the Medical Center needs
> less than half of that, the excess power is sold back to the ISO, which
> pays the Center's utility bills.
> 
> "The UC Davis Medical Center Co-Generation Plant is a self-sufficient
> facility," Governor Davis added. "It is an efficient facility. It is a
> clean facility. And it is the kind of facility that we need a lot more of
> to meet our peak energy demands."
> 
> Governor Davis' energy plan relies on three elements: stabilization,
> conservation and generation. The Governor is working with legislative
> leadership on a stabilization plan for the State's Investor Owned
> Utilities. Over the last several weeks, Governor Davis unveiled an
> aggressive plan for energy conservation that will help reduce demand and
> keep costs down and a plan to dramatically increase the supply of produced
> and sold in California. 
> 
> 
> ###
> 
> 

Laura:
Attached is a 1 1/2 pager that gives 1) the extensive list of folks who are 
in the coalition and 2) the message points that they'll be using in a meeting 
that will take place today with Senator Bowen and other stakeholders to 
discuss "fixing" AB 1X's prohibition on Direct Access.

Best,
Jeff
---

 - dacoalition.summary.doc

thanks.  are you getting just opus, or overture and opus?

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/14/2001 03:37 PM
		 
Attached, please find message points from the direct access coalition.

 - dacoalition.summary.doc

Very sweet.  Thank you very much.

we likely come by friday nite to pick up annie to go to the dome, and then we 
can come back early on monday to pick up wine and kick your butts at spades?

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	02/14/2001 11:53 AM
		 
Dad is picking up 2 cases of champagne for each of you tomorrow.  Please send 
me a check for $129.00 each. 
Jeff, if you guys are coming to Napa this weekend it is fine to bring the 
check along with the one for the zin ($146.29) for a total of $275.29.  We 
won't be home on Friday night but your wine will be at the house (probably 
still in the truck).:
2 cases Coastal Zin 
2 cases Domaine Magnums. 
Will you be back on Monday??  Could pick it all up then if you 
want...Cameron's too?? 

I don't know if they have the authority, and I could be wrong, but this looks 
like an obvious set up by the administration.  Hold up a report from your 
auditor that sez, "it makes now sense to have the two separate, Poolco is the 
only way to go, and they must be merged."  Then legislation is launched, on 
the basis of the auditor's recommendation, to merge the PX and the ISO in 
California.  Looks like an audit whose message we'll want to pre-empt well in 
advance of the report going public.

Susan J Mara
09/18/2000 03:44 PM
Does the state of CA have the authority to do this?
 Market Participants:

Attached please find a notice from the state auditor informing the ISO that
it will undertake an audit of the operations of the Independent System
Operator and its relationship with the California Power Exchange.  The
notice sets forth the Goverment Code sections that the state auditor relies
on for access to ISO records and property (the notice suggests that the
state auditor has access to all ISO records and property) and states how the
state auditor will treat confidential information.  The state auditor has
scheduled a meeting with the ISO to commence the audit process on Monday
September 18.  ISO provides this notice in accordance with Tariff section
20.3.4, and requests that Market Participant's inform the ISO by noon on
Friday of any concerns to jsole@caiso.com <mailto:jsole@caiso.com> , tel
916-608-7144.

Jeanne M. Sol,
Regulatory Counsel
California ISO
(916) 608-7144
The Foregoing e-Mail Communication (Together With Any Attachments Thereto)
Is Intended For The Designated Recipient(s) Only. Its Terms May Be
Confidential And Protected By Attorney/Client Privilege or Other Applicable
Privileges.  Unauthorized Use, Dissemination, Distribution, Or Reproduction
Of This Message Is Strictly Prohibited.

 
 - 9-14-1st page audit.pdf
 - 9-14Audit2.pdf

	Joseph Alamo
	02/14/2001 11:50 AM
		 
	Joseph Alamo
	02/13/2001 04:57 PM
	
Lawmakers failed to respond to energy alarm

(Published Feb. 13, 2001) 

Now that state lawmakers have begun an inquiry to determine what caused 
California's energy crisis, they might want to take a look in the mirror. 
Not at the infamous 1996 vote that triggered the partial deregulation of the 
electricity industry. The remains of that law have been picked over enough. 
Besides, most of the people who voted for it have already left the 
Legislature, thanks to term limits. 
But there was another vote last June, far less heralded and still little 
known. It came just as warning bells were starting to signal the onset of 
what has since become a crippling crisis. The Legislature not only ignored 
those alarms, it stood in the way of the people who were trying to respond. 
Why it did so remains something of a mystery. How it did so says a lot about 
the way the Legislature works. 
At issue was the now-defunct California Power Exchange. This was a 
state-mandated auction, until recently the only place that utilities were 
allowed to shop for the electricity that lights our homes and businesses. By 
last June there were ominous signs that the power exchange, known as the PX, 
wasn't working right. Prices were higher than anyone expected. The supply of 
energy seemed thinner than was reasonable. There were enormous overhead 
costs. 
The power exchange was a bit like having a single automobile auction where 
everyone who wanted to buy or sell a car had to do business. In times of 
surplus this might work, because the sellers would underbid each other to 
unload their cars to reluctant buyers. But in a shortage, the opposite would 
be true. Buyers, with no place else to go, would pay ever-higher prices to 
get what they needed. That's what was happening with electricity. 
A majority of the Public Utilities Commission decided to do something about 
it. The PUC voted 3-2 to allow privately formed exchanges to compete with the 
state-sanctioned auction. At least two private exchanges were promising to 
deliver more power at lower prices with fewer administrative costs. The 
commission wanted to let them give it a try. 
But before the PUC could even implement the change, the Legislature 
intervened. Acting with unusual speed, lawmakers overturned the commission's 
decision. 
Assembly Bill 2866 was a classic legislative bill, in the worst sense. A 
cobbled-together collection of 28 unrelated items, it was drafted in a hurry 
as a companion to the new state budget. One of the bill's many parts was a 
provision to subsidize California's film industry. That got a lot of 
attention. The paragraph overturning the PUC's attempt to head off the energy 
crisis got next to none. The bill was amended in the Senate on June 15 and 
approved later that day. The Assembly passed it the next day, and Gov. Gray 
Davis signed it. 
The analysis of the bill that members saw in the Assembly was cryptic and 
misleading. It said the bill would authorize the PUC to study the idea of 
allowing competition for the state-mandated exchange. That was true as far as 
it went. But the analysis omitted the fact that the bill's real intent was 
just the opposite: to reverse a PUC decision and prohibit competing exchanges 
for at least a year. 
"California had made a big investment in the power exchange," said Sen. Jim 
Brulte, R-Rancho Cucamonga, who was one of probably just a handful of 
legislators who knew about the provision before it became law. "The PUC 
decision would have put that investment at risk." Which is another way of 
saying that the power exchange wasn't working and had to be protected from 
competition. 
Richard Bilas, the PUC commissioner who was pushing the hardest for the 
reform the Legislature overturned, said he never liked the idea of mandating 
a single exchange in which the utilities would have to buy all their power. 
Bilas wasn't a member of the commission when the PUC restructured 
California's electricity industry. But he said the result reminded him of the 
former Soviet Union, where leaders declared that they were going to move to a 
market economy and then appointed a group of central planners to figure out 
how those markets should function. 
"Markets are not based on fictitious or created exchanges," he said. "Markets 
are based on buyers and sellers coming face to face to negotiate a deal. You 
don't establish beforehand something that may not be necessary." 
It's still not clear whether opening up the markets would have prevented the 
price spikes that have since nearly bankrupted the utilities, forcing the 
state to step in and buy electricity to keep the lights on. It might be a 
stretch to suggest that any single policy change could have prevented the 
crisis. But we will never know. 
The Legislature, acting in haste and with little information, kept us from 
finding out. The California Power Exchange, which the Legislature was so 
eager to protect from competition, collapsed of its own weight anyway, and is 
now out of business. 
The law preventing other exchanges from entering the market was quietly 
repealed two weeks ago, seven very long months after it was adopted.

I'd send to Leff for distribution.

	Karen Denne
	02/12/2001 03:52 PM
		 
Any idea who this would go to?
	"M. Kavanaugh" <kavanaughm@interquest.de>
	02/10/2001 12:04 PM
	Please respond to kavanaughm
		 
Hello, and thank you for taking time to answer my question.

Your company was recently awarded $1,650,000 from a project called AB 970
(Demand Responsiveness Program) from the California Energy Commission. I
have read the simple paragraph of the overall concept of the program.
But,can you please provide me specifics on what you plan to do with that
money?

I am also looking for information that you can provide concerning if you
will be working with a company named Conectisys Corp with regards to this
program and two way communications devices or advanced metering devices.

Thank you for you time with this matter.

Sincerely,

Michael Kavanaugh
mkavanaugh@hotmail.com

My apologies.  I'm going to send you a few things that I need to print out.  
Thanks a bunch.
Jeff
	Cindy Derecskey
	02/12/2001 09:29 AM
		 
Hi Jeff,

As a member of the University Affairs department we try to capitalize on 
opportunities that facilitate the exchange of intellectual capital.  I 
realize that you are extremely busy, but it would be fabulous if you, or 
someone else in your immediate department could help us answer this question 
for the University of Liverpool.  Let me know if you think someone will have 
the time to generate an answer to this question...obviously it is NOT a rush.

Regards,

Cindy

	Eddie Ping <gg0u8060@liverpool.ac.uk>
	02/12/2001 04:47 AM
		 
Dear Sir/Madam,

We are a small group of geography students from the University Of
Liverpool, England.  We will be visiting Santa Cruz in April on an
educational research visit and are  focussing our research on the current
Californian energy crisis.  One aspect that we are considering looking at
is effect of the energy crisis on the high-tech industries in and around
Santa Cruz.  However, the information available at present is limited.
Therefore, we would appreciate any help or advise you could give us or pass
this e-mail on to somebody else who may be able to assist us.  

Has the energy crisis reached Santa Cruz or Silicon Valley yet and if so
has it/will have any affect on the high-tech industries?  Have any measures
been taken to mitigate its effects or is it of no concern?

We understand that you are very busy but would appreciate any feedback on
this subject that you may be able to give us.

Thank you for your time and we look forward to hearing from you.

Eddie Ping, Martin Price & Ric Mason

	James D Steffes
	02/11/2001 02:51 PM
		 
Attached is Mary Schoen's analysis of Gov. Davis' Executive Order on 
expediting siting and maximizing output. 

I have asked Mary to try and identify the # of MWs that may be impacted by 
these actions.

Jim

	Mary Schoen
	02/09/2001 03:58 PM
		 
Below is a brief summary of the five Executive Orders issued by Governor 
Davis on 2/9/01.  

For those of you that want the Cliff Notes Version:

These Orders appear to be an attempt to accomplish three things:

1.  Expedite Siting for New Powerplants and Expansions or Modifications of 
Existing Powerplants
2.  Maximize Output and Minimize Outages at Existing Facilities
3.  Centralize Authority and/or Mitigate Issues Impacting Powerplant Siting 
and Construction

The tone is both one of we feel your pain in the complexity of permitting 
powerplants; and that we will tolerate no excuses for not running at full 
capacity.  (ie; the carrot and the stick)

They also includes some targeted incentives to encourage powerplant operators 
to sell their power under contract to the State Dept. of Water.

Some of the critical issues impacting the effectiveness of these orders will 
be:

- How much capacity is truly "idling" and will be able to be brought back on 
line or increase its output?
- Will the state be able to better manage air quality issues and create 
flexibility within the framework allowed by the Clean Air Act in order to 
positively change the air quality issues impacting power plant construction 
and operation?
- How quickly can the accelerated permitting procedures be implemented and 
how soon will we see movements in the market to increase new generation given 
the other issues in CA?

We will continue to analyze the impacts of these orders, but wanted to get 
information to you in a timely manner.

D-22-01  Increased Output/Expedited Siting Mandates 
  
CEC exemption from siting requirements for increased output by existing power 
generators. 
- limited to less than 50MWs using existing installed capacity b/w 
06/01-10/01/01 

Expedited processing of applications for certification of existing thermal 
powerplants that require retooling and a current license to operate.

Accelerated review from all agencies involved in the licensing of proposed 
thermal powerplants.

Action by the State Water Resources Control Board  to insure wastewater 
issues do not preclude thermal powerplants from operating.

Requirements for the State Dept. of Water Resources to purchase power from 
powerplants using renewables and other resources that may currently have not 
other market for their power.

Expires  12/31/01 unless extended

Analysis:

This Order is intended to take away the excuses for why some powerplants are 
currently not operating or not operating at full capacity.  It does not waive 
air quality requirements (they are addressed in a separate order).  

D-23-01  Appropriate Maintenance and Efficient Operation Requirements

ISO Requirements:
- Require generators to submit planned outage schedules to the ISO
- Prepare a coordinated outage plan to be updated quarterly
- Identify generation maintenance criteria to be met by generation facilities
- Maintain records of any unplanned generation facility outages and provide 
those records to Electricity Oversight Board
- Conduct independent audits of generation facilities that have fallen below 
performance benchmarks est. by the ISO
- Consider seeking the authority under state law of federal regulation to 
impose fines on those generation facility owners whose generation facilities 
have fallen     below performance benchmarks est. by the ISO

Requires that the Electricity Oversight Board review the ISO Tariffs and 
Protocols to identify any necessary revisions to increase the ISO's ability 
to ensure adequate power during peak demand.

Instructs the CPUC to ensure that generation facilities still owned by 
utilities are operated as required to maintain reliability.

Requires the Electricity Oversight Board to propose legislation to expand its 
authority to issue audits of generation facilities that do not meet est. 
benchmarks for availability and performance, and issue fines against those 
plants, after a hearing.

Analysis:

Again, the tone of this order is that the state won't tolerate outages as an 
excuse for not generating.  It is also an attempt to better manage planned 
outages to prevent situations that happened last fall when too many plants 
where off-line for maintenance at the same time.

D-24-01  Air Pollution Flexibility and Mitigation Measures

Mandates that local air districts modify emissions limits that limit hours of 
operation in air quality permits to ensure that power generation facilities 
that provide power under contract to the Dept. of Water Resources are not 
restricted in their ability to operate.
- Requires air districts to require a mitigation fee for all applicable 
emissions in excess of the previous limits
- If air districts do not comply, the Board (CARB?) shall impose 
modifications on the permits in lieu of districts

The Board shall establish an emissions reduction credit bank using emissions 
reductions from all available sources:
- Credits will be made available to powerplant peaking sources that need 
emissions offsets in order to add new or expand peaking capacity for the 
Summer Peak Season in 2001
- In the case of powerplants that agree to sell their power under contract to 
the Dept. of Water Resources, CA will make available where necessary and 
available the required emissions credits at up to a 50 percent reduction,
- In order to maximize the amount of electrical generating capacity, 
emissions reduction credits for new generation capacity shall be provided to 
facilities where necessary and available.
- Proceeds from the sales of these emission reduction credits shall be made 
available to fund emissions reduction programs in the air district where the 
new or expanded facility is located.

Expires 12/31/2001 unless extended

Analysis:

This order requires the air districts to modify permit limits on run hours 
for air quality reasons by allowing those powerplants that sell to the Dept. 
of Water to pay a mitigation fee and creates an emission reduction credit 
bank available for use by other sources.  There are a lot of details that 
remain to be clarified, including how the state is going to locate emissions 
reduction credits where developers were unsuccessful.  However, it is a step 
in the right direction by creating flexibility and beginning to drive 
authority back to the state level.

D-25-01  Acceleration the Construction and Upgrading of Approved Powerplants

Expedites review and approval of post-certification amendments to increase 
output from thermal powerplants by the Energy Commission.

Authorizes the Energy Commission to suspends the requirements of the statutes 
and regulations that normally control post-certifications to the extent that 
they impact prompt mitigation of this emergency.

Requires the Energy Commission to establish milestones for both initiation of 
construction within one year of certification, and for the construction phase 
of the project.  Failure to meet milestones without prior approval by Energy 
Commission based on a showing of good cause shall constitute forfeiture of 
the certification.

Expires 12/31/01 unless extended

Analysis

Again, no excuses for not getting your powerplant modifications approved and 
completed in a timely manner.

D-26-01  Accelerating the Availability of New Generation Sources

Requires all relevant agencies shorten the review periods to 7 days for 
required environmental impact documents prepared under CEQA for all 
powerplants that are not subject to the Energy Commission (under 50MWs) and 
that are proposed to be on line by summer 2001.

 Energy Commission shall expedite its licensing process in the following ways:
- Expedite processing of applications for peaking or renewable powerplants 
for construction and operation by July 31, 2001.
-Peaking or renewable powerplants that have a current contract with the ISO 
and can be online by July 2001 may also apply to be permitted by the Energy 
Commission under the emergency siting process.
-Rules which provide a license for a simple cycle thermal powerplant within 
four months, shall apply to any proposed simple-cycle thermal powerplant that 
can be brought on line by August 31, 2002  and that have an application for 
certification complete by Dec. 31. 2001.
-Under regulations for the expedited licensing of powerplants, emission 
offset credits are not required at the time of filing an application for 
certification
-The Energy Commission shall conduct a study of potential peaking power sites 
in the state and prepare a report by 02/21/01  identifying those areas of the 
state that would benefit from the installation of peaking powerplants to 
augment supplies and ensure reliability through the summer of 2003.

IOUs must complete necessary interconnection studies within 7 days of receipt 
of completed application.

Expires 12/31/01 unless extended.

Analysis:

This is an attempt to accelerate the permitting of smaller sources and 
peaking units.

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/08/2001 01:52 PM
		 
Attached, please find a series of Executive Orders from Governor Davis
related to siting and existing generation.

 - EXECUTIVE ORDERs.doc

sue nord's place.  sort of kitty-korner to you.

Greetings folks:
I have a meeting from 9-1 tomorrow that I must attend.  Any chance of doing 
at 8 am.  Apologies for the conflict.
Jeff

	Julie Armstrong
	02/15/2001 08:55 AM
		
I have scheduled 9:30 Friday for a meeting with Danny.  The video conference 
rooms were booked.  How about having the meeting in Danny's office and we 
conference in Drew?  Please advise.

Jeffery Fawcett
02/14/2001 04:57 PM
Julie,
We had a great idea (but poor execution) to get together with Danny this 
morning.  Even though I'm going to be out on Friday, if Danny is available, 
could you block off about 30 minutes in the a.m. for Drew, Susan, Jeff 
Dasovich and myself to run an idea past him?  If Danny asks, let him know 
we're trying to weigh the merits of filing to build an expansion into the 
state of California.  Whether we ultimately build it or not isn't the issue 
as much as whether the threat of another pipeline could motivate the 
utilities and the CPUC to build additonal take-away capacity for TW 
shippers.  I think Steve Harris is out of town for the rest of the week.  If 
not, we'll certainly want to plug him in also.  Will you let me know in the 
a.m.?  Thanks.

I'd vote for 8.

	Julie Armstrong
	02/15/2001 09:20 AM
		
I can schedule 8:30 or 2:00 on Danny's calendar tomorrow.  Please advise 
which time.

Jeffery Fawcett
02/15/2001 09:09 AM
I'm OK with 8 o'clock, but the gang may have to put up with cell phone static 
and the occassional peeps out of my kids in the back seat (I'm off tomorrow 
and will be packing the kids up to head out about 7:45 a.m.).

Greetings folks:
I have a meeting from 9-1 tomorrow that I must attend.  Any chance of doing 
at 8 am.  Apologies for the conflict.
Jeff

	Julie Armstrong
	02/15/2001 08:55 AM
		
I have scheduled 9:30 Friday for a meeting with Danny.  The video conference 
rooms were booked.  How about having the meeting in Danny's office and we 
conference in Drew?  Please advise.

Jeffery Fawcett
02/14/2001 04:57 PM
Julie,
We had a great idea (but poor execution) to get together with Danny this 
morning.  Even though I'm going to be out on Friday, if Danny is available, 
could you block off about 30 minutes in the a.m. for Drew, Susan, Jeff 
Dasovich and myself to run an idea past him?  If Danny asks, let him know 
we're trying to weigh the merits of filing to build an expansion into the 
state of California.  Whether we ultimately build it or not isn't the issue 
as much as whether the threat of another pipeline could motivate the 
utilities and the CPUC to build additonal take-away capacity for TW 
shippers.  I think Steve Harris is out of town for the rest of the week.  If 
not, we'll certainly want to plug him in also.  Will you let me know in the 
a.m.?  Thanks.

As he said in the note, we can wait on the tile.  We'll contact our pal 
karen, the tiling queen, and report back.  sound reasonable?

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	02/15/2001 10:14 AM
		 
I gave dad a check this morning for $700 to get this underway.  What about 
the tile? 
 Agree with PP's assessment also.  I don't always agree with PP's 
assessment. 

Cameron Sellers 
Vice President, Business Development 
PERFECT 
1860 Embarcadero Road - Suite 210 
Palo Alto, CA 94303 
cameron@perfect.com 
650.798.3366 (direct dial) 
650.269.3366 (cell) 
650.858.1095 (fax) 
Wow.  This guy sounds impressive!  I agree with Prentice's assessment (of 
course, I always agree with Prentice's assessment). 
Best, 
Jeff 
Happy Valentine's Day to all. 

  
                    Prentice Sellers 
  

This guy sounds like he knows what he's talking about.  I suggest we get 
the repairs done immediately and leave the tile for later.  Can you find 
out if he can finish before next weekend whatever needs to be done to have 
a fire safely?  I've been planning a trip with two friends of mine from 
school for a long time and it would really be a bummer to have to cancel 
it.  Thanks for working on this. 
Also, about the $$, mom should have put aside $10,000 from grandpa ($5,000 
from me and Cameron each) that was supposed to go for replacing the 
roof.  This is much more important, so I suggest using that money. 
Finally, we can get Jeff's friend Karen to help us with the tiles.  We will 
talk to her. 
At 01:43 PM 2/14/2001 -0800, you wrote: 
>Dotty:  Thought you and Jack might be interested in this report. 
> 
>Jeff: How do we go about getting  in touch with the person you mentioned 
to 
>do the tiles? 
> 
>-----Original Message----- 

It's rough, but Paul and I concluded that, since I'll be in Houston, best 
that I send out whatever I have by COB today.  I will be working on this more 
on the plane on my way to Houston.  Now we have Sandi's, Paul's and this, all 
of which I think are headed in the same direction and complement one 
another.  We'll need to meld them.  Please look at all 3 at the same time.  
Might be useful to begin an email conversation now with folks comments.  I'm 
reachable and will be back in the office on Thursday.

Best,
Jeff

no information is yet public.  you may want to see if they have a website and 
if there's any information there.

best,
jeff

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	02/15/2001 11:12 AM
		 
By NANCY RIVERA BROOKS, DAN MORAIN, Times Staff Writers

     The California energy crisis is hurtling along two tracks--one the slow 
lane of legislative politics, the other the hyper-speed autobahn of high 
finance. 

     As Stage 3 electricity alerts and billion-dollar debts mount, some 
travelers on those intersecting byways are strapping themselves in for what 
they see as a looming pileup, perhaps at the doors of the U.S. Bankruptcy 
Court. 

     Wall Street is becoming increasingly irritated with the deliberative 
pace of the California Legislature and Gov. Gray Davis and his months of 
unfulfilled vows of a remedy. 

     Those owed money by Southern California Edison and Pacific Gas & 
Electric said Wednesday that they cannot not wait forever to be paid. 

     "The pace of progress is not sufficient," said Joe Bob Perkins, 
president of Reliant Energy, a major power supplier in the state. "Our 
accounts receivable from the past aren't being taken care of and the bleeding 
is growing." 

     In Sacramento, no immediate first aid is on the way. 
     Davis, who says he will announce his latest plan to solve the utilities' 
financial meltdown on Friday, left little doubt on Wednesday that he intends 
to press for a state takeover of the massive electricity transmission system, 
despite its huge value to the utilities. But key legislators predict that, no 
matter what the governor proposes, they are at least two weeks away from 
passing legislation to improve the situation. 

     Bob Foster, the Edison official who oversees governmental affairs, said 
the question of bankruptcy is "a day-to-day thing. There are signs that 
creditors are getting increasingly nervous, increasingly impatient." 

     "We were told last week that there will be a proposal from the 
administration, and we're still waiting," Foster said. 

     Senate President Pro Tem John Burton (D-San Francisco) said that if 
Davis and lawmakers cannot resolve the matter within the next two weeks, "we 
aren't going to be able to solve it, and it will be in other people's hands." 

     Edison and PG&E have said they do not want to file for bankruptcy 
protection and will do so only if forced by their creditors. A prelude to 
bankruptcy, the formation of creditors committees, already has begun. Each 
utility can be forced into bankruptcy by as few as three creditors owed as 
little as $10,775 in unsecured debts, bankruptcy experts say. 

     "We respectfully believe that the state has less time than they might 
otherwise think," Gary Dunton, president and chief executive officer of MBIA 
Inc., a firm that insures $1.3 billion of the utilities' debt. 

     "If someone called me an hour from now [to announce a bankruptcy 
filing]," Dunton added, "I wouldn't be surprised. We have been very clear 
that we are frustrated with the timing, and apparent lack of urgency. 

     "If you have 100 people cooking a stew, it may never be edible." 
     Not everyone, however, believes that the prolonged legislative process 
will make much difference in the long run, despite the howls from creditors' 
and utilities. 

     "I don't sense that there is a sense of urgency," said Assemblyman 
George Runner Jr. (R-Lancaster). Runner, like other legislators, pointed to 
repeated deadlines that have come and gone without a bankruptcy, and said: 
"Crying wolf can go so far." 

     Some legislators blame Davis for the delays. 

     "The Legislature will pass enabling legislation. But people are waiting 
to hear from [the governor's] corner office," said Assembly Republican leader 
Bill Campbell of Villa Park, who has not conferred with Davis for a week. "We 
think it is serious. But it is a frustrating situation." 

     Some lawmakers in Sacramento believe that not all the legislative gears 
are in sync, thus complicating progress. They say Davis has positioned 
himself politically so that the Legislature will carry the brunt of the blame 
when potential rate increases come into effect. 

     "The governor is out there saying no more rate increases and that he's 
on the side of consumers, while we have to do the dirty work," fumed an 
Assembly Democrat, who requested anonymity out of fear that his comments 
would only inflame an already tense relationship between the executive and 
the Legislature. 

     That irritation grew among Assembly Democrats when a poll they recently 
commissioned showed the Legislature's approval rating had dropped 25 points, 
while Davis' rating remained relatively high. The poll, conducted in late 
January by the Sacramento firm Moore Methods, showed Davis with a 45% 
approval rating, compared with only 25% for the Legislature. 

     Meanwhile, the cost to the state treasury of buying power is rocketing 
toward $2 billion, as the Department of Water Resources buys electricity 
because utilities are no longer able to borrow money. 

     "Giving [away] $2 billion that could have gone to build schools, 
housing, highways and help lower taxes for consumers . . . is a moral 
outrage," said Harvey Rosenfield of the Foundation for Taxpayer and Consumer 
Rights. 

     In the meantime, the electricity bills--and defaults by the two 
utilities--continue to swell with no end in sight. 

     California's power plant owners, already frustrated by the hundreds of 
millions of dollars they haven't been paid by the state's two biggest 
utilities, fear that the debt is growing by millions of dollars a day--even 
after the state ponied up taxpayers money to buy electricity for the 
utilities. That's because power purchasers for the state are refusing to pay 
for all of the electricity that grid operators order on a last-minute basis 
to prevent blackouts. 

     Growing anxious over the slow pace of progress in Sacramento, generators 
are looking for help from the courts and from state and federal regulators. 
They won a victory Wednesday when federal regulators ruled that power 
suppliers cannot be forced to bear the risk that they won't get paid when 
grid operators order them to supply emergency power. 

     Davis said Wednesday that the ongoing snags in buying power are being 
worked out. The lingering problem of the utilities' estimated $12.7 billion 
in electricity debts, Davis said, can be fixed by the state's purchase of the 
transmission grid. The money paid to the utilities for the grid--which would 
have to be negotiated--plus lease payments the state would make to the 
utilities to continue operating the 32,000 miles of high-voltage wires, would 
infuse the companies with enough cash to restructure their debt. 

     "We're talking about a financial transaction that has value to both 
sides," Davis said. "It has become increasingly clear to me that we cannot 
accomplish that without purchasing the transmission lines." 

     Although Davis voiced his support of taking over the utilities' 
moneymaking transmission system, he has not conferred with companies' 
executives for a week. In fact, they learned of it from press accounts. 

     "It's all just a giant game of chicken," a top utility executive said, 
asking that he not be identified. "But I'm worried that the administration is 
going to overplay its hand and leave us with no options." 

* * *
     Times staff writers James F. Peltz, Nicholas Riccardi, Stuart 
Silverstein, Rone Tempest, Nancy Vogel and Jenifer Warren contributed to this 
story. 

Chris/Christian:

Here's a quick and dirty summary.  Apologies that it ain't proofed.  Please 
provide any edits that you deem necessary to make it accurate and cogent.  
Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks for the congratulations.  What is Stormin' Norman asking for?

Good luck.  If it's not too much trouble, an email summarizing the day's 
festivities would be helpful. Parquet ever get in touch with you?

Got your message.  Just as soon as we get out from under the deliverables Lay 
needs for Brulte, I'll turn to figuring how to get Delaney hooked up with 
decision makers that can make a difference in California.  Is next week too 
late for meetings?

Best,
Jeff

Please forward my apologies for missing the call.  I ended up receiving a 
"fire-drill" assignment that needs to get done in the next couple of hours.  
I'll try to loop back toward the end of the day and update you on what's 
going on.  Very sorry about that.

Best,
Jeff

Key Barriers to Distributed Generation

Excessive and Unnecessary Utility Stand-by Charges
Solution: The executive orders issued by the Governor on February 14th took=
 a=20
step in the right direction.  Utility stand-by charges have always been=20
designed by the utilities to protect their monopoly position, extract=20
monopoly prices from customers, or both.  But there is no reason to limit t=
he=20
elimination of these charges to generation facilities that are less than=20
1MW.  These limits will only lengthen unnecessarily the time it takes for=
=20
California to close the significant gap between supply and demand and reduc=
e=20
the risk of black outs.  We would propose lifting the cap through amendment=
s=20
to SB27X, which is designed to facilitate development of distributed=20
generation.
=20
Excessive delays and costs related to interconnecting facilities with=20
investor-owned and municipal utilities
Solution:   The Governor=01,s executive order regarding interconnection is =
a=20
step in the right direction=01*D-D-26-01 requires utilities to complete=20
interconnection studies within 7 days.)  However, the financial conflicts t=
he=20
utilities face in interconnecting facilities are simply too powerful to=20
overcome through executive orders or other regulations.  The only effective=
,=20
sustainable solution is to shift all control over interconnection away from=
=20
the utility and place that control with the California ISO.  This could be=
=20
accomplished through amendments to SB 27X.

Permitting and Air Quality Issues
Developers of distributed (i.e., =01&on-site=018) generation that is 50 MWs=
 or=20
greater must receive certification from the California Energy Commission an=
d=20
therefore faces all of the impediments to development that large-scale=20
generation faces. =20

Solution: California should ensure that the executive orders (D-22-01 thru=
=20
D-26-01) issued by the Governor to expedite plant siting and maximize plant=
=20
output apply equally to smaller scale, =01&distributed generation=018 facil=
ities.=20
In addition, distributed generation that is less than 50 MWs continues to=
=20
face local opposition.  The State should ensure that local, parochial=20
interests cannot block otherwise beneficial distributed generation projects=
. =20
These could be accomplished through amendments to SB27X.

Hi:
you taking the afternoon off?  If so, have a great afternoon!

Best,
Jeff

Happy holiday to you, too.  Is it too late to request that tonite's class 
(Tasker--Financial Information Analysis) get taped?

Best,
Jeff

Jeff Dasovich
09/18/2000 07:23 PM
It's rough, but Paul and I concluded that, since I'll be in Houston, best 
that I send out whatever I have by COB today.  I will be working on this more 
on the plane on my way to Houston.  Now we have Sandi's, Paul's and this, all 
of which I think are headed in the same direction and complement one 
another.  We'll need to meld them.  Please look at all 3 at the same time.  
Might be useful to begin an email conversation now with folks comments.  I'm 
reachable and will be back in the office on Thursday.

Best,
Jeff

Jim:
It was a pleasure speaking with you yesterday.  Based on our conversation,=
=20
this email includes the following:

An Enron contact to discuss developing small-scale, distributed generation =
on=20
Tribal lands.

Our views on the impediments to small scale, distributed generation and=20
suggestions on how to remove those impediments.

A description of the credit issues that continue to impede DWR=01,s ability=
 to=20
sign contracts with power suppliers, and options to resolve them. Two=20
possible options for addressing the credit issue are 1) a California PUC=20
order clarifying that DWR will recover its power purchase costs through=20
rates, and 2) an amendment to AB1X designed to accomplish the same goal.  I=
=20
have attached talking points regarding the California PUC order and propose=
d=20
amendments to AB1X.  We believe that an amendment to AB1X is the preferable=
=20
option.

Our assessment of the supply/demand picture in California and the West.

Our suggestions for a legislative package designed to solve both the near-=
=20
and long-term electricity crisis in California.  We will deliver to your=20
office tomorrow detailed legislative language.  In those materials we will=
=20
also identify existing bills that we believe can easily accommodate our=20
proposed language.

I hope that the information is useful.  Please do not hesitate to contact m=
e=20
if you would like to discuss these materials further, or if there is anythi=
ng=20
else that I can do to assist you.

Regards,
Ken

1. Contact Information to Discuss Interest Expressed by Native American=20
Tribes in Installing Small-scale Generation on  Tribal Lands

David Parquet, Vice-President

2. Key Barriers to Distributed Generation

Excessive and Unnecessary Utility Stand-by Charges
Solution: The executive orders issued by the Governor on February 14th took=
 a=20
step in the right direction.  Utility stand-by charges have always been=20
designed by the utilities to protect their monopoly position, extract=20
monopoly prices from customers, or both.  But there is no reason to limit t=
he=20
elimination of these charges to generation facilities that are less than=20
1MW.  These limits will only lengthen unnecessarily the time it takes for=
=20
California to close the significant gap between supply and demand and reduc=
e=20
the risk of black outs.  We would propose lifting the cap through amendment=
s=20
to SB27X, which is designed to facilitate development of distributed=20
generation.
=20
Excessive delays and costs related to interconnecting facilities with=20
investor-owned and municipal utilities
Solution:   The Governor=01,s executive order regarding interconnection is =
a=20
step in the right direction=01*D-D-26-01 requires utilities to complete=20
interconnection studies within 7 days.  California should ensure that this=
=20
requirement applies to all generation facilities, including distributed=20
generation.  In addition, the financial conflicts the utilities face when=
=20
interconnecting generation facilities are simply too powerful to overcome=
=20
through executive orders or other regulations.  To the greatest extent=20
possible, California should shift control over interconnection away from th=
e=20
utility and place that control with the California ISO.  This could be=20
accomplished through amendments to SB 27X.

Permitting and Air Quality Issues
Developers of distributed (i.e., =01&on-site=018) generation that is 50 MWs=
 or=20
greater must receive certification from the California Energy Commission an=
d=20
therefore faces all of the impediments to development that large-scale=20
generation faces. =20

Solution: California should ensure that the executive orders (D-22-01 thru=
=20
D-26-01) issued by the Governor to expedite plant siting and maximize plant=
=20
output apply equally to smaller scale, =01&distributed generation=018 facil=
ities.=20
In addition, distributed generation that is less than 50 MWs continues to=
=20
face local opposition.  The State should ensure that local, parochial=20
interests cannot block otherwise beneficial distributed generation projects=
. =20
These objectives could be accomplished through amendments to SB27X.

3. Credit Concerns Regarding Authority Granted to DWR in AB1X to Purchase=
=20
Electricity on Behalf of the Utilities=20

Enron responded to the RFP issued by DWR to enter into power contracts with=
=20
suppliers.
Enron is in active discussions with DWR to establish contract terms with th=
e=20
goal of entering into a power purchase agreement as soon as possible.
However, ambiguities contained in AB1X have created significant credit risk=
=20
concerns that need to be resolved in order to finalize contract terms.
We understand that the lion=01,s share of counterparties share Enron=01,s c=
redit=20
risk concerns.
Enron has proposed several options for resolving the credit risk issues and=
=20
is working with DWR to arrive at a solution that is mutually agreeable to=
=20
both sides and that might serve as a template for power purchase agreements=
=20
going forward.

Summary of the Source of the Credit Risk Issue

Ambiguous Ratemaking Authority
The language in AB1X leaves ambiguous whether DWR has any authority to char=
ge=20
California ratepayers for the costs of purchasing power.  From our analysis=
=20
of the bill, the language in AB1X appears to leave intact the California PU=
C=01,
s exclusive jurisdiction over ratemaking in California.  As such, suppliers=
=20
have no assurance that the PUC will agree to include in rates adequate=20
charges to cover DWR=01,s costs of power purchases.

Ambiguous Regulatory Authority Regarding Contract =01&Prudence=018
The language in AB1X leaves open the possibility that the California Public=
=20
Utilities Commission could determine that power purchases made by DWR are=
=20
=01&imprudent.=018  On the basis of such a finding, the CPUC could then ref=
use to=20
allow DWR to collect from ratepayers the costs associated with its power=20
purchases.  Consequently, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agr=
ee=20
to include in rates the charges to cover the costs of power contracts that=
=20
DWR has entered into with suppliers.
=20
Ambiguous Language Regarding the Ratemaking Mechanism that Will Be Used to=
=20
Recover DWR=01,s Costs of Power Purchases
In addition to the ambiguity regarding ratemaking and regulatory authority=
=20
noted above, the language in the bill is equally ambiguous with respect to=
=20
the specific ratemaking =01&mechanics=018 that AB1X directs the PUC to empl=
oy to=20
permit DWR to recover its power purchase costs. Based on our analysis, it i=
s=20
extremely difficult to determine how the PUC would design the rates to ensu=
re=20
DWR recovers its power purchase costs.  Moreover, as currently drafted, it =
is=20
difficult to determine whether AB1X would even permit the PUC to include in=
=20
rates all of the charges necessary to fully recover DWR=01,s power purchase=
=20
costs.  Again, this ambiguity raises significant credit risk concerns since=
=20
suppliers have little assurance that DWR will have the ability to recover=
=20
from ratepayers the costs of purchasing power.

Options to Resolve Concerns Regarding Credit Risk=20

We have been working diligently with DWR officials to resolve the credit ri=
sk=20
issues.  We have identified three options:

Amend AB1X
The amendments, which are attached to this email, would clarify that a) the=
=20
PUC would accept as =01&prudent and reasonable=018 all purchase costs incur=
red by=20
DWR, and b) the PUC is obligated to include in rates the charges necessary =
to=20
ensure that DWR fully recovers its costs of power purchases.  This is the=
=20
preferred option, though we understand that the there may be some political=
=20
challenges standing in the way of amending AB1X.  (See attached file=20
entitled, =01&XXXX=018.)

Clarify the Ambiguities in AB1X through an Order Issued by the PUC, and=20
through Contract Language
This is the option that we are currently working with DWR officials to=20
implement.  However, it is more complicated and could take significantly mo=
re=20
time to implement than the "legislative" fix.  We have attached electronic=
=20
copies of the talking points related to the order that the California PUC=
=20
would need to issue under this option.  (See attached file entitled, =01&XX=
XX.=018)

Make Use of Other Instruments Designed to Address Credit Risk
As indicated in our letter responding to DWR=01,s RFP, we are willing to ac=
cept=20
other forms of credit from DWR.  Those options include a letter of credit,=
=20
cash prepayment, or an acceptable form of collateral.  DWR officials have=
=20
indicated to us that it prefers to pursue the second options, that is,=20
clarifying the ambiguities in AB1X through a PUC order and through contract=
=20
amendments.

4. California=01,s Supply-demand Picture Heading into Summer 2001

Both the California Energy Commission and Cambridge Energy Research=20
Associates, a private sector energy think tank, have issued reports showing=
=20
that California faces a severe supply-demand imbalance.  They differ only o=
n=20
how much and how soon additional supply will be made available.  All credib=
le=20
sources agree supply supply will be very tight throughout the Summer of=20
2001. =20

CEC and CERA both forecast that California will be this summer short by=20
approximately 5,000 MW.   These numbers are in line with our estimates. =20
California=01,s supply base currently has a 6% capacity margin, well below =
the=20
average 15-20% which is recommended for reliable system operation in the=20
West.  Since the West relies more heavily upon hydroelectric power than oth=
er=20
regions, reserves are particularly important, owing to the unpredictability=
=20
of the weather and the dry year the West has had thus far.

In the event of a low rain and snow period, the system must possess the=20
flexibility to respond to the reduced availability of power supply. =20
California=01,s very low reserve margin makes it especially susceptible to=
=20
this.  Other reasons for reduced supply for the Summer of 2001 include the=
=20
early draw down of reservoirs close the supply-demand gas this summer,=20
emissions restrictions on existing plants, and a reduced number of customer=
s=20
who can be curtailed.  Cambridge Energy Research Associates asserts that at=
=20
the current pace of siting, permitting and construction, adequate supplies=
=20
will not be added to correct the market imbalance until 2003 at the earlies=
t.

CERA predicts that California is likely to face approximately 20 hours of=
=20
rolling black outs this summer.  The CEC paints a considerably more=20
optomistic scenario, banking that California will bring an additional 5,000=
=20
MWs on line to meet peaking summer demand.  It is our view that the=20
California should view the CEC's predictions regarding increased supply wit=
h=20
considerably skepticism.

5. Suggested Package of Legislative Proposals Designed to Solve California=
=01,s=20
Electricity Crisis

This email offers an overview of our proposed legislative solution.  We wil=
l=20
deliver to your office tomorrow specific legislative language and existing=
=20
bills that we believe can accommodate our proposals.

As we have suggested throughout the crisis, any solution to California cris=
is=20
must focus on four issues:

Increase supply
Decrease demand
Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market
Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency

Increase supply--Legislative vehicle: SB28X (Sher)
To site and construct a power plant in Texas takes approximately 2 years. =
=20
Enron and others have completed the entire process in other states in less=
=20
than a year.  In California, complex and costly air quality regulations=20
exacerbate California=01,s inability to site power plants. =20

The Governor=01,s executive orders and Senator Sher=01,s siting reform legi=
slation=20
are steps in the right direction.  Our suggested amendments can improve tho=
se=20
efforts by:

Decrease demand=01*Legislative Vehicle:   AB31X
Because of the delay in implementing a solution to California=01,s electric=
ity=20
crisis, closing the supply-demand gap through energy conservation and=20
efficiency offers the best chance of avoiding blackouts this summer.  This=
=20
can be accomplished most effectively and quickly in two ways:

Buy-down demand
California is tapping into an enormous amount of money from the General Fun=
d=20
to finance DWR=01,s power purchases.  California could likely reduce demand=
 more=20
cheaply by running an auction to determine the payments businesses would be=
=20
willing to receive to reduce demand for a sustained period (e.g., through t=
he=20
summer months).  DWR could very easily run an on-line auction to determine=
=20
the best price it could pay for these demand reductions.  To participate,=
=20
businesses would be required to have the metering equipment necessary to=20
monitor and verify that they are actually achieving the reductions.  Enron=
=20
has developed an on-line auction software package, =01&Dealbench,=018 that =
it would=20
be willing to contribute to the effort.

Use Price Signals to Incent Voluntary Curtailment

To work, customers need access to the following key elements:

An internet based hour-ahead price posting system to track the market price=
=20
for hour-ahead power in real time.=20
Real-time metering systems for baseline demand and voluntarily curtailment=
=20
verification.
Settlement process that allows for market clearing prices of energy to be=
=20
paid for load reduction (=01&Negawatts=018).

The potential benefits of an effective demand response program would includ=
e:

=01&creation=018 of additional summer peaking capacity in California, parti=
cularly=20
in the short term, without requiring construction of additional generation=
=20
resources.
reduction of  peak or super-peak load on the over-stressed California=20
electric system, thus potentially reducing the overall cost of electricity =
in=20
the state.
fostering of demand elasticity without subjecting customers to the full ris=
k=20
of hourly market price volatility by passing market price signals to=20
customers and allowing them to voluntarily shed load and be compensated for=
=20
responding.=20

We estimate that we could generate a summer 2001 on-peak demand response in=
=20
excess of 400 MW during certain high cost hours, and a demand response for=
=20
summer 2002 on-peak hours that could exceed 1000 MW.  We further estimate=
=20
that the market response to this program from all ESPs who would also pay=
=20
Access Fees could be 2 to 3 times that amount.  We recommend that the State=
=20
of California provide rebates directly to customers to fund the installatio=
n=20
of advanced metering and control systems that would support load curtailmen=
t=20
implementation.

Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market=01*Legislative vehi=
cle:=20
SB27X
The only customers who were protected from price volatility in San Diego we=
re=20
customers who chose Direct Access and signed fixed price deals with energy=
=20
service providers.  Ironically, AB1X takes that important option away from=
=20
customers and businesses.  It is critical that AB1X be amended to remove th=
e=20
prohibition against Direct Access.

In addition, California will only achieve a competitive retail market when=
=20
the utility is removed completely from the procurement function.  Procureme=
nt=20
is not a utility core competency, as evidenced by the dire financial=20
condition in which the utilities now find themselves.  California should=20
therefore begin now to gradually phase the utility out of the procurement=
=20
function entirely, with the goal having all customers served by a non-utili=
ty=20
provider within 36 months.  To execute the transition, California should ho=
ld=20
a competitive solicitation in which competing service providers would bid f=
or=20
the right to serve segments, or =01&tranches,=018 of utility load.

Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency=01*Legislative =
vehicle:=20
AB18X
Utility bankruptcy will not increase supply and it will not decrease demand=
. =20
In short, bankruptcy does nothing to solve California=01,s supply-demand=20
imbalance.  In addition, bankruptcy increases the likelihood that consumers=
=20
and businesses will bear the significant financial risks of having Californ=
ia=20
State government assume the role of =01&electricity buyer=018 for an extend=
ed=20
period of time.

California can return the utilities to financial solvency by implementing a=
=20
series of staged rate increases.  California should design those rate=20
increases with the dual goal of returning the utilities to solvency without=
=20
=01&shocking=018 the economy or consumers=01, wallets (e.g., amortize the r=
ecovery of=20
the utilities=01, debt over a 5-10 year period). The magnitude of the rate=
=20
increase can be reduced in two ways: First, the utilities could absorb some=
=20
portion of their existing debt in recognition of the risk they accepted whe=
n=20
they agreed to the structure of AB 1890.  Second, California can =01&net=01=
8 the=20
revenues the utilities have received from selling electricity into the Powe=
r=20
Exchange against the debts they have accrued due to the retail price cap.

Thanks, Christian.  We're including it in the package to Brulte and will let 
you know how it proceeds.

Best,
Jeff

=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 04:42 PM
=09=09=20
Jim:
It was a pleasure speaking with you yesterday.  Based on our conversation,=
=20
this email includes the following:

An Enron contact to discuss developing small-scale, distributed generation =
on=20
Tribal lands.

Our views on the impediments to small scale, distributed generation and=20
suggestions on how to remove those impediments.

A description of the credit issues that continue to impede DWR=01,s ability=
 to=20
sign contracts with power suppliers, and options to resolve them. Two=20
possible options for addressing the credit issue are 1) a California PUC=20
order clarifying that DWR will recover its power purchase costs through=20
rates, and 2) an amendment to AB1X designed to accomplish the same goal.  I=
=20
have attached talking points regarding the California PUC order and propose=
d=20
amendments to AB1X.  We believe that an amendment to AB1X is the preferable=
=20
option.

Our assessment of the supply/demand picture in California.

Our suggestions for a legislative package designed to solve both the near-=
=20
and long-term electricity crisis in California.  We will deliver to your=20
office tomorrow detailed legislative language.  In those materials we will=
=20
also identify existing bills that we believe can easily accommodate our=20
proposed language.

I hope that the information is useful.  Please do not hesitate to contact m=
e=20
if you would like to discuss these materials further, or if there is anythi=
ng=20
else that I can do to assist you.

Regards,
Ken

1. Contact Information to Discuss Interest Expressed by Native American=20
Tribes in Installing Small-scale Generation on  Tribal Lands

David Parquet, Vice-President

2. Key Barriers to Distributed Generation

Excessive and Unnecessary Utility Stand-by Charges

Solution: The executive orders issued by the Governor on February 14th took=
 a=20
step in the right direction.  Utility stand-by charges have always been=20
designed by the utilities to protect their monopoly position, extract=20
monopoly prices from customers, or both.  But there is no reason to limit t=
he=20
elimination of these charges to generation facilities that are less than=20
1MW.  These limits will only lengthen unnecessarily the time it takes for=
=20
California to close the significant gap between supply and demand and reduc=
e=20
the risk of black outs.  We would propose lifting the cap through amendment=
s=20
to SB27X, which is designed to facilitate development of distributed=20
generation.
=20
Excessive delays and costs related to interconnecting facilities with=20
investor-owned and municipal utilities

Solution:   The Governor=01,s executive order regarding interconnection is =
a=20
step in the right direction=01*D-D-26-01 requires utilities to complete=20
interconnection studies within 7 days.  California should ensure that this=
=20
requirement applies to all generation facilities, including distributed=20
generation.  In addition, the financial conflicts the utilities face when=
=20
interconnecting generation facilities are simply too powerful to overcome=
=20
through executive orders or other regulations.  To the greatest extent=20
possible, California should shift control over interconnection away from th=
e=20
utility and place that control with the California ISO.  This could be=20
accomplished through amendments to SB 27X.

Permitting and Air Quality Issues
Developers of distributed (i.e., =01&on-site=018) generation that is 50 MWs=
 or=20
greater must receive certification from the California Energy Commission an=
d=20
therefore faces all of the impediments to development that large-scale=20
generation faces. =20

Solution: California should ensure that the executive orders (D-22-01 thru=
=20
D-26-01) issued by the Governor to expedite plant siting and maximize plant=
=20
output apply equally to smaller scale, =01&distributed generation=018 facil=
ities.=20
In addition, distributed generation that is less than 50 MWs continues to=
=20
face local opposition.  The State should ensure that local, parochial=20
interests cannot block otherwise beneficial distributed generation projects=
. =20
These objectives could be accomplished through amendments to SB27X.

3. Credit Concerns Regarding Authority Granted to DWR in AB1X to Purchase=
=20
Electricity on Behalf of the Utilities=20

Enron responded to the RFP issued by DWR to enter into power contracts with=
=20
suppliers.
Enron is in active discussions with DWR to establish contract terms with th=
e=20
goal of entering into a power purchase agreement as soon as possible.
However, ambiguities contained in AB1X have created significant credit risk=
=20
concerns that need to be resolved in order to finalize contract terms.
We understand that the lion=01,s share of counterparties share Enron=01,s c=
redit=20
risk concerns.
Enron has proposed several options for resolving the credit risk issues and=
=20
is working with DWR to arrive at a solution that is mutually agreeable to=
=20
both sides and that might serve as a template for power purchase agreements=
=20
going forward.

Summary of the Source of the Credit Risk Issue

Ambiguous Ratemaking Authority
The language in AB1X leaves ambiguous whether DWR has any authority to char=
ge=20
California ratepayers for the costs of purchasing power.  From our analysis=
=20
of the bill, the language in AB1X appears to leave intact the California PU=
C=01,
s exclusive jurisdiction over ratemaking in California.  As such, suppliers=
=20
have no assurance that the PUC will agree to include in rates adequate=20
charges to cover DWR=01,s costs of power purchases.

Ambiguous Regulatory Authority Regarding Contract =01&Prudence=018
The language in AB1X leaves open the possibility that the California Public=
=20
Utilities Commission could determine that power purchases made by DWR are=
=20
=01&imprudent.=018  On the basis of such a finding, the CPUC could then ref=
use to=20
allow DWR to collect from ratepayers the costs associated with its power=20
purchases.  Consequently, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agr=
ee=20
to include in rates the charges to cover the costs of power contracts that=
=20
DWR has entered into with suppliers.
=20
Ambiguous Language Regarding the Ratemaking Mechanism that Will Be Used to=
=20
Recover DWR=01,s Costs of Power Purchases
In addition to the ambiguity regarding ratemaking and regulatory authority=
=20
noted above, the language in the bill is equally ambiguous with respect to=
=20
the specific ratemaking =01&mechanics=018 that AB1X directs the PUC to empl=
oy to=20
permit DWR to recover its power purchase costs. Based on our analysis, it i=
s=20
extremely difficult to determine how the PUC would design the rates to ensu=
re=20
DWR recovers its power purchase costs.  Moreover, as currently drafted, it =
is=20
difficult to determine whether AB1X would even permit the PUC to include in=
=20
rates all of the charges necessary to fully recover DWR=01,s power purchase=
=20
costs.  Again, this ambiguity raises significant credit risk concerns since=
=20
suppliers have little assurance that DWR will have the ability to recover=
=20
from ratepayers the costs of purchasing power.

Options to Resolve Concerns Regarding Credit Risk=20

We have been working diligently with DWR officials to resolve the credit ri=
sk=20
issues.  We have identified three options:

Amend AB1X
The amendments, which are attached to this email, would clarify that a) the=
=20
PUC would accept as =01&prudent and reasonable=018 all purchase costs incur=
red by=20
DWR, and b) the PUC is obligated to include in rates the charges necessary =
to=20
ensure that DWR fully recovers its costs of power purchases.  This is the=
=20
preferred option, though we understand that the there may be some political=
=20
challenges standing in the way of amending AB1X.  (See attached file=20
entitled, =01&AmendAB1X.doc=018.)

Clarify the Ambiguities in AB1X through an Order Issued by the PUC, and=20
through Contract Language
This is the option that we are currently working with DWR officials to=20
implement.  However, it is more complicated and could take significantly mo=
re=20
time to implement than the "legislative" fix.  We have attached electronic=
=20
copies of the talking points related to the order that the California PUC=
=20
would need to issue under this option.  (See attached file entitled,=20
=01&cpuctalkingpoints.doc.=018)

Make Use of Other Instruments Designed to Address Credit Risk
As indicated in our letter responding to DWR=01,s RFP, we are willing to ac=
cept=20
other forms of credit from DWR.  Those options include a letter of credit,=
=20
cash prepayment, or an acceptable form of collateral.  DWR officials have=
=20
indicated to us that DWR prefers to pursue the second options. That is, DWR=
=20
prefers to clarify the ambiguities in AB1X through a PUC order and through=
=20
contract amendments.

4. California=01,s Supply-demand Picture Heading into Summer 2001

Both the California Energy Commission and Cambridge Energy Research=20
Associates (CERA), a private sector energy think tank, have issued reports=
=20
showing that California faces a severe supply-demand imbalance.  They diffe=
r=20
only on how much and how soon additional supply will be made available.  Al=
l=20
credible sources agree that supply will be very tight throughout the Summer=
=20
of 2001 and that unless a solution is found immediately, blackouts are=20
likely. =20

CEC and CERA both forecast that California will be short of supply this=20
summer by approximately 5,000 MW.   These numbers are in line with our=20
estimates.  California=01,s supply base currently has a 6% capacity margin,=
 well=20
below the average 15-20%, which is recommended for reliable system operatio=
n=20
in the West.  Since the West relies more heavily upon hydroelectric power=
=20
than other regions, reserves are particularly important, owing to the=20
unpredictability of the weather and the dry year the West has experienced t=
o=20
date. In the event of a low rain and snow period, the system must possess t=
he=20
flexibility to respond to the reduced availability of power supply. =20
California=01,s very low reserve margin makes it especially susceptible to =
this=20
requirement. =20

Other reasons for reduced supply for the Summer of 2001 include the early=
=20
draw-down of reservoirs in the continual effort to manage California's seve=
re=20
supply-demand gap; emissions restrictions on existing plants; and a reduced=
=20
number of customers who can be curtailed under their contracts with the=20
utilities.  Cambridge Energy Research Associates asserts that at the curren=
t=20
pace of siting, permitting and construction, adequate supplies will not be=
=20
added to correct the market imbalance until 2003 at the earliest.

CERA predicts that California is likely to face approximately 20 hours of=
=20
rolling black outs this summer.  The CEC paints a considerably more=20
optimistic scenario, betting that California will bring an additional 5,000=
=20
MWs on line to meet peaking summer demand.  It is our view that California=
=20
should view the CEC's "rosy scenario" with considerable skepticism.

5. Suggested Package of Legislative Proposals Designed to Solve California=
=01,s=20
Electricity Crisis

This email offers an overview of our proposed legislative solution.  We wil=
l=20
deliver to your office tomorrow specific legislative language and existing=
=20
bills that we believe can accommodate our proposals.

As we have suggested throughout the crisis, any solution to California's=20
crisis must focus on four issues:

Increase supply
Decrease demand
Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market
Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency

Increase supply--Legislative vehicle: SB28X (Sher)
To site and construct a power plant in Texas takes approximately 2 years. =
=20
Enron and others have completed the entire process in other states in less=
=20
than a year.  In California, complex and costly air quality regulations=20
exacerbate California=01,s inability to site power plants. =20

The Governor=01,s executive orders and Senator Sher=01,s siting reform legi=
slation=20
are steps in the right direction.  Our suggested amendments can improve tho=
se=20
efforts by further addressing the difficulties that project developers face=
=20
in securing air emission reduction credits to meet the air permit=20
requirements included in the CEC's certification requirements.  Enron=01,s=
=20
proposal seeks to streamline the process for 1) obtaining credits and 2)=20
transferring credits between air districts.  In addition, it creates an=20
innovative emissions reduction bank to allow project sponsors to fund=20
emissions in advance of obtaining certification, and permits the affected a=
ir=20
districts to use those funds to finance projects that will produce the=20
required reductions in pollution emissions.

Decrease demand=01*Legislative Vehicle:   AB31X
Because of the delay in getting a solution in place in California=01,s, clo=
sing=20
the supply-demand gap through energy conservation and efficiency offers the=
=20
best chance of avoiding blackouts this summer.  This can be accomplished mo=
st=20
effectively and quickly in two ways:

Buy-down demand
California is tapping into an enormous amount of money from the General Fun=
d=20
to finance DWR=01,s power purchases.  California could likely reduce demand=
 more=20
cheaply by running an auction to determine the payments businesses would be=
=20
willing to receive to reduce their demand for a sustained period (e.g.,=20
through the summer months).  DWR could easily run an on-line auction to=20
determine the price it could pay for these demand reductions.  To=20
participate, businesses would be required to have the metering equipment=20
necessary to monitor and verify that they are actually achieving the=20
reductions.  Enron has developed an on-line auction software package, =01&D=
eal=20
Bench,=018 that it would be willing to contribute to the effort.

Use Price Signals to Incent Voluntary Curtailment
To work, customers need access to the following key elements:

An internet based hour-ahead price posting system to track the market price=
=20
for hour-ahead power in real time.=20
Real-time metering systems for baseline demand and voluntarily curtailment=
=20
verification.
Settlement process that allows for market clearing prices of energy to be=
=20
paid for load reduction (=01&Negawatts=018).

The potential benefits of an effective demand response program would includ=
e:

=01&creation=018 of additional summer peaking capacity in California, parti=
cularly=20
in the short term, without requiring construction of additional generation=
=20
resources.
reduction of  peak or super-peak load on the over-stressed California=20
electric system, thus potentially reducing the overall cost of electricity =
in=20
the state.
fostering of demand elasticity without subjecting customers to the full ris=
k=20
of hourly market price volatility by passing market price signals to=20
customers and allowing them to voluntarily shed load and be compensated for=
=20
responding.=20

We estimate that we could generate a summer 2001 on-peak demand response in=
=20
excess of 400 MW during certain high cost hours, and a demand response for=
=20
summer 2002 on-peak hours that could exceed 1000 MW.  We further estimate=
=20
that the market response to this program from all ESPs could be 2 to 3 time=
s=20
that amount.  We recommend that the State of California provide rebates=20
directly to customers to fund the installation of advanced metering and=20
control systems that would support load curtailment implementation.

Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market=01*Legislative vehi=
cle:=20
SB27X
The only customers who were protected from price volatility in San Diego we=
re=20
customers who chose Direct Access and signed fixed price deals with energy=
=20
service providers.  Ironically, AB1X takes that important option away from=
=20
customers and businesses.  It is critical that AB1X be amended to remove th=
e=20
prohibition against Direct Access.

Enron's legislative proposal would give customers freedom to enter into a=
=20
direct access transaction, while simultaneously addressing the Department o=
f=20
Water Resources' concerns about stranded power costs that might result from=
=20
customer migration. =20

In addition, California will only achieve a competitive retail market when=
=20
the utility is removed completely from the procurement function.  Procureme=
nt=20
is not a utility core competency, as evidenced by the dire financial=20
condition in which the utilities now find themselves.  California should=20
therefore begin now to gradually phase the utility out of the procurement=
=20
function entirely, with the goal of having all customers served by a=20
non-utility provider within 36 months.  To execute the transition, Californ=
ia=20
should hold a series of competitive solicitations over the 36-month period =
in=20
which competing service providers would bid for the right to serve segments=
,=20
or =01&tranches,=018 of utility load.

Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency=01*Legislative =
vehicle:=20
AB18X
Utility bankruptcy will not increase supply and it will not decrease demand=
. =20
In short, bankruptcy does nothing to solve California=01,s supply-demand=20
imbalance.  In addition, bankruptcy increases the likelihood that consumers=
=20
and businesses will bear the significant financial risks of having Californ=
ia=20
State government assume the role of =01&electricity buyer=018 for an extend=
ed=20
period of time.  Finally, bankruptcy will undermine both investor confidenc=
e=20
in California's energy markets and the private sector's willingness to=20
participate in that market.

California can return the utilities to financial solvency by implementing a=
=20
series of staged rate increases.  California should design those rate=20
increases with the dual goal of returning the utilities to solvency without=
=20
=01&shocking=018 the economy or household budgets For example, California c=
ould=20
amortize the recovery of the utilities=01, past debt over a 5-10 year perio=
d. =20
In addition, the magnitude of the rate increase can be reduced in two ways:=
=20
First, the utilities could absorb some portion of their existing debt in=20
recognition of the risk they accepted when they agreed to the structure of =
AB=20
1890.  Second, California can =01&net=018 the revenues the utilities have r=
eceived=20
from selling electricity into the Power Exchange against the debts they hav=
e=20
accrued due to the retail price cap.

Steve:
Here's a substantially more cleaned-version, with attachments.  There's a=
=20
hard copy on your chair.

Best,
Jeff
=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 05:56 PM
=09=09=20
Jim:
It was a pleasure speaking with you yesterday.  Based on our conversation,=
=20
this email includes the following:

An Enron contact to discuss developing small-scale generation on Tribal lan=
ds.

Our views on the impediments to distributed generation and suggestions on h=
ow=20
to remove those impediments.

A description of the credit issues that continue to impede DWR=01,s ability=
 to=20
sign contracts with power suppliers, and options to resolve them. Two=20
possible options for addressing the credit issue are 1) a California PUC=20
order clarifying that DWR will recover its power purchase costs through=20
rates, and 2) an amendment to AB1X designed to accomplish the same goal.  I=
=20
have attached talking points regarding the California PUC order and propose=
d=20
amendments to AB1X.  We believe that an amendment to AB1X is the preferable=
=20
option.

Our assessment of the supply/demand picture in California.

Our suggestions for a legislative package designed to solve both the near-=
=20
and long-term electricity crisis in California.  We will deliver to your=20
office tomorrow detailed legislative language.  In those materials we will=
=20
also identify existing bills that we believe can easily accommodate our=20
proposed language.

I hope that the information is useful.  Please do not hesitate to contact m=
e=20
if you would like to discuss these materials further, or if there is anythi=
ng=20
else that I can do to assist you.

Regards,
Ken

Contact Information to Discuss Interest Expressed by Native American Tribes=
=20
in Installing Small-scale Generation on Tribal Lands

David Parquet, Vice-President

2. Key Barriers to Distributed Generation

Excessive and Unnecessary Utility Stand-by Charges

Solution: The executive orders issued by the Governor on February 14th took=
 a=20
step in the right direction.  Utility stand-by charges have always been=20
designed by the utilities to protect their monopoly position, extract=20
monopoly prices from customers, or both.  But there is no reason to limit t=
he=20
elimination of these charges to generation facilities that are less than=20
1MW.  These limits will only lengthen unnecessarily the time it takes for=
=20
California to close the significant gap between supply and demand and reduc=
e=20
the risk of black outs this summer.  We would propose lifting the cap by=20
offering amendments to SB27X, which is designed to facilitate development o=
f=20
distributed generation.
=20
Excessive delays and costs related to interconnecting facilities with=20
investor-owned and municipal utilities

Solution:   The Governor=01,s executive order regarding interconnection is =
a=20
step in the right direction=01*D-D-26-01 requires utilities to complete=20
interconnection studies within 7 days.  California should ensure that this=
=20
requirement applies to all generation facilities, including distributed=20
generation.  In addition, the financial conflicts the utilities face when=
=20
interconnecting generation facilities are simply too powerful to overcome=
=20
through executive orders or other regulations.  To the greatest extent=20
possible, California should shift control over interconnection away from th=
e=20
utility and place that control with the California ISO.  This could be=20
accomplished through amendments to SB 27X.

Permitting and Air Quality Issues
Developers of distributed (i.e., =01&on-site=018) generation that is 50 MWs=
 or=20
greater must receive certification from the California Energy Commission an=
d=20
therefore face all of the impediments to development that large-scale=20
generation faces. =20

Solution: California should ensure that the executive orders (D-22-01 thru=
=20
D-26-01) issued by the Governor to expedite plant siting and maximize plant=
=20
output apply equally to smaller scale, =01&distributed generation=018 facil=
ities.=20
In addition, distributed generation that is less than 50 MWs continues to=
=20
face local opposition.  The State should ensure that local, parochial=20
interests cannot block otherwise beneficial distributed generation projects=
. =20
These objectives could be accomplished through amendments to SB27X.

3. Credit Concerns Regarding Authority Granted to DWR in AB1X to Purchase=
=20
Electricity on Behalf of the Utilities=20

Enron responded to the RFP issued by DWR to enter into power contracts with=
=20
suppliers.
Enron is in active discussions with DWR to establish contract terms with th=
e=20
goal of entering into a power purchase agreement as soon as possible.
However, ambiguities contained in AB1X have created significant credit risk=
=20
concerns that need to be resolved in order to finalize contract terms.
We understand that the lion=01,s share of counterparties share Enron=01,s c=
redit=20
risk concerns.
Enron has proposed several options for resolving the credit risk issues and=
=20
is working with DWR to arrive at a solution that is mutually agreeable to=
=20
both sides and that might serve as a template for power purchase agreements=
=20
going forward.

Summary of the Source of the Credit Risk Issue

Ambiguous Ratemaking Authority
The language in AB1X is ambiguous as to whether DWR has any authority to=20
charge California ratepayers for the costs of purchasing power.  From our=
=20
analysis of the bill, the language in AB1X appears to leave intact the=20
California PUC=01,s exclusive jurisdiction over ratemaking in California.  =
As=20
such, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agree to include in rat=
es=20
adequate charges to cover DWR=01,s costs of power purchases.

Ambiguous Regulatory Authority Regarding Contract =01&Prudence=018
The language in AB1X leaves open the possibility that the California Public=
=20
Utilities Commission could determine that power purchases made by DWR are=
=20
=01&imprudent.=018  On the basis of such a finding, the CPUC could then ref=
use to=20
allow DWR to collect from ratepayers the costs associated with its power=20
purchases.  Consequently, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agr=
ee=20
to include in rates the charges to cover the costs of power contracts that=
=20
DWR has entered into with suppliers.
=20
Ambiguous Language Regarding the Ratemaking Mechanism that Will Be Used to=
=20
Recover DWR=01,s Costs of Power Purchases
In addition to the ambiguity regarding ratemaking and regulatory authority=
=20
noted above, the language in the bill is equally ambiguous with respect to=
=20
the specific ratemaking =01&mechanics=018 that AB1X directs the PUC to empl=
oy to=20
permit DWR to recover its power purchase costs. Based on our analysis, it i=
s=20
extremely difficult to determine how the PUC would design the rates to ensu=
re=20
DWR recovers its power purchase costs.  Moreover, as currently drafted, it =
is=20
difficult to determine whether AB1X would even permit the PUC to include in=
=20
rates all of the charges necessary to fully recover DWR=01,s power purchase=
=20
costs.  Again, this ambiguity raises significant credit risk concerns since=
=20
suppliers have little assurance that DWR will have the ability to recover=
=20
from ratepayers the costs of purchasing power.

Options to Resolve Concerns Regarding Credit Risk=20

We have been working diligently with DWR officials to resolve the credit ri=
sk=20
issues.  We have identified three options:

Amend AB1X
The amendments, which are attached to this email, would clarify that a) the=
=20
PUC would accept as =01&prudent and reasonable=018 all purchase costs incur=
red by=20
DWR, and b) the PUC is obligated to include in rates the charges necessary =
to=20
ensure that DWR fully recovers its costs of power purchases.  This is the=
=20
preferred option, though we understand that the there may be some political=
=20
challenges standing in the way of amending AB1X.  (See attached file=20
entitled, =01&AmendAB1X.doc=018.)

Clarify the Ambiguities in AB1X through an Order Issued by the PUC, and=20
through Contract Language
This is the option that we are currently working with DWR officials to=20
implement.  However, it is more complicated and could take significantly mo=
re=20
time to implement than the "legislative" fix.  We have attached electronic=
=20
copies of the talking points related to the order that the California PUC=
=20
would need to issue under this option.  (See attached file entitled,=20
=01&cpuctalkingpoints.doc.=018)

Make Use of Other Instruments Designed to Address Credit Risk
As indicated in our letter responding to DWR=01,s RFP, we are willing to ac=
cept=20
other forms of credit from DWR.  Those options include a letter of credit,=
=20
cash prepayment, or an acceptable form of collateral.  DWR officials have=
=20
indicated to us that DWR prefers to pursue the second options. That is, DWR=
=20
prefers to clarify the ambiguities in AB1X through a PUC order and through=
=20
contract amendments.

4. California=01,s Supply-demand Picture Heading into Summer 2001

Both the California Energy Commission and Cambridge Energy Research=20
Associates (CERA), a private sector energy think tank, have issued reports=
=20
showing that California faces a severe supply-demand imbalance.  They diffe=
r=20
only on how much and how soon additional supply will be made available.  Al=
l=20
credible sources agree that supply will be very tight throughout the Summer=
=20
of 2001 and that unless a solution is found immediately, blackouts are=20
likely. =20

CEC and CERA both forecast that California will be short of supply this=20
summer by approximately 5,000 MW.   These numbers are in line with our=20
estimates.  California=01,s supply base currently has a 6% capacity margin,=
 well=20
below the average 15-20%, which is recommended for reliable system operatio=
n=20
in the West.  Since the West relies more heavily upon hydroelectric power=
=20
than other regions, reserves are particularly important, owing to the=20
unpredictability of the weather and the dry year the West has experienced t=
o=20
date. In the event of a low rain and snow period, the system must possess t=
he=20
flexibility to respond to the reduced availability of power supply. =20
California=01,s very low reserve margin makes it especially susceptible to =
this=20
requirement. =20

Other reasons for reduced supply for the Summer of 2001 include the early=
=20
draw-down of reservoirs in the continual effort to manage California's seve=
re=20
supply-demand gap; emissions restrictions on existing plants; and a reduced=
=20
number of customers who can be curtailed under their contracts with the=20
utilities.  Cambridge Energy Research Associates asserts that at the curren=
t=20
pace of siting, permitting and construction, adequate supplies will not be=
=20
added to correct the market imbalance until 2003 at the earliest.

CERA predicts that California is likely to face approximately 20 hours of=
=20
rolling black outs this summer.  The CEC paints a considerably more=20
optimistic scenario, betting that California will bring an additional 5,000=
=20
MWs on line to meet peaking summer demand.  It is our view that California=
=20
should view the CEC's "rosy scenario" with considerable skepticism.

5. Suggested Package of Legislative Proposals Designed to Solve California=
=01,s=20
Electricity Crisis

This email offers an overview of our proposed legislative solution.  We wil=
l=20
deliver to your office tomorrow specific legislative language and existing=
=20
bills that we believe can accommodate our proposals.

As we have suggested throughout the crisis, any solution to California's=20
crisis must focus on four issues:

Increase supply
Decrease demand
Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market
Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency

Increase supply--Legislative vehicle: SB28X (Sher)
To site and construct a power plant in Texas takes approximately 2 years. =
=20
Enron and others have completed the entire process in other states in less=
=20
than a year.  In California, it takes about six years, or longer.

The Governor=01,s executive orders and Senator Sher=01,s siting reform legi=
slation=20
are steps in the right direction.  Our suggested amendments can improve tho=
se=20
efforts by further addressing the difficulties that project developers face=
=20
in securing air emission reduction credits to meet the air permit=20
requirements included in the CEC's certification requirements.  Enron=01,s=
=20
proposal seeks to streamline the process for 1) obtaining credits and 2)=20
transfering credits between air districts.  In addition, it creates an=20
innovative emissions reduction bank to allow project sponsors to fund=20
emissions in advance of obtaining certification, and permits the affected a=
ir=20
districts to use those funds to finance projects that will produce the=20
required reductions in pollution emissions.

Decrease demand=01*Legislative Vehicle:   AB31X (Wright)
Because of the delay in getting a solution in place in California, closing=
=20
the supply-demand gap through energy conservation and efficiency offers the=
=20
best chance of avoiding blackouts this summer.  This can be accomplished mo=
st=20
effectively and quickly in two ways:

Buy-down demand
California is tapping into an enormous amount of money from the General Fun=
d=20
to finance DWR=01,s power purchases.  California could likely reduce demand=
 more=20
economically by running an auction to determine the payments businesses wou=
ld=20
be willing to receive to reduce their demand for a sustained period (e.g.,=
=20
through the summer months).  DWR could easily run an on-line auction to=20
determine the price it could pay for these demand reductions.  To=20
participate, businesses would be required to have the metering equipment=20
necessary to monitor and verify that they are actually achieving the=20
reductions.  Enron has developed an on-line auction software package, =01&D=
eal=20
Bench,=018 that it would be willing to contribute to the effort.

Use Price Signals to Incent Voluntary Curtailment
To be successful, customers need access to the following key elements:

An internet based hour-ahead price posting system to track the market price=
=20
for hour-ahead power in real time.=20
Real-time metering systems for baseline demand and voluntarily curtailment=
=20
verification.
Settlement process that allows for market clearing prices of energy to be=
=20
paid for load reduction (=01&Negawatts=018).

The potential benefits of an effective demand response program would includ=
e:

=01&creation=018 of additional summer peaking capacity in California, parti=
cularly=20
in the short term, without requiring construction of additional generation=
=20
resources.
reduction of  peak or super-peak load on the over-stressed California=20
electric system, thus potentially reducing the overall cost of electricity =
in=20
the state.
fostering of demand elasticity without subjecting customers to the full ris=
k=20
of hourly market price volatility by passing market price signals to=20
customers and allowing them to voluntarily shed load and be compensated for=
=20
responding.=20

We estimate that we could generate a summer 2001 on-peak demand response in=
=20
excess of 400 MW during certain high cost hours, and a demand response for=
=20
summer 2002 on-peak hours that could exceed 1000 MW.  We further estimate=
=20
that the market response to this program from all ESPs could be 2 to 3 time=
s=20
that amount.  We recommend that the State of California provide rebates=20
directly to customers to fund the installation of advanced metering and=20
control systems that would support load curtailment implementation.

Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market=01*Legislative vehi=
cle:=20
SB27X
The only customers who were protected from price volatility in San Diego we=
re=20
customers who chose Direct Access and signed fixed price deals with energy=
=20
service providers.  Ironically, AB1X takes that important option away from=
=20
customers and businesses.  It is critical that AB1X be amended to remove th=
e=20
prohibition against Direct Access.

Enron's legislative proposal would give customers freedom to enter into a=
=20
direct access transaction, while simultaneously addressing the Department o=
f=20
Water Resources' concerns about stranded power costs that might result from=
=20
customer migration. =20

In addition, California will only achieve a competitive retail market when=
=20
the utility is removed completely from the procurement function.  Procureme=
nt=20
is not a utility core competency, as evidenced by the dire financial=20
condition in which the utilities now find themselves.  California should=20
therefore begin immediately to phase the utility out of the procurement=20
function entirely, with the goal of having all customers served by a=20
non-utility provider within 36 months.  To execute the transition, Californ=
ia=20
should hold a series of competitive solicitations over the 36-month period =
in=20
which competing service providers would bid for the right to serve segments=
=20
of utility load.

Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency=01*Legislative =
vehicle:=20
AB18X
Utility bankruptcy will not increase supply and it will not decrease demand=
. =20
In short, bankruptcy does nothing to solve California=01,s supply-demand=20
imbalance.  In addition, bankruptcy increases the likelihood that consumers=
=20
and businesses will bear the significant financial risks of having Californ=
ia=20
State government assume the role of =01&electricity buyer=018 for an extend=
ed=20
period of time.  Finally, bankruptcy will undermine both investor confidenc=
e=20
in California's energy markets and the private sector's willingness to=20
participate in that market.

California can return the utilities to financial solvency by implementing a=
=20
series of staged rate increases.  California should design those rate=20
increases with the dual goal of returning the utilities to solvency without=
=20
=01&shocking=018 the economy or household budgets For example, California c=
ould=20
amortize the recovery of the utilities=01, past debt over a 5-10 year perio=
d. =20
In addition, the magnitude of the rate increase can be reduced in two ways:=
=20
First, the utilities could absorb some portion of their existing debt in=20
recognition of the risk they accepted when they agreed to the structure of =
AB=20
1890.  Second, California can =01&net=018 the revenues the utilities have r=
eceived=20
from selling electricity into the Power Exchange against the debts they hav=
e=20
accrued due to the retail price cap.

FYI.
=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 06:11 PM
=09=09=20
Steve:
Here's a substantially more cleaned-version, with attachments.  There's a=
=20
hard copy on your chair.

Best,
Jeff
=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 05:56 PM
=09=09=20
Jim:
It was a pleasure speaking with you yesterday.  Based on our conversation,=
=20
this email includes the following:

An Enron contact to discuss developing small-scale generation on Tribal lan=
ds.

Our views on the impediments to distributed generation and suggestions on h=
ow=20
to remove those impediments.

A description of the credit issues that continue to impede DWR=01,s ability=
 to=20
sign contracts with power suppliers, and options to resolve them. Two=20
possible options for addressing the credit issue are 1) a California PUC=20
order clarifying that DWR will recover its power purchase costs through=20
rates, and 2) an amendment to AB1X designed to accomplish the same goal.  I=
=20
have attached talking points regarding the California PUC order and propose=
d=20
amendments to AB1X.  We believe that an amendment to AB1X is the preferable=
=20
option.

Our assessment of the supply/demand picture in California.

Our suggestions for a legislative package designed to solve both the near-=
=20
and long-term electricity crisis in California.  We will deliver to your=20
office tomorrow detailed legislative language.  In those materials we will=
=20
also identify existing bills that we believe can easily accommodate our=20
proposed language.

I hope that the information is useful.  Please do not hesitate to contact m=
e=20
if you would like to discuss these materials further, or if there is anythi=
ng=20
else that I can do to assist you.

Regards,
Ken

Contact Information to Discuss Interest Expressed by Native American Tribes=
=20
in Installing Small-scale Generation on Tribal Lands

David Parquet, Vice-President

2. Key Barriers to Distributed Generation

Excessive and Unnecessary Utility Stand-by Charges

Solution: The executive orders issued by the Governor on February 14th took=
 a=20
step in the right direction.  Utility stand-by charges have always been=20
designed by the utilities to protect their monopoly position, extract=20
monopoly prices from customers, or both.  But there is no reason to limit t=
he=20
elimination of these charges to generation facilities that are less than=20
1MW.  These limits will only lengthen unnecessarily the time it takes for=
=20
California to close the significant gap between supply and demand and reduc=
e=20
the risk of black outs this summer.  We would propose lifting the cap by=20
offering amendments to SB27X, which is designed to facilitate development o=
f=20
distributed generation.
=20
Excessive delays and costs related to interconnecting facilities with=20
investor-owned and municipal utilities

Solution:   The Governor=01,s executive order regarding interconnection is =
a=20
step in the right direction=01*D-D-26-01 requires utilities to complete=20
interconnection studies within 7 days.  California should ensure that this=
=20
requirement applies to all generation facilities, including distributed=20
generation.  In addition, the financial conflicts the utilities face when=
=20
interconnecting generation facilities are simply too powerful to overcome=
=20
through executive orders or other regulations.  To the greatest extent=20
possible, California should shift control over interconnection away from th=
e=20
utility and place that control with the California ISO.  This could be=20
accomplished through amendments to SB 27X.

Permitting and Air Quality Issues
Developers of distributed (i.e., =01&on-site=018) generation that is 50 MWs=
 or=20
greater must receive certification from the California Energy Commission an=
d=20
therefore face all of the impediments to development that large-scale=20
generation faces. =20

Solution: California should ensure that the executive orders (D-22-01 thru=
=20
D-26-01) issued by the Governor to expedite plant siting and maximize plant=
=20
output apply equally to smaller scale, =01&distributed generation=018 facil=
ities.=20
In addition, distributed generation that is less than 50 MWs continues to=
=20
face local opposition.  The State should ensure that local, parochial=20
interests cannot block otherwise beneficial distributed generation projects=
. =20
These objectives could be accomplished through amendments to SB27X.

3. Credit Concerns Regarding Authority Granted to DWR in AB1X to Purchase=
=20
Electricity on Behalf of the Utilities=20

Enron responded to the RFP issued by DWR to enter into power contracts with=
=20
suppliers.
Enron is in active discussions with DWR to establish contract terms with th=
e=20
goal of entering into a power purchase agreement as soon as possible.
However, ambiguities contained in AB1X have created significant credit risk=
=20
concerns that need to be resolved in order to finalize contract terms.
We understand that the lion=01,s share of counterparties share Enron=01,s c=
redit=20
risk concerns.
Enron has proposed several options for resolving the credit risk issues and=
=20
is working with DWR to arrive at a solution that is mutually agreeable to=
=20
both sides and that might serve as a template for power purchase agreements=
=20
going forward.

Summary of the Source of the Credit Risk Issue

Ambiguous Ratemaking Authority
The language in AB1X is ambiguous as to whether DWR has any authority to=20
charge California ratepayers for the costs of purchasing power.  From our=
=20
analysis of the bill, the language in AB1X appears to leave intact the=20
California PUC=01,s exclusive jurisdiction over ratemaking in California.  =
As=20
such, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agree to include in rat=
es=20
adequate charges to cover DWR=01,s costs of power purchases.

Ambiguous Regulatory Authority Regarding Contract =01&Prudence=018
The language in AB1X leaves open the possibility that the California Public=
=20
Utilities Commission could determine that power purchases made by DWR are=
=20
=01&imprudent.=018  On the basis of such a finding, the CPUC could then ref=
use to=20
allow DWR to collect from ratepayers the costs associated with its power=20
purchases.  Consequently, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agr=
ee=20
to include in rates the charges to cover the costs of power contracts that=
=20
DWR has entered into with suppliers.
=20
Ambiguous Language Regarding the Ratemaking Mechanism that Will Be Used to=
=20
Recover DWR=01,s Costs of Power Purchases
In addition to the ambiguity regarding ratemaking and regulatory authority=
=20
noted above, the language in the bill is equally ambiguous with respect to=
=20
the specific ratemaking =01&mechanics=018 that AB1X directs the PUC to empl=
oy to=20
permit DWR to recover its power purchase costs. Based on our analysis, it i=
s=20
extremely difficult to determine how the PUC would design the rates to ensu=
re=20
DWR recovers its power purchase costs.  Moreover, as currently drafted, it =
is=20
difficult to determine whether AB1X would even permit the PUC to include in=
=20
rates all of the charges necessary to fully recover DWR=01,s power purchase=
=20
costs.  Again, this ambiguity raises significant credit risk concerns since=
=20
suppliers have little assurance that DWR will have the ability to recover=
=20
from ratepayers the costs of purchasing power.

Options to Resolve Concerns Regarding Credit Risk=20

We have been working diligently with DWR officials to resolve the credit ri=
sk=20
issues.  We have identified three options:

Amend AB1X
The amendments, which are attached to this email, would clarify that a) the=
=20
PUC would accept as =01&prudent and reasonable=018 all purchase costs incur=
red by=20
DWR, and b) the PUC is obligated to include in rates the charges necessary =
to=20
ensure that DWR fully recovers its costs of power purchases.  This is the=
=20
preferred option, though we understand that the there may be some political=
=20
challenges standing in the way of amending AB1X.  (See attached file=20
entitled, =01&AmendAB1X.doc=018.)

Clarify the Ambiguities in AB1X through an Order Issued by the PUC, and=20
through Contract Language
This is the option that we are currently working with DWR officials to=20
implement.  However, it is more complicated and could take significantly mo=
re=20
time to implement than the "legislative" fix.  We have attached electronic=
=20
copies of the talking points related to the order that the California PUC=
=20
would need to issue under this option.  (See attached file entitled,=20
=01&cpuctalkingpoints.doc.=018)

Make Use of Other Instruments Designed to Address Credit Risk
As indicated in our letter responding to DWR=01,s RFP, we are willing to ac=
cept=20
other forms of credit from DWR.  Those options include a letter of credit,=
=20
cash prepayment, or an acceptable form of collateral.  DWR officials have=
=20
indicated to us that DWR prefers to pursue the second options. That is, DWR=
=20
prefers to clarify the ambiguities in AB1X through a PUC order and through=
=20
contract amendments.

4. California=01,s Supply-demand Picture Heading into Summer 2001

Both the California Energy Commission and Cambridge Energy Research=20
Associates (CERA), a private sector energy think tank, have issued reports=
=20
showing that California faces a severe supply-demand imbalance.  They diffe=
r=20
only on how much and how soon additional supply will be made available.  Al=
l=20
credible sources agree that supply will be very tight throughout the Summer=
=20
of 2001 and that unless a solution is found immediately, blackouts are=20
likely. =20

CEC and CERA both forecast that California will be short of supply this=20
summer by approximately 5,000 MW.   These numbers are in line with our=20
estimates.  California=01,s supply base currently has a 6% capacity margin,=
 well=20
below the average 15-20%, which is recommended for reliable system operatio=
n=20
in the West.  Since the West relies more heavily upon hydroelectric power=
=20
than other regions, reserves are particularly important, owing to the=20
unpredictability of the weather and the dry year the West has experienced t=
o=20
date. In the event of a low rain and snow period, the system must possess t=
he=20
flexibility to respond to the reduced availability of power supply. =20
California=01,s very low reserve margin makes it especially susceptible to =
this=20
requirement. =20

Other reasons for reduced supply for the Summer of 2001 include the early=
=20
draw-down of reservoirs in the continual effort to manage California's seve=
re=20
supply-demand gap; emissions restrictions on existing plants; and a reduced=
=20
number of customers who can be curtailed under their contracts with the=20
utilities.  Cambridge Energy Research Associates asserts that at the curren=
t=20
pace of siting, permitting and construction, adequate supplies will not be=
=20
added to correct the market imbalance until 2003 at the earliest.

CERA predicts that California is likely to face approximately 20 hours of=
=20
rolling black outs this summer.  The CEC paints a considerably more=20
optimistic scenario, betting that California will bring an additional 5,000=
=20
MWs on line to meet peaking summer demand.  It is our view that California=
=20
should view the CEC's "rosy scenario" with considerable skepticism.

5. Suggested Package of Legislative Proposals Designed to Solve California=
=01,s=20
Electricity Crisis

This email offers an overview of our proposed legislative solution.  We wil=
l=20
deliver to your office tomorrow specific legislative language and existing=
=20
bills that we believe can accommodate our proposals.

As we have suggested throughout the crisis, any solution to California's=20
crisis must focus on four issues:

Increase supply
Decrease demand
Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market
Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency

Increase supply--Legislative vehicle: SB28X (Sher)
To site and construct a power plant in Texas takes approximately 2 years. =
=20
Enron and others have completed the entire process in other states in less=
=20
than a year.  In California, it takes about six years, or longer.

The Governor=01,s executive orders and Senator Sher=01,s siting reform legi=
slation=20
are steps in the right direction.  Our suggested amendments can improve tho=
se=20
efforts by further addressing the difficulties that project developers face=
=20
in securing air emission reduction credits to meet the air permit=20
requirements included in the CEC's certification requirements.  Enron=01,s=
=20
proposal seeks to streamline the process for 1) obtaining credits and 2)=20
transfering credits between air districts.  In addition, it creates an=20
innovative emissions reduction bank to allow project sponsors to fund=20
emissions in advance of obtaining certification, and permits the affected a=
ir=20
districts to use those funds to finance projects that will produce the=20
required reductions in pollution emissions.

Decrease demand=01*Legislative Vehicle:   AB31X (Wright)
Because of the delay in getting a solution in place in California, closing=
=20
the supply-demand gap through energy conservation and efficiency offers the=
=20
best chance of avoiding blackouts this summer.  This can be accomplished mo=
st=20
effectively and quickly in two ways:

Buy-down demand
California is tapping into an enormous amount of money from the General Fun=
d=20
to finance DWR=01,s power purchases.  California could likely reduce demand=
 more=20
economically by running an auction to determine the payments businesses wou=
ld=20
be willing to receive to reduce their demand for a sustained period (e.g.,=
=20
through the summer months).  DWR could easily run an on-line auction to=20
determine the price it could pay for these demand reductions.  To=20
participate, businesses would be required to have the metering equipment=20
necessary to monitor and verify that they are actually achieving the=20
reductions.  Enron has developed an on-line auction software package, =01&D=
eal=20
Bench,=018 that it would be willing to contribute to the effort.

Use Price Signals to Incent Voluntary Curtailment
To be successful, customers need access to the following key elements:

An internet based hour-ahead price posting system to track the market price=
=20
for hour-ahead power in real time.=20
Real-time metering systems for baseline demand and voluntarily curtailment=
=20
verification.
Settlement process that allows for market clearing prices of energy to be=
=20
paid for load reduction (=01&Negawatts=018).

The potential benefits of an effective demand response program would includ=
e:

=01&creation=018 of additional summer peaking capacity in California, parti=
cularly=20
in the short term, without requiring construction of additional generation=
=20
resources.
reduction of  peak or super-peak load on the over-stressed California=20
electric system, thus potentially reducing the overall cost of electricity =
in=20
the state.
fostering of demand elasticity without subjecting customers to the full ris=
k=20
of hourly market price volatility by passing market price signals to=20
customers and allowing them to voluntarily shed load and be compensated for=
=20
responding.=20

We estimate that we could generate a summer 2001 on-peak demand response in=
=20
excess of 400 MW during certain high cost hours, and a demand response for=
=20
summer 2002 on-peak hours that could exceed 1000 MW.  We further estimate=
=20
that the market response to this program from all ESPs could be 2 to 3 time=
s=20
that amount.  We recommend that the State of California provide rebates=20
directly to customers to fund the installation of advanced metering and=20
control systems that would support load curtailment implementation.

Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market=01*Legislative vehi=
cle:=20
SB27X
The only customers who were protected from price volatility in San Diego we=
re=20
customers who chose Direct Access and signed fixed price deals with energy=
=20
service providers.  Ironically, AB1X takes that important option away from=
=20
customers and businesses.  It is critical that AB1X be amended to remove th=
e=20
prohibition against Direct Access.

Enron's legislative proposal would give customers freedom to enter into a=
=20
direct access transaction, while simultaneously addressing the Department o=
f=20
Water Resources' concerns about stranded power costs that might result from=
=20
customer migration. =20

In addition, California will only achieve a competitive retail market when=
=20
the utility is removed completely from the procurement function.  Procureme=
nt=20
is not a utility core competency, as evidenced by the dire financial=20
condition in which the utilities now find themselves.  California should=20
therefore begin immediately to phase the utility out of the procurement=20
function entirely, with the goal of having all customers served by a=20
non-utility provider within 36 months.  To execute the transition, Californ=
ia=20
should hold a series of competitive solicitations over the 36-month period =
in=20
which competing service providers would bid for the right to serve segments=
=20
of utility load.

Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency=01*Legislative =
vehicle:=20
AB18X
Utility bankruptcy will not increase supply and it will not decrease demand=
. =20
In short, bankruptcy does nothing to solve California=01,s supply-demand=20
imbalance.  In addition, bankruptcy increases the likelihood that consumers=
=20
and businesses will bear the significant financial risks of having Californ=
ia=20
State government assume the role of =01&electricity buyer=018 for an extend=
ed=20
period of time.  Finally, bankruptcy will undermine both investor confidenc=
e=20
in California's energy markets and the private sector's willingness to=20
participate in that market.

California can return the utilities to financial solvency by implementing a=
=20
series of staged rate increases.  California should design those rate=20
increases with the dual goal of returning the utilities to solvency without=
=20
=01&shocking=018 the economy or household budgets For example, California c=
ould=20
amortize the recovery of the utilities=01, past debt over a 5-10 year perio=
d. =20
In addition, the magnitude of the rate increase can be reduced in two ways:=
=20
First, the utilities could absorb some portion of their existing debt in=20
recognition of the risk they accepted when they agreed to the structure of =
AB=20
1890.  Second, California can =01&net=018 the revenues the utilities have r=
eceived=20
from selling electricity into the Power Exchange against the debts they hav=
e=20
accrued due to the retail price cap.

Hi Rosalee:
Steve asked that I forward this to you.  I believe that Steve left you a=20
voicemail describing the nature of the email.

All the best,
Jeff
=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 06:11 PM
=09=09=20

=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 05:56 PM
=09=09=20
Jim:
It was a pleasure speaking with you on Wednesday.  Based on our conversatio=
n,=20
this email includes the following:

An Enron contact to discuss developing small-scale generation on Tribal lan=
ds.

Our views on the impediments to distributed generation and suggestions on h=
ow=20
to remove those impediments.

A description of the credit issues that continue to impede DWR=01,s ability=
 to=20
sign contracts with power suppliers, and options to resolve them. Two=20
possible options for addressing the credit issue are 1) a California PUC=20
order clarifying that DWR will recover its power purchase costs through=20
rates, and 2) an amendment to AB1X designed to accomplish the same goal.  I=
=20
have attached talking points regarding the California PUC order and propose=
d=20
amendments to AB1X.  We believe that an amendment to AB1X is the preferable=
=20
option.

Our assessment of the supply/demand picture in California.

Our suggestions for a legislative package designed to solve both the near-=
=20
and long-term electricity crisis in California.  We will deliver to your=20
office tomorrow detailed legislative language.  In those materials we will=
=20
also identify existing bills that we believe can easily accommodate our=20
proposed language.

I hope that the information is useful.  Please do not hesitate to contact m=
e=20
if you would like to discuss these materials further, or if there is anythi=
ng=20
else that I can do to assist you.

Regards,
Ken

Contact Information to Discuss Interest Expressed by Native American Tribes=
=20
in Installing Small-scale Generation on Tribal Lands

David Parquet, Vice-President

2. Key Barriers to Distributed Generation

Excessive and Unnecessary Utility Stand-by Charges

Solution: The executive orders issued by the Governor on February 14th took=
 a=20
step in the right direction.  Utility stand-by charges have always been=20
designed by the utilities to protect their monopoly position, extract=20
monopoly prices from customers, or both.  But there is no reason to limit t=
he=20
elimination of these charges to generation facilities that are less than=20
1MW.  These limits will only lengthen unnecessarily the time it takes for=
=20
California to close the significant gap between supply and demand and reduc=
e=20
the risk of black outs this summer.  We would propose lifting the cap by=20
offering amendments to SB27X, which is designed to facilitate development o=
f=20
distributed generation.
=20
Excessive delays and costs related to interconnecting facilities with=20
investor-owned and municipal utilities

Solution:   The Governor=01,s executive order regarding interconnection is =
a=20
step in the right direction=01*D-D-26-01 requires utilities to complete=20
interconnection studies within 7 days.  California should ensure that this=
=20
requirement applies to all generation facilities, including distributed=20
generation.  In addition, the financial conflicts the utilities face when=
=20
interconnecting generation facilities are simply too powerful to overcome=
=20
through executive orders or other regulations.  To the greatest extent=20
possible, California should shift control over interconnection away from th=
e=20
utility and place that control with the California ISO.  This could be=20
accomplished through amendments to SB 27X.

Permitting and Air Quality Issues
Developers of distributed (i.e., =01&on-site=018) generation that is 50 MWs=
 or=20
greater must receive certification from the California Energy Commission an=
d=20
therefore face all of the impediments to development that large-scale=20
generation faces. =20

Solution: California should ensure that the executive orders (D-22-01 thru=
=20
D-26-01) issued by the Governor to expedite plant siting and maximize plant=
=20
output apply equally to smaller scale, =01&distributed generation=018 facil=
ities.=20
In addition, distributed generation that is less than 50 MWs continues to=
=20
face local opposition.  The State should ensure that local, parochial=20
interests cannot block otherwise beneficial distributed generation projects=
. =20
These objectives could be accomplished through amendments to SB27X.

3. Credit Concerns Regarding Authority Granted to DWR in AB1X to Purchase=
=20
Electricity on Behalf of the Utilities=20

Enron responded to the RFP issued by DWR to enter into power contracts with=
=20
suppliers.
Enron is in active discussions with DWR to establish contract terms with th=
e=20
goal of entering into a power purchase agreement as soon as possible.
However, ambiguities contained in AB1X have created significant credit risk=
=20
concerns that need to be resolved in order to finalize contract terms.
We understand that the lion=01,s share of counterparties share Enron=01,s c=
redit=20
risk concerns.
Enron has proposed several options for resolving the credit risk issues and=
=20
is working with DWR to arrive at a solution that is mutually agreeable to=
=20
both sides and that might serve as a template for power purchase agreements=
=20
going forward.

Summary of the Source of the Credit Risk Issue

Ambiguous Ratemaking Authority
The language in AB1X is ambiguous as to whether DWR has any authority to=20
charge California ratepayers for the costs of purchasing power.  From our=
=20
analysis of the bill, the language in AB1X appears to leave intact the=20
California PUC=01,s exclusive jurisdiction over ratemaking in California.  =
As=20
such, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agree to include in rat=
es=20
adequate charges to cover DWR=01,s costs of power purchases.

Ambiguous Regulatory Authority Regarding Contract =01&Prudence=018
The language in AB1X leaves open the possibility that the California Public=
=20
Utilities Commission could determine that power purchases made by DWR are=
=20
=01&imprudent.=018  On the basis of such a finding, the CPUC could then ref=
use to=20
allow DWR to collect from ratepayers the costs associated with its power=20
purchases.  Consequently, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agr=
ee=20
to include in rates the charges to cover the costs of power contracts that=
=20
DWR has entered into with suppliers.
=20
Ambiguous Language Regarding the Ratemaking Mechanism that Will Be Used to=
=20
Recover DWR=01,s Costs of Power Purchases
In addition to the ambiguity regarding ratemaking and regulatory authority=
=20
noted above, the language in the bill is equally ambiguous with respect to=
=20
the specific ratemaking =01&mechanics=018 that AB1X directs the PUC to empl=
oy to=20
permit DWR to recover its power purchase costs. Based on our analysis, it i=
s=20
extremely difficult to determine how the PUC would design the rates to ensu=
re=20
DWR recovers its power purchase costs.  Moreover, as currently drafted, it =
is=20
difficult to determine whether AB1X would even permit the PUC to include in=
=20
rates all of the charges necessary to fully recover DWR=01,s power purchase=
=20
costs.  Again, this ambiguity raises significant credit risk concerns since=
=20
suppliers have little assurance that DWR will have the ability to recover=
=20
from ratepayers the costs of purchasing power.

Options to Resolve Concerns Regarding Credit Risk=20

We have been working diligently with DWR officials to resolve the credit ri=
sk=20
issues.  We have identified three options:

Amend AB1X
The amendments, which are attached to this email, would clarify that a) the=
=20
PUC would accept as =01&prudent and reasonable=018 all purchase costs incur=
red by=20
DWR, and b) the PUC is obligated to include in rates the charges necessary =
to=20
ensure that DWR fully recovers its costs of power purchases.  This is the=
=20
preferred option, though we understand that the there may be some political=
=20
challenges standing in the way of amending AB1X.  (See attached file=20
entitled, =01&AmendAB1X.doc=018.)

Clarify the Ambiguities in AB1X through an Order Issued by the PUC, and=20
through Contract Language
This is the option that we are currently working with DWR officials to=20
implement.  However, it is more complicated and could take significantly mo=
re=20
time to implement than the "legislative" fix.  We have attached electronic=
=20
copies of the talking points related to the order that the California PUC=
=20
would need to issue under this option.  (See attached file entitled,=20
=01&cpuctalkingpoints.doc.=018)

Make Use of Other Instruments Designed to Address Credit Risk
As indicated in our letter responding to DWR=01,s RFP, we are willing to ac=
cept=20
other forms of credit from DWR.  Those options include a letter of credit,=
=20
cash prepayment, or an acceptable form of collateral.  DWR officials have=
=20
indicated to us that DWR prefers to pursue the second options. That is, DWR=
=20
prefers to clarify the ambiguities in AB1X through a PUC order and through=
=20
contract amendments.

4. California=01,s Supply-demand Picture Heading into Summer 2001

Both the California Energy Commission and Cambridge Energy Research=20
Associates (CERA), a private sector energy think tank, have issued reports=
=20
showing that California faces a severe supply-demand imbalance.  They diffe=
r=20
only on how much and how soon additional supply will be made available.  Al=
l=20
credible sources agree that supply will be very tight throughout the Summer=
=20
of 2001 and that unless a solution is found immediately, blackouts are=20
likely. =20

CEC and CERA both forecast that California will be short of supply this=20
summer by approximately 5,000 MW.   These numbers are in line with our=20
estimates.  California=01,s supply base currently has a 6% capacity margin,=
 well=20
below the average 15-20%, which is recommended for reliable system operatio=
n=20
in the West.  Since the West relies more heavily upon hydroelectric power=
=20
than other regions, reserves are particularly important, owing to the=20
unpredictability of the weather and the dry year the West has experienced t=
o=20
date. In the event of a low rain and snow period, the system must possess t=
he=20
flexibility to respond to the reduced availability of power supply. =20
California=01,s very low reserve margin makes it especially susceptible to =
this=20
requirement. =20

Other reasons for reduced supply for the Summer of 2001 include the early=
=20
draw-down of reservoirs in the continual effort to manage California's seve=
re=20
supply-demand gap; emissions restrictions on existing plants; and a reduced=
=20
number of customers who can be curtailed under their contracts with the=20
utilities.  Cambridge Energy Research Associates asserts that at the curren=
t=20
pace of siting, permitting and construction, adequate supplies will not be=
=20
added to correct the market imbalance until 2003 at the earliest.

CERA predicts that California is likely to face approximately 20 hours of=
=20
rolling black outs this summer.  The CEC paints a considerably more=20
optimistic scenario, betting that California will bring an additional 5,000=
=20
MWs on line to meet peaking summer demand.  It is our view that California=
=20
should view the CEC's "rosy scenario" with considerable skepticism.

5. Suggested Package of Legislative Proposals Designed to Solve California=
=01,s=20
Electricity Crisis

This email offers an overview of our proposed legislative solution.  We wil=
l=20
deliver to your office tomorrow specific legislative language and existing=
=20
bills that we believe can accommodate our proposals.

As we have suggested throughout the crisis, any solution to California's=20
crisis must focus on four issues:

Increase supply
Decrease demand
Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market
Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency

Increase supply--Legislative vehicle: SB28X (Sher)
To site and construct a power plant in Texas takes approximately 2 years. =
=20
Enron and others have completed the entire process in other states in less=
=20
than a year.  In California, it takes about six years, or longer.

The Governor=01,s executive orders and Senator Sher=01,s siting reform legi=
slation=20
are steps in the right direction.  Our suggested amendments can improve tho=
se=20
efforts by further addressing the difficulties that project developers face=
=20
in securing air emission reduction credits to meet the air permit=20
requirements included in the CEC's certification requirements.  Enron=01,s=
=20
proposal seeks to streamline the process for 1) obtaining credits and 2)=20
transfering credits between air districts.  In addition, it creates an=20
innovative emissions reduction bank to allow project sponsors to fund=20
emissions in advance of obtaining certification, and permits the affected a=
ir=20
districts to use those funds to finance projects that will produce the=20
required reductions in pollution emissions.

Decrease demand=01*Legislative Vehicle:   AB31X (Wright)
Because of the delay in getting a solution in place in California, closing=
=20
the supply-demand gap through energy conservation and efficiency offers the=
=20
best chance of avoiding blackouts this summer.  This can be accomplished mo=
st=20
effectively and quickly in two ways:

Buy-down demand
California is tapping into an enormous amount of money from the General Fun=
d=20
to finance DWR=01,s power purchases.  California could likely reduce demand=
 more=20
economically by running an auction to determine the payments businesses wou=
ld=20
be willing to receive to reduce their demand for a sustained period (e.g.,=
=20
through the summer months).  DWR could easily run an on-line auction to=20
determine the price it could pay for these demand reductions.  To=20
participate, businesses would be required to have the metering equipment=20
necessary to monitor and verify that they are actually achieving the=20
reductions.  Enron has developed an on-line auction software package, =01&D=
eal=20
Bench,=018 that it would be willing to contribute to the effort.

Use Price Signals to Incent Voluntary Curtailment
To be successful, customers need access to the following key elements:

An internet based hour-ahead price posting system to track the market price=
=20
for hour-ahead power in real time.=20
Real-time metering systems for baseline demand and voluntarily curtailment=
=20
verification.
Settlement process that allows for market clearing prices of energy to be=
=20
paid for load reduction (=01&Negawatts=018).

The potential benefits of an effective demand response program would includ=
e:

=01&creation=018 of additional summer peaking capacity in California, parti=
cularly=20
in the short term, without requiring construction of additional generation=
=20
resources.
reduction of  peak or super-peak load on the over-stressed California=20
electric system, thus potentially reducing the overall cost of electricity =
in=20
the state.
fostering of demand elasticity without subjecting customers to the full ris=
k=20
of hourly market price volatility by passing market price signals to=20
customers and allowing them to voluntarily shed load and be compensated for=
=20
responding.=20

We estimate that we could generate a summer 2001 on-peak demand response in=
=20
excess of 400 MW during certain high cost hours, and a demand response for=
=20
summer 2002 on-peak hours that could exceed 1000 MW.  We further estimate=
=20
that the market response to this program from all ESPs could be 2 to 3 time=
s=20
that amount.  We recommend that the State of California provide rebates=20
directly to customers to fund the installation of advanced metering and=20
control systems that would support load curtailment implementation.

Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market=01*Legislative vehi=
cle:=20
SB27X
The only customers who were protected from price volatility in San Diego we=
re=20
customers who chose Direct Access and signed fixed price deals with energy=
=20
service providers.  Ironically, AB1X takes that important option away from=
=20
customers and businesses.  It is critical that AB1X be amended to remove th=
e=20
prohibition against Direct Access.

Enron's legislative proposal would give customers freedom to enter into a=
=20
direct access transaction, while simultaneously addressing the Department o=
f=20
Water Resources' concerns about stranded power costs that might result from=
=20
customer migration. =20

In addition, California will only achieve a competitive retail market when=
=20
the utility is removed completely from the procurement function.  Procureme=
nt=20
is not a utility core competency, as evidenced by the dire financial=20
condition in which the utilities now find themselves.  California should=20
therefore begin immediately to phase the utility out of the procurement=20
function entirely, with the goal of having all customers served by a=20
non-utility provider within 36 months.  To execute the transition, Californ=
ia=20
should hold a series of competitive solicitations over the 36-month period =
in=20
which competing service providers would bid for the right to serve segments=
=20
of utility load.

Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency=01*Legislative =
vehicle:=20
AB18X
Utility bankruptcy will not increase supply and it will not decrease demand=
. =20
In short, bankruptcy does nothing to solve California=01,s supply-demand=20
imbalance.  In addition, bankruptcy increases the likelihood that consumers=
=20
and businesses will bear the significant financial risks of having Californ=
ia=20
State government assume the role of =01&electricity buyer=018 for an extend=
ed=20
period of time.  Finally, bankruptcy will undermine both investor confidenc=
e=20
in California's energy markets and the private sector's willingness to=20
participate in that market.

California can return the utilities to financial solvency by implementing a=
=20
series of staged rate increases.  California should design those rate=20
increases with the dual goal of returning the utilities to solvency without=
=20
=01&shocking=018 the economy or household budgets For example, California c=
ould=20
amortize the recovery of the utilities=01, past debt over a 5-10 year perio=
d. =20
In addition, the magnitude of the rate increase can be reduced in two ways:=
=20
First, the utilities could absorb some portion of their existing debt in=20
recognition of the risk they accepted when they agreed to the structure of =
AB=20
1890.  Second, California can =01&net=018 the revenues the utilities have r=
eceived=20
from selling electricity into the Power Exchange against the debts they hav=
e=20
accrued due to the retail price cap.

Greetings All:

First, I am apologizing in advance for any typos in this email.  Schedule i=
s=20
very tight, but I wanted to make sure that everyone had it first thing this=
=20
morning, with some back-up info that I've included below.

Attached is the email that was sent to Ken Lay's office yesterday evening f=
or=20
delivery to Sen. Brulte.  It's of course confidential.  Few points:

I don't have Bev's email, so if you could please forward to her, that would=
=20
be appreciated.
As we discussed (Jim, Mike, Bev, Scott, Hedy) on our lengthy call on=20
Wednesday, I'm assuming that the plan is still to "wallpaper" Sacramento wi=
th=20
our proposed legislation.
This email does not contain the legislation.  Mike sent the "final" version=
s=20
of our legislation out yesterday, except for the siting piece, which I=20
believe Brian Cragg of Mike's office is finalizing today.
You'll note that we promise Senator Brulte in the email that we'll deliver =
to=20
his office today the proposed legislation.  Again, based on our call on=20
Wednesday, I'm assuming that we would simultaneously release the proposed=
=20
legislation to the rest of the world at the same time.
When we spoke on Wednesday, we decided that the Sacramento team would=20
determine to whom we would circulate the proposed legislation at the same=
=20
time that we deliver the Senator Brulte. I'm assuming that you folks will=
=20
handle that end of things.  Please let us know at your convenience to whom=
=20
you've decided to circulate.
This email does, however, include a "summary" of our proposed legislation. =
=20
But I'm not certain that the summary included in this email is the=20
appropriate language to distribute "to the world," or if we'll need instead=
=20
to tailor some new language.  I think we all agreed that we need a "one=20
pager" to accompany the legislative package so that we can communicate the=
=20
package effectively.
We also discussed the need to quickly develop a coalition to support our=20
proposals.  We didn't finalize that plan.  Perhaps the Sacramento team coul=
d=20
propose a plan to do that.  Perhaps we could start with our friends in the=
=20
Direct Access coalition?
We also talked about the need at this point to engage in PR and to get the =
PR=20
machinery activated, also with the goal of effectively communicating our=20
legislative package/message.  We're in a meeting with folks today where we=
=20
can discuss getting that side of things going and Karen Denne has contacted=
=20
Marathon and they're pondering some things that we can do in the near term.
You'll note that there's a considerable amount of information about the DWR=
=20
credit issue.  As I recollect, we discussed the issue in depth on the call.=
 =20
You note that attached to the email is a "legislative fix" to AB1X that cou=
ld=20
solve the credit issue and an attached set of "taking points" related to a=
=20
second alternative to solving the credit issue:  a PUC order clarifying tha=
t=20
DWR will get its money for power purchase costs.
Note also that Steve Kean reminded me that we've got to continue to push to=
=20
get the utilities out of the merchant function.  Accordingly, I've put a=20
brief paragraph on that issue in the note to Brulte in the last section=20
(legislative solution) under the topic "create a real competitive retail=20
market in California."  To the best of my knowledge, we don't have=20
legislative language on that piece yet, and it seems that we'll need to=20
discuss it in considerably more depth before doing so.

If you have any questions about any of the materials in the email, please=
=20
don't hesitate to contact me or Jim or Sandi to discuss.  I can be best=20
reached to day by pager at 888.916.7184. =20

Thanks to all for helping pull this together.

Best,
Jeff

=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 06:11 PM
=09=09=20
Steve:
Here's a substantially more cleaned-version, with attachments.  There's a=
=20
hard copy on your chair.

Best,
Jeff
=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 05:56 PM
=09=09=20
Jim:
It was a pleasure speaking with you yesterday.  Based on our conversation,=
=20
this email includes the following:

An Enron contact to discuss developing small-scale generation on Tribal lan=
ds.

Our views on the impediments to distributed generation and suggestions on h=
ow=20
to remove those impediments.

A description of the credit issues that continue to impede DWR=01,s ability=
 to=20
sign contracts with power suppliers, and options to resolve them. Two=20
possible options for addressing the credit issue are 1) a California PUC=20
order clarifying that DWR will recover its power purchase costs through=20
rates, and 2) an amendment to AB1X designed to accomplish the same goal.  I=
=20
have attached talking points regarding the California PUC order and propose=
d=20
amendments to AB1X.  We believe that an amendment to AB1X is the preferable=
=20
option.

Our assessment of the supply/demand picture in California.

Our suggestions for a legislative package designed to solve both the near-=
=20
and long-term electricity crisis in California.  We will deliver to your=20
office tomorrow detailed legislative language.  In those materials we will=
=20
also identify existing bills that we believe can easily accommodate our=20
proposed language.

I hope that the information is useful.  Please do not hesitate to contact m=
e=20
if you would like to discuss these materials further, or if there is anythi=
ng=20
else that I can do to assist you.

Regards,
Ken

Contact Information to Discuss Interest Expressed by Native American Tribes=
=20
in Installing Small-scale Generation on Tribal Lands

David Parquet, Vice-President

2. Key Barriers to Distributed Generation

Excessive and Unnecessary Utility Stand-by Charges

Solution: The executive orders issued by the Governor on February 14th took=
 a=20
step in the right direction.  Utility stand-by charges have always been=20
designed by the utilities to protect their monopoly position, extract=20
monopoly prices from customers, or both.  But there is no reason to limit t=
he=20
elimination of these charges to generation facilities that are less than=20
1MW.  These limits will only lengthen unnecessarily the time it takes for=
=20
California to close the significant gap between supply and demand and reduc=
e=20
the risk of black outs this summer.  We would propose lifting the cap by=20
offering amendments to SB27X, which is designed to facilitate development o=
f=20
distributed generation.
=20
Excessive delays and costs related to interconnecting facilities with=20
investor-owned and municipal utilities

Solution:   The Governor=01,s executive order regarding interconnection is =
a=20
step in the right direction=01*D-D-26-01 requires utilities to complete=20
interconnection studies within 7 days.  California should ensure that this=
=20
requirement applies to all generation facilities, including distributed=20
generation.  In addition, the financial conflicts the utilities face when=
=20
interconnecting generation facilities are simply too powerful to overcome=
=20
through executive orders or other regulations.  To the greatest extent=20
possible, California should shift control over interconnection away from th=
e=20
utility and place that control with the California ISO.  This could be=20
accomplished through amendments to SB 27X.

Permitting and Air Quality Issues
Developers of distributed (i.e., =01&on-site=018) generation that is 50 MWs=
 or=20
greater must receive certification from the California Energy Commission an=
d=20
therefore face all of the impediments to development that large-scale=20
generation faces. =20

Solution: California should ensure that the executive orders (D-22-01 thru=
=20
D-26-01) issued by the Governor to expedite plant siting and maximize plant=
=20
output apply equally to smaller scale, =01&distributed generation=018 facil=
ities.=20
In addition, distributed generation that is less than 50 MWs continues to=
=20
face local opposition.  The State should ensure that local, parochial=20
interests cannot block otherwise beneficial distributed generation projects=
. =20
These objectives could be accomplished through amendments to SB27X.

3. Credit Concerns Regarding Authority Granted to DWR in AB1X to Purchase=
=20
Electricity on Behalf of the Utilities=20

Enron responded to the RFP issued by DWR to enter into power contracts with=
=20
suppliers.
Enron is in active discussions with DWR to establish contract terms with th=
e=20
goal of entering into a power purchase agreement as soon as possible.
However, ambiguities contained in AB1X have created significant credit risk=
=20
concerns that need to be resolved in order to finalize contract terms.
We understand that the lion=01,s share of counterparties share Enron=01,s c=
redit=20
risk concerns.
Enron has proposed several options for resolving the credit risk issues and=
=20
is working with DWR to arrive at a solution that is mutually agreeable to=
=20
both sides and that might serve as a template for power purchase agreements=
=20
going forward.

Summary of the Source of the Credit Risk Issue

Ambiguous Ratemaking Authority
The language in AB1X is ambiguous as to whether DWR has any authority to=20
charge California ratepayers for the costs of purchasing power.  From our=
=20
analysis of the bill, the language in AB1X appears to leave intact the=20
California PUC=01,s exclusive jurisdiction over ratemaking in California.  =
As=20
such, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agree to include in rat=
es=20
adequate charges to cover DWR=01,s costs of power purchases.

Ambiguous Regulatory Authority Regarding Contract =01&Prudence=018
The language in AB1X leaves open the possibility that the California Public=
=20
Utilities Commission could determine that power purchases made by DWR are=
=20
=01&imprudent.=018  On the basis of such a finding, the CPUC could then ref=
use to=20
allow DWR to collect from ratepayers the costs associated with its power=20
purchases.  Consequently, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agr=
ee=20
to include in rates the charges to cover the costs of power contracts that=
=20
DWR has entered into with suppliers.
=20
Ambiguous Language Regarding the Ratemaking Mechanism that Will Be Used to=
=20
Recover DWR=01,s Costs of Power Purchases
In addition to the ambiguity regarding ratemaking and regulatory authority=
=20
noted above, the language in the bill is equally ambiguous with respect to=
=20
the specific ratemaking =01&mechanics=018 that AB1X directs the PUC to empl=
oy to=20
permit DWR to recover its power purchase costs. Based on our analysis, it i=
s=20
extremely difficult to determine how the PUC would design the rates to ensu=
re=20
DWR recovers its power purchase costs.  Moreover, as currently drafted, it =
is=20
difficult to determine whether AB1X would even permit the PUC to include in=
=20
rates all of the charges necessary to fully recover DWR=01,s power purchase=
=20
costs.  Again, this ambiguity raises significant credit risk concerns since=
=20
suppliers have little assurance that DWR will have the ability to recover=
=20
from ratepayers the costs of purchasing power.

Options to Resolve Concerns Regarding Credit Risk=20

We have been working diligently with DWR officials to resolve the credit ri=
sk=20
issues.  We have identified three options:

Amend AB1X
The amendments, which are attached to this email, would clarify that a) the=
=20
PUC would accept as =01&prudent and reasonable=018 all purchase costs incur=
red by=20
DWR, and b) the PUC is obligated to include in rates the charges necessary =
to=20
ensure that DWR fully recovers its costs of power purchases.  This is the=
=20
preferred option, though we understand that the there may be some political=
=20
challenges standing in the way of amending AB1X.  (See attached file=20
entitled, =01&AmendAB1X.doc=018.)

Clarify the Ambiguities in AB1X through an Order Issued by the PUC, and=20
through Contract Language
This is the option that we are currently working with DWR officials to=20
implement.  However, it is more complicated and could take significantly mo=
re=20
time to implement than the "legislative" fix.  We have attached electronic=
=20
copies of the talking points related to the order that the California PUC=
=20
would need to issue under this option.  (See attached file entitled,=20
=01&cpuctalkingpoints.doc.=018)

Make Use of Other Instruments Designed to Address Credit Risk
As indicated in our letter responding to DWR=01,s RFP, we are willing to ac=
cept=20
other forms of credit from DWR.  Those options include a letter of credit,=
=20
cash prepayment, or an acceptable form of collateral.  DWR officials have=
=20
indicated to us that DWR prefers to pursue the second options. That is, DWR=
=20
prefers to clarify the ambiguities in AB1X through a PUC order and through=
=20
contract amendments.

4. California=01,s Supply-demand Picture Heading into Summer 2001

Both the California Energy Commission and Cambridge Energy Research=20
Associates (CERA), a private sector energy think tank, have issued reports=
=20
showing that California faces a severe supply-demand imbalance.  They diffe=
r=20
only on how much and how soon additional supply will be made available.  Al=
l=20
credible sources agree that supply will be very tight throughout the Summer=
=20
of 2001 and that unless a solution is found immediately, blackouts are=20
likely. =20

CEC and CERA both forecast that California will be short of supply this=20
summer by approximately 5,000 MW.   These numbers are in line with our=20
estimates.  California=01,s supply base currently has a 6% capacity margin,=
 well=20
below the average 15-20%, which is recommended for reliable system operatio=
n=20
in the West.  Since the West relies more heavily upon hydroelectric power=
=20
than other regions, reserves are particularly important, owing to the=20
unpredictability of the weather and the dry year the West has experienced t=
o=20
date. In the event of a low rain and snow period, the system must possess t=
he=20
flexibility to respond to the reduced availability of power supply. =20
California=01,s very low reserve margin makes it especially susceptible to =
this=20
requirement. =20

Other reasons for reduced supply for the Summer of 2001 include the early=
=20
draw-down of reservoirs in the continual effort to manage California's seve=
re=20
supply-demand gap; emissions restrictions on existing plants; and a reduced=
=20
number of customers who can be curtailed under their contracts with the=20
utilities.  Cambridge Energy Research Associates asserts that at the curren=
t=20
pace of siting, permitting and construction, adequate supplies will not be=
=20
added to correct the market imbalance until 2003 at the earliest.

CERA predicts that California is likely to face approximately 20 hours of=
=20
rolling black outs this summer.  The CEC paints a considerably more=20
optimistic scenario, betting that California will bring an additional 5,000=
=20
MWs on line to meet peaking summer demand.  It is our view that California=
=20
should view the CEC's "rosy scenario" with considerable skepticism.

5. Suggested Package of Legislative Proposals Designed to Solve California=
=01,s=20
Electricity Crisis

This email offers an overview of our proposed legislative solution.  We wil=
l=20
deliver to your office tomorrow specific legislative language and existing=
=20
bills that we believe can accommodate our proposals.

As we have suggested throughout the crisis, any solution to California's=20
crisis must focus on four issues:

Increase supply
Decrease demand
Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market
Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency

Increase supply--Legislative vehicle: SB28X (Sher)
To site and construct a power plant in Texas takes approximately 2 years. =
=20
Enron and others have completed the entire process in other states in less=
=20
than a year.  In California, it takes about six years, or longer.

The Governor=01,s executive orders and Senator Sher=01,s siting reform legi=
slation=20
are steps in the right direction.  Our suggested amendments can improve tho=
se=20
efforts by further addressing the difficulties that project developers face=
=20
in securing air emission reduction credits to meet the air permit=20
requirements included in the CEC's certification requirements.  Enron=01,s=
=20
proposal seeks to streamline the process for 1) obtaining credits and 2)=20
transfering credits between air districts.  In addition, it creates an=20
innovative emissions reduction bank to allow project sponsors to fund=20
emissions in advance of obtaining certification, and permits the affected a=
ir=20
districts to use those funds to finance projects that will produce the=20
required reductions in pollution emissions.

Decrease demand=01*Legislative Vehicle:   AB31X (Wright)
Because of the delay in getting a solution in place in California, closing=
=20
the supply-demand gap through energy conservation and efficiency offers the=
=20
best chance of avoiding blackouts this summer.  This can be accomplished mo=
st=20
effectively and quickly in two ways:

Buy-down demand
California is tapping into an enormous amount of money from the General Fun=
d=20
to finance DWR=01,s power purchases.  California could likely reduce demand=
 more=20
economically by running an auction to determine the payments businesses wou=
ld=20
be willing to receive to reduce their demand for a sustained period (e.g.,=
=20
through the summer months).  DWR could easily run an on-line auction to=20
determine the price it could pay for these demand reductions.  To=20
participate, businesses would be required to have the metering equipment=20
necessary to monitor and verify that they are actually achieving the=20
reductions.  Enron has developed an on-line auction software package, =01&D=
eal=20
Bench,=018 that it would be willing to contribute to the effort.

Use Price Signals to Incent Voluntary Curtailment
To be successful, customers need access to the following key elements:

An internet based hour-ahead price posting system to track the market price=
=20
for hour-ahead power in real time.=20
Real-time metering systems for baseline demand and voluntarily curtailment=
=20
verification.
Settlement process that allows for market clearing prices of energy to be=
=20
paid for load reduction (=01&Negawatts=018).

The potential benefits of an effective demand response program would includ=
e:

=01&creation=018 of additional summer peaking capacity in California, parti=
cularly=20
in the short term, without requiring construction of additional generation=
=20
resources.
reduction of  peak or super-peak load on the over-stressed California=20
electric system, thus potentially reducing the overall cost of electricity =
in=20
the state.
fostering of demand elasticity without subjecting customers to the full ris=
k=20
of hourly market price volatility by passing market price signals to=20
customers and allowing them to voluntarily shed load and be compensated for=
=20
responding.=20

We estimate that we could generate a summer 2001 on-peak demand response in=
=20
excess of 400 MW during certain high cost hours, and a demand response for=
=20
summer 2002 on-peak hours that could exceed 1000 MW.  We further estimate=
=20
that the market response to this program from all ESPs could be 2 to 3 time=
s=20
that amount.  We recommend that the State of California provide rebates=20
directly to customers to fund the installation of advanced metering and=20
control systems that would support load curtailment implementation.

Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market=01*Legislative vehi=
cle:=20
SB27X
The only customers who were protected from price volatility in San Diego we=
re=20
customers who chose Direct Access and signed fixed price deals with energy=
=20
service providers.  Ironically, AB1X takes that important option away from=
=20
customers and businesses.  It is critical that AB1X be amended to remove th=
e=20
prohibition against Direct Access.

Enron's legislative proposal would give customers freedom to enter into a=
=20
direct access transaction, while simultaneously addressing the Department o=
f=20
Water Resources' concerns about stranded power costs that might result from=
=20
customer migration. =20

In addition, California will only achieve a competitive retail market when=
=20
the utility is removed completely from the procurement function.  Procureme=
nt=20
is not a utility core competency, as evidenced by the dire financial=20
condition in which the utilities now find themselves.  California should=20
therefore begin immediately to phase the utility out of the procurement=20
function entirely, with the goal of having all customers served by a=20
non-utility provider within 36 months.  To execute the transition, Californ=
ia=20
should hold a series of competitive solicitations over the 36-month period =
in=20
which competing service providers would bid for the right to serve segments=
=20
of utility load.

Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency=01*Legislative =
vehicle:=20
AB18X
Utility bankruptcy will not increase supply and it will not decrease demand=
. =20
In short, bankruptcy does nothing to solve California=01,s supply-demand=20
imbalance.  In addition, bankruptcy increases the likelihood that consumers=
=20
and businesses will bear the significant financial risks of having Californ=
ia=20
State government assume the role of =01&electricity buyer=018 for an extend=
ed=20
period of time.  Finally, bankruptcy will undermine both investor confidenc=
e=20
in California's energy markets and the private sector's willingness to=20
participate in that market.

California can return the utilities to financial solvency by implementing a=
=20
series of staged rate increases.  California should design those rate=20
increases with the dual goal of returning the utilities to solvency without=
=20
=01&shocking=018 the economy or household budgets For example, California c=
ould=20
amortize the recovery of the utilities=01, past debt over a 5-10 year perio=
d. =20
In addition, the magnitude of the rate increase can be reduced in two ways:=
=20
First, the utilities could absorb some portion of their existing debt in=20
recognition of the risk they accepted when they agreed to the structure of =
AB=20
1890.  Second, California can =01&net=018 the revenues the utilities have r=
eceived=20
from selling electricity into the Power Exchange against the debts they hav=
e=20
accrued due to the retail price cap.

Looks like we'll be staying the night and leaving in the AM.

was travelling all week.  would be happy to discuss this weekend, but i'd 
need to be by phone, since i'll be in mendocino.  are the handouts from 
thursday that i need to get?

Best,
Jeff

	Anil Sama <asama@yahoo.com>
	02/16/2001 12:55 PM
		 
Jeff, Mark:

Wondering where you were yesterday. Hope you didn't
forget about the in-class quiz! 

The next HW and writeup due next week seems like 
a heavy one. 
Do most of you have Monday off? I'll take a look at the
case/HW Sa/Su, and prefer a meeting / conf call anytime
Monday. Perhaps PM in the city if folks are working 
that day? Sunday PM (after 7) works for me too. 

-Anil 

--- "Vavrek, Carolyn (US - San Francisco)"
<cvavrek@deloitte.com> wrote:
> Congrats crew - we got a 9 on case #2.  
> When is everyone available between now and Wed pm to talk
> about case #3 and
> the other homework?
> - cv
> 
> Carolyn M. Vavrek
> Manager - Human Capital Advisory Services
> Deloitte & Touche
> 50 Fremont Street
> San Francisco, CA  94105
> 
> phone: 415-783-5137
> fax: 415-783-8760
> e-mail: cvavrek@deloitte.com
> 
> - This message (including any attachments) contains
> confidential information
> intended for a specific individual and purpose, and is
> protected by law.  -
> If you are not the intended recipient, you should delete
> this message and
> are hereby notified that any disclosure, copying, or
> distribution of this
> message, or the taking of any action based on it, is
> strictly prohibited.
> 

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Get personalized email addresses from Yahoo! Mail - only $35 
a year!  http://personal.mail.yahoo.com/

This is Kathy Franz w/Win2K Desktop Support.

I have copied the names and journal.nsf files for Jeff Dasovich to the 
appropriate locations on the server.
They are ready to be copied up to EESHOU-LN1.

Thanks,

Kathy Franz
713-327-4709 (pager)

P.S. Please do this ASAP as customer is scheduled to leave at 4pm today.

will do.  thanks.

	Ginger Dernehl
	02/16/2001 01:38 PM
		 
Rick would like to hold a weekly call re: California every Friday from 4:00pm 
- 5:00pm CST w/the above listed individuals.  The dial in number will be 
1-800-283-1805 and the call will start on Friday, February 23.

Thanks and please mark your calendars accordingly.

gngr
713-853-7751

=09Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
=0902/16/2001 02:17 PM
=09=09=20
The IEP web-site is now on-line at www.turnonthetruth.com =01.-=01;please u=
se it
as a resource.  Please note that all references to a retail rate freeze hav=
e
been removed.

Thanks,
Jean

----=20
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

Scott Govenar, our outside lobbyist,  (916.448.8240) and Mike Day, our 
outside counsel, might also be useful resources for you, John.

Best,
Jeff

	John Neslage@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	02/16/2001 03:44 PM
		 
Hey Leslie:

Sandi McCubbin told me that I should consult with you.  I am compiling 
information on legislation being considered in California as a result of the 
electrcity crisis for two main  purposes.  First, I need it for Steve Kean's 
briefing book as he is scheduled to meet with a federal legislative panel in 
California (Tauzin and Barton, +6 other Congressmen) on Wednesday, and 
second, I am going  to compile info on emergency legislation and CPUC 
proceedings in a central place for  knowledge management purposes.

Can you email me whatever information you may have on California 
legislation?  I would greatly appreciate it.  I will also give you a call to 
follow up.   Steve's leaving on Tuesday at Noon, so I need to get info 
together well before then.

Thanks

John

	Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
	02/16/2001 03:53 PM
		 
The Republican Caucus briefing Thursday was well attended, and members were
appreciative of the fact that Jan and other members of IEP took the time to
brief them.  The feedback we've heard from Republican Leader Bill Campbell's
office and others is that the handouts IEP provided were great, and the
presentations very informative.  In fact, several members acknowledged that
they had never heard the message communicated in such a clear, concise way.

Just fyi, one issue that is on the radar screen of Republicans is the fact
that generators have not been paid -- yet they still continue to supply
electricity to California.

We have offered to brief the Democrat Caucus, but they have not expressed
interest thus far.  We will continue trying!

Below is a list of those who attended the meeting.

Thanks,
Jean

-- 
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

______________________________________
Honorable Sam Aanestad
and staff Brett Michelin

Honorable Bob Pacheco

Honorable Pat Bates
and staff Russell Lowry

Honorable Anthony Pescetti
and staff Steve McCarthy

Assembly Republican Leader Bill Campbell
and staff Barbara Brown

Honorable Mark Wyland
and staff Stefanie Curry

Honorable John Campbell
and staff Matt Back

Honorable Phil Wyman
and staff Gina Zari

Honorable Dave Cox 

Honorable Dick Dickerson
      
Honorable Dave Kelley
       
Honorable Jay LaSuer
  
Honorable Lynne Leach
                   
Honorable Bill Leonard

Staff Attending on Behalf of Absent Member
Steffanie Watkins d Roy Ashburn
Rock Zierman d Mike Briggs
Aaron Bone d Dave Cogdill
Nancy Leneis d Dennis Mountjoy
Jerilyn Stanley d Rod Pacheco
Dan Pellissier d Keith Richman
Sarah Sprouse d Tony Strickland

Policy Consultants:
David Nunenkamp
Phil Nails

Staff from Senator McClintock, Senator Brulte,
Senator McPherson, and Senator Johannessen also attended

Thanks a million, Jean.

Thanks very much.  Let's keep trying.  And congratulations on a great find in 
Roger.

Best,
Jeff

	"Robert Weisenmiller" <rbw@mrwassoc.com>
	02/16/2001 03:54 PM
		 
I have a call into John Geesman, but I have not heard from him.

I may try Susan Morse also, she knows financing issues very well (ask 
Ronnie Lott and Joe Montana) although II am not sure on muni bonds.

Bob

	Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
	02/16/2001 04:56 PM
		 
Below is a copy of Governor's press release.  Jan will be responding during
the IEP media tele-conference today at 4pm PST.  Call in number
1-800-374-2393, pass code: Independent Energy Producers.

Thanks,
Jean

-- 
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

___________
PR01: 057
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
02/16/2001 2:20 pm 

GOVERNOR DAVIS ANNOUNCES
RECOVERY PLAN FOR STATE'S UTILITIES

SACRAMENTO 

Governor Gray Davis today unveiled the framework of a recovery plan for the
California's investor-owned utilities that includes the purchase of their
power lines and targeted revenue from the existing rate structure to help
pay their back debt.

"Today we have begun serious negotiations with the utilities on a balanced
recovery plan," said Governor Davis. "This is a balanced business
transaction. It provides real benefits of real value to consumers and allows
the utilities to get back on their feet."

Elements of the plan include:

*    State purchase of the transmission grid owned by the state's three
investor-owned utilities;
*    Benefits to ratepayers and taxpayers including:

1.    A significant contribution by the parent companies to their utility
subsidiaries to satisfy their creditors and return to financial viability;
2.    The extension of cost-based rates from the utilities generating
facilities from five to 10 years and a ban on their sale;
3.    Conservation easements on utility-owned land in prime watershed areas;
and
4.    Dismissal of all pending litigation.

The Governor's plan directs the Public Utilities Commission to establish a
"dedicated rate component" from the existing rate structure (not a new
charge on consumer bills). This would allow the utilities to make payments
to their creditors, including banks, generators, and renewable energy
producers. Utilities would be allowed to sell revenue bonds secured by the
dedicated rate component.

Governor Davis said he is working closely with the legislative leadership on
legislative components necessary to carry out negotiations.

Governor Davis also noted that he sent a letter to President George W. Bush
thanking him for his order today to expedite the review and licensing of new
power generation facilities in California.

"I am extremely gratified that President Bush has acted to put the federal
government on the same path as I have in California to cut red tape and get
new power plants on line," said the Governor.

###

=09"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
=0902/16/2001 05:34 PM
=09Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
=09=09=20

Date: 2/16/01

RECENT EVENTS:

-- The Governor=01,s press conference today provided no surprises. Davis
annouced the framework of a recovery plan for the IOUs that include the
purchase of their transmission system and a dedicated rate component, not a
rate increase, on consumers=01, electric bills to allow the utilities to ma=
ke
payments to their creditors.  A transcript of the press conference will be
available later on the Goveronr=01,s web site.

--  As reported earlier this week, the Senate Energy Committee amended and
passed out SB 6x (Burton), which would establish and state power and
financing authority, and SB 33x (Burton) which would require the Governor=
=01,s
plan to purchase the IOU=01,s transmission to be approved first by the
Legislature.  Both measures were amended in the Senate Appropriations
committee and passed out the following day.

In response to Burton=01,s commitment to work with IEP on language limiting=
 the
Authority=01,s eminent domain powers, IEP has drafted amendments which will=
 be
presented to Burton staff next week.  At this point, however, I have no
confidence we will come to any resolution.  Sen. Morrow had a similar
commitment to fence-in the Authority=01,s =01&adequate reserve capacity=018=
 role, but
has since given up due to any lack of progress and believes Burton does wan=
t
much more authority than merely ensuring reserve capacity.   Given the
likelihood IEP will not gets its amendment, although we will continue to
push for it on the Assembly side, we will need to reassess our position on
this measure.  Considering there doesn=01,t appear to be anything stopping
either of these bills from making it to the Governor=01,s desk, any opposit=
ion
efforts may be futile.

So much for the good news.

-- Siting:  IEP counsel Chris Ellison and I were able to spend a
considerable amount of time this week with Senator Sher=01,s staff to talk
about siting issues.  Generally, we believe the meetings went very well and
we were able to provide comment both on SB 28x and many other siting issues
not address in the bill.  E+M is still working on putting together an
official IEP package of siting proposals which should be ready for final
comment on Tuesday.  There is no indication when SB 28x will be heard.  The
Senate Energy Committee may have a hearing on Thursday next week but has no=
t
decided for sure or what bills will be hears.  We will be anticipating that
siting is one of them.

-- QFs:  As reported by Steven Kelley this week, recent discussions with
Sen. Battin indicated that he is attempting to work with the Governor's
office on language that would, among other things, provide a linkage to the
"mega bill" and/or stronger language on payment for past due amounts. At
this point in time, the Governor's office has not responded to Battin's
request.  While the QF bill could begin moving at any time, pending the
Governor's action, it is increasingly likely that the QF legislation may no=
t
go before the =01&mega=018 bill.

 -- The Senate Energy committee also held an informational hearing this wee=
k
on the state=01,s audit of the CPUC=01,s audits of SCE and PG&E.  This is t=
he link
to the State Auditor=01,s review:
http://www.senate.ca.gov/ftp/SEN/COMMITTEE/STANDING/ENERGY/_home/Audit.htm.
From my initial review it appears as if the State Auditor believes there
were several major issues not handled in the CPUC audits.  Surprised?

-- This week=01,s ECA committee hearing on interruptible programs was cance=
led.

-- The proposed ECA committee hearing next Tuesday to address Asm. Wright=
=01,s
repower bill, AB 36x, may also be cancelled.  E+M is currently researching
what permitted, current and proposed repower projects would be able to meet
the definition currently outlined in the bill.  If you have knowledge of an=
y
of these projects and can assist with this research, please call me.  Wrigh=
t
=01,s office is asking for specific examples to help justify the amendments=
 we
are requesting..

-- McNally/Temple provided a report on this week=01,s energy briefing for t=
he
Assembly Republican caucus which went very well.  According to M/T=01,s rep=
ort,
members were appreciative of IEP taking the time to do this and several
members acknowledged that
they had never heard the message communicated in such a clear, concise way

--  Attached is the most recent legislative tracking report which includes
all the special session bills introduced to date.  The report is now 116
bill strong.  Please let me know if you need copies of any of these bills.

UPCOMING EVENTS (?):

-- Monday, February 19th is a holiday so the Legislature will be off, as
will I.

-- The Assembly Energy Costs and Availability Committee may have a hearing
on Tuesday to possibly hear AB 36x (Wright).

-- Senate Energy Committee may meet on Thursday to hear bills to be
announced.

--end--

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - 2001 Tracking Report.doc

We'll need to discuss further internally, but they may be correct in their 
assessment.

Best,
Jeff

	Tom Riley/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange
	02/16/2001 07:03 PM
		 
From further discussions with UC/CSU, it appears their primary concern 
relative to Enron's decision to De-DASR their accounts is that they have lost 
their "direct access" status, and are again a bundled utility customer.  

Jeff - what impacts does this status have with respect to the ban language of 
AB-1X?  And with SB-27X, will they now encumber costs to become a direct 
access customer that they would not have been liable for had Enron not made 
the decision to return them to utility supply?

Your input is appreciated.  Please shed some light here as soon as possible.

Regards - Tom Riley

I apologize, but I won't be in SF Monday evening, and this week coming up 
will be a grinder.  I have a lot of time to work on it over the weekend, 
though. I can provide a fax number tomorrow where the materials can be sent 
to me.  And I assume that they are on the Izio site, too.  I'm going to go 
there now.  Tomorrow, I'll try to crunch some numbers and outline the 
one-pager and distribute to folks by the end of the day.  Then perhaps we can 
email each other on Monday and try to make some progress on the memo by the 
end of the day.  That should put us in pretty good shape to finish it up 
Tuesday and Wednesday.  If I can't get the materials off of Izio, I'll let 
you know.  I'll report back in the AM tomorrow with a proposed game plan, 
once I've collected all the materials and pondered things a bit.  Sound 
reasonable? Thoughts?  Just let me know.

Mark, I hope that if you're in Denver, that means you're skiing.

Best,
Jeff

	"Mark Guinney" <Mark_Guinney@watsonwyatt.com>
	02/17/2001 12:04 PM
		 
Can we schedule a conference call at 8pm on Monday night?  I'm returning from
Denver that evening and assuming all goes according to schedule I should be 
home
by then.  

Jeff- we'll need your conference call making capabilities.  You up for it?

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax

 Connection-specific DNS Suffix  . : corp.enron.com
 IP Address. . . . . . . . . . . . : 172.28.228.37
 Subnet Mask . . . . . . . . . . . : 255.255.254.0
 Default Gateway . . . . . . . . . : 172.28.228.1

Got everything off of Izio.  I'll start messing with it and report back 
tomorrow.  If others want to do the same, have at it, and we can compare 
notes.

Best,
Jeff

	"Vavrek, Carolyn (US - San Francisco)" <cvavrek@deloitte.com>
	02/16/2001 10:21 PM
		 
How about talking Monday pm?

There were a ridiculous amount of handouts again on Thursday, some of which
directly related to next week's assignments.  I thought the quiz was
straight forward enough.

Mark - my mom and I were going to go to the Pottery Barn Kids in Corte
Madera on Saturday, so perhaps we could stop by your house to drop off
copies of the handouts on our way in or out.  Send me directions again to
your house if you would.  

I'm not sure how we can get copies to you Jeff.  I could drop them off to
your place in SF if that works.  Let me know.

Thanks,
CV

Carolyn M. Vavrek
Manager - Human Capital Advisory Services
Deloitte & Touche
50 Fremont Street
San Francisco, CA  94105

phone: 415-783-5137
fax: 415-783-8760
e-mail: cvavrek@deloitte.com

Was the case materials handed out in class?  If so, any care to fax it to
me. 
Fax #415-733-4190.

Thanks

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax

____________________Reply Separator____________________
Jeff, Mark:

Wondering where you were yesterday. Hope you didn't
forget about the in-class quiz!

The next HW and writeup due next week seems like
a heavy one.
Do most of you have Monday off? I'll take a look at the
case/HW Sa/Su, and prefer a meeting / conf call anytime
Monday. Perhaps PM in the city if folks are working
that day? Sunday PM (after 7) works for me too.

-Anil

--- "Vavrek, Carolyn (US - San Francisco)"
<cvavrek@deloitte.com> wrote:
> Congrats crew - we got a 9 on case #2.
> When is everyone available between now and Wed pm to talk
> about case #3 and
> the other homework?
> - cv
>
> Carolyn M. Vavrek
> Manager - Human Capital Advisory Services
> Deloitte & Touche
> 50 Fremont Street
> San Francisco, CA  94105
>
> phone: 415-783-5137
> fax: 415-783-8760
> e-mail: cvavrek@deloitte.com
>
> - This message (including any attachments) contains
> confidential information
> intended for a specific individual and purpose, and is
> protected by law.  -
> If you are not the intended recipient, you should delete
> this message and
> are hereby notified that any disclosure, copying, or
> distribution of this
> message, or the taking of any action based on it, is
> strictly prohibited.
>

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Get personalized email addresses from Yahoo! Mail - only $35
a year!  http://personal.mail.yahoo.com/
- This message (including any attachments) contains confidential information
intended for a specific individual and purpose, and is protected by law.  -
If you are not the intended recipient, you should delete this message and
are hereby notified that any disclosure, copying, or distribution of this
message, or the taking of any action based on it, is strictly prohibited.

Looks fine to me.  What's your expectations re: Freeman paying us what he 
owes us?

Best,
Jeff

FYI.  I told Chris that it looks fine with me.  Seems like a useful tactic, 
i.e., maybe if you pay me what you owe for power already delivered, I might 
consider doing a deal for power going forward....

Best,
Jeff
	Christopher F Calger@ECT
	02/17/2001 07:21 PM
		 
Attached please find a draft letter to David Freeman.  Please review and 
provide any comments.  Jeff, do you have the adress and fax number for the LA 
Office?
Tracy, Bob and Christian  -  do you approve?  I intend to send this out 
Monday.

Regards,

Chris

Fax number (in LA) is 213.897.9560.  I don't have the address.  Did we use 
the LA address on the original response letter delivered on 2.6.01?  I can't 
recall.  Let me know.  I can call and get the address if necessary.

Best,
Jeff

Chris/Christian:

FYI.  Here's the version that Kean and I sent to Ken Lay's office for=20
transmittal to Brulte.  Ken Lay may have chaged it a bit.  I'll find out an=
d=20
let you know, but wanted you to have what we forwarded to him.  Thanks agai=
n=20
for all the help.

Best,
Jeff
=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 06:54 PM
=09=09=20
Hi Rosalee:
Steve asked that I forward this to you.  I believe that Steve left you a=20
voicemail describing the nature of the email.

All the best,
Jeff
=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 06:11 PM
=09=09=20

=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 05:56 PM
=09=09=20
Jim:
It was a pleasure speaking with you on Wednesday.  Based on our conversatio=
n,=20
this email includes the following:

An Enron contact to discuss developing small-scale generation on Tribal lan=
ds.

Our views on the impediments to distributed generation and suggestions on h=
ow=20
to remove those impediments.

A description of the credit issues that continue to impede DWR=01,s ability=
 to=20
sign contracts with power suppliers, and options to resolve them. Two=20
possible options for addressing the credit issue are 1) a California PUC=20
order clarifying that DWR will recover its power purchase costs through=20
rates, and 2) an amendment to AB1X designed to accomplish the same goal.  I=
=20
have attached talking points regarding the California PUC order and propose=
d=20
amendments to AB1X.  We believe that an amendment to AB1X is the preferable=
=20
option.

Our assessment of the supply/demand picture in California.

Our suggestions for a legislative package designed to solve both the near-=
=20
and long-term electricity crisis in California.  We will deliver to your=20
office tomorrow detailed legislative language.  In those materials we will=
=20
also identify existing bills that we believe can easily accommodate our=20
proposed language.

I hope that the information is useful.  Please do not hesitate to contact m=
e=20
if you would like to discuss these materials further, or if there is anythi=
ng=20
else that I can do to assist you.

Regards,
Ken

Contact Information to Discuss Interest Expressed by Native American Tribes=
=20
in Installing Small-scale Generation on Tribal Lands

David Parquet, Vice-President

2. Key Barriers to Distributed Generation

Excessive and Unnecessary Utility Stand-by Charges

Solution: The executive orders issued by the Governor on February 14th took=
 a=20
step in the right direction.  Utility stand-by charges have always been=20
designed by the utilities to protect their monopoly position, extract=20
monopoly prices from customers, or both.  But there is no reason to limit t=
he=20
elimination of these charges to generation facilities that are less than=20
1MW.  These limits will only lengthen unnecessarily the time it takes for=
=20
California to close the significant gap between supply and demand and reduc=
e=20
the risk of black outs this summer.  We would propose lifting the cap by=20
offering amendments to SB27X, which is designed to facilitate development o=
f=20
distributed generation.
=20
Excessive delays and costs related to interconnecting facilities with=20
investor-owned and municipal utilities

Solution:   The Governor=01,s executive order regarding interconnection is =
a=20
step in the right direction=01*D-D-26-01 requires utilities to complete=20
interconnection studies within 7 days.  California should ensure that this=
=20
requirement applies to all generation facilities, including distributed=20
generation.  In addition, the financial conflicts the utilities face when=
=20
interconnecting generation facilities are simply too powerful to overcome=
=20
through executive orders or other regulations.  To the greatest extent=20
possible, California should shift control over interconnection away from th=
e=20
utility and place that control with the California ISO.  This could be=20
accomplished through amendments to SB 27X.

Permitting and Air Quality Issues
Developers of distributed (i.e., =01&on-site=018) generation that is 50 MWs=
 or=20
greater must receive certification from the California Energy Commission an=
d=20
therefore face all of the impediments to development that large-scale=20
generation faces. =20

Solution: California should ensure that the executive orders (D-22-01 thru=
=20
D-26-01) issued by the Governor to expedite plant siting and maximize plant=
=20
output apply equally to smaller scale, =01&distributed generation=018 facil=
ities.=20
In addition, distributed generation that is less than 50 MWs continues to=
=20
face local opposition.  The State should ensure that local, parochial=20
interests cannot block otherwise beneficial distributed generation projects=
. =20
These objectives could be accomplished through amendments to SB27X.

3. Credit Concerns Regarding Authority Granted to DWR in AB1X to Purchase=
=20
Electricity on Behalf of the Utilities=20

Enron responded to the RFP issued by DWR to enter into power contracts with=
=20
suppliers.
Enron is in active discussions with DWR to establish contract terms with th=
e=20
goal of entering into a power purchase agreement as soon as possible.
However, ambiguities contained in AB1X have created significant credit risk=
=20
concerns that need to be resolved in order to finalize contract terms.
We understand that the lion=01,s share of counterparties share Enron=01,s c=
redit=20
risk concerns.
Enron has proposed several options for resolving the credit risk issues and=
=20
is working with DWR to arrive at a solution that is mutually agreeable to=
=20
both sides and that might serve as a template for power purchase agreements=
=20
going forward.

Summary of the Source of the Credit Risk Issue

Ambiguous Ratemaking Authority
The language in AB1X is ambiguous as to whether DWR has any authority to=20
charge California ratepayers for the costs of purchasing power.  From our=
=20
analysis of the bill, the language in AB1X appears to leave intact the=20
California PUC=01,s exclusive jurisdiction over ratemaking in California.  =
As=20
such, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agree to include in rat=
es=20
adequate charges to cover DWR=01,s costs of power purchases.

Ambiguous Regulatory Authority Regarding Contract =01&Prudence=018
The language in AB1X leaves open the possibility that the California Public=
=20
Utilities Commission could determine that power purchases made by DWR are=
=20
=01&imprudent.=018  On the basis of such a finding, the CPUC could then ref=
use to=20
allow DWR to collect from ratepayers the costs associated with its power=20
purchases.  Consequently, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agr=
ee=20
to include in rates the charges to cover the costs of power contracts that=
=20
DWR has entered into with suppliers.
=20
Ambiguous Language Regarding the Ratemaking Mechanism that Will Be Used to=
=20
Recover DWR=01,s Costs of Power Purchases
In addition to the ambiguity regarding ratemaking and regulatory authority=
=20
noted above, the language in the bill is equally ambiguous with respect to=
=20
the specific ratemaking =01&mechanics=018 that AB1X directs the PUC to empl=
oy to=20
permit DWR to recover its power purchase costs. Based on our analysis, it i=
s=20
extremely difficult to determine how the PUC would design the rates to ensu=
re=20
DWR recovers its power purchase costs.  Moreover, as currently drafted, it =
is=20
difficult to determine whether AB1X would even permit the PUC to include in=
=20
rates all of the charges necessary to fully recover DWR=01,s power purchase=
=20
costs.  Again, this ambiguity raises significant credit risk concerns since=
=20
suppliers have little assurance that DWR will have the ability to recover=
=20
from ratepayers the costs of purchasing power.

Options to Resolve Concerns Regarding Credit Risk=20

We have been working diligently with DWR officials to resolve the credit ri=
sk=20
issues.  We have identified three options:

Amend AB1X
The amendments, which are attached to this email, would clarify that a) the=
=20
PUC would accept as =01&prudent and reasonable=018 all purchase costs incur=
red by=20
DWR, and b) the PUC is obligated to include in rates the charges necessary =
to=20
ensure that DWR fully recovers its costs of power purchases.  This is the=
=20
preferred option, though we understand that the there may be some political=
=20
challenges standing in the way of amending AB1X.  (See attached file=20
entitled, =01&AmendAB1X.doc=018.)

Clarify the Ambiguities in AB1X through an Order Issued by the PUC, and=20
through Contract Language
This is the option that we are currently working with DWR officials to=20
implement.  However, it is more complicated and could take significantly mo=
re=20
time to implement than the "legislative" fix.  We have attached electronic=
=20
copies of the talking points related to the order that the California PUC=
=20
would need to issue under this option.  (See attached file entitled,=20
=01&cpuctalkingpoints.doc.=018)

Make Use of Other Instruments Designed to Address Credit Risk
As indicated in our letter responding to DWR=01,s RFP, we are willing to ac=
cept=20
other forms of credit from DWR.  Those options include a letter of credit,=
=20
cash prepayment, or an acceptable form of collateral.  DWR officials have=
=20
indicated to us that DWR prefers to pursue the second options. That is, DWR=
=20
prefers to clarify the ambiguities in AB1X through a PUC order and through=
=20
contract amendments.

4. California=01,s Supply-demand Picture Heading into Summer 2001

Both the California Energy Commission and Cambridge Energy Research=20
Associates (CERA), a private sector energy think tank, have issued reports=
=20
showing that California faces a severe supply-demand imbalance.  They diffe=
r=20
only on how much and how soon additional supply will be made available.  Al=
l=20
credible sources agree that supply will be very tight throughout the Summer=
=20
of 2001 and that unless a solution is found immediately, blackouts are=20
likely. =20

CEC and CERA both forecast that California will be short of supply this=20
summer by approximately 5,000 MW.   These numbers are in line with our=20
estimates.  California=01,s supply base currently has a 6% capacity margin,=
 well=20
below the average 15-20%, which is recommended for reliable system operatio=
n=20
in the West.  Since the West relies more heavily upon hydroelectric power=
=20
than other regions, reserves are particularly important, owing to the=20
unpredictability of the weather and the dry year the West has experienced t=
o=20
date. In the event of a low rain and snow period, the system must possess t=
he=20
flexibility to respond to the reduced availability of power supply. =20
California=01,s very low reserve margin makes it especially susceptible to =
this=20
requirement. =20

Other reasons for reduced supply for the Summer of 2001 include the early=
=20
draw-down of reservoirs in the continual effort to manage California's seve=
re=20
supply-demand gap; emissions restrictions on existing plants; and a reduced=
=20
number of customers who can be curtailed under their contracts with the=20
utilities.  Cambridge Energy Research Associates asserts that at the curren=
t=20
pace of siting, permitting and construction, adequate supplies will not be=
=20
added to correct the market imbalance until 2003 at the earliest.

CERA predicts that California is likely to face approximately 20 hours of=
=20
rolling black outs this summer.  The CEC paints a considerably more=20
optimistic scenario, betting that California will bring an additional 5,000=
=20
MWs on line to meet peaking summer demand.  It is our view that California=
=20
should view the CEC's "rosy scenario" with considerable skepticism.

5. Suggested Package of Legislative Proposals Designed to Solve California=
=01,s=20
Electricity Crisis

This email offers an overview of our proposed legislative solution.  We wil=
l=20
deliver to your office tomorrow specific legislative language and existing=
=20
bills that we believe can accommodate our proposals.

As we have suggested throughout the crisis, any solution to California's=20
crisis must focus on four issues:

Increase supply
Decrease demand
Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market
Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency

Increase supply--Legislative vehicle: SB28X (Sher)
To site and construct a power plant in Texas takes approximately 2 years. =
=20
Enron and others have completed the entire process in other states in less=
=20
than a year.  In California, it takes about six years, or longer.

The Governor=01,s executive orders and Senator Sher=01,s siting reform legi=
slation=20
are steps in the right direction.  Our suggested amendments can improve tho=
se=20
efforts by further addressing the difficulties that project developers face=
=20
in securing air emission reduction credits to meet the air permit=20
requirements included in the CEC's certification requirements.  Enron=01,s=
=20
proposal seeks to streamline the process for 1) obtaining credits and 2)=20
transfering credits between air districts.  In addition, it creates an=20
innovative emissions reduction bank to allow project sponsors to fund=20
emissions in advance of obtaining certification, and permits the affected a=
ir=20
districts to use those funds to finance projects that will produce the=20
required reductions in pollution emissions.

Decrease demand=01*Legislative Vehicle:   AB31X (Wright)
Because of the delay in getting a solution in place in California, closing=
=20
the supply-demand gap through energy conservation and efficiency offers the=
=20
best chance of avoiding blackouts this summer.  This can be accomplished mo=
st=20
effectively and quickly in two ways:

Buy-down demand
California is tapping into an enormous amount of money from the General Fun=
d=20
to finance DWR=01,s power purchases.  California could likely reduce demand=
 more=20
economically by running an auction to determine the payments businesses wou=
ld=20
be willing to receive to reduce their demand for a sustained period (e.g.,=
=20
through the summer months).  DWR could easily run an on-line auction to=20
determine the price it could pay for these demand reductions.  To=20
participate, businesses would be required to have the metering equipment=20
necessary to monitor and verify that they are actually achieving the=20
reductions.  Enron has developed an on-line auction software package, =01&D=
eal=20
Bench,=018 that it would be willing to contribute to the effort.

Use Price Signals to Incent Voluntary Curtailment
To be successful, customers need access to the following key elements:

An internet based hour-ahead price posting system to track the market price=
=20
for hour-ahead power in real time.=20
Real-time metering systems for baseline demand and voluntarily curtailment=
=20
verification.
Settlement process that allows for market clearing prices of energy to be=
=20
paid for load reduction (=01&Negawatts=018).

The potential benefits of an effective demand response program would includ=
e:

=01&creation=018 of additional summer peaking capacity in California, parti=
cularly=20
in the short term, without requiring construction of additional generation=
=20
resources.
reduction of  peak or super-peak load on the over-stressed California=20
electric system, thus potentially reducing the overall cost of electricity =
in=20
the state.
fostering of demand elasticity without subjecting customers to the full ris=
k=20
of hourly market price volatility by passing market price signals to=20
customers and allowing them to voluntarily shed load and be compensated for=
=20
responding.=20

We estimate that we could generate a summer 2001 on-peak demand response in=
=20
excess of 400 MW during certain high cost hours, and a demand response for=
=20
summer 2002 on-peak hours that could exceed 1000 MW.  We further estimate=
=20
that the market response to this program from all ESPs could be 2 to 3 time=
s=20
that amount.  We recommend that the State of California provide rebates=20
directly to customers to fund the installation of advanced metering and=20
control systems that would support load curtailment implementation.

Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market=01*Legislative vehi=
cle:=20
SB27X
The only customers who were protected from price volatility in San Diego we=
re=20
customers who chose Direct Access and signed fixed price deals with energy=
=20
service providers.  Ironically, AB1X takes that important option away from=
=20
customers and businesses.  It is critical that AB1X be amended to remove th=
e=20
prohibition against Direct Access.

Enron's legislative proposal would give customers freedom to enter into a=
=20
direct access transaction, while simultaneously addressing the Department o=
f=20
Water Resources' concerns about stranded power costs that might result from=
=20
customer migration. =20

In addition, California will only achieve a competitive retail market when=
=20
the utility is removed completely from the procurement function.  Procureme=
nt=20
is not a utility core competency, as evidenced by the dire financial=20
condition in which the utilities now find themselves.  California should=20
therefore begin immediately to phase the utility out of the procurement=20
function entirely, with the goal of having all customers served by a=20
non-utility provider within 36 months.  To execute the transition, Californ=
ia=20
should hold a series of competitive solicitations over the 36-month period =
in=20
which competing service providers would bid for the right to serve segments=
=20
of utility load.

Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency=01*Legislative =
vehicle:=20
AB18X
Utility bankruptcy will not increase supply and it will not decrease demand=
. =20
In short, bankruptcy does nothing to solve California=01,s supply-demand=20
imbalance.  In addition, bankruptcy increases the likelihood that consumers=
=20
and businesses will bear the significant financial risks of having Californ=
ia=20
State government assume the role of =01&electricity buyer=018 for an extend=
ed=20
period of time.  Finally, bankruptcy will undermine both investor confidenc=
e=20
in California's energy markets and the private sector's willingness to=20
participate in that market.

California can return the utilities to financial solvency by implementing a=
=20
series of staged rate increases.  California should design those rate=20
increases with the dual goal of returning the utilities to solvency without=
=20
=01&shocking=018 the economy or household budgets For example, California c=
ould=20
amortize the recovery of the utilities=01, past debt over a 5-10 year perio=
d. =20
In addition, the magnitude of the rate increase can be reduced in two ways:=
=20
First, the utilities could absorb some portion of their existing debt in=20
recognition of the risk they accepted when they agreed to the structure of =
AB=20
1890.  Second, California can =01&net=018 the revenues the utilities have r=
eceived=20
from selling electricity into the Power Exchange against the debts they hav=
e=20
accrued due to the retail price cap.

I took a stab at drafting the memo.  I pooped out on the last question, 
however and was only able to jot down some thoughts.  Caution:  The memo 
ain't been proofed.  I did it as a memo to the CEO of Timberland, but we 
don't need to do it that way.  Also attaching files (one each for each of the 
scenarios asked for, so that folks could see what I did).  Have not 
constructed the "one-page attachment, however.  Let me know what you think.

Best,
Jeff

	"Mark Guinney" <Mark_Guinney@watsonwyatt.com>
	02/18/2001 02:31 PM
		 
I jotted down my answers to the questions.  Feel free to use as needed.  I 
need
to get things off my plate for the next few days while I work on some other
homework problems.  Of course, I will still help out if anyone needs any
assistance.

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax
 - Timberland Questions.doc

Since it seems like folks may have only been sporadically receiving my 
emails, please let me know if you receive the memos and accompanying 
spreadsheets that I just sent.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

Wow, thanks Dylan.  I thought that I was on the hook for this one.  Let me 
know what I can do to help.  I've read it and will look at what Mark's done 
and throw my 2 cents in. I'll be working on it tomorrow morning.

Best,
jeff

	Dylan Windham <dwindham@uclink4.berkeley.edu>
	02/18/2001 08:37 PM
		 
Hey guys,

I just got this.  I will work on it tonight and send it to you later.  I 
agree that we should put it to bed soon.  I suggest that we let Jimmy be in 
charge of the colored graphs so that he can use his artistic side.

Dylan

At 03:34 PM 2/18/01 -0500, Mark Guinney at ~WW_SFO wrote:
>My crack at answers the questions for AHP.  Let's get this thing written
>earlier
>than latter.  Anyone willing to take a crack?  I am also sending the
>spreadsheet
>since I performed some simple calculations to help justify my responses.  My
>work is highlighted in gray.
>
>
>
>**********************************************
>Mark D. Guinney, CFA
>Consultant
>Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
>345 California Street, Ste. 1400
>San Francisco, CA  94104
>(415) 733-4487 ph.
>(415) 733-4190 fax
>
>

I'm on the case.  I'll look at what you folks did and take a crack at writing 
the memo.  I'll shoot for writing and sending around at some point today.  
Otherwise, it'll be tomorrow.  

Best,
Jeff

Greetings.  I have left two messages on the voice mail authorizing the help 
desk to delete everything in my haas account.  That should help.  Please 
consider this email authorization to delete everything in the account.  
Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

you never need to ask.  you can always use me as a reference.  what's it for?

	Cameron Sellers <cameron@perfect.com>
	09/20/2000 02:44 PM
		 
I want to use you as a personal reference.  Is that OK?  I need your title
and direct dial number (i think it's 415-782-7822).  Write back soon.

We want to go ahead with the road repair.  Nancy said the cost was about
$900.  However, we want to hold off on doing the stumps.  Nancy doesn't
think we go there often enough to spend the money right now to do that.
Can
anything be done about the culvert that didn't entail too much expense?

I'm having difficulty finding out what the duty is on the wine we
brought in
here.  If you could, without spending a lot of time, find out what it
costs
per liter above the 3 liter amount you can bring into Mexico duty-free.
It
would help us negotiate with the authorities here if we knew what the
amount
should be.

Share information about yourself, create your own public profile at
http://profiles.msn.com.

I can' t thank you enough for organizing my business cards.  I know it's a 
pain and I really appreciate it.  Thank you so much.  Also, I've got an entry 
in my bank account (EDI payment) for abou $5700.  Do you have the paper for 
that?  Do I have any other expense thing-ees coming?

Thanks,
Jeff

thanks so much for dinner.  it was really, really good.  and SO sorry for 
beating the pants off of you in spades (tee hee).  and i JUST put your check 
for the wine in the mail!  have a great week.

Best,
Jeff

yes.  check for 576.29 is in the mail!  thanks so much for getting the 
coastal, and the champagne, and the opus!  can't thank you enough.  i've also 
mailed you a new bottle of oyster sauce.

jeff

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/20/2001 06:26 AM
		 
Attached, please find the latest versions of SBX 6 and SBX 33, including
their respective analysis'.  Both bills could be heard on the Senate
floor today.

http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx1_6_bill_20010215_amended_
sen.pdf

http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx1_6_cfa_20010216_103526_se
n_floor.html

http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx1_33_bill_20010215_amended
_sen.pdf

http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx1_33_cfa_20010216_102714_s
en_floor.html

Please turn comments around as quickly as possible.  The folks in Sacramento 
need them by 1 PM CST.  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/20/2001 07:11 AM
		 
As discussed, attached please find draft opposition letters to SBX 33
and SBX 6 for the Senate floor.  Mike Day originally drafted longer
versions of these letters for the committee hearings.  We tried to
shorten both letters to make them easier to understand for the general
membership.

Please advise as soon as possible.

 - sbx 33 floor alert.doc
 - SBX 6 floor alert.doc

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/16/2001 07:13 AM
		 
The Senate did not take up SBX 6 or SBX 33 prior to adjourning for the
long weekend.  The next time the Senate will meet is on Tuesday at 10:00
a.m.  I have attached the most recent versions of both bills.

http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx1_6_bill_20010215_amended_
sen.pdf

http://info.sen.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx1_33_bill_20010215_amended
_sen.pdf

In all week, except tomorrow, when I'll be in Pasadena with Steve Kean at a 
meeting of Republican Congressional folks to discuss CA's electricity mess.

	Joseph Alamo
	02/20/2001 12:18 PM
		 
Please see previous request.  Your responses would be most appreciated!
Thanks,
Joseph
	Joseph Alamo
	02/15/2001 12:27 PM
	
Please forward your *anticipated* schedules to me for next week, as soon as 
possible.
[Just a reminder:  Monday the 19th is a Company holiday.]

Thanks in advance for your assistance.

Joseph Alamo
Sr. Administrative Assistant
Government Affairs - The Americas
San Francisco CA 

Linda:
I will have the California update done for Steve today.  Maureen, could I 
possibly get the fax # where Steve will be staying this evening in the event 
that I need to fax it to him directly?  What time will he be leaving for LA?  
Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

Well, this would seem to indicate one of two things: either Hertzberg's is 
now an absolute lost cause, or it's more urgent than ever to have Ken Lay 
talk to him.  Given the situation, it would still seem prudent to have Ken 
Lay talk to the Speaker.

Best,
Jeff

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/20/2001 09:12 AM
		 
The following message points are being circulated by Assembly Speaker Robert 
Hertzberg.  These are very confidential and should not be distributed. 
  
Deregulation has been a failure of epic proportions, and Californians are 
hurting because of it. 
  
This is bigger than politics. People have energy bills they cannot afford. 
Rolling blackouts threaten our economy - as well as the safety of our people. 
We cannot allow this to continue. 
  
This is not a bailout, it's a lifeboat for consumers. We support the 
Governor's plan as a framework for negotiations with the utilities. 
  
The state purchase of transmission lines -- at the right price and under the 
right terms - will restore a measure of control to a system that is out of 
control. 
  
Our goal continues to be restoring reliable, reasonably priced power to all 
of California.

	"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
	02/20/2001 01:43 PM
	Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
		 
LEGISLATIVE ALERT:

The Senate Energy Committee is hearing SB 39x (Speier) on Thursday.  SB 39x
would make an owner of a electric generating facility a public utility;
authorize the CPUC to prevent the exercise of market power by prohibiting
economic or physical withholding of the divested facilities; and, require
the CPUC to prescribe inspecting, maintenance and operation practices and
procedures for any electric plants.

Your comments and letters on this measure need to be directed to the author
and members of the committee as soon as possible.  Please bcc IEP on any
correspondance relating to this measure.

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

plx check fax (646.8160).  Leg is out.  give a call.  Jeff

Be happy to discuss.  My preference would be to have a brief call to discuss, 
since Mr. Filner is on a mission to tan a few hides over the price spikes in 
S.D.  At congressional and FERC hearings in S.D. last week, Mr. Filner called 
generators and marketers quite a few ugly names, fingered them as the cause 
for the high prices, and demanded that Congress and FERC make them give all 
the money back to S.D. consumers.  Fairly sensitive item, to put it mildly.  
I'm at 415.782.7822.

Best,
Jeff

	Michael Kenneally@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	09/21/2000 10:47 AM
		 
Gentlemen:

Steve asked that I follow up with you on the inquiry below.  I met with Bob 
Filner, US Representative from San Diego , who had asked that I forward any 
information to him about Enron's management of energy prices.  Could you 
recommend how we can follow up with him.  I am happy to direct him towards 
you.

Thanks for your help,
Michael
	Steven J Kean@ENRON
	Sent by: Steven J Kean@ENRON
	09/13/00 07:57 AM
		
Contact Dave Parquet and Jeff Dasovich in our San Fran. office.  Dave has 
worked on Enron's proposals to San Diego and Jeff has been supporting him 
from a gov't/reg affairs standpoint.

Steve:

Chris Holmes recommended I contact you concerning the attached inquiry.  I 
recently met with a federal representative from San Diego who had asked if I 
could send him any information on Enron's ability to hedge energy prices.  
After a summer of rolling brown outs and soaring prices, he is looking for 
ways to avoid the scenario in the future.

Could you recommend the best avenue for responding to this request?

I appreciate you assistance in this matter.

Regards,
Michael
x 35868
	Chris Holmes@EES
	08/16/00 06:46 AM
		
glad  to hear you are in  a good place-- I suggest you call Steve Kean's 
office, regulatory affairs as they would like the contact with the Cong. 
office-- they will in turn follow-up, .

Best to you and the family. Drop by sometime,. I am in room 1212.

chris

Hello Chris:

I hope you and your family are doing well.  I am sorry to have fallen out of 
touch.

I was thinking of you recently wen speaking with a Congressional 
representative from San Diego.  After a summer of rolling brown outs and  
increasing prices from the utilities, he was searching for an energy 
solution.  Who would be the best contact within EES or ENA to explore the 
possibilities for the city of San Diego?

I look forward to hearing from you.

Best regards,
Michael

Carolyn, you're a star.  Thanks for the input , Anil.  For what it's worth, 
I'll take a final looksee this evening and tie up any loose ends (though I 
doubt that there will be any).  I'll send around to all for one last peek in 
the morning, and I'll bring a copy to turn in.  Sound reasonable?  Let me 
know.

Best,
Jeff

Thank you.  I'll be picking Steve up at the hotel and 9:30 am tomorrow 
morning.  And thank you very much for paging him for me.

Best,
Jeff

	Susan J Mara
	02/20/2001 02:22 PM
		 
More info on Dept of Finance's response to the coalition seeking direct 
access, from ARm's lobbyist

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854
	nplotkin@tfglobby.com (Norman Plotkin)
	02/20/2001 08:57 AM
		 
Update:

I spoke with Robert Miyashiro at Finance (DOFs point person for those who 
have inquired) late Friday evening.  I tried to schedule some time to speak 
with him and bond counsel, but he begged off, but with good reason.

Through our conversation he intimated that they were greatly encouraged by 
the coalition proposal vis-a-vis reasonable controls on opt-in/opt-out and 
surcharges for incremental state costs.  It seems that they gave their canned 
presentation in the meeting and did not respond publicly to our proposal.

When pushed for direction relative to quantifying specific formulas, he 
expressed concern over the "proprietary" (he didn't say the word expressly) 
nature of DWRs rate calculations and a general reluctance to talk numbers at 
this stage of the game.

Much remains to be done, but I wanted to convey my relief and concur with 
Aaron that our position is not as gloomy as my initial impression.

More later,
Norm

	Ginger Dernehl
	02/16/2001 02:16 PM
		 
Rick Shapiro has scheduled a daily conference call for the above listed 
individuals to discuss the clarity of Enron's message and purpose.  This call 
will take place every week day at 10:00am CST, beginning Tuesday, February 
20th.  Please see below for details:

Date:  Daily (beginning Tuesday, February 20)

Time:  10:00am CST 
 
Number: 1-800-998-2462
  passcode 5010418

Thanks and please call with questions.

gngr
713-853-7751

Hi Rosalee:
Steve Kean asked that I send you this note for transmittal to Ken Lay.  Mr.=
=20
Lay may receive a call from David Freeman regarding on-going power=20
negotiations between the California Department of Water and Enron, but it i=
s=20
not certain that he will call.  In the event that he does phone, we would=
=20
like to make sure that Mr. Lay gets this information prior returning the=20
call.  Thanks very much for your help.

All the best,
Jeff

Mr. Lay:

As you know we've been working very hard with David Freeman trying to hamme=
r=20
out a power deal with CDWR.  The big issue getting in the way of the deal=
=20
continues to be credit. I've attached the summary of the credit issues and=
=20
possible solutions to the problem that was included in the email to Senator=
=20
Brulte last week.  As part of the ongoing efforts to resolve the credit=20
issues, Chris Calger of the Portland office sent a letter to David Freeman=
=20
yesterday.  That letter is also attached.  In sum, the letter:

expresses our commitment to continue working together to resolve the credit=
=20
issues,and,
requests payment for power previously delivered to CDWR and pre-payment for=
=20
any new deliveries.

In response, David Freeman phoned Chris Calger expressing dissappointment=
=20
that 1) we had yet to sign a power deal with DWR, despite your meeting with=
=20
Dave Freeman and Mike Peevey a couple of weeks ago, and 2) we would make a=
=20
power deal contingent upon a) payment for power previously delivered to DWR=
=20
and b) pre-payment for any future deliveries.  Freeman suggested that we=20
could sign the deal for 200 MWs of power now, but then back out of the deal=
=20
if CDWR fails to get adequate credit provisions in place within the next fe=
w=20
weeks.  Given the political climate in California, we are of course not=20
anxious to sign a deal today that carries significant credit risk and=20
announce later that we are backing out of the deal, since doing so would=20
place the Company in a very uncomfortable political position.  Instead, we=
=20
continue to suggest that it's best for all parties to have the credit issue=
s=20
resolved up front.

You may receive a call from David Freeman seeking to discuss these issues=
=20
further.  As you know, the credit issues are significant and we are working=
=20
hard to overcome those issues.  But in the current climate, where the=20
Governor and the Legislature are actively discussing a complete takeover of=
=20
the electric industry in California, getting the contract issues right is=
=20
critical.

Regards,
Jeff Dasovich

SUMMARY OF CREDIT ISSUES FROM BRULTE EMAIL

Credit Concerns Regarding Authority Granted to DWR in AB1X to Purchase=20
Electricity on Behalf of the Utilities=20

Enron responded to the RFP issued by DWR to enter into power contracts with=
=20
suppliers.
Enron is in active discussions with DWR to establish contract terms with th=
e=20
goal of entering into a power purchase agreement as soon as possible.
However, ambiguities contained in AB1X have created significant credit risk=
=20
concerns that need to be resolved in order to finalize contract terms.
We understand that the lion=01,s share of counterparties share Enron=01,s c=
redit=20
risk concerns.
Enron has proposed several options for resolving the credit risk issues and=
=20
is working with DWR to arrive at a solution that is mutually agreeable to=
=20
both sides and that might serve as a template for power purchase agreements=
=20
going forward.

Summary of the Source of the Credit Risk Issue

Ambiguous Ratemaking Authority
The language in AB1X is ambiguous as to whether DWR has any authority to=20
charge California ratepayers for the costs of purchasing power.  From our=
=20
analysis of the bill, the language in AB1X appears to leave intact the=20
California PUC=01,s exclusive jurisdiction over ratemaking in California.  =
As=20
such, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agree to include in rat=
es=20
adequate charges to cover DWR=01,s costs of power purchases.

Ambiguous Regulatory Authority Regarding Contract =01&Prudence=018
The language in AB1X leaves open the possibility that the California Public=
=20
Utilities Commission could determine that power purchases made by DWR are=
=20
=01&imprudent.=018  On the basis of such a finding, the CPUC could then ref=
use to=20
allow DWR to collect from ratepayers the costs associated with its power=20
purchases.  Consequently, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agr=
ee=20
to include in rates the charges to cover the costs of power contracts that=
=20
DWR has entered into with suppliers.
=20
Ambiguous Language Regarding the Ratemaking Mechanism that Will Be Used to=
=20
Recover DWR=01,s Costs of Power Purchases
In addition to the ambiguity regarding ratemaking and regulatory authority=
=20
noted above, the language in the bill is equally ambiguous with respect to=
=20
the specific ratemaking =01&mechanics=018 that AB1X directs the PUC to empl=
oy to=20
permit DWR to recover its power purchase costs. Based on our analysis, it i=
s=20
extremely difficult to determine how the PUC would design the rates to ensu=
re=20
DWR recovers its power purchase costs.  Moreover, as currently drafted, it =
is=20
difficult to determine whether AB1X would even permit the PUC to include in=
=20
rates all of the charges necessary to fully recover DWR=01,s power purchase=
=20
costs.  Again, this ambiguity raises significant credit risk concerns since=
=20
suppliers have little assurance that DWR will have the ability to recover=
=20
from ratepayers the costs of purchasing power.

Options to Resolve Concerns Regarding Credit Risk=20

We have been working diligently with DWR officials to resolve the credit ri=
sk=20
issues.  We have identified three options:

Amend AB1X
The amendments, which are attached to this email, would clarify that a) the=
=20
PUC would accept as =01&prudent and reasonable=018 all purchase costs incur=
red by=20
DWR, and b) the PUC is obligated to include in rates the charges necessary =
to=20
ensure that DWR fully recovers its costs of power purchases.  This is the=
=20
preferred option, though we understand that the there may be some political=
=20
challenges standing in the way of amending AB1X.  (See attached file=20
entitled, =01&AmendAB1X.doc=018.)

Clarify the Ambiguities in AB1X through an Order Issued by the PUC, and=20
through Contract Language
This is the option that we are currently working with DWR officials to=20
implement.  However, it is more complicated and could take significantly mo=
re=20
time to implement than the "legislative" fix.  We have attached electronic=
=20
copies of the talking points related to the order that the California PUC=
=20
would need to issue under this option.  (See attached file entitled,=20
=01&cpuctalkingpoints.doc.=018)

Make Use of Other Instruments Designed to Address Credit Risk
As indicated in our letter responding to DWR=01,s RFP, we are willing to ac=
cept=20
other forms of credit from DWR.  Those options include a letter of credit,=
=20
cash prepayment, or an acceptable form of collateral.  DWR officials have=
=20
indicated to us that DWR prefers to pursue the second options. That is, DWR=
=20
prefers to clarify the ambiguities in AB1X through a PUC order and through=
=20
contract amendments.

LETTER FROM CHRIS CALGER TO DAVID FREEMAN

February 19, 2001

S. David Freeman, Advisor to the Governor
California Department of Water Resources
1416 =01) 9th Street
Sacramento, California 95814

FAX# (213) 897-9560

 Re: Proposed Short-Term CAISO Firm Energy Sale

Dear Mr. Freeman,

As we described in our Response to Notice and Invitation to Bid dated=20
February 6, 2001, Enron Power Marketing Inc. (=01&EPMI=018) and its affilia=
tes are=20
prepared to provide California Department of Water Resources (=01&CDWR=018)=
 various=20
power and power-related products.  At this time, however, EPMI and CDWR are=
=20
not in agreement with respect to the form of contract and the credit suppor=
t=20
required to enter into long-term transactions.  In response to your request=
=20
of February 14, 2001, EPMI proposes that CDWR consider a short-term firm=20
energy transaction. =20

EPMI is prepared to offer to CDWR CAISO Firm Energy under the attached EEI=
=20
Agreement and Confirmation Letter subject to (i) the payment in full by CDW=
R=20
to EPMI on or before February 21, 2001 for deliveries of power already made=
=20
by EPMI to CDWR; (ii) confirmation that CDWR will pay EPMI in full for the=
=20
new power deliveries according to the schedule described in the attached=20
Confirmation Letter; and (iii) CDWR will in good faith consider the followi=
ng=20
proposals described in our Response To Notice and Invitation to Bid dated=
=20
February 6, 2001:

a) Unit Contingent Power supply from Pastoria Energy Facility
b) Firm Power Supply from Market Sources
c) Hourly Demand Response Program

The amounts due from CDWR to EPMI are described below:

DATE  DESCRIPTION   NET SALES
JAN  CDWR    $578,870.00
JAN  CDWR    $4,913,100.00
FEB  CERS    $6,014,000.00
FEB1-17 Block Forward    $2,502,000.00
    Total:  $14,007,970.00

The above amount can be wire transferred to:

BNK:  Bank of America
  For: Enron Power Marketing, Inc.
ABA:  Routing # 111000012
ACCT:  #375 046 9312
Confirmation: Enron Power Marketing, Inc.
  Credit and Collections
  (713) 853-5667

If we find that payment has been made, we will be able to offer a firm pric=
e,=20
and if we are in agreement at that time, we will sign and forward the=20
attached documents.  On Friday, February 16, 2001, the price for the power=
=20
described in the attached Confirmation Letter was $270 per MWh.  The price =
is=20
subject to change based on market conditions and will need to be revised an=
d=20
confirmed prior to execution of the attached Confirmation Letter. =20

EPMI is available to discuss this proposal at your convenience and we will =
be=20
available on Tuesday, February 20, 2001 to discuss the amounts payable=20
described above.   We are prepared to continue working with you and your te=
am=20
to establish a Master Agreement with sufficient credit support to enable us=
=20
to enter into other agreements that best meet your power purchase needs.   =
I=20
can be reached at (503) 464-3735.

Yours Truly,

ENRON POWER MARKETING, INC.

Christopher F. Calger
Managing Director

Sorry, Mike.  Just got this.  Will try to turn it around pronto.  Our guy 
John Neslage is trying to pull together exactly what you're requesting.  
He'll get it to you as soon as we've got it pulled together.

Best,
Jeff

	Mike D Smith@EES
	02/20/2001 10:53 AM
		 
Jeff--can you send me asap  a real quick message listing all of the current 
"X" legislation that is out there that we are following, along with a brief 
description of what each bill is about and whether we support or oppose.  
That will help me keep track of the alphabet soup.  Thanks.  MDS

Thanks very much, Rosalee.  Have a nice evening.

Best,
Jeff

Man, you're quick.  Thanks very much.  This is really starting to get wierd.  
Makes Cuba look capitalist.

Best,
Jeff

Joe/Sue:

We'll need to brief Steve on the fed/state issues tied to the state buying 
the TX systems of PG&E and Edison prior to his meeting with the Congressional 
Republicans tomorrow.  I'll be driving with Steve from  LA to Pasadena (where 
the meeting is) tomorrow beginning at about 9:30 AM PST (the meeting's at 
10:30 AM PST).  Could we put together a call-in number at 9:45 or 10 AM PST 
so you could quickly/briefly brief Steve on the issues prior to the 10:30 AM 
meeting?  Let me know if this works, or if there's a better way to get him up 
to speed on the issues before the meeting.  Thanks very much for helping to 
pull this together on such short notice.

Best,
Jeff

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	09/21/2000 08:53 AM
		 
Content-Transfer-Encoding: quoted-printable
Date: Thu, 21 Sep 2000 08:10:21 -0500
DJ Calif Officials Look Into Merging Cal-ISO And CalPX
Copyright , 2000 Dow Jones & Company, Inc.

LOS ANGELES (Dow Jones)--California state officials are studying the 
possibility of merging the state's Independent System Operator with the 
California Power Exchange.

     The state auditor's office met Monday with the ISO to look into the 
ISO's operations and its relationship with the CalPX, according to documents 
obtained by Dow Jones Newswires.

     The audit was requested by state senator Steve Peace, D-El Cajon, who 
believes a merger between the ISO and the CalPX would make California's 
electricity market more competitive, said Jan Smutny-Jones, chairman of the 
ISO Board of Governors.

     The ISO controls 75% of the state's electricity grid and real-time 
electricity market. The CalPX is the spot market where electricity is bought 
and sold in the state.

     The ISO will meet again with the auditor's office early next week. The 
audit will be complete by spring, said state auditor Mary Noble.

     By Jessica Berthold, Dow Jones Newswires; 323-658-3761 
mailto:jessica.berthold@dowjones.com
     (END) Dow Jones Newswires 20-09-00

     1603GMT

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	02/20/2001 06:47 PM
		 
Critics Say ISO Rookies Will Hinder Resolving Crisis

Carl T. Hall, Chronicle Staff Writer    Tuesday, February 20, 2001 
  

Experience in the complicated world of energy didn't matter much when Gov.  
Gray Davis went shopping for a new set of policymakers to oversee the state- 
sponsored California Independent System Operator. 

Davis named five new members to the Cal-ISO board last month, replacing an 
unwieldy 26-member board whose members were selected to balance competing 
interests in electricity supply and transmission. 

The prior board was packed with longtime players in various industry and 
energy-policy arenas. But the board's reluctance to cap rates, among other 
things, led some to question its independence -- and eventually caused its 
demise when the Legislature moved to restructure the agency, based in Folsom, 
technically a nonprofit public-benefit corporation but in reality an arm of 
state energy policy. 

The new board includes only one member -- Mike Florio, senior attorney at The 
Utility Reform Network (TURN), a San Francisco-based consumer group -- with 
any significant background in the energy field. 

Florio, a perennial critic of Pacific Gas and Electric Co. and other 
regulated utilities, was among the original members of the Cal-ISO board 
Davis and the Legislature dumped. Now, he is the only veteran left, 
surrounded by eager rookies. 

"There will be a learning curve, no question," said Terry Winter, Cal-ISO's 
chief executive officer. 

Remedial training is under way, but critics fear that may get in the way of 
solutions to the fast-breaking state power crisis. 

Curt Hebert, chairman of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, also 
faulted the new board's close ties to Sacramento, saying that "politicized 
control of transmission" could deter suppliers from entering California and 
sour other states on the idea of regional cooperation. 

"The ISO should operate as a truly independent operator of the grid," Hebert 
said. "But initial signs are not encouraging. Legislation adopted that makes 
the ISO board a political arm of the governor, with five handpicked members, 
could prove to be detrimental in the long run." 

Other observers view the Sacramento connection as a plus. 

"I expect there will be better overall coordination with the state now," said 
Susan Schneider, a former PG&E executive who now advises industry clients as 
a principal at Phoenix Consulting. "There's been a bit of a disconnect." 

The new board members insisted that the governor had started them out with no 
marching orders other than to do what's in the public's best interest. And 
while Davis' board may not know its new business quite yet, its members boast 
some formidable resumes in other fields. 

In any case, they have little direct control over the most important policy 
matters being decided in Sacramento and Washington. But that's not to say the 
Cal-ISO board has no significant role. 

"The ISO is going to be an important gear in whatever machine ends up fixing 
this thing," said Eric Saltmarsh, general counsel at the state Electricity 
Oversight Board. 
 
 

,2001 San Francisco Chronicle   Page A11  

 

FYI.  We should discuss on tomorrow's call.

Best,
Jeff
	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	02/20/2001 07:15 PM
		 
Attached is a draft order circulated late this afternoon.  The intent of the
Commission is to vote on it at Thursday's meeting. The order implements the
provision in AB 1x to suspend direct access.  We are given 24 hours to
comment.  In addition note ordering paragraph six which gives parties 30
days to address how the Commission should implement the suspension of direct
access.

If you want to lob comments in tomorrow, please call me first thing in the
morning. ( I must leave for hearings at the Commission at 8:40).

>  <<CPUC01-#90588-v1-A0011038_et_al_DeUlloa_Agenda_Dec__.doc>>
>
>
Jeanne Bennett

 - CPUC01-#90588-v1-A0011038_et_al_DeUlloa_Agenda_Dec__.doc

Dudes:
My other team has now finished the case that's due on Thursday (in another 
class), so I will spend this evening turning what's been passed around into 
memo format and distribute for review and comment by (what will likely be 
late) this evening.  I'm travelling tomorrow--back late afternoon--and can 
work on it more tomorrow night.

Best
Jeff

Shmuel:
Flattered that you would ask.  I should be able to participate.  Let's 
discuss further.  Give me a call.  415.782.7822.

Best,
Jeff

	"Shmuel Oren" <oren@ieor.berkeley.edu>
	02/19/2001 11:36 AM
		 
>
> Dear Jeff
> I am Organizing a Panel at the IEEE Summer Meeting in Vancouver July 15-19
> on the California electricity crisis: cause, remedies and prevention. The
> idea is to have different perspectives e.g. operations, market power,
demand
> side response, supply, regulatory etc. I would like to invite you to take
> part in this panel. As someone that was intimately involved in the
> restructuring you could provide an invaluable regulatory and political
> perspective on how did we get into this and how can we get out. At this
> point I have commitments from Fluckiger of the CAISO, Ed Kahn, Ward
Uggerud
> CEO of Otter Tail Power Company, Gary Ackermann, Executive
Director-Western
> Power Trading Forum and I am waiting for a commitment from Vikram Budraja.
>
> Regard, Shmuel Oren
>

Message Points

Recent legislative proposals designed to have the state play a dominant rol=
e=20
in developing, owning and operating power plants in California (SB6X--Burto=
n)=20
and buy PG&E and Edison's electric transmission assets (SB33X--Burton) are=
=20
taking California in the wrong direction and won't solve the State's=20
electricity crisis.
Two new bills are equally disturbing:  AB60X (Hertzerg) would make plant=20
certification contigent upon the developer agreeing to sell the power to th=
e=20
state at "just and reasonable, cost based rates."  SB39X (Spier) would make=
=20
power plant owners public utilities
The proposals represent a political solution, not a commercial, financial,=
=20
economic or technical solution. =20
As a political solution, these bills will not increase supply, decrease=20
demand, or get the utilities back on their financial feet.
In fact, it's worse than that.  These bills will exacerbate California's=20
problems:
The transaction contemplated in SB33X is extremely complex, requiring=20
approval by state and federal authorities, bondholders, creditors and=20
others.  California will be forced to spend an enormous amount of time and=
=20
resources trying to achieve the deal, with no certainty of success,=20
particularly in view of PG&E's public opposition.  In the meantime, summer=
=20
approaches, and the gap between supply and demand remains staggering.  This=
=20
complex, costly and litigious alternative will not lessen the serious threa=
t=20
of blackouts that California faces this summer.
SB6X would have the state finance, develop, own and/or operate power plants=
=20
in the state.

? Unfortunately, the proposal being offered will not solve the problem;=20
rather, it=01,s a significant step backward that will make matters worse in=
=20
California.

? The reason?  Rather than remove California=01,s roadblocks to increased=
=20
generation and transmission investment, this proposal requires California t=
o=20
use taxpayer dollars to get into the business of financing, owning and=20
operating power plants and transmission.

? The best solution =01) recognized across the country and around the world=
 =01) is=20
for the state to allow private companies to site new generation immediately=
.

? Once built, California could easily enter into contracts with private pow=
er=20
plant developers and avoid using taxpayers=01, dollars.

? Given government=01,s other failed experiments in other large scale=20
participation into public power, like TVA, BPA, NYPA, it is highly unlikely=
=20
that a California state agency will succeed in doing something that private=
=20
capital is better equipped and willing to do.

? In the short, the proposal is neither in the public interest nor rational=
.

? Issuing debt to build power plants and take over transmission systems cos=
ts=20
consumers money and takes money away from investments in schools and other=
=20
important priorities.

? We would be willing to work with the Legislature to help craft a bill tha=
t=20
gets more supply in California quickly, efficiently, and in an=20
environmentally sound manner, but this draft achieves only one goal: =20
creating more bureaucracy.

Three articles that folks might find of particular interest written in the 
past couple of days.  

Best,
Jeff

Fellows:
OK, here's the beginning of the memo.  I'm still working on it, but work 
cratered on me and I have to switch back to that now.  I'll have a draft 
finished by tomorrow night and I'll redistribute.  Couple things.

Check the DuPont.  Asset turn needed to be changed, because the pro form 
calcs hadn't taken the cash out of the assets.  That bumps the ROE up some.  
See my attached file, I decompose ROE using an alternative method (Mark, the 
one Tasker used in class) just to do a check, and the numbers turn out the 
same.  I also ran some turnover ratios for AHP and Warner (understanding the 
limitations of one year's numbers.)

Questions:
Don't we have to assume that covenants will force AHP to dump its divident 
payout?  Folks likely to get unhappy about that?  Should we care, or should 
we just expect a rotation out of the stock by dividend-loving investors and 
rotation in by capital-gains loving investors?

Could we persuade the new management to lever up with an argument that with 
all that cash on the books, AHP is ripe for takeover?

Anyway just some thoughts.  I'll finish it up tomorrow and re-distribute. 

Herr Jackson:  I haven't had a chance to review your comments, but I'll 
incorporate those in tomorrow as well.

Best,
Jeff

ah jeez, nobody tell timi and rory....

Sue: Could you use your contacts with Edelman to get on the phone with Scott, 
Mark and Karen to jump start this thing?

Best,
Jeff

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/21/2001 08:26 AM
		 
The direct access coalition had a conference call today to discuss
strategy.

The Chamber, Retailers and the Manufacturers met with the Governor's
office and Senator Burton to discuss DA.  The Retailers and the
Manufacturers came away somewhat disenchanted.  There was little support
for DA, especially from Senator Burton, and the Governor's office was
unfocused.  The Chamber wasn't as pessimistic as the others because the
Governor's office was focused on other things and did not necessarily
shoot down DA.

As requested, I urged the group to utilize Edelman Public Relations who
is under contract to AREM.  The group as whole was very supportive.
There was some reluctance for fear of upsetting Senator Bowen and
Governor Davis.  Several members of the coalition, including the
Manufacturers, Retailers, Grocers and myself,  dismissed those fears and
took the tact that the time is now and we have little to lose given
recent statements by legislators and the administration.  Aaron Thomas
with AES agreed to contact AREM and Edelman to develop a strategy but I
think a call from Enron directly to AREM would be beneficial to speed
the process up.

The group is going to meet with DWR and continue their individual
lobbying efforts.  Their intent is to address the bonding and net short
fears raised by finance and DWR.  Enron had discussed hiring bond
counsel.  Has this occurred, and if so, should attend the DWR meeting?

The group is also going to meet with TURN to try and address their
core/non-core issues, if possible in order to try and get them on board
with the coalition proposal.

talked to mike h.  problem solved.  disregard franctic voicemail.  best,jeff

Any intelligence from "closed door" meeting?
	"Anne Kelly" <kelly@hnks.com>
	02/21/2001 12:19 PM
		 
Julie: Please note the meeting is titled "Executive Session",  therefore it
is not open to the public. John Rozsa is handling the meeting for Sen.
Peace.
> FYI:
>
> There is a Joint Legislative Budget Committee meeting today Chaired by
Sen.
> Peace at 3 p.m in the Maddy Lounge in Room 3030.
>
> SUBJECT: Preservation of Legal Rights and Pursuit of Legal Remedies in the
> Context of Procurement and Contractual Activities Being Conducted Under
> Assembly Bill No. 1 of the first Extraordinary Session.
>
>
> Julee Malinowski-Ball
> Senior Associate
> Edson + Modisette
> 916-552-7070
> FAX-552-7075
> jmball@ns.net
>
>
>

nice smushing.

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/21/2001 04:54 PM
		 
Check out the attached J.D. Power press release issued today with regard to  
the electricity crisis.? According to their survey, 64% of Californians  
still endorse competition.? The file is in Adobe Acrobat format.
?
Dan
 - JD Power 2-21-01 Press Release.pdf

OK, last call for comments.  Need them by noon.  I'll bring copies to class 
for everyone, including Ms Tasker.

Best,
Jeff

Hey folks.  Mr. Jackson makes some very good points, which I'd like to 
include.  However, before I work them in, wanns make sure that everyone 
agrees with his comments, since including some of his will require some 
modifications to the direction that the memo takes.  We could discuss in a 
brief conference call if folks wish.  Also, please review what I've done--not 
major edits, but edits (with some questions and additions) nonetheless.

Best,
Jeff

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/21/2001 07:30 PM
		 
Comments of UC/CSU?on the Draft Decision.
Received: from dymwsm06.mailwatch.com by ArterHadden.com; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 
16:29:52 -0800
Received: from dymw0104.mailwatch.com (dymw0104.allegro.net [204.253.83.244]) 
by dymwsm06.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id f1M0D3A18585 for 
<douglass@arterhadden.com>; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 19:13:03 -0500
Received: from 204.253.83.34 by dymw0104.mailwatch.com with SMTP ( 
WorldSecure Server SMTP Relay(WSS) v4.3); Wed, 21 Feb 01 19:29:56 -0500
X-Server-Uuid: d007647a-7e79-11d4-a501-00508bd358de
Received: from c017.sfo.cp.net (c017-h015.c017.sfo.cp.net [209.228.12.229]) 
by dymwsm12.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id f1M0Txh03569 for 
<douglass@arterhadden.com>; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 19:29: 59 -0500
Received: (cpmta 27422 invoked from network); 21 Feb 2001 16:29:52 -0800
Received: from 154-139-7-216.ip.sirius.com (HELO gralegal.com) ( 
216.7.139.154) by smtp.gralegal.com (209.228.12.229) with SMTP; 21 Feb 2001 
16:29:52 -0800
X-Sent: 22 Feb 2001 00:29:52 GMT

February 21, 2001 

TO ALL PARTIES OF RECORD IN CPUC DOCKET NO. A.00-11-038, A.00-11-056, and 
A.00-10-028: 

Attached please find the Comment sof University of California and California 
State University on February 20, 2000 Draft Decision of Administrative Law 
Judge DeUlloa filed today with the CPUC Docket Office in regard to the above 
matters.? Hard copies are being mailed in today's mail as well. 

Betsie Diamond 
Secretary to 
DIAN M. GRUENEICH 
?
 - A.00-11-038 Caption.doc
 - 02-21-01 Comments On AB X1 Implementation Proposed Decision.doc
 - CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE.doc

Sorry, to fill your in-boxes, but wanted to make sure that you folks have the 
comments that are getting filed.
Best,
Jeff
	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/21/2001 07:40 PM
		 
.....are attached.
?
Dan
 - 00018pld1_.doc

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/21/2001 07:37 PM
		 
...are attached.
?
Dan
 - Comments of PG&E on the Draft Decision.doc

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/21/2001 07:30 PM
		 
Comments of UC/CSU?on the Draft Decision.
Received: from dymwsm06.mailwatch.com by ArterHadden.com; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 
16:29:52 -0800
Received: from dymw0104.mailwatch.com (dymw0104.allegro.net [204.253.83.244]) 
by dymwsm06.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id f1M0D3A18585 for 
<douglass@arterhadden.com>; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 19:13:03 -0500
Received: from 204.253.83.34 by dymw0104.mailwatch.com with SMTP ( 
WorldSecure Server SMTP Relay(WSS) v4.3); Wed, 21 Feb 01 19:29:56 -0500
X-Server-Uuid: d007647a-7e79-11d4-a501-00508bd358de
Received: from c017.sfo.cp.net (c017-h015.c017.sfo.cp.net [209.228.12.229]) 
by dymwsm12.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id f1M0Txh03569 for 
<douglass@arterhadden.com>; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 19:29: 59 -0500
Received: (cpmta 27422 invoked from network); 21 Feb 2001 16:29:52 -0800
Received: from 154-139-7-216.ip.sirius.com (HELO gralegal.com) ( 
216.7.139.154) by smtp.gralegal.com (209.228.12.229) with SMTP; 21 Feb 2001 
16:29:52 -0800
X-Sent: 22 Feb 2001 00:29:52 GMT

February 21, 2001 

TO ALL PARTIES OF RECORD IN CPUC DOCKET NO. A.00-11-038, A.00-11-056, and 
A.00-10-028: 

Attached please find the Comment sof University of California and California 
State University on February 20, 2000 Draft Decision of Administrative Law 
Judge DeUlloa filed today with the CPUC Docket Office in regard to the above 
matters.? Hard copies are being mailed in today's mail as well. 

Betsie Diamond 
Secretary to 
DIAN M. GRUENEICH 
?
 - A.00-11-038 Caption.doc
 - 02-21-01 Comments On AB X1 Implementation Proposed Decision.doc
 - CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE.doc

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/21/2001 07:29 PM
		 
Attached are Edison's comments on the draft decision.
?
Dan
Received: from dymwsm06.mailwatch.com by ArterHadden.com; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 
16:27:36 -0800
Received: from dymw0127.allegro.net (dymw0127.allegro.net [204.253.83.121]) 
by dymwsm06.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id f1M0AjA17586; Wed, 21 
Feb 2001 19:10:45 -0500
Received: from 204.253.83.34 by dymw0127.allegro.net with SMTP ( WorldSecure 
Server SMTP Relay(WSS) v4.3); Wed, 21 Feb 01 19:27:39 -0500
X-Server-Uuid: 40f89cae-8e8c-11d4-bdb6-00508bd392a8
Received: from dnsp1.sce.com (dnsp1.sce.com [155.13.48.3]) by 
dymwsm12.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with ESMTP id f1M0RJh01592; Wed, 21 
Feb 2001 19:27:19 -0500
Received: from D058661.sce.com (D058661.sce.com [155.13.167.39]) by 
dnsp1.sce.com (AIX4.3/8.9.3/5.5.5) with ESMTP id QAA13006; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 
16:27:09 -0800

(See attached file: Comments.PDF)
Attached are SCE Comments on Proposed Decisions on Joint Petition For
Modification of D. 01-01-061 and Implementation of Water Code Section
80110.

This document was filed and served today, 2-21-01, on all parties of
record.

Sincerely,

Anthony V. Archer
So. Cal. Edison/Legal
PAX 2-3104
FAX 2-2304
Tele:(626) 302-3104
 - Comments.PDF

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/21/2001 07:27 PM
		 
Attached are Enron's comments on the draft decision.
?
Dan
Content-Transfer-Encoding: binary
Received: from dymwsm06.mailwatch.com by ArterHadden.com; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 
19:26:11 -0500
Received: from dymw0102.mailwatch.com (dymw0102.allegro.net [204.253.83.159]) 
by dymwsm06.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id f1M09MA16935; Wed, 21 
Feb 2001 19:09:26 -0500
Received: from 204.253.83.26 by dymw0102.mailwatch.com with SMTP ( 
WorldSecure Server SMTP Relay(WSS) v4.3); Wed, 21 Feb 01 19:26:04 -0500
X-Server-Uuid: c41a640a-a9e9-11d4-8124-00508bd3f8dc
Received: from nt2.gmssr.com (smtp.gmssr.com [38.227.228.2]) by 
dymwsm11.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with ESMTP id f1M0PJE09234; Wed, 21 
Feb 2001 19:25:19 -0500
Received: by nt2 with Internet Mail Service (5.5.2650.21) id <1951K2KJ>; Wed, 
21 Feb 2001 16:20:58 -0800

 - X22061.DOC

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/21/2001 07:23 PM
		 
Attached are IEP's comments on the draft decision.
?
Dan
Received: from dymwsm07.mailwatch.com by ArterHadden.com; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 
16:22:39 -0800
Received: from dymw0118.mailwatch.com (dymw0118.allegro.net [204.253.83.116]) 
by dymwsm07.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id f1M0PCG18707; Wed, 21 
Feb 2001 19:25:12 -0500
Received: from 204.253.83.34 by dymw0118.mailwatch.com with SMTP ( 
WorldSecure Server SMTP Relay(WSS) v4.3); Wed, 21 Feb 01 19:20:19 -0500
X-Server-Uuid: b3152adc-79d3-11d4-beb5-00508bd3dc40
Received: from sequoia.eslawfirm.com ([140.174.48.66]) by 
dymwsm12.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with ESMTP id f1M0MCh29964; Wed, 21 
Feb 2001 19:22:12 -0500
Received: by sequoia.eslawfirm.com with Internet Mail Service ( 5.5.2232.9) 
id <1FQ6P4SY>; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 16:22:21 -0800

Greetings:  attached please find the "Preliminary Comments of the
Independent Energy Producers Association to the Draft Decision of ALJ
DeUlloa Regarding Interim Implementation of ABX-1" filed today at the
Commission.  The attachment is in Word 2000 format.  Thank you.  -Eric
Janssen

Eric Janssen
Legal Assistant
Ellison, Schneider & Harris, L.L.P.
2015 H Street
Sacramento, CA  95814
Tel: (916) 447-2166
Fax: (916) 447-3512
Email: ericj@eslawfirm.com

 - 010221_IEP_cmts_360.5_FINAL.doc

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/21/2001 07:15 PM
		 
Attached are ORA's comments filed today.
Content-Transfer-Encoding: binary
Received: from dymwsm07.mailwatch.com by ArterHadden.com; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 
19:22:39 -0500
Received: from dymw0127.allegro.net (dymw0127.allegro.net [204.253.83.121]) 
by dymwsm07.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id f1M0PIG18747; Wed, 21 
Feb 2001 19:25:18 -0500
Received: from 204.253.83.72 by dymw0127.allegro.net with SMTP ( WorldSecure 
Server SMTP Relay(WSS) v4.3); Wed, 21 Feb 01 19:22:44 -0500
X-Server-Uuid: 40f89cae-8e8c-11d4-bdb6-00508bd392a8
Received: from [134.186.70.194] (nic.cpuc.ca.gov [162.15.7.1]) by 
dymwsm10.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id f1M0Goi00654; Wed, 21 Feb 
2001 19:16:50 -0500
Received: from nic.cpuc.ca.gov by [134.186.70.194] via smtpd (for 
mail.mailwatch.com [204.253.83.157]) with SMTP; 22 Feb 2001 00:12:56 UT
Received: from [162.15.7.254] (exchserver1 [162.15.5.63]) by nic.cpuc.ca.gov 
(8.9.3+Sun/8.9.1) with SMTP id QAA17257; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 16:12:26 -0800 (PST)
Received: from no.name.available by [162.15.7.254] via smtpd (for 
nic.cpuc.ca.gov [162.15.7.1]) with SMTP; 22 Feb 2001 00:11:42 UT
Received: by EXCHSERVER1 with Internet Mail Service (5.5.2650.21) id 
<FKBXQ2GG>; Wed, 21 Feb 2001 16:15:22 -0800

 - CPUC01-#90723-v1-comments_of_ORA_on_Draft_Decision_of_ALJ_DEULLOA_.doc

Dude.  You rock.  A hearty, hearty congratulations.  Wish you all the best 
and great success in your new role.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks very much, John.  When this is complete, I'd like to send to the 
larger distribution list.  In fact, if you concur, I'd like to send this 
around to the rest of the group right now.  Let me know.

You're very sweet.  Thank you very much.  However, I still am counting the 
days, and looking forward to, working with you folks.

Best,
Jeff

To say that you are a treasure is apt, though understates the incredible job 
that you do and the wonderful person that you are to work with.  
Congratulations and all the very best.

Best,
Jeff

thank you, cindy.  

Thank you very much for the kind thoughts.

All the best and I hope that all is well in your neck of the woods,
Best,
Jeff

	Ricardo Charvel
	02/22/2001 12:19 PM
		 
Jeff,

I wish you the very best in your new responsibilities.  California is a big 
challenge but I am sure that your work there is making a difference.

Congratulations,

Ricardo

Here they are.

Best,
Jeff

 - dacoalition.summary.doc
 - subscription.protocols revised

	Tom Riley/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange
	02/22/2001 11:47 AM
		 
Dennis, Eric,

Jeff Dasovich will be sending you language currently being contemplated by 
the CPUC regarding customers switching from Bundled Utility status to Direct 
Access status.  We need to begin estimating the price tag for what that 
switch back may be in regards to UC/CSU.  Please take a look at the current 
contemplated language and assess if we are able to translate that into a 
cost, recognizing we are in a very fluid environment.  We need an assessment 
by tomorrow (assuming, of course, that the existing language provides us 
enough guidance to make such an assessment).

Thank you - Tom

A very, very hearty congratulations on your promotion, Ms Leibman.

Best,
Jeff

Thank you very much for including me on this. Really great to see you last 
week.  Hope to see you again soon.  And thanks very much for a great dinner.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks.  How quaint.

	Paul Kaufman@ECT
	02/22/2001 09:26 AM
		
Not any that we could gather.  Apparently the meeting was not supposed to  
benoticed.  Hedy informs that they have an exemption under the Brown Act for 
certain activities.  

Any intelligence from "closed door" meeting?
	"Anne Kelly" <kelly@hnks.com>
	02/21/2001 12:19 PM
		 
Julie: Please note the meeting is titled "Executive Session",  therefore it
is not open to the public. John Rozsa is handling the meeting for Sen.
Peace.
> FYI:
>
> There is a Joint Legislative Budget Committee meeting today Chaired by
Sen.
> Peace at 3 p.m in the Maddy Lounge in Room 3030.
>
> SUBJECT: Preservation of Legal Rights and Pursuit of Legal Remedies in the
> Context of Procurement and Contractual Activities Being Conducted Under
> Assembly Bill No. 1 of the first Extraordinary Session.
>
>
> Julee Malinowski-Ball
> Senior Associate
> Edson + Modisette
> 916-552-7070
> FAX-552-7075
> jmball@ns.net
>
>
>

I think that this is what Sandi was referring to.  If not, please let me kn=
ow.

Best,
Jeff
=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/21/2001 01:31 AM
=09=09=20
Here are some draft message points.  Please review.  Apologies in advance i=
f=20
they're a little rough, but these guys are getting bothersome at this point=
.

Best,
Jeff

Recent legislative proposals designed to 1) give the State the role of=20
developing, owning and operating power plants in California (SB6X--Burton)=
=20
and 2) buy PG&E and Edison's electric transmission assets (SB33X--Burton) a=
re=20
taking California in the wrong direction and won't solve the State's=20
electricity crisis.
Two other recently introduced new bills are equally disturbing and=20
counter-productive:  AB60X (Hertzerg) would make plant certification=20
contingent upon the developer agreeing to sell the power to the state at=20
"just and reasonable, cost based rates."  SB39X (Spier) would classify powe=
r=20
plant as public utilities and would dictate plant operations to a very=20
significant degree.
The proposals are significantly outside the mainstream and offer a politica=
l,=20
as opposed to an economic, commercial, financial, or technical solution. =
=20
Around the rest of the world, governments are privatizing these industries,=
=20
relying on efficient capital markets to provide both the infrastructure  an=
d=20
the products and services that derive from that infrastructure.
Astonishingly, California is moving in the opposite direction, toward a=20
state-owned and operated, centrally-planned industry.
The notion that a state takeover of the industry is the only choice that=20
California has left is false, will lead to a seriously flawed economic=20
policy, and will result in consumers paying higher prices for lower quality=
=20
services for years to come.
As a political solution, these bills will not increase supply, decrease=20
demand, or get the utilities back on their financial feet.
In fact, they are likely to do just the opposite:
They will result in a significant expansion of the state bureaucracy and=20
create additional burdens on the state budget. =20
The transmission buyout contemplated in SB33X is extremely complex, requiri=
ng=20
buy-in from state and federal authorities, bondholders, creditors and=20
others. =20
California will be forced to spend an enormous amount of time and resources=
=20
trying to achieve the deal, with no certainty of success, particularly in=
=20
view of PG&E's public opposition. =20
There is no evidence that the State has any expertise in overseeing a TX=20
system as large and complex as the ones possessed by PG&E and Edison, even =
if=20
it did manage to complete the transaction.
Nor have any estimates been made regarding how much additional capital=20
California will be required to invest in what is generally viewed as a=20
transmission network in desperate need of repair and upgrading.
In the meantime, summer approaches, and the gap between supply and demand=
=20
remains staggering. =20
This complex, costly and litigious alternative will in no way reduce the=20
serious threat of blackouts that California faces this summer.
When those blackouts arrive=01*and they will unless bold action is taken sw=
iftly=01*
consumer will wonder why policy makers spent their time negotiating the pri=
ce=20
of utility transmission assets.
As important, it is extremely difficult to see how the transmission buy-out=
=20
offers creditors a better alternative to bankruptcy court. =20
Indeed, when viewed against the uncertainty of achieving the transmission=
=20
buy-out, particularly in light of the politically charged atmosphere in whi=
ch=20
the debate is taking place, creditors seem increasingly inclined to opt for=
=20
the relative certainty that comes with a bankruptcy court.=20
If that happens, the State loses a significant amount of influence over the=
=20
situation.
Moreover, SB6X squarely inserts the State into the power plant business,=20
despite the face that there is abundant private capital ready and willing t=
o=20
invest in California=01*IF California provides the investment environment t=
o=20
attract that capital.=20
Unfortunately, these bills create an environment that is hostile toward=20
investment capital.
Distressingly, the state could finance, develop, own and/or operate power=
=20
plants, at the same time that it controls the monopoly transmission system.=
=20
In addition, any company that uses the newly-created =01&Power Authority=01=
,s=018=20
financing authority would have the price that it can charge for power set b=
y=20
the =01&Authority,=018 or, if the developer is a utility, by the California=
 PUC.
In sum, the biggest player in the power business=01*the State=01*will contr=
ol the=20
network that power suppliers must use to get their power to market.
The state will control the price to use the network, and in many cases it=
=20
will also control the prices power suppliers charge for power services.
This scenario makes the old vertically-integrated monopoly structure look=
=20
inviting.
Capital markets will run from this =01&solution=018 and put capital to more=
=20
productive uses outside of California.
Under this proposed =01&solution=018 only IOUs and municipal utilities will=
 build=20
plants, and the state will be forced to finance them. =20
That=01,s the same recipe for inefficiency and waste that got California to=
=20
electricity prices that were 50% higher than the national average. =20
We=01,ve been down that route; it=01,s been given chance after chance to su=
cceed,=20
and it=01,s failed.  State-ownership and intrusive regulation haven=01,t wo=
rked in=20
the past, and they won=01,t work today.
This package of bills will increase the risk of blackouts this summer;=20
increase the time it takes to close the gap between supply and demand in=20
California; increase the likelihood of bankruptcy; and force businesses to=
=20
look elsewhere to locate and/or expand operations, all of which put=20
California=01,s economy at risk.
The real solution is to succeed in doing what California failed to do the=
=20
first time=01*lay the groundwork for truly competitive retail and wholesale=
=20
markets and foster an environment designed to foster investment, invest,=20
rather than chase it away.

Sue:

The way that I understood what Loretta said, the utilities will not be forced 
to absorb the shortfall between the price cap and DWR's cost of power.  
Instead, she said that DWR will be responsible for those costs.  (That ought 
to make DWR an even less creditworthy entity.)  I'll check in with Mike Day's 
folks to make sure that I heard correctly and get more details.  Will report 
back just as soon as we get more information.

Best,
Jeff

There is MAJOR MAJOR concern over how the CPUC is implementing ABX 1. Being 
voted on right now.

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854Sue (Mara):

Carol:
Steve should double check.  As I understand it, they did vote out the 
decision implementing AB1X, however, the decision removed the language 
prohibiting direct access and made DWR, not the utility, "responsible" for 
any shortfalls caused by the difference between the price cap and DWR's cost 
of buying power.

Best,
Jeff

	"Carol Hudson" <carol@iepa.com>
	02/22/2001 01:10 PM
	Please respond to carol
		 
Steven just called in from the Capitol with the following information:

   Today, Thursday, Feb. 22, the CPUC did not vote out the draft decision
implementing AB1X.   Also, the CPUC held the Wood decision.

Carol Hudson, Executive Assistant
Independent Energy Producers Assn.
1112 I Street, Suite 380
Sacramento, CA 95814
PH: 916-448-9499
FX: 916-448-0182
carol@iepa.com

	John Neslage@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	02/22/2001 10:37 AM
		
We are in the process of distilling this list down to its essentials, and 
when we are done, I will forward it along to the group.  So as not to hold 
you up, I am attaching a comprehensive list of proposed legislation in both 
the Assembly and the Senate in California, along with short summary of what 
each piece of legislation purports to do.

Thanks-

John

Davis Signals Utility's Grid Could Be Seized 
Power: Governor says eminent domain is a possible last resort against PG&E, 
which is balking in state sales negotiations. 
By DAN MORAIN and NANCY RIVERA BROOKS, Times Staff Writers 
On the eve of a new round of rescue negotiations with a reluctant Pacific Gas 
& Electric Co., Gov. Gray Davis suggested Wednesday that as a last resort the 
state could seize the utility's prized electrical transmission system through 
eminent domain.
That saber-rattling cut against the grain of some rare good news in the 
state's continuing electricity crisis. The energy supply crunch eased 
slightly as grid operators pumped up the cushion between supply and demand, 
and for the first time in more than five weeks the statewide power grid was 
operating under a relatively mild Stage 1 emergency.
Negotiations with the state's two other big utilities--Southern California 
Edison and San Diego Gas & Electric--were described by a Davis aide as going 
"very well."
But the governor, responding to a reporter's question, would not rule out the 
idea of taking over transmission assets through eminent domain, a legal 
proceeding by which government can take over private property, at a price 
determined by a court. His aides downplayed the possibility, and Davis said 
he intends to continue talking with utility executives in an effort to 
resolve the weighty questions.
"My strong preference is to do this through [a] cooperative negotiation 
process rather than just seize it," Davis said at a brief news conference at 
an elementary school south of Sacramento.
Davis is insisting that the utilities give up control of the massive system 
of high-voltage transmission lines in exchange for an infusion of state money 
that would allow Southern California Edison and Pacific Gas & Electric to 
restructure their multibillion-dollar debts.
While Edison and San Diego Gas & Electric executives have said they are 
willing to discuss the sale of their portion of the 32,000-mile statewide 
grid, PG&E, the state's largest utility, is balking.
"The governor would like to solve this thing in one fell swoop, but if PG&E 
is sitting up there being obdurate, then this thing is severable," Davis 
political advisor Garry South said in Los Angeles.
The utilities need the state's help to buy electricity, as wholesale prices 
have soared since May and supplies have been stretched to the limit. Under 
the state's limited deregulation plan, the companies were forced to buy 
wholesale power at market prices but were not allowed to pass along increased 
costs to customers.
Internal administration documents circulated in the Capitol last week show 
that the state was considering paying 2.3 times the grid's "book value," or 
about $7.3 billion, for the grid serving all three companies.
A top utility source, requesting anonymity, said the figure was in the 
"ballpark" of what was being discussed.
Talks will continue today with all three utilities. Davis had not decided 
whether he would join the talks directly, or leave that task to his aides, 
San Francisco attorney Michael Kahn and former Southern California Edison 
executive Michael Peevey.
"We're still hopeful for an announcement by Friday," Davis spokesman Steve 
Maviglio said Wednesday night.

Transmission Grid the Key
Davis insisted that the transmission grid is key to any deal. The utilities 
would use cash from the purchase to restructure debt and the state would use 
its ability to raise money through bond sales to revamp the aging system, 
which is said to need $1 billion in improvements.
"That will be part of the solution," Davis said. "I will not sign off on a 
resolution of this [without the transmission grid]."
South, the governor's chief political advisor, acknowledged that PG&E is in 
more difficult financial straits than Edison, largely because the PG&E 
electricity rate structure set by the Public Utilities Commission is lower.
But he added that Edison has shown more good faith and interest coming into 
the negotiations, which began Tuesday in San Francisco.
"Edison's been coming into these meetings with 50-page binder books with 
various specific proposals," South said. "PG&E comes in with a handwritten 
piece of paper and a big huff of arrogance. They act like they are in control 
when they are in serious soup."
A spokesman for PG&E declined to comment on South's remarks. The utility has 
maintained a policy of not discussing the negotiations.
PG&E's parent company, PG&E Corp., announced Wednesday that it would not be 
paying its regular dividend of 30 cents per share on common stock for the 
first quarter of 2001. PG&E said it would not resume paying common stock 
dividends until it "determines that the financial health of the company will 
support such action."
The company has come under intense criticism that it is maintaining a 
business-as-usual approach while its utility subsidiary was teetering toward 
bankruptcy.
While the negotiations with PG&E threatened to prolong the political crisis, 
the state was emerging from 39 straight days of moderate-to-critical power 
supply emergencies, having been lifted into the relative calm of a low-level 
alert by warmer weather, improved electricity reserves and a decrease in the 
number of power plant shutdowns.
"We should probably be making a big deal about this, but we just don't have 
time," said Stephanie McCorkle, a spokeswoman for the California Independent 
System Operator, which balances supply and demand on the electricity grid 
serving about 75% of the state.
The grid controllers have been operating in full crisis mode for months now, 
using everything short of the Energizer bunny to keep electricity flowing 
while state leaders looked for solutions to the power market meltdown.

Economic Uncertainty
For more than a month, the state's transmission grid has been operating under 
either a Stage 2 or Stage 3 emergency, indicating extremely tight reserves. 
At noon Wednesday, the grid bumped down to Stage 1--indicating that the state 
was maintaining reserves at a relatively cushy 7%. That is still below what 
grid operators consider prudent, but no one was complaining.
The full effect of the electricity crisis on the state's economy is not yet 
clear, and independent Legislative Analyst Elizabeth Hill urged state 
lawmakers Wednesday to take a "wait-and-see" approach as they craft a new 
budget.
Still, she left no doubt that she believes the power problems could seriously 
crimp California's economic outlook.
Hill said she believes it is safe to assume that electricity costs will rise 
because of the gap between wholesale prices and regulated rates. If wholesale 
prices were to stay as high as they are now, she estimated, the state's 
wholesale electricity costs would climb to $40 billion this year, up from $25 
billion in 1999.
Hill made no prediction about whether that would happen. Indeed, Brad 
Williams, a senior economist in Hill's office, said he thought it likely that 
prices would decline and that legislation would shield consumers from the 
full effect of the inflated electricity market.

30-Day Supply Agreement
Also Wednesday, Reliant Energy of Houston, which has balked at being forced 
to provide electricity to California when payment for that power is 
uncertain, said it had reached a 30-day agreement with the state under which 
the company will continue to provide emergency electricity supplies.
As a result, a federal judge in Sacramento delayed ruling on a lawsuit filed 
by state grid operators against Reliant. Instead, U.S. District Judge Frank 
C. Damrell Jr. extended until Friday afternoon an order forcing Reliant and 
several other energy suppliers to keep selling to the California grid 
operators.
In Huntington Beach, city officials delivered a blow to Davis' plan to 
accelerate power plant projects, filing an appeal with the California Energy 
Commission to fight the speedy reactivation of two old gas-fired generators. 
If they exhaust that process without stopping the plan, they promised to go 
to court.
Regardless of whether the appeals succeed, they are likely to tie up the 
approval process, and in that sense strike against the heart of the 
governor's plan to expedite power plant projects to meet the energy shortfall 
expected this summer.
The AES units--with a combined output of 450 megawatts, enough to serve 
450,000 typical homes--represent about 10% of the 5,000 megawatts that Davis 
assured power-starved Californians would be available in time for the summer 
peak.
--- 
Times staff writers Mitchell Landsberg in Los Angeles, Richard Simon in 
Washington, Julie Tamaki and Rone Tempest in Sacramento and Christine Hanley 
in Orange County contributed to this story.

 

Ginger:  

Could you please forward this along to the Quinn-Gillespie folks---David 
Lugar in particular?  Thanks very much.

Others:
Attached are excerpts from the California Leg Analyst's Report--an 
"independent" institution in Sacramento--on the electricity crisis, the plan 
thus far to address it, and the effect that the solution might have on the 
State's financial position.  Also have attached URL to full report.
http://www.lao.ca.gov/analysis_2001/2001_pandi/pandi_toc_anl2001.html

Best,
Jeff

FYI.  Never heard back from Kevin.

	Allison Navin@ENRON
	09/18/2000 05:17 PM
		 
Jeff - Just wanted to follow-up on my voice mail of Friday re: Kevin Binger 
at the House Government Reform Committee.  He is looking to talk with someone 
from Enron about the California situation prior to a hearing the Committee is 
having this Thursday morning.  His phone number is 202-225-5074.  Thanks.

=09Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
=0902/22/2001 01:33 PM
=09=09=20
Just a reminder that there is an IEP Market Response Call today, 2/22 at
1:30 pm PST.  The call in number will be 1-800-374-2393, Pass-code:
Independent Energy Producers. An agenda is below.

Thanks,
Jean

--=20
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

February 22, 2001

PR UPDATE

Target Briefings

? Republican Caucus Briefing =01. 2/8
? Democrat Caucus Briefings =01. TBD
? Lawrence Lindsey, Assistant to the President for Economic Policy, and
Director of the National Economic Council =01. 3/2

Collateral Materials

? Web-site =01. www.turnonthetruth.com
? Rough and Tumble Ad =01. www.rtumble.com
? Seeing the Light Update =01. MRW making technical updates
? Weekly distribution=01. Public Power Handout,  QF article mock-up; Highli=
ghts
from the FERC report on Plant Outages, QF handout, Sacramento Bee article
mock-up=20
? California Journal Ad April
? The Power In Your District
? IEP folders

Research

? Recent polling results

Earned Media

? Teleconference briefings with press =01. On Fridays, or as needed
? Statewide and national media outreach =01. Ongoing
? Editorial Board Meetings =01.  Targeting: Sacramento Bee, LA Times, San
Francisco Chronicle, San Jose Mercury News, Alameda News Group, San Diego
Union Tribune

? Press Contacts:

 TV=20
? CBS Nightly News, w/ Dan Rather, John Blackstone reporting
? KCRA CH 3 Sacramento
? NBC Nightly News w/Tom Brokaw)
? KVIE, Ch.6, California Capitol Week
? CBC, Canadian Broadcasting Corporation
o  CBS Sunday with Charles Osgood
=20
Print Reporters/Columnists
? George Skelton, LA Times
? Mitchell Bensen, Wall Street Journal
? Jennifer Warren, LA Times
? Santa Maria Times, John Reed
? Los Angeles Daily Breeze
? Steve Geissenger, Oakland Tribune
? John Enswiller, Wall Street Journal
? Jim Sterngold, New York Times
? Hugo Martin, LA Times
? Brandon Bailey, San Jose Mercury News
? Dale Kasler, Sacramento Bee
? Jim Sands, Stockton Record
? Chris Keyser, McGraw Hill
? Emily Richmond, Palo Alto Daily News
? Leslie Berkman, Riverside Press Enterprise
? William Booth, Washington Booth
? Bill Lambrecht, St. Louis Post Dispatch
? Julie Tamaki, LA Times
? Amy Costello, NPR
? Jeff Stanfield, Generation Week
? Rob Thormeyer, McGraw Hill
? Richard Gonzales, National Public Radio
? Chris Martin, Bloomberg News
? Hanna Quak, Orange Co. Register
? Chris Palmary, Business Week Magazine
? John Wilkens, San Diego Union Tribune

Radio=20
? KPFK, LA, 90.7
? KCRW, Which Way LA
? KALW City Vision, Public Radio San Francisco
? KCCP FM, Los Angeles
? KPCC FM
? KALW

Participating in 1/24 or 1/26 Teleconference
? Gene Laverty, Bloomberg
? George Osterkamp, CBS news
? Jim Limbach, Associated Press
? Jim Kennett, Bloomberg News
? Gary Chase, KMJ Radio
? Mike Thornton, KVMR FM RADIO
? Mike Ward, KFBK Radio
? Todd Thornton, KCHO RADIO
? Ann Deroufigger, OIL AND GAS JOURNAL
? Craig Rose, San Diego Union Tribune
? David Ivanovich, Houston Chronicle
? Matthew J Donoval, KVEC Radio
? Paul Redding, KXBX Radio News
? Mark Howell, KUZZ Radio
? Eve Mitchell, Oakland Tribune
? Nick Roman, KLON RADIO
? George Lewis, NBC NEWS
? Barbara Shook, Energy Intelligence
? Arthur O'donnell, California Energy Markets
? Andrew Phemister, San Diego East County Times
? Julie Tamaki, LA Times
? Mike Montgomery, CAPITAL PUBLIC RADIO
? Carolyn Said, SF Chronicle
? Linda Gledhill, San Francisco Chronicle
? Rachel Mryow, KPCC
? Mike Sugarman, KCBS RADIO
? David Ivanovich Jr, HOUSTON CHRONICLE
? Tim Heardt, VENTURA COUNTY STAR
? Mike Taugher, The Contra Costa Times
? Scott Howard, KNVN CH 24
? Hugo Martin, LA Times
? Alan Zibel, Oakland Tribune
? Bob Garrett, Riverside Press Enterprise
? Ron Sumeda, Energy Analyst
? Don Andrews, Metro Networks
? Tim Anderacci, Bloomberg News
? Jim Steingold, NY Times
? Germain Ferman, Business Report
? Leslie Berkman, Press Enterprise
? Ramona Evans, St. Alina Star
? Kiki Tamaka, Los Angeles Times
? Rachel Myrow, KPPC
? Anndee Laskoe, ABC KESQ
? Doug Caldwell, San Jose Business Journal
? Christian Berthelsen, San Fransicso Chronicle
? Lynne Corum, McGraw Hill
? Chris Ko, Korea Times
? Jeff Barber, McGraw Hill
? Gus Thompson, Auburn Journal
? Ron Statler, KMJ News

Greetings.  Thanks for the help yesterday.  I may have missed it, but could 
you forward me the memo describing the 203 stuff?  Greatly appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

Joe:  My apologies.  It was buried deep in this thing that I used to call an 
in-box.  Found it shortly after I wrote the note.  Thanks again.

Best,
Jeff

 WHAT?!!?

Here's the piece put out by the academics.

Best,
Jeff
	David Teece <teece@Haas.Berkeley.EDU>
	01/26/2001 06:47 PM
		 
Dear Colleagues,

Some of you have been asking for the final version of the manifesto.  The
copy attached is the FINAL version.

David

 - Manifesto DJT 1-25-01.doc
======================================
David J. Teece, Director
Institute of Management, Innovation and Organization
F402 Haas School of Business #1930
University of California, Berkeley
Berkeley, CA  94720-1930
Phone:  (510) 642-1075
Fax:  (510) 642-2826
http://haas.berkeley.edu/~imio
======================================

thank you.  got message that call is now at 11:30 am.

Davis' deadlines on energy much easier set than met
By Emily Bazar
Bee Staff Writer
(Published Feb. 23, 2001) 
Exactly one week ago, Gov. Gray Davis sounded hopeful, optimistic even, when 
he predicted that the state and its debt-ridden utilities would forge an 
agreement by today on a plan to save the companies from financial doom. 
Problem is, it won't work out that way. 
Negotiations between state officials and the investor-owned utilities have 
produced no comprehensive agreement to announce today. 
Davis' predictions during the energy crisis have been wrong before. 
For weeks, he has set deadlines for agreements and legislative action that 
haven't been met. On deadline days, even when there's little substantive 
progress to report, Davis often holds news conferences anyway -- many of them 
on Friday afternoons after financial markets close. 
The Democratic governor's office scheduled an "announcement" for today in Los 
Angeles, even though one utility representative said agreement is far away. 
Davis' actions have fueled speculation that he's trying to force consensus by 
setting artificial deadlines and putting a spin on the news, and tarnishing 
the state's credibility in the process. 
"I can't see how you would negotiate such a complex deal, like the purchase 
of the transmission grid, in such a short period of time. It doesn't seem 
realistic," said Gary Ackerman of the Western Power Trading Forum, an 
association of wholesale generators. "I guess the people I represent have 
turned it off. They have stopped listening. They hear it and say, 'OK, sure. 
Here's another photo op.' " 
Last Friday, Davis told a gathering of reporters that state officials and the 
utilities would agree by today on a rescue plan for the utilities. 
"I believe we'll have agreement before next week is out, on exactly what 
should go in a piece of legislation," he said at the time. "And hopefully, 
that legislation will be passed by the end of the following week." 
Legislative veterans said his comments were ill-advised and unrealistic. 
Davis met into the night Thursday with top officials of Pacific Gas and 
Electric Co., but no agrement was reached. 
"These are complicated problems that will not be solved overnight," said PG&E 
spokesman Ron Low. "On some issues, we are very far away from agreement." 
Sources said PG&E has been unwilling to negotiate sale of its transmission 
lines, which Davis has said is a necessary component of a deal. More progress 
was reported with the two other near-bankrupt companies -- San Diego Gas and 
Electric Co. and Southern California Edison -- although sources said talks 
with them were far from concluded. 
Davis has been setting specific deadlines for himself and the Legislature for 
months: 
In November, the governor promised to present a comprehensive "plan" by Dec. 
1 to stave off a full-blown energy crisis, but ended up offering only a 
modest slate of proposals. 
Davis called Feb. 12 a "drop dead" date by which he hoped to cement a deal 
between lawmakers and the utilities. There's no deal yet. 
Davis told reporters that he and the state's legislative leaders would reach 
a "consensus agreement" on the proposal to take to utilities by last Friday. 
It didn't happen; he made the announcement alone. 
Leon Panetta, a White House chief of staff under former President Clinton, 
said it's important that the governor set deadlines because the nature of 
politics is to delay. 
However, he cautioned against missing deadlines. 
"You have to be careful that you keep the deadlines you establish, because 
the more that you establish and not meet, the more that begins to lose its 
value as a political tool," Panetta said. 
The governor can't continue to indefinitely set deadlines without facing 
consequences, cautioned Steven Fetter, managing director of the Global Power 
Group at Fitch, a credit-rating agency based in New York. 
At some point, he warned, creditors and power suppliers may push the 
utilities into involuntary bankruptcy, which would trigger an official 
deadline that can't be ignored. The dispute would be tied up in court at a 
judge's discretion. 
"Eventually, there is going to be a real deadline," Fetter said. "The problem 
is it's probably not a deadline that will be set by Gov. Davis. It's a 
deadline that will be set by the banks and the (electricity) suppliers." 
In several cases when deadlines haven't been met, Davis has held a news 
conference regardless, unveiling little new information and scant detail. 
On Jan. 26, for instance, the governor promoted the broad framework of a plan 
to save the utilities rather than a detailed plan that had been anticipated. 
One prong of the plan: "Aggressively promote energy efficiency, conservation 
and demand reduction among consumers, businesses and public entities." 
Davis spokesman Steve Maviglio said that the governor continues to set 
deadlines because it's important to show that the state is making progress, 
particularly to Wall Street. 
He added that it's not the governor's fault the deadlines have been missed. 
"Many of the dates have been blown away by factors no one has been able to 
foresee or have control over: court decisions, actions by creditors, weather, 
you name it," Maviglio said. "The governor sets deadlines that continue to 
move the ball forward and he has been successful at doing that." 
Many of these announcements came after 2 p.m. on Fridays, triggering 
suggestions that the governor has attempted to spin the facts and manipulate 
the markets. 
Timing announcements after the close of East Coast financial markets is 
commonly used by politicians who don't want to send stocks soaring or 
tumbling by making an announcement, Panetta said. 
"You want people to evaluate what's happening so there isn't a panic reaction 
to a news flash going over the wire," he said. 
But market analysts say that ever since PG&E and Edison stocks plummeted in 
early January, the governor's statements haven't significantly affected their 
performance. 
"There has been so much news that has been so negative for the companies that 
I don't think it makes much of a difference," said Ed Schuller, a senior vice 
president for the full-service brokerage firm Sutro & Co. "It's beyond that 
point now." 

FYI.  Mirant announced a 750MW deal with DWR, but story only said "for March" 
so unclear what term is. 

let's talk about it tonite.

Please keep confidential (for now), and please forward to Bev.  Thanks.
Best,
Jeff
	Susan J Mara
	02/22/2001 07:24 PM
		 
Mirant calculated some good data and the rest of the gens are going to do the 
same

Mirant:  80% Increase in energy production vs. under IOU ownership
 6% forced outage rate vs. 19.8% forced outage rate of the same plants owned 
by the IOUs
IEP will put together some data

The big news is the POLLING.  IEP and Reliant have just completed some 
polling for California.  Here are the fascinating results -- which should 
help shape our message.

This polled as the #1 voter issue

58% say its  not appropriate to use tax dollars to bailout by the utilities 
by buying transmission, hydro or stock options.

Who favors the state getting the following in return for dollars (forced to 
choose one):
Hydroelectric -- 28%
Stock options -- 27%
Transmission -- 18%

50% say its OK for the government to play a larger role in purchasing and 
distribution
48% say the state SHOULD NOT takeover transmission
39% say the state SHOULD NOT create a public power agency

45% oppose re-regulation which is estimated to cost $40 billion

Asked if it is fair for the generators who are owed $1 billion to be forced 
to sell without assurance of being paid, 47% said this was unfair

WHo's to blame:
38%  Legislature
22% Utilities
11% Davis
10% Generators withholding power

52% says Davis is doing a good job
38% said he's not
This was reported to be the same as for Bush and "Davis will know that"

49% says Davis is on the wrong track

Would you want to re-elect Davis?
38% yes
42% replace him

38% are angry about it -- they said this isn't enough for the "pitchfork 
parade" yet

33%  only this amount thinks Davis' handling is "exceptional" or "good"
10% for the regulators
12% for the legislature

Now for the bad news:

ASKED PREVIOUSLY -- If rates went up 10% without any blackouts or if there 
was no rate increase with blackouts every day of the summer, which do you 
prefer
Blackouts -- 46%
Rate inc   --  41%

ASKED IN THIS ROUND -- If rates went up 25% without any blackouts or if there 
was no rate increase with blackouts every day of the summer, which do you 
prefer
Blackouts -- 47%
Rate inc   --  36%

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854

Greetings Sally:
My name is Jeff Dasovich.  The Greens have been helping me develop 40 acres 
of land that I bought just north of Anchor Bay (a couple of miles up the hill 
from Highway One, about 1200 ft or so up) and they suggested that I contact 
you.

The property is right in the heart of the Banana Belt and my property faces 
south, is protected, and a such is very hot and sunny from late spring 
through later summer/early fall.  The property has an abundance of water on 
it.  Of course, the possibility of evening fog raises some tricky issues, and 
I haven't done soil tests.  In short, while I think there are some 
challenges, I'm convinced that there is at least the strong possibility that 
I could grow grapes--around 10 acres or so.

I'm sure that you're extremely busy, but I'd be very interested in talking to 
you at your convenience to discuss the viability of growing grapes on my 
property.  I look forward to talking further about the possibilities.

All the best,
Jeff

Hi darlin'.  I'm here, been spending a lot of time on an EES crisis 
(surprise?).  can i call you in about 15-30 minutes?

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/23/2001 08:34 AM
		 
These committees will all meet on Monday at 1:30 p.m. to hear the
following bills.  I have included brief descriptions.  The bills are
however subject to change.

Assembly Energy, Costs and Availability

ABX1 9 (2001-2002), Richman: ASM
Digest Summary: Under existing law, the State Energy Resources
Conservation and Development Commission has various powers and duties
with respect to the siting of thermal powerplants, as defined, in the
state.
This bill would require the commission, at the earliest possible time,
to identify the 10 counties in the state with the highest total
population and electricity demand for the 10 years preceding January 1,
2001, and, after completing that identification of counties, to allocate
a total of 20 sites that are distributed throughout those identified
counties to be used as a location for a 1000 megawatt thermal powerplant
and related facilities, as provided.

ABX1 13 (2001-2002), Firebaugh: ASM
Digest Summary:Existing law requires the Public Utilities Commission to
establish a program of assistance to low-income electric and gas
customers, which is referred to as the California Alternate Rates for
Energy or CARE program.
This bill would establish the Low-Income Oversight Board for the purpose
of monitoring and evaluating the implementation of low-income programs.

ABX1 25 (2001-2002), Runner: ASM
Digest Summary:Existing law authorizes the governing board of a school
district that determines during a fiscal year that its revenues are less
than the amount necessary to meet its current year expenditure
obligations to request an emergency apportionment through the
Superintendent of Public Instruction subject to requirements and
repayment provisions.
This bill would establish the Interruptible Program Contingency
Revolving Loan Fund, appropriated to and administered by the State
Department of Education, to provide loans to school districts, community
college districts, and private postsecondary educational institutions
for the purpose of paying unexpected energy costs.

ABX1 26 (2001-2002), Leach: ASM
Digest Summary:Existing law authorizes the governing board of a school
district that determines during a fiscal year that its revenues are less
than the amount necessary to meet its current year expenditure
obligations to request an emergency apportionment through the
Superintendent of Public Instruction subject to requirements and
repayment provisions.
This bill would establish the continuously appropriated School Energy
Contingency Revolving Loan Fund to provide loans, to the extent that
funds are transferred to the fund and according to specified priorities,
to school districts and charter schools for the purpose of paying
unexpected energy costs.

ABX1 38 (2001-2002), Jackson: ASM
Digest Summary: Existing law establishes the California Alternative
Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority and prescribes
the duties of the authority with respect to, among other things,
promoting prompt and efficient development of energy sources that are
renewable or that more efficiently utilize and conserve scarce energy
resources.
The bill would appropriate $150,000,000 from the General Fund to the
authority for a program to create loan guarantees to underwrite joint
venture agreements between public power entities, independent
generators, and utilities for specified purposes.

Assembly Natural Resources:

ABX1 31 (2001-2002), Wright: ASM
Digest Summary: Existing law authorizes any person to petition the
hearing board of an air pollution control district or air quality
management district for a variance from the rules, regulations, or
orders of the district.
This bill would provide that a breakdown condition includes, but is not
limited to, the startup or shutdown of a facility that has complied with
applicable startup and shutdown procedures, or a failure to operate air
emission control equipment, if either condition is caused by a power
interruption or curtailment initiated by the Independent System
Operator, a public utility electrical corporation, or local publicly
owned electric utility, as defined.

ABX1 34 (2001-2002), La Suer: ASM
Digest Summary: The Warren-Alquist State Energy Resources Conservation
and Development Act authorizes the State Energy Resources Conservation
and Development Commission, upon a declaration by the Governor or by an
act of the Legislature that a threat to public health, safety, and
welfare exists and requires immediate action, to determine that all
reasonable conservation, allocation, and service restriction measures
may not alleviate any energy supply emergency, and to authorize the
construction and use of generating facilities under the terms and
conditions as specified by the commission to protect the public
interest.
This bill would make a legislative declaration that a threat to the
public health, safety, and welfare exists that requires immediate action
and that all reasonable conservation, allocation, and service
restriction measures have not alleviated the energy supply emergency.

ACRX1 2 (2001-2002), Cogdill: ASM
Digest Summary:This measure would urge the Governor of California to
expand the current declaration of emergency in California and to exert
his emergency power authority to increase the production of electricity
in California and order the Public Utilities Commission to meet in an
emergency session to enact a comprehensive regulation allowing for
forward and bilateral contracting of energy purchases without a
reasonableness review of the contracts.

Senate Natural Resources

SBX1 28 (2001-2002), Sher: SEN
Digest Summary: Existing law contains various provisions relative to air
pollution control.
This bill would require the State Air Resources Board, in consultation
with air districts and the State Energy Resources Conservation and
Development Commission, to implement a program for the expedited
retrofit of electrical generating facilities to ensure that the
facilities are permitted to operate in a manner that complies with law.

biz cards.

Thanks.  You do the same.  Best, Jeff

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/23/2001 11:20 AM
		 
Jeff,

Got your message.  I had a long conversation yesterday with Lt. Colonel
Bill Wells who I promised to keep in the loop.  I suggested he send a
letter now indicating their support for DA but they were not prepared to
do so. I'll keep both of you updated.

If I don't speak to you have a nice weekend.

Scott

thanks.  sorry about that.  please apologize to hedy.

Best,
Jeff

	Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
	02/23/2001 04:18 PM
		 
Jan will be responding to the attached remarks by Governor Davis during the
IEP press call at 3:00 PST.  Call in # is 1-800-374-2393, Pass code:
Independent Energy Producers.

Thanks,
Jean

-- 
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

PR01:065
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
02/23/2001 02:05 PM

GOVERNOR DAVIS ANNOUNCES PRINCIPLES OF AGREEMENT WITH SOUTHERN CALIFORNIA
EDISON

LOS ANGELES 

Governor Gray Davis today announced an agreement in principle with Southern
California Edison to keep the utility solvent.

"This is the framework of a good, balanced deal," said Governor Davis. "It's
not a final deal. There's a lot of work to be done. But we're making
progress.

"This is a complex transaction with a lot of moving parts. With these terms
in place, I'm confident we'll be able to hammer out a final agreement
shortly."

The State has agreed to purchase the utility's transmission lines for an
estimated $2.76 billion (2.3 times estimated book value) and allow Edison to
issue bonds for a substantial portion of its undercollection.

In exchange, Southern California Edison has agreed to:

*    Make payments from its parent company, Edison International, to the
utility of approximately $420 million;
*    Commit the entire output of the parent company's Sunrise Mission power
project at low "cost-based" rates for 10 years (a value to ratepayers of
$500 million over the next two years);
*    Provide cost-based rates from the generating facilities they own for
another 10 years;
*    Conservation easements on 20,000 acres of watershed lands for 99 years;
and
*    Drop their pending litigation against the Public Utilities Commission
that would have resulted in immediate higher electric rates for consumers if
they had prevailed in court.

Negotiations will continue during the next several days with the utility.

###

Yes, that's my sister.  She graduated (undergrad) in 1979 (don't tell her 
that I told you, but I think that she was first in her class).  Married to a 
very nice guy (Mike Bentivoglio)--also Haas '79.  He's now the head of 
corporate planning at Schwab. 

Have a great weekend.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks again, John.
Best,
Jeff
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/22/2001 07:46 AM
		 
Here are the DA amendments and cover sheet.

 - dacoalition.summary.doc
 - subscription.protocols revised

Thank a lot.

Dollar amount: $7,500.
Project:  Retain MRW & Associates to assist in developing a rate structure 
for California that solves the utilities' financial solvency issues without 
applying "rate shock" to the state's economy, businesses or consumers.  Use 
the rate plan to develop an alternative to Governor Davis' proposal to 
nationalize the state's electric industry.

Congratulations.  Freeman is such a reasonable guy....

Best,
Jeff

FYI.
	Christopher F Calger@ECT
	02/23/2001 06:00 PM
		 
Dave,

Today we entered into an agreement with CDWR.  A condition of any new deal 
was payment for power deliveries already made.  We received $10.9MM today so 
we executed a 200MW Peak NP-15 Sale from Feb24-Mar31.  CDWR gave us an option 
until Mar28 to extend the deal for five years (at a lower price).  This gives 
us the opportunity to work out the credit issues.  

I plan on speaking with Freeman early next week to re-engage on credit issues 
/ Pastoria / other deals.  

Chris

=09"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
=0902/23/2001 05:59 PM
=09Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
=09=09=20

Date: 2/23/01

RECENT EVENTS:

-- The week started off on a very positive note.  Monday was a holiday!
Tuesday, however, inevitably came along to spoil all the fun with last
minute committee hearing announcements for some significant bills.

-- SB 39x (Speier) was heard this week in the Senate Energy Committee.  Thi=
s
measure would define owners or operators of any electric generating facilit=
y
as a public utility subject to the state=01,s jurisdiction.  The bill also
places the CPUC in the role of determining scheduled maintenance outages fo=
r
generation units.  Although the bill goes much further, the author=01,s onl=
y
intention is to give the CPUC a role in coordinating power plant outages,
but seems to not understand the implications of doing it in the manner
outlined in the bill.  IEP opposed the bill and testified to that end along
with CMTA, the State Chamber of Commerce, Enron, WSPA, and the California
Cogeneration Council.  The usual cast of consumer groups supported the bill=
.
Of particular note during the hearing was the hostility shown to the
opposition by the Chair of the Committee, Senator Bowen.  The message from
the opposition clearly was ignored by the majority of the members as it
passed out of the committee on a party-line vote.  IEP is currently
reassessing its strategy on this particular issue because this is not the
only bill that proposes similar changes.

-- The Assembly Natural Resources Committee, chaired by Asm. Howard Wayne,
was scheduled this week to hear two siting bills.  The first was AB 34x (La
Suer), which would make various changes to the CEC siting process, includin=
g
some IEP-sponsored language.  IEP has a support if amended position on the
bill which has some technical and policy problems, but workable.  Last
minute amendments offered by Asm. Keeley forced Asm. La Suer to postpone a
hearing on the bill until next Monday (2/26).  However, because the Keeley
amendments basically gut the current language and turn it into a study bill=
,
La Suer is unlikely to accept them and, according to the negative committee
analysis, the committee is unlikely to approve the measure in its current
form.

AB 36x (Wright), on the other hand, passed the Natural Resources committee
with only one =01&no=018 vote.  AB 36x would provide expedited siting for a
repower project, as defined.  However, despite IEP=01,s efforts to get the =
bill
amended, the current language would help few, if any, repower projects.  Th=
e
author has agreed to continue working with us, the environmental community
and the CEC to develop language that works for everyone.  IEP=01,s major is=
sue
at this point is that is should actually work.  The measure was double
referred to the Assembly Energy Costs and Availability Committee and will b=
e
heard there next.

-- The negotiated language on the QF issue finally has a vehicle, SB 47x
(Battin).  All stakeholders are not united in their complete support for th=
e
measure.  IEP has may need some additional changes but will be mobilizing
members on Monday to educate Senators on the bill and support the measure i=
n
the Senate Energy Committee when it is scheduled for a hearing.  Both SCE
and WSPA also have some outstanding issues, but only WSPA so far will be
opposing the bill.

-- SB 6x (Burton), which would establish and state power and financing
authority, passed off the Senate Floor 24 to 14 this week and is headed to
the Assembly Energy Costs and Availability Committee next. IEP met with
Senator Burton=01,s staff this week to talk about amendments to SB 6x relat=
ing
to limiting the Authority=01,s eminent domain powers.  Staff was open to wh=
at
we had to say but we have little confidence our recommendations will move
forward with the bill.  Regardless, IEP will continue to push for amendment=
s
on the Assembly side.

-- SB 33x (Burton), which would require the Governor=01,s plan to purchase =
the
IOU=01,s transmission to be approved first by the Legislature, is still
awaiting consideration on the Senate floor.

-- The Governor had another press conference today to provide a status on
the negotiations between the state and the three IOUs regarding the purchas=
e
of the utilities=01, transmission system.  Reuters is saying there the Gove=
rnor
has a deal with SCE to purchase its share of the power grid for $2.76
billion.  Negotiations are still going on with PG&E and SDG&E.  More
information on press conference can be found on the Governor=01,s web site.

--  Attached is the most recent legislative tracking report which includes
all the special session bills introduced through yesterday.  Please let me
know if you need copies of any of these bills.

UPCOMING EVENTS:

MONDAY, February 26th
Assembly Natural Resources Committee
1:45 pm, Room 447.
AB 34x (La Suer) =01) makes various changes to the siting process.

Assembly Energy Costs and Availability Committee
1:30 pm, Room 4202.
AB 38x (Jackson) =01) relates to loan guarantees for renewable energy joint
venture agreements.

Senate Environmental Quality Committee
1:30 pm, Room 4203.
SB 28x (Sher/Battin) =01) makes various changes to the siting process.

WEDNESDAY, February 28th
Assembly Revenue and Taxation Committee
1:30 pm, Room 126
AB 45x (Kelley) =01) expands the MIC for certain energy production.

--end--

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - 2001 Tracking Report.doc

Greetings.  If you have a minute, can you give me a call?  I'd like to get 
you up-to-date on what's going on in this crazy electricity industry.

Best,
Jeff

415.782.7822

The guy negotiating the bill on behalf of IEP told me that there's a 35-40% 
chance that it will make it out of the Senate by the end of next week, which 
means that it still has quite a ways to go.

Best,
Jeff

	Michael Etringer@ECT
	02/23/2001 04:39 PM
		 
Jeff,
Do you know how this bill is progressing.  I was on an IEP call last night 
where they seem to be rallying the troops to respond in very short order on 
this bill .   During the call they where working towards a Tuesday deadline.  
It sounded as if there would be some consideration of the bill on Tuesday?  
If you have any insight it would be greatly appreciated.

Mike

Steve C Hall
02/23/2001 10:41 AM
Mike,

Here is an article on the QF bill.

Small electric producers OK big
 price cut

 By Ed Mendel 
 STAFF WRITER 

 February 23, 2001 

 SACRAMENTO -- Legislators said yesterday that small generators who
 produce about 30 percent of the state's power have agreed to cut their power
 prices in half, an important step toward easing the electricity crisis.

 Negotiations continued on what Gov. Gray Davis has called the final step: the
 state purchase of the transmission systems of the three investor-owned 
utilities
 in exchange for paying off their huge debt.

 Meanwhile, the amount that the state is spending to buy power for the
 customers of the utilities grows. Officials gave notice that an additional 
$500
 million will be needed in 10 days, bringing the total to $2.6 billion.

 But for the first time in nearly six weeks the state did not declare an alert
 yesterday due to power shortages. More power was available from other
 states, and some power plants that had been shut down for maintenance
 resumed operation.

 Two legislators, Sen. Jim Battin, R-Palm Desert, and Assemblyman Fred
 Keeley, D-Boulder Creek, said they introduced legislation that sharply
 reduces the prices paid to small generators after weeks of difficult
 negotiations.

 "Ultimately, this bill will reduce the cost of energy to the state and its
 ratepayers by billions of dollars," said Battin, who represents eastern San
 Diego County.

 About half of the small generators use "renewable" technologies such as 
solar,
 wind, geothermal and biomass. The rest is "co-generation," when fuel is used
 for industrial purposes and electricity is generated as a by-product.

 The small generators have grown to produce nearly a third of California's
 power under a two-decade-old federal "qualifying facilities" program, which
 requires utilities to buy their power.

 Battin and Keeley said that under the bill, SB 47X, the average price for 
these
 QF contracts could drop from the current 17 cents per kilowatt-hour to about
 8 to 8.5 cents per kilowatt-hour.

 "We believe that the rates are at least that low, if not lower," said Jan
 Smutny-Jones, executive director of the Independent Energy Producers,
 which represents small and large generators.

 The small generators support the bill because it will give them a stable 
price
 for five years, avoiding ups and downs and the possibility that state 
regulators
 might make a more unfavorable price cut.

 Much of the current price formula is based on the price of natural gas at the
 California border, which has soared this winter. The legislation spreads the
 price bench mark over a five-year period.

 "We encourage the Legislature to take quick action to approve SB 47X as
 quickly as possible to help stabilize the electricity crisis," Smutny-Jones 
said.

 He said one of the side agreements to the legislation is the creation of a
 portfolio of long-term contracts to purchase natural gas for some
 co-generators, lowering their production costs.

 The legislation was applauded as "a major step forward" by a group of small
 generators who formed a creditors committee last week and threatened to
 take the utilities into bankruptcy.

 "We call on the Legislature and the governor to act on it immediately," said
 Chris Thompson, a spokesman for the group.

 Thompson said Southern California Edison continues to collect money from
 ratepayers, as the state buys power for its customers, but is not paying
 anything to the small non-polluting generators.

 A spokesman for a geothermal generator in El Centro, which filed a lawsuit
 seeking $45 million from Edison for power provided since November,
 welcomed the legislation for giving generators stability and ratepayers 
cheaper
 power.

 But Vince Signorotti, a spokesman for CalEnergy, said it would be
 "premature" to consider dropping the lawsuit.

 Battin and Keeley said that payment of the small generators depends on the
 governor's attempt to negotiate the purchase of the transmission systems of
 Edison, Pacific Gas and Electric, and San Diego Gas and Electric in exchange
 for payment of their debt.

 As part of the governor's plan, the utilities would agree to provide low-cost
 power for five to 10 years from their generators, which provide about a third
 of the state's power.

 Davis aides are attempting to negotiate long-term contracts with generators
 for the remaining third of the power required by the state, sharply reducing 
the
 cost of buying power on the expensive spot market.

 But the governor said this week that many generators are reluctant to sign
 long-term contracts until they know how the utilities will pay their debt for
 previous power purchases.

 The state called off all power alerts yesterday for the first time since
 mid-January, rescinding a Stage 1 alert declared Wednesday. Grid operators
 made the change after increased power supplies became available.

 "The supply situation this week has gradually been improving," said Lorie
 O'Donley, a spokeswoman with the California Independent System Operator,
 which manages most of the state's power supplies.

 However, she said the improvements shouldn't deter consumers from
 conservation.

 "It is good news to be out of electrical emergencies but we just want to
 remind everybody that we are looking at a long-term power supply situation
 here," she said. "And the high-demand summer is just around the corner. So
 we would ask that people continue with their conservation efforts."

 In San Francisco yesterday, state power regulators decided unanimously that
 the Department of Water Resources is responsible for buying any power that
 cash-strapped utilities are unable to generate or buy on their own -- no 
matter
 what price wholesalers are charging.

 But the PUC voted 3-2 against taking action that would have allowed the
 DWR to receive a portion of ratepayer revenues from the utilities to help
 cover the cost of buying electricity.

 The state, through the DWR, was authorized by a recent law to buy power
 for the utilities. Edison and PG&E have such low credit ratings that no power
 companies will sell to them. SDG&E's rating is much better, but its debt also
 was mounting.

 The DWR purchases that portion of electricity beyond what the utilities
 provide through their own generating plants and through existing long-term
 contracts. But the DWR has refused to buy power beyond a certain price.
 That means more last-minute power purchases on the expensive spot market.

 The utilities and the state had disagreed over how the DWR will be
 reimbursed -- whether through state bonds or ratepayer dollars -- and the
 extent of its power-buying role.

 The author of the bill authorizing the long-term contracts, Assemblyman
 Keeley, said the legislation's intent was to fully cover the one-third of the
 power that utilities purchased on the spot market, either through extended
 contracts or through the state ISO.

 Staff writer Karen Kucher and The Associated Press contributed to this
 report. 

Dude:  got your message last nite--just missed it.  called you on your cell, 
but no answer. very sorry to have missed your birthday.  glad you like the 
presents.  we'd definitely like to get together with you guys.  hope to see 
ya soon.

best,
jeff

yes, we are evil.

	Sean Maloney <skmaloney@yahoo.com>
	02/22/2001 06:43 PM
		 
Is Enron really evil?

Thanks for the kayak carrier and the CD's.  We missed you at my birthday 
bash.  I heard about the fire at the dome.  You need to build a dome on 
your property soon or else there won't be any place to stay.

Call me.  We should go to the cafe for a beer.

Sean Maloney
skmaloney@yahoo.com
415.305.5160

Greetings:
I'm going to finish this up in the next few hours and send out.  Dylan, go 
ahead and calculate using operating cash rather than income and send along 
and I'll incorporate.  I'll try to work Jimmy's stuff in a bit, too.

Best,
Jeff

	Dylan Windham <dwindham@uclink4.berkeley.edu>
	02/22/2001 11:48 PM
		 
Jeff:

I just got done ready your memo.  I really liked what you have done.  I did 
not want to make any direct changes, but rather just pose a few questions 
for discussion.

First, when I calculated how long it would take to purchase the shares 
without debt I did use the net income number.  It might be better to change 
them to the operating cash flow number.  If you guys would like, I can 
recalculate them.

I agree that having higher amounts of debt will fend off take overs.

Are we planing to calculate the amount the tax shield will increase the 
value of the company.  If we assume that the debt will be held in 
perpetuity, we can directly compute the amount.  Let me know and I can run 
the numbers.

Also, Jimmy when you do the color graphs you want to do.  Try some MM pie 
charts (just kidding)

Good job,

Let me know what I can do to help.

Dylan

Gents:
Here it is.  Please insert directly any proposed edits using 
strike-out-underline.  Need them no later than 10 AM tomorrow in order to 
have incorporated and ready to go for class tomorrow.  Dylan, just go ahead 
and put your operating cash flow nos. in (and any other changes you have) and 
send on back.  All:  recall that we are limited to 4 pages of text.

Best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/25/2001 11:57 AM
		
Greetings:
I'm going to finish this up in the next few hours and send out.  Dylan, go 
ahead and calculate using operating cash rather than income and send along 
and I'll incorporate.  I'll try to work Jimmy's stuff in a bit, too.

Best,
Jeff

	Dylan Windham <dwindham@uclink4.berkeley.edu>
	02/22/2001 11:48 PM
		 
Jeff:

I just got done ready your memo.  I really liked what you have done.  I did 
not want to make any direct changes, but rather just pose a few questions 
for discussion.

First, when I calculated how long it would take to purchase the shares 
without debt I did use the net income number.  It might be better to change 
them to the operating cash flow number.  If you guys would like, I can 
recalculate them.

I agree that having higher amounts of debt will fend off take overs.

Are we planing to calculate the amount the tax shield will increase the 
value of the company.  If we assume that the debt will be held in 
perpetuity, we can directly compute the amount.  Let me know and I can run 
the numbers.

Also, Jimmy when you do the color graphs you want to do.  Try some MM pie 
charts (just kidding)

Good job,

Let me know what I can do to help.

Dylan

Thanks so much.  Hope that all is well with you and yours.

All the best,
Jeff

Test

POWER POINTS:Calif Gov Fiddles As Summer Likely To Burn
   By Mark Golden
   A Dow Jones Newswires Column

  NEW YORK (Dow Jones)--Once there was a bride whose pianist became ill the
night before a beachfront wedding. As she frantically tried to find a new
pianist, the radio blared an alert: A 40-foot tidal wave was headed
straight
for
the beach.
  "I just will not let this pianist ruin my wedding," muttered the bride as
she
turned the radio off.
  California Gov. Gray Davis and the state Legislature have no better sense
of
priorities than the bride did. They've been obsessing over the financial
solvency of the state's utilities for three months, instead of making
progress
on the bigger problem: the huge shortage of electricity expected to hit the
state this summer. California's multibillion dollar purchase of the
utilities'
transmission lines won't add one megawatt to the supply of electricity.
  How big is the imbalance between supply and expected summer demand? The
California Energy Commission forecast two weeks ago that the
60,000-megawatt
system might just squeak by with 87 MW to spare in a bad heat wave. But
nobody
takes that forecast seriously.
  The CEC's numbers are way off base. California's electricity demand could
exceed supply by 5%, or 2,000 MW, on days with typical summer weather. That
2,000 MW shortfall will be made up by turning out the lights in 2 million
homes,
or a mix of homes, businesses and industry. A bad heat wave would get
shortages
several times that size. As the blackouts roll through parts of the state
every
weekday that temperatures are at or above normal, every business and home
will
take its turn at getting by without electricity for an hour or so. What
factory
can operate under such conditions? Will the state's elderly survive the
heat
exposure?
  The CEC put the capacity of generators in the state at about 54,000, but
it
used original capacity figures. Most of California's big power plants are
more
than 30 years old. They can't produce as much power as they once did, so
subtract about 7,000 MW from their rated capacity.
  About 15,000 MW of the state's capacity is now controlled by merchant
energy
companies Calpine (CPN), Duke Energy (DUK), Dynegy (DYN), Mirant (MIR),
Reliant
Energy (REI) and Williams Cos. (WMB). They say they already have sold much
of
the power they will generate this summer to out-of-state western utilities.
But
the CEC ignored that.
  Hydroelectric generation in the western states is expected to be just 60%
of
normal this spring and summer. Western utilities have been buying up
supplies
since last fall. California's PG&E (PCG) and Edison International (EIX)
couldn't
do that, of course, because they're nearly bankrupt.
  Nobody knows exactly how much power has already been sold out of state. A
trader at one California merchant power company estimated 5,000 MW. In a
recent
auction of transmission line use, capacity to move electricity out of
California
sold for up to 15 times the price of transmission capacity to move power
into
the state.
  The CEC ignored the sales of California power to out-of-state generators
in
its rosy summer outlook and ignored the forecast for below-normal
hydropower,
which depends on winter snowfall. The snowfall season is three-fourths over
now,
making a hydropower shortage pretty much a done deal. Yet the CEC used
normal
northwest hydropower production in its forecast. Take off another 2,000 MW.
  The commission expects 3,000 MW of generators to be off line for
unplanned
repairs when the heat wave hits. That's California's historic average. But
outages usually increase dramatically during a heat wave. Take off another
2,000
MW.
  The commission expects all 1,000 MW of Davis' recently announced peaking
generators to be on line for the summer. "No way," says the industry.
  Instead of the CEC's estimate of 61,000 MW, then, California can expect
available supply of only 44,000 MW. The state needs 51,000 MW to meet
demand
and
maintain recommended reserves in the kind of heat wave it gets, on average,
every two summers.
  People in the industry have been telling the governor for nine months
that
there's no way to raise supply to meet demand this year or next. Siting and
building power plants takes too long. Demand has to be reduced to the level
of
supply.
  The current course is to reduce demand through blackouts. Pricing offers
a
better way. If the state raised electricity rates immediately - a step no
longer
opposed even by California consumer group The Utility Reform Network -
California would stop burning through the natural gas and water reserves
needed
to keep generators running this summer.
  Davis insists on solving the crisis without a rate increase big enough to
damp
demand. Several western U.S. utilities outside California have already
imposed
such rate hikes. Davis is focused on buying power, even though California
can't
subsidize consumption of artificially cheap power much longer. The
Department of
Water Resources is signing 10-year power supply contracts at hefty prices
that
fully reflect today's supply-demand imbalance.
  Instead, he should be addressing the imbalance, which must be dealt with
sooner (by prices) or later (by blackouts). Raise California rates
significantly
now. Cut demand, and the wholesale price for electricity comes crashing
down.
Then sign long-term contracts at the lower rates.
  Davis is committing California's citizens and businesses to 10 years of
overpriced electricity. After that, he says, he will try to reduce demand.
His
streak of bad decisions in this crisis continues unbroken.
  -By Mark Golden, Dow Jones Newswires; 201-938-4604;
mark.golden@dowjones.com

  (END) Dow Jones Newswires 23-02-01
  1944GMT(AP-DJ-02-23-01 1944GMT)

In all week, save Wednesday for AB1890 meeting in Sacramento.

FYI.

Best,
Jeff
	Tom Riley/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange
	Sent by: Michele Curtis/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange
	02/23/2001 08:12 PM
		 
Attorney/Client Privileged Information

Summary of our follow-on discussion with UC/CSU Friday afternoon (Tom/Dennis 
from Enron):
1.  UC/CSU's goal is to reach agreement on the interim solution by the end of 
next week (Friday, 3/2)
2.  UC/CSU would like draft language memorializing the structure contemplated 
below by COB Monday, 2/26, and asked what our proposed form of agreement 
would be (letter agreement, amendment).  Their preference is the first and 
expressed concern that if the draft had too many legal terms and/or was too 
one-sided, that it would be unrealistic to expect approval by Friday.  I have 
since spoken to Mike and I will propose to UC/CSU that we get them a term 
sheet on Monday for discussion, with the intent of wrapping the terms into a 
letter agreement of a couple pages.
3.  UC/CSU is considering underwriting the risk they would be absorbing 
through the interim agreement.
4.  It is both our expectations that during the interim period we would gain 
some clarity on the legislative/regulatory landscape such that we could begin 
working on a long-term solution.
5.  If we don't reach a long-term solution, we would flip back to the terms 
of the existing contract, and are back to the existing issues.  
6.  We reinforced the highly confidential nature of these discussions.
Commercial terms
? Intent is to offer an intermediate solution to mediate UC/CSU's concern of 
potential long-term consequences (loss of direct access rights preventing 
them from gaining financial benefits) due to status as a bundled utility 
customer.  Want time for landscape to solidify so we can agree on a long term 
solution that would retain them as a direct access customer or a synthetic 
version of that (i.e., they still receive the benefits).
? Enron would re-DASR accounts, assuming the following:
? UC/CSU assume liabilities from February 1, 2001 through end of term of 
interim agreement, resulting from that action.
? Term to be 90 days, with the option to extend upon the mutual agreement of 
both parties.
? Calculation methodology of the liability:  Spot market price minus the 
prevailing bundled utility rate plus load shaping costs (Dennis - please 
provide the methodology.  Also, what about A/R risk, treatment of 
surcharges?).
? Exposure is calculated ex-post (i.e., we will not agree to an amount, 
capped or fixed, at the outset).  They want an estimation of the potential 
exposure, so we need to make sure we have proper protection that does not 
bind us to that estimation. (Alternatively, we can provide them this 
estimation outside the agreement, with the same caveats).
? Agree during interim period to work together (good faith effort) to 
mitigate the exposure of the liability.
? UC/CSU assumes risk that should we be barred from re-de-DASRing at the end 
of the term (due to legislative, regulatory or other actions or 
circumstances), UC/CSU would assume this exposure as well.  They countered 
with a suggestion for our consideration that such an occurrence be treated as 
a force majure event with the affect of terminating the contract.  (This 
seems counter-intuitive to me to their desire to remain a direct access 
customer - see concern below).
? This was not discussed, but term should include a provision for 
confidentiality.
Concern:
It is somewhat disconcerting they have asked for and are considering this 
proposal.  They are absorbing our risk, which we shared to be a very large 
number ($100M+ over the remaining contract term).  They also did not want to 
discuss their regulatory concerns, and enter into a discussion with Dasovich 
regarding these.  These points lead me to believe that perhaps they know 
something we don't.  Just a consideration for our call Saturday.
Tom 

We had a cordial and outside the box discussion with UC/CSU today.

On the call, UC/CSU expressed a concern that in light of the uncertain and 
rapidly evolving regulatory and legislative landscape, they do not feel it to 
be prudent for them to consider our long-term proposed solutions.  They were 
intrigued by our offers and we will take them up at a later date.  In the 
meantime, they are proposing we price a short term deal.  This will buy them 
re-DASR status until the end of the current uncertain situation.

Proposed Structure:

Enron to temporarily Re-DASR UC/CSU accounts.  UC/CSU liable for any 
additional costs incurred by Enron as a result of that action.  Such costs 
may include, but not be limited to the following: account receivable risks, 
difference between spot market price and utility bundled rate, exposure to 
changes in calculation of PX credit applicable to direct access providers (as 
compared to spot market purchase price), load shaping costs to follow 
customer hourly load without availability of the PX.

Assumptions:

? Enron has sole option to return accounts to De-DASR status at end of term.
? UC/CSU assumes risk should this action be blocked by law, regulation, or 
3rd party action.
? Enron retains right in contract to choose source of electricity supply for 
duration of existing contract term.
? Enron will work with UC/CSU to mitigate liability exposure (i.e., consider 
entering into purchase agreement with utilities, etc.).

Potential liability during term (notional):  $_____ (60 day term);   $____(90 
day term)

Potential liability at end of term if Enron is unable to return accounts to 
utility supply status at end of term due to potential legislative, 
regulatory, or other action or circumstance (notional):   $_____ (assuming 60 
day term);   $____(assuming 90 day term)

It is envisioned that during this short term period that the regulatory and 
legislative landscape will become clearer, allowing both parties to better 
understand their exposure through the term of the contract and beyond.  Once 
this clarity is achieved, it is agreed both parties will meet to discuss long 
term solutions meeting the needs of both parties.

Please comment with concerns, ideas immediately as we will be back on the 
phone with them shortly.

Thank you.

Tom

haven't heard.  i'll check in today.

	Elizabeth Linnell
	02/26/2001 08:13 AM
		 
Jeff - Any luck with your contact on getting the transcripts and tapes of the 
Skilling/Hogan testimony?

We should cast a little broader net on this internally--Yoder, Calger, 
Belden, Foster, Sanders, etc.--but seems that, given the Governor's actions 
as of late, the likelihood of nonpayment might even be a bit higher than 25%.

Best,
Jeff

	Harry Kingerski
	02/25/2001 08:54 PM
		 
ok swammies -

I told Neil I'd gather some input -  my assessment is 25% probability that 
payment is not received within one year; probability is nil that it won't be 
received at all.  Your thoughts?
	Neil Bresnan@EES
	02/23/2001 05:45 PM
		 
Michael,

With the dissolution of the PX we are exploring various markets in an attempt 
to shape our load and minimise our credit exposure to counterparts such as 
the ISO.  We are continuing to work with EPMI to manage the risk associated 
with selling any volume into the Cal ISO. Currently we are purchasing power 
on a daily basis from the market to meet the highest common on and off peak 
hour.  This strategy leaves us long for all the other hours but reduces our 
exposure to ISO penalties for under scheduling . Our most promising options 
are to sell the excess shoulder power into the PX imbalance market or OTC 
hour ahead. We are concerned about any receivable from the ISO and would like 
to know what you think the probability is of non-payment. If we do receive 
payment over what time period can we expect to receive it.

NFB 

Greetings:
Best info to date on TX deal is today's Wall Street Journal.

Best,
Jeff

RE:  the tx buyout announced on Friday.  the best info available is the story 
in today's WSJ.  that help?

Best,
Jeff

OK, here's what I propose.  Dylan:  Galant and much appreciated effort to 
quantify the value of the tax shield.  However, my day's completely out of 
control and resolving now may be more than we can manage.  I propose that I 
simply delete the one sentence quantifying the value of the shield and leave 
it as a qualitative statement.  If you folks would like to mess with with it 
some more, that's great with me, it's just that--and I apologize--I just 
won't be able to work on it today.  If you decide to do some more with it, go 
ahead and please bring copies to class.  Otherwise, I'll just delete the 
sentence referenced above, print out, and bring to class.  Just let me know.

And Dylan, from someone whose surname gets butchered all the time, my 
apologies for having done the same to yours in the memo.

Best,
Jeff

This case is killing me!  1) I had to get before 10 AM today.  2) So much for 
that leisurely 2-hour coffee and morning paper at the neighborhood cafe---not 
today, thank you!  3) My nap!  Fahgetaboutit.  

I'm going to be a wreck tonite.

Best,
Jeff

Cameron:  Thanks for a dee-licious dinner.  (I did steal a couple pieces of 
duck---curiosity killed the cat---and it was dee-lectible.)  

Couple things:  Very, very nice to go through all that to get reservations at 
La Folie and I of course love the place, but I was thinking that maybe we 
ought to go somewhere that's a tad less expensive.  I'm thinking that Sean 
ain't even a big food person, that he's not working, that Molly to bring down 
a king's ransom in her biz, and Tom and Karen are, after all, vegetarians.  
Anywho,  it's really kind of you guys to want to go there, but I'm just 
throwing out the notion that maybe we should go to another place that's just 
a wee bit less dear.  Maybe that other French place that's just one room that 
we went to out in the Avenues.  Just a thought.  Whatever you guys want to do 
is fine with me.

Also, I'm happy to do a "whole family" thing----well, maybe "happy's to 
strong" (we kid!).  I was actually trying to pull it together last Xmas, but 
found out that my sister and her hubbie only do their big xmas party once a 
year, so had to scratch it.  I ain't necessarily all that keen, though, on 
having all get together--particularly for the first time--with the focus 
being my birthday.  So maybe we can have another event sometime soon where we 
can bring the thundering hoards together at one place----Lord help us.

Finally, what's the plan for your dad?  I just found out that I'm supposed to 
be in Houston for an "all hands" meeting on--you guessed it--March 9th, but 
if there's something planned for that evening, I intend to tell my buddies at 
Enron that I can't make the meeting.  Please let me know so that I can cancel 
Houston in advance.

Finally, and MOST important.  Today is the Man in Black's birthday.  God 
bless the real king, Johnny Cash.

Best,
Jeff

When you moving to S.F.?  You excited about the change?  What will you be 
focused on?  Congratulations.  Sounds like a great opportunity.

ON THE GRID OR OFF THE GRID
Bigger Is Better
An interstate electricity highway could leverage economies of scale to keep 
the lights on Burton A. Weisbrod, Glen E. Weisbrod
Sunday,?February 25, 2001 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle 
URL: 
http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/chronicle/archive/2001/02/25/S
C177059.DTL 
WE COULD HAVE left it to the states. When the Interstate Highway System was 
proposed nearly 50 years ago, we could have said, "Leave it to each state to 
decide on its roads and to pay for them, or leave it to private enterprise to 
build toll roads wherever it is profitable." Fortunately, we didn't. 
Today, vehicles can travel throughout the country on a system of integrated 
high-capacity roads that crisscross the nation. There are many differences 
between the flow of cars or trucks and the flow of electricity. But just as 
the Interstate Highway System ushered in a new era of easier movement of 
people and goods across the states, allowing enormous economic and social 
gains, so, too, do we now need to overcome the obstacles to the easy flow of 
power across state lines. 
Many forces are at work contributing to California's electricity crises, and 
power shortages in other parts of the country also are quite possible. The 
growth of population and industry in California has expanded demand for 
electricity. Legislative constraints, reflecting environmental protection and 
other concerns, have discouraged construction of electricity-generating 
plants. 
Periodic shutdowns of generation plants for maintenance have caused short- 
term power shortages. And, in an oddity of California law, the prices that 
power producers can charge distributors are deregulated, while the prices 
that those distributors can charge consumers are regulated and restricted. 
But largely missing from the debate of what can be done to balance supply and 
demand is discussion of an effective national power grid that would permit 
substantial amounts of electricity to flow, as highway traffic does, from one 
state to another. 
Interstate transmission connections do exist now, but are limited in 
capacity. They were primarily designed to meet temporary needs associated 
with local power emergencies, not for sustained use. If those interstate 
lines were upgraded to greater capacity, then we could move toward actually 
creating a national power grid. 
An effective national power grid could result in far more competition among 
producers of electric power across the nation, and far more options to meet 
demand in any local area. No state or region would need to depend simply on a 
small number of generating producers within its borders, and the increased 
number of interstate competitors would bring greater assurance of supply and 
lower prices. 
The underlying problem is basically one of incentives. With the maze of 
state, and federal regulations on the production, distribution and pricing of 
electricity, there is great risk and little incentive for private 
construction of costly transmission lines that cross multiple state borders. 
Imagine a power plant in state A, but near state B, with that plant 
occasionally having excess production capacity. There is no market for the 
power in state B, but there is demand for it in state C, which is adjacent to 
it. In a smoothly functioning, efficient, power transmission system, power 
would move from the generating plant in state A, across the border for use in 
state B, thereby permitting deals so that power produced in that area could 
be sent to state C. Through such a domino-like process, power available in 
one region effectively can help alleviate a shortage in another area - with 
only a series of relatively short-distance transmissions. 
Development of such an integrated electricity transmission network is what 
the federal government can and should foster. It would strengthen the nation; 
it would expand options for users; it would increase competition among 
suppliers, to the benefit of consumers; it would overcome the multiplicity of 
state regulations that have the effect of restricting incentives for 
profitable interstate power transmission. 
The Interstate Highway System did not solve all the problems of the nation's 
escalating population of cars, and it was not cheap. But, designed to 
maximize interconnections between metropolitan areas, with ample systemwide 
capacity to spare, it did transform the country, binding the 48 contiguous 
states into an integrated whole. 
The effect: reduced costs and increased "exports" of California fruits and 
vegetables to the Midwest, and reduced costs, along with increased exports of 
Midwest manufactured products to the West. 
Just as it does not make sense for every state to act like a separate 
country, building roads just for its own residents, or growing all of its own 
food supply, it is equally inefficient for each state to independently 
develop its own power supply. It is foolish to find electricity producers in 
one state claiming that they should not "help out" consumers in another 
state. 
A nationwide system would take better advantage of differential electricity 
demand in various parts of the country, seasonally and even in the course of 
a day. 
To consumers and industrial users in California, the effects of a national 
electricity transmission grid would be real and enduring, but not 
spectacular. It would, however, go far to achieving the quiet result that 
every consumer seeks - lower prices, more reliable electric power supplies. 
There is no single solution to California's energy crisis, but developing a 
national interstate electricity highway system would go far toward addressing 
it. Local power distribution within a state would remain a matter of state 
control. The federal government's role would be largely to provide financial 
incentives for constructing additional interstate transmission capacity, and 
to establish standards for its design and utilization - just as is the case 
with the Interstate Highway System. 
A survey of history and government professors conducted by the Brookings 
Institution last year identified the Interstate Highway System as one of the 
Top Seven governmental achievements of the last 50 years - along with 
rebuilding Europe after World War II and expanding the right to vote. An 
interstate electricity highway system could well be among the top 
achievements of government in the next half-century. 
MACRO POWER TRANSMISSION
WE HAVE AN ELECTRIC power crisis in California. In fact, we have two 
problems: a short-term problem and a long-term problem. 
Short term, the problem, from the consumer perspective, is: 
-- Soaring electricity bills. 
-- Fear of paying the mounting debts being incurred by electricity 
distributors such as Pacific Gas and Electric Co. either in rate increases or 
higher taxes. 
-- The threat, and to some users the reality, of no lights, no refrigeration, 
no heat. 
These concerns are real and severe. But they are merely symptoms of a serious 
long-term crisis: Incentives to the power industry are wrong! 
As Adam Smith reminded us over two centuries ago, we do not look to the good 
intentions of sellers to get them to serve the public interest; we look to 
their self interest. Then, as today, wise public policy calls for aligning 
the two, by providing incentives for the development of an electricity system 
that provides power that is dependable, is produced efficiently and is 
distributed competitively, so that prices are low. 
This long-term problem will not be solved by the series of Band-Aids that 
governmental officials and power producers and distributors are skirmishing 
over. Now is the time to develop a long-term plan. 
Two elements of a long-term plan for efficient and reliable electricity are 
clear: 
-- Electricity self-sufficiency for each state is bad policy. It is easy to 
think that dependency on power imports from other states is a root problem. 
It is not. Trade and competition mean access to more producers, and that can 
bring efficiency in electricity no less than in food, electronics or autos, 
as low-cost sources are utilized. (Promoting more interstate options does not 
preclude building more local generation, and small, "micro" electricity 
generating units do have a role as part of an overall electricity policy. 
However, the advantage of their flexibility must be balanced against their 
generally higher cost for meeting predictable long-term demand.) 
-- Incentives are needed to encourage investment in electricity transmission. 
It does no good to have low-cost power production unless the power can reach 
users. This is why the federal government has such an important role to play 
in financially encouraging and supporting a national interstate power highway 
system. 
--Burton A. Weisbrod and Glen E. Weisbrod 
Burton Weisbrod is John Evans Professor of Economics and Fellow, Institute 
for Policy Research, Northwestern University, and a former senior staff 
economist on the Council of Economic Advisers to Presidents Kennedy and 
Johnson. Glen Weisbrod, his son, is president of Economic Development 
Research Group Inc. in Boston. 
Burton Weisbrod is John Evans Professor of Economics and Fellow, Institute 
for Policy Research, Northwestern University, and a former senior staff 
economist on the Council of Economic Advisers to Presidents Kennedy and 
Johnson. Glen Weisbrod, his son, is 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle ? Page?WB1 

Governor Calls for 10% Cut In Usage
On national TV, Davis increases goal on energy 
Tanya Schevitz, Chronicle Staff Writer
Monday,?February 26, 2001 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle 
URL: 
http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/chronicle/archive/2001/02/26/M
N44189.DTL 
Signaling a greater urgency in California's power crisis, Gov. Gray Davis 
said yesterday that keeping the lights and air conditioners running this 
summer will require every Californian to reduce electricity usage by about 10 
percent. 
In addition, he said, the state must get more electrical power online by 
then. 
His call for a 10 percent cut is a significant jump from the 7 percent he was 
asking for during his State of the State speech last month, and it may be a 
difficult stretch for consumers. Davis made his remarks on NBC's news show 
"Meet the Press." 
State Sen. Don Perata, D-Oakland, praised the governor's statement on 
national television. 
"The most important thing right now is that the governor said that, because 
there has been general skepticism statewide, reflected both in anecdotes and 
public opinion polls, that we are in fact facing a crisis," Perata said. "If 
you don't believe, you won't conform, you won't respond." 
But, he said, Davis will not get the conservation he wants unless consumers 
are given financial incentives. Perata said he will propose legislation today 
to give $1 billion to customers who cut down on their electricity use during 
the summer months. 
Severin Borenstein, director of the Energy Institute at the University of 
California at Berkeley, said if temperatures soar this summer, it will take a 
"huge effort" to keep the state at safe electricity levels. 
NEED FOR CONSERVATION
"We are in big trouble," Borenstein said. "That doesn't mean we can't avoid 
blackouts -- that means we will have to take serious measures." 
The needed steps include instituting variable prices for commercial and 
industrial users that reflect the supply and demand at any given hour and 
hooking up air conditioners to cycling systems, he said. For residential 
users, 
he said, it will mean increases for use above a certain level. 
Forecasters predict a shortfall of at least 5,000 megawatts this summer, but 
the state got some good news Thursday when the California Independent System 
Operator, which coordinates the flow of electricity through the state's power 
grid, removed all power alerts for the first time in more than a month. 
Lorie O'Donley, a spokeswoman for the California ISO, said that she does not 
expect any changes today but that it is too early to make any predictions 
about the summer power situation. 
"We still need to check the snowpack and the hills and the hydro situation in 
the state," O'Donley said. "Conservation is a big part of it, and whatever 
people can do to step up their conservation efforts will be a huge factor in 
avoiding blackouts." 
GOVERNOR DODGES BLAME
Davis appeared on "Meet the Press" while visiting Washington, D.C., for a 
meeting of the National Governors Association and a concurrent meeting of the 
Democratic Governors Association, which he chairs. With him on the program 
were Sen. John Kerry, D-Mass., Sen. Pete Domenici, R-N.M., and Republican 
Gov. Mike Huckabee of Arkansas. 
Davis took the opportunity of the high-profile television show to tell East 
Coast decisionmakers and Wall Street analysts that the blame for the state's 
energy crisis does not lie with him and to reassure them that he is taking 
solid steps to resolve the problem. 
"Both President Bush and I inherited California, a flawed deregulation 
system," he said during the broadcast. "Secondly, no major plant has been 
built in California prior to my governorship for 12 years." 
He outlined some solutions, including the approval of nine new power plants, 
with six under construction and three expected to be online this summer, and 
14 more in the pipeline. 
In a slip of the tongue, Davis said on yesterday morning's broadcast that 
consumers would need to cut electricity use to only 10 percent of last year. 
"It will require every Californian using about 10 percent of the electricity 
than they did the year before and a little luck in getting some extra 
megawatts on line this summer," Davis said. 
What he meant, a spokesman said, was they had to cut use by 10 percent. 
Still, that will require significant sacrifice. 
In addition, Davis has said that he wants to add 5,000 megawatts of power -- 
enough for 5 million homes -- by summer. He has promised to speed up the 
approval process and provide bonuses to builders who finish before July. 
The state also established an $800 million conservation program this year. 
But Borenstein said that many of the ideas floating around for spending the 
conservation money are for efforts that would not help for about another 
three years. 
ON NATIONAL MATTERS
During yesterday's show, Davis also weighed in on President Bush's tax-cut 
proposal and former President Bill Clinton's controversial last-minute 
pardons. 
The administration should wait for a tax cut until the money is available, he 
said. 
"All of us who have been in government for a while have seen the roller- 
coaster ride of surpluses and then shortages and surpluses and shortages," he 
said. "Clearly, people need tax relief, but it should be moderated to the 
point where we don't kill the golden goose, which is a strong, growing 
economy. " 
Although he received a significant campaign donation from the father of 
Carlos Vignali, the Los Angeles drug kingpin, Davis told show host Tim 
Russert that he never spoke with the family about the presidential pardon 
Vignali received on Clinton's last day in office. 
Davis said he did not have enough information to know whether the pardon was 
a mistake, but, he said, "there's something about them in general that 
doesn't ring right." 
"However," he said, "people expect us to focus on things that matter to them, 
and they really want to see progress on education, the environment, tax 
relief, health care." 
Asked by Russert whether he is going to run for president in 2004, Davis did 
not rule it out but said that only re-election to the governorship in 2002 is 
on his horizon. 
"I'm focused on keeping the lights on and making our schools better," he 
said. 
E-mail Tanya Schevitz at tschevitz@sfchronicle.com. 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle ? Page?A1 

FYI.  Per our call today, some press from Saturday referencing PG&E's 
opposition to having Comrade Davis buy its Tx assets.

Power-Lines Deal
Davis, Edison come to terms but PG&E remains a balky holdout 
Lynda Gledhill, Chronicle Sacramento Bureau
Saturday,?February 24, 2001 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle 
URL: 
http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/chronicle/archive/2001/02/24/M
N184206.DTL 
Gov. Gray Davis said yesterday he had reached an agreement with Southern 
California Edison to put the state's financially ailing utilities back on 
their feet - but Pacific Gas and Electric Co., crucial to any deal, remained 
a holdout. 
The key to the deal is state purchase of utility transmission lines, which 
would help the companies pay off debt they piled up selling electricity for 
less than it cost them. Edison will part with its lines for $2.76 billion, 
Davis said. 
But PG&E is reluctant to sell, and the governor said no deal will work 
without PG&E. 
In addition to agreeing to sell its transmission lines, Edison said it would 
produce inexpensive power to sell to the state for the next 10 years. 
At a news conference in Los Angeles, Davis said the agreement in principle 
with Edison "provides value to both sides. The utility gets the financial 
wherewithal to go back into business and keep our lights on. We get 
commensurate value in specific benefits, which provide us long-term power at 
very cheap rates." 
Davis' framework for righting California's wobbly energy market, however, 
hinges on a similar agreement with PG&E. Those familiar with the talks 
involving the utility, based in San Francisco, said discussions are moving 
"very, very slowly." 
"They are adamantly resistant to selling their transmission facilities," said 
Assemblyman Fred Keeley, D-Boulder Creek. 
Ron Low, a spokesman for PG&E, did not comment on Keeley's statement, but 
after talks concluded Thursday, Low said the two sides were "very far apart" 
on some issues. 
In a statement yesterday, PG&E Corporate Chairman Robert Glynn said the 
"discussions were an important milestone in the resolution of California's 
energy crisis." 
"Each utility's issues and opportunities in this crisis are different, and we 
believe that PG&E has proposed a detailed solution that balances ratepayer 
and shareholder interests," Glynn said. "We are confident that continued 
discussions can achieve a resolution for our company." 
Davis said he made "good" progress with Sempra Energy, the parent company of 
San Diego Gas & Electric, but only "some" progress with PG&E. 
Davis ruled out a deal that does not include PG&E. 
"I don't believe we can make a satisfactory arrangement without acquiring 60 
percent of the transmission lines. That, in turn, requires us to have an 
arrangement with PG&E," he said. The other 40 percent of the grid is owned by 
municipal utilities. 
Keeley said Davis is right to insist that PG&E be part of any deal. 
"I think the deal announced is a good first step, and will hopefully put 
pressure on the other companies," Keeley said. 
CRITICS CALL DEAL BAILOUT
The purchase price set for Edison's transmission lines is 2.3 times the 
system's book value. Although critics argue that represents a bailout, 
supporters of the plan say the lines are worth far more than book value. 
For example, the cost to replace all the utilities' transmission lines -- a 
figure that probably would come into play during a possible bankruptcy -- is 
estimated at $20 billion. If the state pays 2.3 times the book value for all 
three utilities' systems, it will pay $7.2 billion total. 
The agreement with Edison follows a framework Davis announced last week. In 
exchange for the purchase of the lines, Edison also agreed to return $420 
million that the utility had sent to its parent company, establish 
conservation easements on 20,000 acres of watershed for 99 years and drop all 
litigation against the state demanding the ability to immediately raise 
rates. 
Edison also agreed to continue to sell the power it produces to the state at 
cost for another 10 years. 
Edison said it still believed that it would have won its lawsuit to recover 
costs through a rate increase. But Edison International Chairman John Bryson 
said, "This agreement is far preferable to perhaps years of protracted 
litigation." 
NO RATE INCREASE
Davis continued to insist that the deal would not require a rate increase, 
although he has indicated that the rate increase adopted by the state Public 
Utilities Commission last month -- which was supposed to last 90 days -- 
would stay in place. 
Davis has been under pressure to meet deadlines he has imposed himself for 
making progress in the energy crisis, which he said were designed to reassure 
Wall Street. However, he also had a personal stake in making yesterday's 
announcement, as he left immediately for a five-day trip to the East Coast. 
Davis will spend four days at the National Governors Association in 
Washington, D.C., and a concurrent meeting of the Democratic Governors 
Association, which he chairs. 
Much of his time will be spent reassuring his fellow governors that the 
crisis is under control, as well as meeting with President Bush and Energy 
Secretary Spencer Abraham. 
DAVIS ON 'MEET THE PRESS'
Davis also will use the time to make national media appearances, including 
one on "Meet the Press" tomorrow. Garry South, Davis' political strategist, 
said the appearances will allow Davis to address some East Coast media 
accounts of the energy crisis. 
"A lot of misconceptions and myths have crept in," South said. "It's not 
helpful to California; it's not accurate on how the crisis came about and how 
we're trying to solve it." 
After he leaves Washington, Davis will spend a day in New York to meet with 
Wall Street analysts. Yesterday, he suggested that he would be asking for 
their support in California's quest for revenue bonds to help pay for power 
purchases. 
California will have spent $2.8 billion on power by next month, and its 
credit ratings have been downgraded by some analysts. 
Consumer advocates reacted with skepticism to Davis' tentative deal with 
Edison. 
Nettie Hoge, executive director of TURN, The Utility Reform Network, said she 
was displeased with the governor's plan because it commits ratepayers to 
paying off an unidentified portion of utility debt. 
"Nothing says what the final price tag is," she said. 
Dealing for Power 
-- Power lines: The state would buy Southern California Edison's transmission 
lines for about $2.7 billion, 2.3 times their estimated book value, to help 
bail out the financially strapped utility. 
-- Helping out: Edison parent Edison International would pay the utility 
about $420 million. 
-- Payback: Edison would drop its lawsuit seeking higher electricity rates 
and would to continue to sell the state cheap power for another 10 years. 
-- The other shoe: ''Some progress'' reported in talks over a similar deal 
with PG&E, which is reluctant to sell its lines. 
Source: Associated Press 
Other Developments 
ENERGY FORECAST
California enjoyed its second straight day without a power alert. Lori 
O'Donley, spokeswoman for the California Independent System Operator said 
continued warm weather around the West and completion of maintenance on some 
power plants that had been out of operation kept the state above the percent 
reserve mark. O'Donley said the state should remain out of the danger zone 
during the weekend. 
MORE MEGAWATTS COMING
Mirant Corp., announced that it signed a contract to provide 750 megawatts of 
power to the state during the month of March. "We became more confident in 
our ability to enter such a contract after we received full payment from the 
Department of Water Resources for a bill due Feb. 20," said Randy Harrison, 
executive director of the company's western operations. 
INDEPENDENT SYSTEM OPERATOR SETTLEMENT
Three generators reached a settlement with the California Independent System 
Operator to continue to supply emergency power to California until March 18 
even though it is unclear who will pay for much of that power. 
Reliant Energy Inc., Williams Cos. and Dynegy Inc. signed an agreement that 
effectively extended a U.S. District Court judge's temporary restraining 
order that had required the generators to supply power to the power grid 
operators. 
In the meantime, the three generators, along with Duke Energy Corp. and 
Mirant Corp., have asked the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission for an 
emergency order forcing the Independent System Operator to provide a 
creditworthy buyer for their power. 
The federal commission on Feb. 14 told the system operator that it could not 
force generators to take on "unacceptable financial risks" by selling without 
a reasonable expectation of being paid. 
CONSERVATION REWARD
State Sen. Don Perata, D-Oakland, said he will propose legislation to give $1 
billion to customers who conserve on their electricity bills during the 
summer months. Perata claims that his bill, which would pay consumers a $10 
refund for every megawatt hour saved, would reduce the amount of money that 
the state would have to spend buying power on the expensive spot market. 
Source: Chronicle staff report 
Chronicle staff writer Patrick Hoge contributed to this report. / E-mail 
Lynda Gledhill at lgledhill@sfchronicle.com. 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle ? Page?A1 

Sending again.  Prentice said that she didn't get it, so just wanted to make 
sure that it wasn't lost in cyberspace somewhere.

Jeff
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/26/2001 12:42 PM
		 
Cameron:  Thanks for a dee-licious dinner.  (I did steal a couple pieces of 
duck---curiosity killed the cat---and it was dee-lectible.)  

Couple things:  Very, very nice to go through all that to get reservations at 
La Folie and I of course love the place, but I was thinking that maybe we 
ought to go somewhere that's a tad less expensive.  I'm thinking that Sean 
ain't even a big food person, that he's not working, that Molly to bring down 
a king's ransom in her biz, and Tom and Karen are, after all, vegetarians.  
Anywho,  it's really kind of you guys to want to go there, but I'm just 
throwing out the notion that maybe we should go to another place that's just 
a wee bit less dear.  Maybe that other French place that's just one room that 
we went to out in the Avenues.  Just a thought.  Whatever you guys want to do 
is fine with me.

Also, I'm happy to do a "whole family" thing----well, maybe "happy's to 
strong" (we kid!).  I was actually trying to pull it together last Xmas, but 
found out that my sister and her hubbie only do their big xmas party once a 
year, so had to scratch it.  I ain't necessarily all that keen, though, on 
having all get together--particularly for the first time--with the focus 
being my birthday.  So maybe we can have another event sometime soon where we 
can bring the thundering hoards together at one place----Lord help us.

Finally, what's the plan for your dad?  I just found out that I'm supposed to 
be in Houston for an "all hands" meeting on--you guessed it--March 9th, but 
if there's something planned for that evening, I intend to tell my buddies at 
Enron that I can't make the meeting.  Please let me know so that I can cancel 
Houston in advance.

Finally, and MOST important.  Today is the Man in Black's birthday.  God 
bless the real king, Johnny Cash.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks very much.  Very interesting.  We'll be a lot more aligned once 
they've paid us...

Best,
Jeff

I'm getting him deck railing, a new pump, a new fire place, new skylights, a 
new roof, and a new car.

	"Scott Laughlin" <scottwl@hotmail.com>
	02/26/2001 04:39 PM
		 
Even if my diet consisted solely of rare African roots, I'd still go to La 
Folie for your 40th. I understand that you don't want to make people do what 
they don't really want to do, but this is also about you, the celebration of 
the 40th year of your life, etc. Fuck everyone else. Anyway, from what I've 
heard, everyone's cool with Folie. After all, the wine ain't half bad. But, 
I'll be leaving all this up to the Lone Mountain Sisters (and not their 
current bluegrass boyfriends).

I'm happy to hear it's the man in black's b-day. Hopefully he'll stay around 
for many more.

LATE!

PS I meant to ask last night: what the hell are we getting Eldon for his 
birthday?

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

Greetings:

Please review the attached.  It's a summary I've put together of a very=20
lengthy analysis MRW did for us over the weekend.  I've also attached the=
=20
considerably lengthier MRW memo for those who'd like to see it.  The tables=
=20
included in the summary are pulled directly from the MRW memo.  The analysi=
s=20
only addresses the utilities undercollection (i.e., solvency) and doesn't=
=20
address any additional increases that might result from DWR's buying=20
activities.

The Bottom Line
=06=15 By raising average rates 10% over a 10-year period, California could=
 1)=20
return the utilities to solvency, and 2) help close the  supply-demand gap =
by=20
providing customers with better price signals.
=06=15 California could achieve these goals under this new rate structure a=
nd at=20
the same time exclude one-third of residential  customers from any increase=
s.=20
If California chose not to exclude any customers from the new rate structur=
e,=20
California  would only need to raise average rates by about 8.8%.
=06=15 This level of increase is in line with increases enacted in other st=
ates=20
(e.g., Washington: 28-34%; Montana: 4.5-32%; Idaho:  6.0-24%; Nevada:=20
7-12.5%; New Mexico 12%).

We'll need to look at it critically and try to shoot holes in it before goi=
ng=20
public with the numbers as part of our broader effort, but it offers a=20
reasonable benchmark against which to judge alternatives (like spending the=
=20
kids lunch money on crumbling, broken down transmission systems).

Please provide feedback as soon as possible, and perhaps, Paul we conclude=
=20
the MRW work on the agenda for discussion on tomorrow's daily conference ca=
ll.

Best,
Jeff

 - Undercollection assessment final.doc

Agree.  Sounds like a very reasonable way to proceed, and consistent with 
what we've said all along, non?  Thanks, Harry.  Jeanne, while your at it, 
could you get us a new Governor?  Thanks so much.

Best,
Jeff

	Harry Kingerski
	02/26/2001 04:59 PM
		
Jeanne - you shouldn't compromise Enron's prior statements on ending the rate 
freeze.  The most important thing is that we not get a retroactive end of the 
rate freeze (retroactive to any time before the date of the order).  We may 
also accomplish this through legislation.

Regarding the book vs. market valuation, it is less important that we argue 
for market or book than it is we should clarify for the commission how and 
why it should be consistent with the new legislation.  If new legislation 
occurs and means that utility generation will be priced at cost for 10 years, 
then everyone needs to realize that is a fundamentally different construct.  
DA Customers are not getting the value of these plants through the valuation 
process so they must have access to that value through the access to retained 
generation approach. If cost based rates are not legislated, market valuation 
shoud proceed.  What we don't want is for them to legislate cost-based rates 
and then forget about the value being stripped from DA.

Also, seems like it could be a good thing to point out that if they do 
declare an end to the rate freeze, if it is effective before new replacement 
legislation is enacted, they've only created another quagmire.   I'll call to 
discuss.

	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	02/26/2001 10:32 AM
		 
Despite the fact that the hearings will probably continue into Wednesday of
this week, the briefs in Phase I of the Rate Stabilization Proceeding are
still due this Friday the 2nd.  One of the issues before the  ALJ is the use
of interim versus final market valuation to end the rate freeze.  I am very
hesitant to say that the rate freeze cannot end on the basis of a Commission
approved interim valuation as Enron has, in previous proceedings, taken the
position that it can.  Please let me know right away if you feel different
about this.  Along these same lines, the issue of the value of the assets is
somewhat at play (at least on an interim basis).  Do we want to take a
position that the assets need to be market valued (rather than book) thus
increasing the rate base for the purpose of cost of service regulation which
the assets are now under? Increased generation rate would mean an increased
DA credit. However, it may also hurt our claim that we should get a piece of
the retained generation.  Again let me know as soon as possible about your
position. 

Jeanne Bennett        

Please don't be insulted, but this will provide a useful tool internally.  
Thanks again for a great job.

Best,
Jeff

Hey, how's things? Long time not chat.  What's up?  Anywho, you seem like the 
right person to respond to this email.  (And I have no idea.)

Best,
Jeff
	Catherine McKalip-Thompson@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	02/26/2001 09:14 PM
		 
Jeff,
I'd meant to stop in your office today to ask you about this in person, but 
you seemed rather busy whenever I went by.  Now I'll be out for awhile so am 
sending you this note instead.

I got a call from KKSF who is putting on an Earth Day Jazz concert at the 
Chronicle (Concord) Pavillion on 4/29 asking if we are interested in 
sponsoring the vent, expected to draw 20,000 Northern Calif consumers with a 
high income/education demographic.  In addition to signage, display 
opportunities, etc. there is the opportunity for a feature story on CNET 
Radio for promotion of companies' involvement in the community (energy 
efficiency, quality of life whatever).
Previous sponsors of interst are PG&E, Green Mountain, and the Renewable 
Energy Marketing Board.

My question for you is whether Enron would be interested in the opportunity 
for positive PR here in CA, or whether we are trying to keep a low profile.  
Is an opportunity like this something any part of Enron (EES included) would 
be interested in?

Thanks for advising.
Catherine

Catherine McKalip-Thompson
Manager, Environmental Responsibility
Enron Corp.
101 California Street, Suite 1950
San Francisco, CA 94111
Tel: 415.782.7842
Fax: 415.782.7854

FYI.
	Jacqlynn Wu <jwu@apx.com>
	02/26/2001 09:38 PM
		 
Please see attachement.  Thank you.

Jacqlynn Wu
5201 Great America Parkway, Suite 522
Santa Clara, CA 95054
408 517 2161

 - Congestion Management Offer_2-26-01.doc

Glad to hear it went well.  Debra never called.

gramlr@pjm.com on 08/29/2000 11:38:33 AM
Not at all, keep pushing for stellar.  That's what everyone wants.

Things went very well in Portland.  Belden, Kaufman, and Steffes seem very
interested and positive.  It is kind of a culture shock to see young people 
like
Belden carrying so much weight.  Its a refreshing change from most utilities 
and
govt agencies where age seems to be a prerequisite for responsibility, and
reminds me of when your former boss Gigi Coe said to me that the CPUC couldn't
hire more young people because of age discrimination issues (if that's not a
perverse result of a well-meaning policy...).

Whatever happened to Debra Stump, do you know?  She was the GSPP class of 2000
that we had exchanged some messages about last spring.
Rob

Hi Dana:

Please accept my apologies for not having responded sooner.  Things, as you 
know, are, well, a little nuts.  It was great to meet you and I would be 
happy to discuss opportunities.  I need to be in S.D. in the next few weeks.  
Perhaps we could have lunch, or something, and you could fill me in on what 
you folks do.

Best,
Jeff

	Dana Perino <dana@gablegroup.com>
	09/14/2000 06:40 PM
		 
Hi, Jeff --

It was great to meet you this week while you were in San Diego for the
hearings.  Cathy Van Way and I had a blast catching up on old times and
trying to think of every pun possible that led directly back to electricity.

I know Enron has extensive communications support, but in the future if you
have need on a project or public relations campaign, I hope you'll keep me
in mind.  Although it took me a while to understand the difference between
a megawatt and a megaphone before Rep. Schaefer introduced the first bill,
once I finally "got it" I developed an ability to help the media understand
the issue -- so that misinformation, as experienced in San Diego -- can be
avoided.   I've also maintained excellent contacts with the media covering
electricity and can help with corporate pr as well as issue communications.

As you're well aware, the light won't go out on this issue for a long time
(pun practice).

Best regards,

Dana

Dana Perino
dana@gablegroup.com
619-234-1300 ext. 238

FYI.  Chris:  Any progress with Freeman on creditworthiness issues?

Best,
Jeff
	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	02/27/2001 10:04 AM
		 
On Friday (February 23rd), Commissioner Bilas issued an alternate decision
to the February 20th draft ALJ decision on interim implementation of the
California Procurement Adjustment.    Basically what the Bilas alternate
does is give DWR certain assurances, without any money right now.  It
provides Commission recognition that the purchases made by DWR are not
subject to Commission reasonableness review and that once DWR has provided
the Commission with its needed revenue requirement that the Commission must
pass it through to ratepayers.  What it does not do is implement a CPA
mechanism.  The Bilas draft recognizes that the matter is being dressed
through the process established by ALJ Deulloa and a decision on it should
be rendered by the end of March. The Bilas draft also states that the
Commission "shall stay action on implementation of suspension of direct
access under water code section 80110 until further order."

Greetings Sally:
My name is Jeff Dasovich.  The Greens have been helping me develop 40 acres
of land that I bought just north of Anchor Bay (a couple of miles up the
hill from Highway One, about 1200 ft or so up) and they suggested that I
contact you.

The property is right in the heart of the Banana Belt and my property faces
south, is protected, and a such is very hot and sunny from late spring
through later summer/early fall.  The property has an abundance of water on
it.  Of course, the possibility of evening fog raises some tricky issues,
and I haven't done soil tests.  In short, while I think there are some
challenges, I'm convinced that there is at least the strong possibility
that I could grow grapes--around 10 acres or so.

I'm sure that you're extremely busy, but I'd be very interested in talking

Best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/27/2001 11:14 AM
		 
Greetings Sally:
My name is Jeff Dasovich.  The Greens have been helping me develop 40 acres
of land that I bought just north of Anchor Bay (a couple of miles up the
hill from Highway One, about 1200 ft or so up) and they suggested that I
contact you.

The property is right in the heart of the Banana Belt and my property faces
south, is protected, and a such is very hot and sunny from late spring
through later summer/early fall.  The property has an abundance of water on
it.  Of course, the possibility of evening fog raises some tricky issues,
and I haven't done soil tests.  In short, while I think there are some
challenges, I'm convinced that there is at least the strong possibility
that I could grow grapes--around 10 acres or so.

I'm sure that you're extremely busy, but I'd be very interested in talking

Best,
Jeff

Thanks, Jeanne:

Couple of thoughts.

1) If California wants to get out of this crisis, it's critical that DWR be 
creditworthy.  Bilas' proposal helps in that regard.  We've been thinking 
pretty hard about the issue and working with DWR to try to fix 
creditworthiness concerns.  Christian, it might make sense to put together 
some comments supporting Bilas' approach and perhaps give him some additional 
recommendations about what the PUC needs to do to get DWR creditworthy? If 
so, (see note below), we have an opportunity to provide those comments to the 
PUC by this Friday.

2) Scott Govenar--on the direct access piece.  Seems like it would be very 
useful to get the DA coalition we're working with in Sacramento to jointly 
file some comments on Friday in response to the Bilas proposal supporting a 
ban on any PUC action on the DA prohibition since the Legislature is still 
working on it.  What are your thoughts?  And if you and the rest of the 
Sacramento team agree, can we work with Jeanne to get some (brief) language 
put together and work to get the rest of the coalition to sign on.  
Alternatively, we could work to get the other folks file individually.  Your 
thoughts on both approaches is appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	02/27/2001 10:04 AM
		 
On Friday (February 23rd), Commissioner Bilas issued an alternate decision
to the February 20th draft ALJ decision on interim implementation of the
California Procurement Adjustment.    Basically what the Bilas alternate
does is give DWR certain assurances, without any money right now.  It
provides Commission recognition that the purchases made by DWR are not
subject to Commission reasonableness review and that once DWR has provided
the Commission with its needed revenue requirement that the Commission must
pass it through to ratepayers.  What it does not do is implement a CPA
mechanism.  The Bilas draft recognizes that the matter is being dressed
through the process established by ALJ Deulloa and a decision on it should
be rendered by the end of March. The Bilas draft also states that the
Commission "shall stay action on implementation of suspension of direct
access under water code section 80110 until further order."

If we want to comment on the Bilas draft, they are due on Friday the 2nd.  I
think Bilas' approach makes sense.  Adoption of the ALJ draft decision would
mean the implementation of an interim CPA mechanism for a few weeks, to
potentially be replaced by another interim mechanism at the end of March, to
ultimately be replaced by a final CPA mechanism.

As for the Bilas language on direct access -- while it is good, I think we
were successful in removing the direct access suspension language from the
ALJ's Draft Decision (it was removed in the version released on the morning
of the last commission meeting), so I think we have that point covered
regardless of which order gets voted out.

I will fax a copy of the draft to Harry and Sue (I don't have an e-mail
version). Let me know if you feel we should comment.

Jeanne Bennett        

  

got sent back the first time.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/27/2001 11:47 AM
		
Thanks, Jeanne:

Couple of thoughts.

1) If California wants to get out of this crisis, it's critical that DWR be 
creditworthy.  Bilas' proposal helps in that regard.  We've been thinking 
pretty hard about the issue and working with DWR to try to fix 
creditworthiness concerns.  Christian, it might make sense to put together 
some comments supporting Bilas' approach and perhaps give him some additional 
recommendations about what the PUC needs to do to get DWR creditworthy? If 
so, (see note below), we have an opportunity to provide those comments to the 
PUC by this Friday.

2) Scott Govenar--on the direct access piece.  Seems like it would be very 
useful to get the DA coalition we're working with in Sacramento to jointly 
file some comments on Friday in response to the Bilas proposal supporting a 
ban on any PUC action on the DA prohibition since the Legislature is still 
working on it.  What are your thoughts?  And if you and the rest of the 
Sacramento team agree, can we work with Jeanne to get some (brief) language 
put together and work to get the rest of the coalition to sign on.  
Alternatively, we could work to get the other folks file individually.  Your 
thoughts on both approaches is appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

	JMB <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	02/27/2001 10:04 AM
		 
On Friday (February 23rd), Commissioner Bilas issued an alternate decision
to the February 20th draft ALJ decision on interim implementation of the
California Procurement Adjustment.    Basically what the Bilas alternate
does is give DWR certain assurances, without any money right now.  It
provides Commission recognition that the purchases made by DWR are not
subject to Commission reasonableness review and that once DWR has provided
the Commission with its needed revenue requirement that the Commission must
pass it through to ratepayers.  What it does not do is implement a CPA
mechanism.  The Bilas draft recognizes that the matter is being dressed
through the process established by ALJ Deulloa and a decision on it should
be rendered by the end of March. The Bilas draft also states that the
Commission "shall stay action on implementation of suspension of direct
access under water code section 80110 until further order."

If we want to comment on the Bilas draft, they are due on Friday the 2nd.  I
think Bilas' approach makes sense.  Adoption of the ALJ draft decision would
mean the implementation of an interim CPA mechanism for a few weeks, to
potentially be replaced by another interim mechanism at the end of March, to
ultimately be replaced by a final CPA mechanism.

As for the Bilas language on direct access -- while it is good, I think we
were successful in removing the direct access suspension language from the
ALJ's Draft Decision (it was removed in the version released on the morning
of the last commission meeting), so I think we have that point covered
regardless of which order gets voted out.

I will fax a copy of the draft to Harry and Sue (I don't have an e-mail
version). Let me know if you feel we should comment.

Jeanne Bennett        

  

I'll forward this along.  Thanks.

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/27/2001 10:56 AM
		 
Jeff,

In light of our conversation about ongoing DA sales, the Theater Owners
Association of California would like to talk to someone at Enron about
DA contracts.  The contact is Milton Moritz (President) at (310)
657-7724 or (310) 652-1093, and his conversation with me should be
referenced as I know him personally.

Speak to you soon.

Scott

FYI.  Not sure 1) who the right person is to forward this along to, or 2) if 
it's something that folks want to follow up on.  Anyway, here's the 
dope---Scott is an Enron outside lobbyist located in Sacramento.

Best,
Jeff
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/27/2001 10:56 AM
		 
Jeff,

In light of our conversation about ongoing DA sales, the Theater Owners
Association of California would like to talk to someone at Enron about
DA contracts.  The contact is Milton Moritz (President) at (310)
657-7724 or (310) 652-1093, and his conversation with me should be
referenced as I know him personally.

Speak to you soon.

Scott

Have these letters been sent?  If so, Linda, would it be possible to have 
overnighted to me "official versions" of the letters?  Greatly appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks a million, buddy.  Very useful.

Thanks.  What's your fax number?  I'll get a copy of the Bilas alternate 
decision to you as soon as I can.

Best,
Jeff

	Christian Yoder@ECT
	02/27/2001 01:17 PM
		
Jeff, 
I will work with Pat Boylston to get some comments.  We should, as you say, 
push this along if we can. ----cgy

Well, looks like it's that time again.  There only 2 questions.  Howzabout if 
the S.F. contingent takes #1 and the East Bay Gang takes #2 and we distribute 
around over the weekend?  Thoughts?

Dude:

Could you please fax to me ASAP a copy of the Bilas alternative 
(415.782.7854)?  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

Pact With PG&E Eluding Governor 
Power: Davis says obstacles include a debt that is double Edison's. Others 
cite an aggressive corporate culture as an impediment to state purchase of 
grid. 
By DAN MORAIN, NANCY RIVERA BROOKS, Times Staff Writers

?????WASHINGTON--As he attempts to finalize a settlement with Southern 
California Edison, Gov. Gray Davis said Monday that his effort to rescue a 
more recalcitrant Pacific Gas & Electric has been short-circuited by issues 
far more difficult than those raised by the state's other two ailing 
utilities. 
?????PG&E's debt could be as much as $8 billion, Davis indicated--twice the 
red ink of Edison, which Friday reached a preliminary agreement to sell its 
transmission lines to the state for $2.76 billion to pay off some of its 
staggering debt. Davis acknowledged that the Edison deal would mean nothing 
unless he was able to reach a twin pact with PG&E. 
?????Seasoned utility watchers see PG&E's stubborn negotiating posture as 
partly a bargaining ploy and partly the result of underlying business issues 
at the San Francisco company. 
?????Some cite a more aggressive corporate culture at PG&E than at Edison 
that has left PG&E alone on a precarious pinnacle, with bankruptcy on one 
side and partial dismembering by the state on the other. 
?????Brian Youngberg, senior utility analyst with the Edward Jones investment 
firm in St. Louis, said PG&E "has historically pushed the envelope more in 
certain situations and that probably reflects their corporate culture. 
They're just sticking to their guns." 
?????While Edison appears to have rejected bankruptcy law protection as an 
option, PG&E has not. 
?????Although Davis did not specify the size of PG&E's debt, he said it is 
"more than twice the size of Southern California Edison's." As part of the 
deal between Davis and Edison, both sides agreed that the utility's debt is 
about $4 billion, sources close to the talks have said. 
?????"We are making progress" with PG&E, said Davis, attending the annual 
National Governors Assn. conference in Washington, D.C. "I want people to 
understand it is a far more complicated transaction. . . . It is just going 
to take a little longer." 
?????Officials at PG&E and its parent, PG&E Corp., declined to publicly 
discuss the company's stance, citing the sensitivity of the negotiations. 
Company spokesman Ron Low said only that "we expect to meet again this week. 
There was no time or date set yet." 
?????San Francisco lawyer Michael Kahn, one of Davis' energy advisors, said 
the parties "had contact over the weekend" but he declined to elaborate. 
?????"We in the governor's office would very much like to reach arrangements 
with them and don't want to say anything in public that spoils the 
negotiations," he said. 
?????PG&E's hard-nosed bargaining stance is no surprise to Wall Street 
analysts and consumer advocates who have watched the utility's aggressive 
moves to shed its hydroelectric system, now blocked by state law, and to 
recoup past electricity and other costs. 
?????"It could be a negotiating tactic," said Lori Woodland, an analyst with 
Fitch Inc., the credit-rating firm that was the first to drop PG&E and 
Edison's debt to junk bond status. 
?????"PG&E has the largest piece of the pie" in terms of uncollected 
electricity costs, Woodland said. "It could also be just the thought of 
having to sacrifice their assets to pay for what ended up being flawed public 
policy." 
?????Consumer advocate Michael Shames contends that PG&E might believe that a 
bankruptcy judge would allow the utility to sell some assets and restructure 
its debt in ways that would be preferable to anything the state is offering. 
?????"On the other hand, if Edison and [San Diego Gas & Electric] do sign on, 
then PG&E almost has to or risk the wrath of the governor and the Public 
Utilities Commission for the next seven years," said Shames, executive 
director of the Utility Consumers' Action Network in San Diego. 
?????Edison is more comfortable in the role of regulated utility than is 
PG&E, said Mike Florio, a lawyer with the Utility Reform Network in San 
Francisco. 
?????"PG&E really seems to hate PUC regulation and wants to get as far away 
from it as it can, even if it means taking the company into the tank," said 
Florio, who is on the governing board of the California Independent System 
Operator, which runs the transmission grid owned by the three utilities. 
?????The utilities have amassed more than $12 billion in debt as they paid 
record sums for wholesale power last year, but were barred by state 
regulators from passing those costs on to California consumers of 
electricity. 
?????The level of debt is a fundamental part of the negotiations between the 
Davis administration and the three private utilities. At least part of that 
debt ultimately will be passed on to consumers. While Davis says he opposes 
rate hikes, his plan would restructure the rate system by propping up rates 
in the coming years, even as electricity costs may fall. 
?????Davis on Friday announced the outlines of an accord in which the state 
would buy Edison's share of the transmission grid for $2.76 billion. He said 
he hopes to make the deal final by week's end with Edison and Sempra, the 
parent company of San Diego Gas & Electric. 
?????Davis, meanwhile, is scheduled to meet today with U.S. Energy Secretary 
Spencer Abraham to outline his plan to take over the transmission grid. The 
Federal Energy Regulatory Commission must approve the state takeover of the 
grid, and FERC Chairman Kurt Hebert has been quoted recently as being 
skeptical of the plan. 
?????"Some people in Washington see this as more of an ideological 
statement," Davis said. "As a governor, I see it as a practical solution. . . 
. Clearly, we have to persuade lots of people in Washington that what we're 
doing is the right thing." 
?????Davis expressed optimism that the Bush administration would approve the 
transfer. Davis and other governors attending the conference met with the 
president for about 45 minutes at the White House on Monday. 
?????In his opening remarks, Bush repeated his desire to give the states more 
authority, saying "real change comes from the states up." 
?????Davis noted that he and other Western governors are hoping for federal 
aid to overhaul the transmission and distribution systems for electricity and 
natural gas system. 
?????"If we're going to have a strong economy," Davis said, "we have to have 
the electricity to power it." 
?????Davis, chairman of the Democratic Governors Assn., was scheduled to 
attend a $5.5-million fund-raiser Monday night for the Democratic governors 
in Washington. He will then leave for New York, where he will hold personal 
fund-raisers and confer with Wall Street analysts Wednesday about the state's 
energy situation. 
?????Meanwhile, Duke Energy North America on Monday suspended a lawsuit it 
had filed against Davis. The company said it reached an "interim settlement" 
to sell power to the state at the same below-market prices that it originally 
had agreed to supply to Edison and PG&E under long-term contracts. 
?????Duke sued the governor after he used emergency authority to seize the 
Duke contracts and similar contracts signed by other energy companies with 
the two utilities. Davis' action prevented the Power Exchange, the state's 
now defunct electricity market, from liquidating the contracts after Edison 
and PG&E defaulted on multimillion-dollar payments. 
?????The agreement reached Monday between Duke and the state expires April 
30, a Duke spokesman said, which should give the parties enough time to reach 
a more formal settlement. 
?????Power Exchange officials, however, are pressing ahead with their 
$1-billion claim against the state. Under California law, the state must pay 
reasonable value for private property seized under the governor's emergency 
authority. 
* * *
?????Morain reported from Washington, Rivera Brooks from Los Angeles. Times 
staff writers Tim Reiterman in San Francisco and Nancy Vogel in Sacramento 
contributed to this story. Copyright 2001 Los Angeles Times 

?
?? 
?

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	02/27/2001 02:15 PM
		 
Pact With PG&E Eluding Governor 
Power: Davis says obstacles include a debt that is double Edison's. Others 
cite an aggressive corporate culture as an impediment to state purchase of 
grid. 
By DAN MORAIN, NANCY RIVERA BROOKS, Times Staff Writers

?????WASHINGTON--As he attempts to finalize a settlement with Southern 
California Edison, Gov. Gray Davis said Monday that his effort to rescue a 
more recalcitrant Pacific Gas & Electric has been short-circuited by issues 
far more difficult than those raised by the state's other two ailing 
utilities. 
?????PG&E's debt could be as much as $8 billion, Davis indicated--twice the 
red ink of Edison, which Friday reached a preliminary agreement to sell its 
transmission lines to the state for $2.76 billion to pay off some of its 
staggering debt. Davis acknowledged that the Edison deal would mean nothing 
unless he was able to reach a twin pact with PG&E. 
?????Seasoned utility watchers see PG&E's stubborn negotiating posture as 
partly a bargaining ploy and partly the result of underlying business issues 
at the San Francisco company. 
?????Some cite a more aggressive corporate culture at PG&E than at Edison 
that has left PG&E alone on a precarious pinnacle, with bankruptcy on one 
side and partial dismembering by the state on the other. 
?????Brian Youngberg, senior utility analyst with the Edward Jones investment 
firm in St. Louis, said PG&E "has historically pushed the envelope more in 
certain situations and that probably reflects their corporate culture. 
They're just sticking to their guns." 
?????While Edison appears to have rejected bankruptcy law protection as an 
option, PG&E has not. 
?????Although Davis did not specify the size of PG&E's debt, he said it is 
"more than twice the size of Southern California Edison's." As part of the 
deal between Davis and Edison, both sides agreed that the utility's debt is 
about $4 billion, sources close to the talks have said. 
?????"We are making progress" with PG&E, said Davis, attending the annual 
National Governors Assn. conference in Washington, D.C. "I want people to 
understand it is a far more complicated transaction. . . . It is just going 
to take a little longer." 
?????Officials at PG&E and its parent, PG&E Corp., declined to publicly 
discuss the company's stance, citing the sensitivity of the negotiations. 
Company spokesman Ron Low said only that "we expect to meet again this week. 
There was no time or date set yet." 
?????San Francisco lawyer Michael Kahn, one of Davis' energy advisors, said 
the parties "had contact over the weekend" but he declined to elaborate. 
?????"We in the governor's office would very much like to reach arrangements 
with them and don't want to say anything in public that spoils the 
negotiations," he said. 
?????PG&E's hard-nosed bargaining stance is no surprise to Wall Street 
analysts and consumer advocates who have watched the utility's aggressive 
moves to shed its hydroelectric system, now blocked by state law, and to 
recoup past electricity and other costs. 
?????"It could be a negotiating tactic," said Lori Woodland, an analyst with 
Fitch Inc., the credit-rating firm that was the first to drop PG&E and 
Edison's debt to junk bond status. 
?????"PG&E has the largest piece of the pie" in terms of uncollected 
electricity costs, Woodland said. "It could also be just the thought of 
having to sacrifice their assets to pay for what ended up being flawed public 
policy." 
?????Consumer advocate Michael Shames contends that PG&E might believe that a 
bankruptcy judge would allow the utility to sell some assets and restructure 
its debt in ways that would be preferable to anything the state is offering. 
?????"On the other hand, if Edison and [San Diego Gas & Electric] do sign on, 
then PG&E almost has to or risk the wrath of the governor and the Public 
Utilities Commission for the next seven years," said Shames, executive 
director of the Utility Consumers' Action Network in San Diego. 
?????Edison is more comfortable in the role of regulated utility than is 
PG&E, said Mike Florio, a lawyer with the Utility Reform Network in San 
Francisco. 
?????"PG&E really seems to hate PUC regulation and wants to get as far away 
from it as it can, even if it means taking the company into the tank," said 
Florio, who is on the governing board of the California Independent System 
Operator, which runs the transmission grid owned by the three utilities. 
?????The utilities have amassed more than $12 billion in debt as they paid 
record sums for wholesale power last year, but were barred by state 
regulators from passing those costs on to California consumers of 
electricity. 
?????The level of debt is a fundamental part of the negotiations between the 
Davis administration and the three private utilities. At least part of that 
debt ultimately will be passed on to consumers. While Davis says he opposes 
rate hikes, his plan would restructure the rate system by propping up rates 
in the coming years, even as electricity costs may fall. 
?????Davis on Friday announced the outlines of an accord in which the state 
would buy Edison's share of the transmission grid for $2.76 billion. He said 
he hopes to make the deal final by week's end with Edison and Sempra, the 
parent company of San Diego Gas & Electric. 
?????Davis, meanwhile, is scheduled to meet today with U.S. Energy Secretary 
Spencer Abraham to outline his plan to take over the transmission grid. The 
Federal Energy Regulatory Commission must approve the state takeover of the 
grid, and FERC Chairman Kurt Hebert has been quoted recently as being 
skeptical of the plan. 
?????"Some people in Washington see this as more of an ideological 
statement," Davis said. "As a governor, I see it as a practical solution. . . 
. Clearly, we have to persuade lots of people in Washington that what we're 
doing is the right thing." 
?????Davis expressed optimism that the Bush administration would approve the 
transfer. Davis and other governors attending the conference met with the 
president for about 45 minutes at the White House on Monday. 
?????In his opening remarks, Bush repeated his desire to give the states more 
authority, saying "real change comes from the states up." 
?????Davis noted that he and other Western governors are hoping for federal 
aid to overhaul the transmission and distribution systems for electricity and 
natural gas system. 
?????"If we're going to have a strong economy," Davis said, "we have to have 
the electricity to power it." 
?????Davis, chairman of the Democratic Governors Assn., was scheduled to 
attend a $5.5-million fund-raiser Monday night for the Democratic governors 
in Washington. He will then leave for New York, where he will hold personal 
fund-raisers and confer with Wall Street analysts Wednesday about the state's 
energy situation. 
?????Meanwhile, Duke Energy North America on Monday suspended a lawsuit it 
had filed against Davis. The company said it reached an "interim settlement" 
to sell power to the state at the same below-market prices that it originally 
had agreed to supply to Edison and PG&E under long-term contracts. 
?????Duke sued the governor after he used emergency authority to seize the 
Duke contracts and similar contracts signed by other energy companies with 
the two utilities. Davis' action prevented the Power Exchange, the state's 
now defunct electricity market, from liquidating the contracts after Edison 
and PG&E defaulted on multimillion-dollar payments. 
?????The agreement reached Monday between Duke and the state expires April 
30, a Duke spokesman said, which should give the parties enough time to reach 
a more formal settlement. 
?????Power Exchange officials, however, are pressing ahead with their 
$1-billion claim against the state. Under California law, the state must pay 
reasonable value for private property seized under the governor's emergency 
authority. 
* * *
?????Morain reported from Washington, Rivera Brooks from Los Angeles. Times 
staff writers Tim Reiterman in San Francisco and Nancy Vogel in Sacramento 
contributed to this story. Copyright 2001 Los Angeles Times 

?
?? 
?

Just faxed it to you.

Greetings Catherine and Roger:

A PUC staffer has called our outside lawyer saying that a high school in 
Ontario, CA called to complain that we're turning back the school for credit 
issues.  The staffer says that "a hospital might also be involved."   Can you 
provide any more information?  The PUC staffer does not seem to have much 
information, but has nonetheless seems inclined to write us a letter asking 
us to explain.

Sort of ironic:  PUC Commissioner Woods states that his goal is to drive all 
ESPs from the state, the Legislature passes and the Governor signs a bill 
prohibiting Direct Access, and now the PUC is concerned that California might 
actually be succeeding in its efforts to kill choice.  (The PUC is 
particularly concerned since they recently passed an order prohibiting gas 
customers from returning to the LDC---ironic indeed)

Any information that you folks can provide as soon as possible would be 
greatly appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks, Mike.  Given time constraints, might be more efficient if we agree 
internally prior to sending out to the coalition.  Could folks please provide 
any comments to Mike Day pronto so that Scott Govenar can start immediately 
to get the DA coalition on board?  Scott, could you hold off until Mike gets 
and incorporates any internal comments?  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

	MDay <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	02/27/2001 03:24 PM
		 
 <<BILASALT.DOC>>

Here is the draft letter for the direct access coalition to send to Bilas on
Friday.  It must be made into a formal letter with a service certificate.
So... Scott can you distribute it to the full direct access coalition and
ask them to directly reply to me if they want to be added to the letter we
send or do they want to send their own comments?  We would like a response
by Thursday noon.

Comments by Enron personnel can be sent to me directly as well.

Thanks, Mike Day

 - BILASALT.DOC

Thanks, Catherine.  We've had a conversation with the PUC staffer and she's 
pretty ill-informed.  We told her that we need specific details.  I'll get 
back to you just as soon as (and if) I get them.

Best,
Jeff

	Catherine Woods@EES
	02/27/2001 03:30 PM
		
Jeff,

Do you have any specific information on this customer (school name, address, 
telephone number, etc...) in order to identify the customer?  We did a very 
basic search in our operational data bases under a school in Ontario, CA and 
no school was found. 

Thanks!
Catherine

Greetings Catherine and Roger:

A PUC staffer has called our outside lawyer saying that a high school in 
Ontario, CA called to complain that we're turning back the school for credit 
issues.  The staffer says that "a hospital might also be involved."   Can you 
provide any more information?  The PUC staffer does not seem to have much 
information, but has nonetheless seems inclined to write us a letter asking 
us to explain.

Sort of ironic:  PUC Commissioner Woods states that his goal is to drive all 
ESPs from the state, the Legislature passes and the Governor signs a bill 
prohibiting Direct Access, and now the PUC is concerned that California might 
actually be succeeding in its efforts to kill choice.  (The PUC is 
particularly concerned since they recently passed an order prohibiting gas 
customers from returning to the LDC---ironic indeed)

Any information that you folks can provide as soon as possible would be 
greatly appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

Catherine/Roger:

Here are some more details forwarded by our outside counsel.

Best,
Jeff
	MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	02/27/2001 05:25 PM
		 
Jeff:

Here is some more useful information.  Sarita Sarvate of the CPUC spoke to
the woman in person.  The school in question is the Providence High School
in Burbank, California (not Ontario), operated by the Sisters of Providence.
Ms. Kathy Pentalio (sp?) at 818-846-8140 wrote to the CPUC asking about the
school's options after receiving phone and letter notification that their
gas service would be terminated by Enron.  Apparently the Sisters also
operate a hospital which is also served by Enron.  Ms. Pentalio indicated
that she was told that the school would no longer be served on the same
contract as the hospital (claimed to be an attractive 86 cents/th rate)
because the school's load was so small that it was a core customer, while
the hospital was a noncore customer with a larger load.   Neither Ms.
Sarvate nor Ms. Pentalio was clear if the school was served as a core
aggregation customer or as part of the Sisters of Providence noncore
contract.  Ms. Pentalio claimed she spoke with Enron employees Dennis Harris
in Dublin, Ohio as well as Roger Pons in New Mexico.  She indicated that
service would be terminated on June 1, 2001 and she is looking for
alternative sources of gas.

Sarita Sarvate of the CPUC Energy Division would like to understand the
specifics of this case, but her main concern, and the purpose for sending a
letter (if she does send one) is that Dynergy has told her that a number of
small noncore businesses are being returned to the utilities by marketers
because they no longer meet credit requirements.  She assumed that must be
true with Enron as well.  I indicated to her that she should never assume
that we are doing what Dynegy is doing and that we would respond and advise
her if there was any significant trend of noncore customer turnbacks.  The
Commission's concern, which I know you understand, is that it is phasing out
the core subscription schedule (and has a moratorium on switches to the
SoCalGas core subscription schedule) therefore leaving no place for such
customers to go if they cannot contract with a replacement aggregator.

Please advise me of what you discover about this matter and we can talk
further about a response to the CPUC.   Thank you.

Mike Day

	Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
	02/27/2001 04:30 PM
		 
Mirant Agrees to Move 1,000 Megawatts in Power Contracts to California DWR

PR Newswire
02/27/01, 5:17p
(Copyright , 2001, PR Newswire)

SACRAMENTO, Calif., Feb. 27 /PRNewswire/ -- Mirant Corp. (NYSE: MIR) today
announced an agreement to shift 1,000 megawatts in power contracts from the
California Power Exchange to the state's Department of Water Resources
(DWR), which is acting as the state's electricity buyer.

"In our continuing effort to cooperate with the State of California, the
California DWR has been named as the third-party holder of these contracts,"
said Randy Harrison, chief executive officer of Mirant's western U.S.
operations. "This places the contracts directly in the hands of a
creditworthy entity."

The contracts vary in term length from a month to 10 months. The state of
California took control of the contracts after the California Power Exchange
ceased doing business.

Mirant, which operates California power plants in San Francisco, Antioch and
Pittsburg, last week agreed to provide 750 megawatts of electric generation
capacity to DWR during March.

Formerly known as Southern Energy, Mirant is a global competitive energy
company with leading energy marketing and risk-management expertise. With an
integrated business model, Mirant develops, constructs, owns and operates
power plants and sells wholesale electricity, gas and other energy-related
commodity products. The company has extensive operations in North America,
Europe and Asia. Mirant owns or controls more than 20,000 megawatts of
electric generating capacity around the world, including more than 14,000
megawatts in the United States, with another 9,000 megawatts under advanced
development. Mirant is 80 percent owned by Southern Company (NYSE: SO)

SOURCE Mirant Corp.

/CONTACT: media, Chuck Griffin, 678-579-7814, or investors, John Robinson,
678-579-7782, both of Mirant Corp./

/Web site: http://www.mirant.com /

Fitch Views SCE Transmission Sale Favorably

Business Wire
02/27/01, 2:00p
(Copyright , 2001, Business Wire)

NEW YORK--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Feb. 27, 2001--Fitch views Southern California
Edison's (SCE) tentative agreement to sell its transmission assets as a
favorable step to avoid bankruptcy.

Fitch maintains its Rating Watch Evolving status for SCE's securities.

Under an agreement announced by the Governor of California, the state plans
to purchase SCE's transmission lines for $2.76 billion. Gains from the sale
are expected to reduce debt incurred for power procurement costs that have
exceeded retail rates.

At 2.3 times (x) their book value, the purchase price is a healthy multiple
on assets that earn a small percentage of total utility revenues. SCE's
remaining assets are low variable cost generation (primarily hydro and
nuclear, with some coal-fired), and its large distribution infrastructure.

As of Jan. 31, 2001, SCE had incurred approximately $5.5 billion of
undercollections. Under its first mortgage indenture, SCE's transmission
assets may be released from the mortgage without paying secured bondholders
if at least 150% asset coverage of outstanding secured debt exists. SCE has
approximately $9 billion of additional unbonded utility property, which
provides more than enough collateral to permit the transmission asset sale
under the indenture.

Proceeds from the transmission asset sale, however, are insufficient to
recoup all of SCE's previously incurred undercollections and meet financial
obligations. SCE owes approximately $614 million in unpaid principal and
interest on its bonds and commercial paper.

Through Feb. 5, 2001, SCE deferred payments aggregating $743 million due to
the PX, ISO and QFs. Through Feb. 28, 2001, an additional $733 million will
become due to these providers. Another $78 million is due to energy service
providers through Feb. 15, 2001. The utility's bank groups have agreed to
forbear taking action under their credit agreements until March 14.

The utility will need to consider action before cure periods under certain
unpaid bonds expire within the month. SCE has accumulated $1.4 billion in
cash as of Feb. 5, which could be applied to make critical payments and
prevent acceleration. SCE has paid interest on certain bonds before their
cure periods expired.

In addition, the utility will need to address its existing agreements with
qualifying facility (QF) power producers. Many of these agreements have a
variable cost component tied to natural gas prices, which currently exceed
retail rates. As the state of California and its investor-owned utilities
work to reform the power market, some restructuring of these contracts
remains a possibility.

The transmission proposal will require the approval of the Federal Energy
Regulatory Energy Commission (FERC) and the California legislature. FERC
approval could require many months to occur. Similar transactions may need
to be executed with California's other investor-owned utilities, San Diego
Gas and Electric Company, and Pacific Gas and Electric Company to assure
passage of legislation.

Any legislation to restructure California's power market also risks voter
initiatives overturning these actions at a later date.

Asset sale proceeds will almost halve the amount of previously incurred
excess power costs, plus EIX plans to infuse $420 million into SCE as part
of the overall agreement. Based on legislation passed earlier this month,
the California Department of Water Resources (CDWR) has now assumed future
power purchase obligations until 2003.

To recoup the remaining amount of uncollected costs, the tentative agreement
includes a dedicated rate component permitting securitization at the utility
company level.

If an agreement is reached and approved by all parties, SCE will likely
assume a somewhat different profile. Its generation is moving to a cost of
service basis, which yields a regulated rate of return. SCE currently has an
11.6% authorized rate of return. Combined with the state owning the
transmission infrastructure, SCE would become a more stable, less
growth-oriented investment.

Headquartered in Rosemead, Calif., SCE is a wholly-owned subsidiary of
Edison International (EIX). Serving 4.3 million customers, SCE's peak demand
was 19,757 mw as of Sept. 30, 2000. The utility owns 10,430 mw of
generation.

Fitch currently rates these SCE securities:

    -- First Mortgage Bonds `B-`;
    -- Senior Unsecured Debt `CC';
    -- Preferred Stock/QUIDS `C';
    -- Commercial Paper `D';
    -- Rating Watch Evolving.
Prominent Tech Business Leaders Call for National Energy Reliability
Initiative

Business Wire
02/27/01, 11:20a
(Copyright , 2001, Business Wire)

DANBURY, Conn.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Feb. 27, 2001--

   Congress & Bush Administration Are Urged To Support Research For
     New Technologies In Electricity Generation and Distribution

Leading energy associations and Fortune 500 companies have delivered a
letter to Capitol Hill appropriations committees proposing that the U.S.
Department of Energy create a $320 million National Energy Reliability
Initiative for the 2002 fiscal year, specifically focused on the energy
needs of the high-tech industry. The more than 20 prominent businesses and
trade groups that signed the letter are urging U.S. House and Senate
leaders, as well as the Bush Administration, to establish the federal
initiative as a channel for public-private research in new energy
technologies, including distributed generation and end-use improvements.

The proposed National Energy Reliability Initiative program budget, along
with a letter addressed to Energy Secretary Spencer Abraham, can be viewed
at http://www.hi-availability.com/news.htm.

According to National Energy Reliability Initiative supporters, power
outages cost the nation nearly $50 billion annually. They back calls that
the U.S. Department of Energy should support research, development and
deployment of innovative energy systems so that America's information-based
industries can remain competitive in the global economy.

"High-tech businesses face tremendous financial risk from outages and
brownouts because power fluctuations of only a few microseconds can bring
computers and other sensitive systems to a crashing halt," says Patrick
Hanley, president and CEO of Sure Power Corporation, a developer of next
generation power systems and one of the more than 20 firms backing the
letter.

"As recent events in California have demonstrated, the nation's existing
infrastructure cannot adequately meet the New Economy's need for high
amounts of reliable, computer-grade electricity," Hanley notes.

About Sure Power Corporation

Sure Power Corporation, a privately-held company located in Danbury, Conn.,
delivers computer-grade electricity at "six 9s" availability and better,
exceeding the highest availability levels required for mainframe computers
and high-end servers. Its distributed generation systems are at the
forefront of the onsite power industry. Spencer Trask, a New York City
venture capital firm, owns a minority stake in the company. With Sure
Power's high availability power systems, users realize substantially
increased uptime, allowing for higher revenues and fewer unexpected losses.
Sure Power has partnerships with both High-Point Rendel and R.W. Beck in the
construction, planning and design of its systems. More information about
Sure Power Corporation can be found at www.hi-availability.com.

    CONTACT: Sure Power Corporation
             Art Mannion, (203) 790-8996
             amannion@hi-availability.com
                OR
             Sterling Hager, Inc.
             Jon Rucket, (617) 926-6665 ext. 369
             jrucket@sterlinghager.com

    

Greetings Jess:
I work in Government Affairs in San Francisco.  I would like to discuss 
internally and think hard about this before we give any response to the 
staffer at the CPUC---not because we have any reason not to respond, but 
because this a problem created almost exclusively by the PUC, and I don't 
want to give the PUC the opportunity to shift bad decision making and actions 
onto us.  There's a very easy fix to the situation.  The Commission can 
reverse the bad decision it made a month or so ago, and permit customers to 
return to utility service.

I've forwarded all of the information to Catherine Woods and Roger Ponce.  
Let's discuss more internally when we've gathered up all the facts and then 
decide whether and how we choose to respond to the staffer at the PUC.  My 
number's 415.782.7822.   Feel free to give me a ring.  Thanks very much Mike 
for helping to track down the info.

	MDay <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	02/27/2001 06:16 PM
		 
Jess, there is little more than I indicated in my note.  
I received a phone call from Sarita Sarvate, an analyst at the Energy
Division of the CPUC asking why we were returning gas customers to utility
service, citing "a number of customer complaints, including a school and a
hospital".  It now turns out that the school and the hospital are from the
same customer essentially.  The CPUC staff recognizes that they have no
direct jurisdiction over gas sales, but are concerned about the effect of
turnbacks on their utility regulation, as they are in the process of
eliminating the core subscription program which allows noncore customers to
take core service.  In fact there is now a resolution in place barring
noncore customers from taking core subscrition service from SoCalGas or
SDG&E.  They want to know if this is part of a trend which they will have to
adapt to or whether it is an isolated incident.  In addition, they would
like to be able to offer the customer some options for continuing gas
service.  

Let me know if I can add any more or if you can assist us in responding to
the CPUC. 

Thanks, Mike Day

Mike,

My name is Jess Hewitt and I am in charge of the gas desk at EES.  I came in
late on this email string so can you give me a background on this situation?

jess
any insights?  thanks.
>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|
  |
|
>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|

Catherine/Roger:

Here are some more details forwarded by our outside counsel.

Best,
Jeff
>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|
  |
|
>---------------------------------------------------------------------------
-|

Jeff:

Here is some more useful information.  Sarita Sarvate of the CPUC spoke to
the woman in person.  The school in question is the Providence High School
in Burbank, California (not Ontario), operated by the Sisters of Providence.
Ms. Kathy Pentalio (sp?) at 818-846-8140 wrote to the CPUC asking about the
school's options after receiving phone and letter notification that their
gas service would be terminated by Enron.  Apparently the Sisters also
operate a hospital which is also served by Enron.  Ms. Pentalio indicated
that she was told that the school would no longer be served on the same
contract as the hospital (claimed to be an attractive 86 cents/th rate)
because the school's load was so small that it was a core customer, while
the hospital was a noncore customer with a larger load.   Neither Ms.
Sarvate nor Ms. Pentalio was clear if the school was served as a core
aggregation customer or as part of the Sisters of Providence noncore
contract.  Ms. Pentalio claimed she spoke with Enron employees Dennis Harris
in Dublin, Ohio as well as Roger Pons in New Mexico.  She indicated that
service would be terminated on June 1, 2001 and she is looking for
alternative sources of gas.

Sarita Sarvate of the CPUC Energy Division would like to understand the
specifics of this case, but her main concern, and the purpose for sending a
letter (if she does send one) is that Dynergy has told her that a number of
small noncore businesses are being returned to the utilities by marketers
because they no longer meet credit requirements.  She assumed that must be
true with Enron as well.  I indicated to her that she should never assume
that we are doing what Dynegy is doing and that we would respond and advise
her if there was any significant trend of noncore customer turnbacks.  The
Commission's concern, which I know you understand, is that it is phasing out
the core subscription schedule (and has a moratorium on switches to the
SoCalGas core subscription schedule) therefore leaving no place for such
customers to go if they cannot contract with a replacement aggregator.

Please advise me of what you discover about this matter and we can talk
further about a response to the CPUC.   Thank you.

Mike Day

Too hot a market: How energy producers manipulate California 

(Published Sept. 22, 2000) 
The priciest place to shop this August in California was in Pasadena. There 
at the California Power Exchange, where much of the state's electricity is 
bought and sold, prices that utilities paid for power (an average $166 per 
megawatt) were up fivefold from the previous August ($32). What is happening? 
Among other things, too much power on hot days is being purchased in the 
near-panic environment that develops in the hours before a possible crisis. 
Too little is being purchased as it should be -- days, or even months, in 
advance. 
How was this new market-based system of buying electricity supposed to work? 
Much of the action was supposed to take place at the Power Exchange. There 
vibrant trading was supposed to exist in a variety of markets. Some utilities 
would be busy shopping for electricity the next day. Others, depending on 
their needs, would be squirreling away supply a month, even a year, in 
advance. 
Selling this power are private companies that have been busy purchasing 
fossil-fuel burning generators from the state's investor-owned utilities. 
Under the state's restructuring of electricity, these utilities were 
obligated to sell their fossil-fuel burning plants, but not necessarily their 
nuclear or hydroelectric generators. 
On any given day, up to 95 percent of the power needed to fuel California was 
supposed to be already purchased. The idea was to leave just a little bit for 
the last minute. Headquartered in Folsom, the state's entire grid is managed 
by an agency known as the Independent System Operator. The ISO's job is to 
buy whatever extra power is necessary to keep the lights on. With literally 
only hours to work with, the ISO is ill-suited to drive hard bargains. The 
ISO pays up to $250 per megawatt. 
The problem is that the ISO's spot market is way too big, and too pricey. It 
is buying up to 30 percent of California's power on some days, particularly 
hot ones. This August, less power is being purchased in those struggling 
futures market down in Pasadena. More was being bought in Folsom. This is a 
telltale sign that California's electricity market is working for those who 
own power plants, not those who pay the bills that are poised to rise. 

Hey Buddy:

See cover email to the Brulte letter that was sent to the Sacramento Team=
=20
couple of weeks ago when I was in Houston.  Might be a good place to start=
=20
w.r.t. getting our "constructive" message out, though I'm sure that there's=
=20
plenty of other things that needed to be added.

Best,
Jeff
=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/16/2001 08:49 AM
=09=09=20

=09

Greetings All:

First, I am apologizing in advance for any typos in this email.  Schedule i=
s=20
very tight, but I wanted to make sure that everyone had it first thing this=
=20
morning, with some back-up info that I've included below.

Attached is the email that was sent to Ken Lay's office yesterday evening f=
or=20
delivery to Sen. Brulte.  It's of course confidential.  Few points:

I don't have Bev's email, so if you could please forward to her, that would=
=20
be appreciated.
As we discussed (Jim, Mike, Bev, Scott, Hedy) on our lengthy call on=20
Wednesday, I'm assuming that the plan is still to "wallpaper" Sacramento wi=
th=20
our proposed legislation.
This email does not contain the legislation.  Mike sent the "final" version=
s=20
of our legislation out yesterday, except for the siting piece, which I=20
believe Brian Cragg of Mike's office is finalizing today.
You'll note that we promise Senator Brulte in the email that we'll deliver =
to=20
his office today the proposed legislation.  Again, based on our call on=20
Wednesday, I'm assuming that we would simultaneously release the proposed=
=20
legislation to the rest of the world at the same time.
When we spoke on Wednesday, we decided that the Sacramento team would=20
determine to whom we would circulate the proposed legislation at the same=
=20
time that we deliver the Senator Brulte. I'm assuming that you folks will=
=20
handle that end of things.  Please let us know at your convenience to whom=
=20
you've decided to circulate.
This email does, however, include a "summary" of our proposed legislation. =
=20
But I'm not certain that the summary included in this email is the=20
appropriate language to distribute "to the world," or if we'll need instead=
=20
to tailor some new language.  I think we all agreed that we need a "one=20
pager" to accompany the legislative package so that we can communicate the=
=20
package effectively.
We also discussed the need to quickly develop a coalition to support our=20
proposals.  We didn't finalize that plan.  Perhaps the Sacramento team coul=
d=20
propose a plan to do that.  Perhaps we could start with our friends in the=
=20
Direct Access coalition?
We also talked about the need at this point to engage in PR and to get the =
PR=20
machinery activated, also with the goal of effectively communicating our=20
legislative package/message.  We're in a meeting with folks today where we=
=20
can discuss getting that side of things going and Karen Denne has contacted=
=20
Marathon and they're pondering some things that we can do in the near term.
You'll note that there's a considerable amount of information about the DWR=
=20
credit issue.  As I recollect, we discussed the issue in depth on the call.=
 =20
You note that attached to the email is a "legislative fix" to AB1X that cou=
ld=20
solve the credit issue and an attached set of "taking points" related to a=
=20
second alternative to solving the credit issue:  a PUC order clarifying tha=
t=20
DWR will get its money for power purchase costs.
Note also that Steve Kean reminded me that we've got to continue to push to=
=20
get the utilities out of the merchant function.  Accordingly, I've put a=20
brief paragraph on that issue in the note to Brulte in the last section=20
(legislative solution) under the topic "create a real competitive retail=20
market in California."  To the best of my knowledge, we don't have=20
legislative language on that piece yet, and it seems that we'll need to=20
discuss it in considerably more depth before doing so.

If you have any questions about any of the materials in the email, please=
=20
don't hesitate to contact me or Jim or Sandi to discuss.  I can be best=20
reached to day by pager at 888.916.7184. =20

Thanks to all for helping pull this together.

Best,
Jeff

=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 06:11 PM
=09=09=20
Steve:
Here's a substantially more cleaned-version, with attachments.  There's a=
=20
hard copy on your chair.

Best,
Jeff
=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0902/15/2001 05:56 PM
=09=09=20
Jim:
It was a pleasure speaking with you yesterday.  Based on our conversation,=
=20
this email includes the following:

An Enron contact to discuss developing small-scale generation on Tribal lan=
ds.

Our views on the impediments to distributed generation and suggestions on h=
ow=20
to remove those impediments.

A description of the credit issues that continue to impede DWR=01,s ability=
 to=20
sign contracts with power suppliers, and options to resolve them. Two=20
possible options for addressing the credit issue are 1) a California PUC=20
order clarifying that DWR will recover its power purchase costs through=20
rates, and 2) an amendment to AB1X designed to accomplish the same goal.  I=
=20
have attached talking points regarding the California PUC order and propose=
d=20
amendments to AB1X.  We believe that an amendment to AB1X is the preferable=
=20
option.

Our assessment of the supply/demand picture in California.

Our suggestions for a legislative package designed to solve both the near-=
=20
and long-term electricity crisis in California.  We will deliver to your=20
office tomorrow detailed legislative language.  In those materials we will=
=20
also identify existing bills that we believe can easily accommodate our=20
proposed language.

I hope that the information is useful.  Please do not hesitate to contact m=
e=20
if you would like to discuss these materials further, or if there is anythi=
ng=20
else that I can do to assist you.

Regards,
Ken

Contact Information to Discuss Interest Expressed by Native American Tribes=
=20
in Installing Small-scale Generation on Tribal Lands

David Parquet, Vice-President

2. Key Barriers to Distributed Generation

Excessive and Unnecessary Utility Stand-by Charges

Solution: The executive orders issued by the Governor on February 14th took=
 a=20
step in the right direction.  Utility stand-by charges have always been=20
designed by the utilities to protect their monopoly position, extract=20
monopoly prices from customers, or both.  But there is no reason to limit t=
he=20
elimination of these charges to generation facilities that are less than=20
1MW.  These limits will only lengthen unnecessarily the time it takes for=
=20
California to close the significant gap between supply and demand and reduc=
e=20
the risk of black outs this summer.  We would propose lifting the cap by=20
offering amendments to SB27X, which is designed to facilitate development o=
f=20
distributed generation.
=20
Excessive delays and costs related to interconnecting facilities with=20
investor-owned and municipal utilities

Solution:   The Governor=01,s executive order regarding interconnection is =
a=20
step in the right direction=01*D-D-26-01 requires utilities to complete=20
interconnection studies within 7 days.  California should ensure that this=
=20
requirement applies to all generation facilities, including distributed=20
generation.  In addition, the financial conflicts the utilities face when=
=20
interconnecting generation facilities are simply too powerful to overcome=
=20
through executive orders or other regulations.  To the greatest extent=20
possible, California should shift control over interconnection away from th=
e=20
utility and place that control with the California ISO.  This could be=20
accomplished through amendments to SB 27X.

Permitting and Air Quality Issues
Developers of distributed (i.e., =01&on-site=018) generation that is 50 MWs=
 or=20
greater must receive certification from the California Energy Commission an=
d=20
therefore face all of the impediments to development that large-scale=20
generation faces. =20

Solution: California should ensure that the executive orders (D-22-01 thru=
=20
D-26-01) issued by the Governor to expedite plant siting and maximize plant=
=20
output apply equally to smaller scale, =01&distributed generation=018 facil=
ities.=20
In addition, distributed generation that is less than 50 MWs continues to=
=20
face local opposition.  The State should ensure that local, parochial=20
interests cannot block otherwise beneficial distributed generation projects=
. =20
These objectives could be accomplished through amendments to SB27X.

3. Credit Concerns Regarding Authority Granted to DWR in AB1X to Purchase=
=20
Electricity on Behalf of the Utilities=20

Enron responded to the RFP issued by DWR to enter into power contracts with=
=20
suppliers.
Enron is in active discussions with DWR to establish contract terms with th=
e=20
goal of entering into a power purchase agreement as soon as possible.
However, ambiguities contained in AB1X have created significant credit risk=
=20
concerns that need to be resolved in order to finalize contract terms.
We understand that the lion=01,s share of counterparties share Enron=01,s c=
redit=20
risk concerns.
Enron has proposed several options for resolving the credit risk issues and=
=20
is working with DWR to arrive at a solution that is mutually agreeable to=
=20
both sides and that might serve as a template for power purchase agreements=
=20
going forward.

Summary of the Source of the Credit Risk Issue

Ambiguous Ratemaking Authority
The language in AB1X is ambiguous as to whether DWR has any authority to=20
charge California ratepayers for the costs of purchasing power.  From our=
=20
analysis of the bill, the language in AB1X appears to leave intact the=20
California PUC=01,s exclusive jurisdiction over ratemaking in California.  =
As=20
such, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agree to include in rat=
es=20
adequate charges to cover DWR=01,s costs of power purchases.

Ambiguous Regulatory Authority Regarding Contract =01&Prudence=018
The language in AB1X leaves open the possibility that the California Public=
=20
Utilities Commission could determine that power purchases made by DWR are=
=20
=01&imprudent.=018  On the basis of such a finding, the CPUC could then ref=
use to=20
allow DWR to collect from ratepayers the costs associated with its power=20
purchases.  Consequently, suppliers have no assurance that the PUC will agr=
ee=20
to include in rates the charges to cover the costs of power contracts that=
=20
DWR has entered into with suppliers.
=20
Ambiguous Language Regarding the Ratemaking Mechanism that Will Be Used to=
=20
Recover DWR=01,s Costs of Power Purchases
In addition to the ambiguity regarding ratemaking and regulatory authority=
=20
noted above, the language in the bill is equally ambiguous with respect to=
=20
the specific ratemaking =01&mechanics=018 that AB1X directs the PUC to empl=
oy to=20
permit DWR to recover its power purchase costs. Based on our analysis, it i=
s=20
extremely difficult to determine how the PUC would design the rates to ensu=
re=20
DWR recovers its power purchase costs.  Moreover, as currently drafted, it =
is=20
difficult to determine whether AB1X would even permit the PUC to include in=
=20
rates all of the charges necessary to fully recover DWR=01,s power purchase=
=20
costs.  Again, this ambiguity raises significant credit risk concerns since=
=20
suppliers have little assurance that DWR will have the ability to recover=
=20
from ratepayers the costs of purchasing power.

Options to Resolve Concerns Regarding Credit Risk=20

We have been working diligently with DWR officials to resolve the credit ri=
sk=20
issues.  We have identified three options:

Amend AB1X
The amendments, which are attached to this email, would clarify that a) the=
=20
PUC would accept as =01&prudent and reasonable=018 all purchase costs incur=
red by=20
DWR, and b) the PUC is obligated to include in rates the charges necessary =
to=20
ensure that DWR fully recovers its costs of power purchases.  This is the=
=20
preferred option, though we understand that the there may be some political=
=20
challenges standing in the way of amending AB1X.  (See attached file=20
entitled, =01&AmendAB1X.doc=018.)

Clarify the Ambiguities in AB1X through an Order Issued by the PUC, and=20
through Contract Language
This is the option that we are currently working with DWR officials to=20
implement.  However, it is more complicated and could take significantly mo=
re=20
time to implement than the "legislative" fix.  We have attached electronic=
=20
copies of the talking points related to the order that the California PUC=
=20
would need to issue under this option.  (See attached file entitled,=20
=01&cpuctalkingpoints.doc.=018)

Make Use of Other Instruments Designed to Address Credit Risk
As indicated in our letter responding to DWR=01,s RFP, we are willing to ac=
cept=20
other forms of credit from DWR.  Those options include a letter of credit,=
=20
cash prepayment, or an acceptable form of collateral.  DWR officials have=
=20
indicated to us that DWR prefers to pursue the second options. That is, DWR=
=20
prefers to clarify the ambiguities in AB1X through a PUC order and through=
=20
contract amendments.

4. California=01,s Supply-demand Picture Heading into Summer 2001

Both the California Energy Commission and Cambridge Energy Research=20
Associates (CERA), a private sector energy think tank, have issued reports=
=20
showing that California faces a severe supply-demand imbalance.  They diffe=
r=20
only on how much and how soon additional supply will be made available.  Al=
l=20
credible sources agree that supply will be very tight throughout the Summer=
=20
of 2001 and that unless a solution is found immediately, blackouts are=20
likely. =20

CEC and CERA both forecast that California will be short of supply this=20
summer by approximately 5,000 MW.   These numbers are in line with our=20
estimates.  California=01,s supply base currently has a 6% capacity margin,=
 well=20
below the average 15-20%, which is recommended for reliable system operatio=
n=20
in the West.  Since the West relies more heavily upon hydroelectric power=
=20
than other regions, reserves are particularly important, owing to the=20
unpredictability of the weather and the dry year the West has experienced t=
o=20
date. In the event of a low rain and snow period, the system must possess t=
he=20
flexibility to respond to the reduced availability of power supply. =20
California=01,s very low reserve margin makes it especially susceptible to =
this=20
requirement. =20

Other reasons for reduced supply for the Summer of 2001 include the early=
=20
draw-down of reservoirs in the continual effort to manage California's seve=
re=20
supply-demand gap; emissions restrictions on existing plants; and a reduced=
=20
number of customers who can be curtailed under their contracts with the=20
utilities.  Cambridge Energy Research Associates asserts that at the curren=
t=20
pace of siting, permitting and construction, adequate supplies will not be=
=20
added to correct the market imbalance until 2003 at the earliest.

CERA predicts that California is likely to face approximately 20 hours of=
=20
rolling black outs this summer.  The CEC paints a considerably more=20
optimistic scenario, betting that California will bring an additional 5,000=
=20
MWs on line to meet peaking summer demand.  It is our view that California=
=20
should view the CEC's "rosy scenario" with considerable skepticism.

5. Suggested Package of Legislative Proposals Designed to Solve California=
=01,s=20
Electricity Crisis

This email offers an overview of our proposed legislative solution.  We wil=
l=20
deliver to your office tomorrow specific legislative language and existing=
=20
bills that we believe can accommodate our proposals.

As we have suggested throughout the crisis, any solution to California's=20
crisis must focus on four issues:

Increase supply
Decrease demand
Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market
Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency

Increase supply--Legislative vehicle: SB28X (Sher)
To site and construct a power plant in Texas takes approximately 2 years. =
=20
Enron and others have completed the entire process in other states in less=
=20
than a year.  In California, it takes about six years, or longer.

The Governor=01,s executive orders and Senator Sher=01,s siting reform legi=
slation=20
are steps in the right direction.  Our suggested amendments can improve tho=
se=20
efforts by further addressing the difficulties that project developers face=
=20
in securing air emission reduction credits to meet the air permit=20
requirements included in the CEC's certification requirements.  Enron=01,s=
=20
proposal seeks to streamline the process for 1) obtaining credits and 2)=20
transfering credits between air districts.  In addition, it creates an=20
innovative emissions reduction bank to allow project sponsors to fund=20
emissions in advance of obtaining certification, and permits the affected a=
ir=20
districts to use those funds to finance projects that will produce the=20
required reductions in pollution emissions.

Decrease demand=01*Legislative Vehicle:   AB31X (Wright)
Because of the delay in getting a solution in place in California, closing=
=20
the supply-demand gap through energy conservation and efficiency offers the=
=20
best chance of avoiding blackouts this summer.  This can be accomplished mo=
st=20
effectively and quickly in two ways:

Buy-down demand
California is tapping into an enormous amount of money from the General Fun=
d=20
to finance DWR=01,s power purchases.  California could likely reduce demand=
 more=20
economically by running an auction to determine the payments businesses wou=
ld=20
be willing to receive to reduce their demand for a sustained period (e.g.,=
=20
through the summer months).  DWR could easily run an on-line auction to=20
determine the price it could pay for these demand reductions.  To=20
participate, businesses would be required to have the metering equipment=20
necessary to monitor and verify that they are actually achieving the=20
reductions.  Enron has developed an on-line auction software package, =01&D=
eal=20
Bench,=018 that it would be willing to contribute to the effort.

Use Price Signals to Incent Voluntary Curtailment
To be successful, customers need access to the following key elements:

An internet based hour-ahead price posting system to track the market price=
=20
for hour-ahead power in real time.=20
Real-time metering systems for baseline demand and voluntarily curtailment=
=20
verification.
Settlement process that allows for market clearing prices of energy to be=
=20
paid for load reduction (=01&Negawatts=018).

The potential benefits of an effective demand response program would includ=
e:

=01&creation=018 of additional summer peaking capacity in California, parti=
cularly=20
in the short term, without requiring construction of additional generation=
=20
resources.
reduction of  peak or super-peak load on the over-stressed California=20
electric system, thus potentially reducing the overall cost of electricity =
in=20
the state.
fostering of demand elasticity without subjecting customers to the full ris=
k=20
of hourly market price volatility by passing market price signals to=20
customers and allowing them to voluntarily shed load and be compensated for=
=20
responding.=20

We estimate that we could generate a summer 2001 on-peak demand response in=
=20
excess of 400 MW during certain high cost hours, and a demand response for=
=20
summer 2002 on-peak hours that could exceed 1000 MW.  We further estimate=
=20
that the market response to this program from all ESPs could be 2 to 3 time=
s=20
that amount.  We recommend that the State of California provide rebates=20
directly to customers to fund the installation of advanced metering and=20
control systems that would support load curtailment implementation.

Establish a truly competitive retail electricity market=01*Legislative vehi=
cle:=20
SB27X
The only customers who were protected from price volatility in San Diego we=
re=20
customers who chose Direct Access and signed fixed price deals with energy=
=20
service providers.  Ironically, AB1X takes that important option away from=
=20
customers and businesses.  It is critical that AB1X be amended to remove th=
e=20
prohibition against Direct Access.

Enron's legislative proposal would give customers freedom to enter into a=
=20
direct access transaction, while simultaneously addressing the Department o=
f=20
Water Resources' concerns about stranded power costs that might result from=
=20
customer migration. =20

In addition, California will only achieve a competitive retail market when=
=20
the utility is removed completely from the procurement function.  Procureme=
nt=20
is not a utility core competency, as evidenced by the dire financial=20
condition in which the utilities now find themselves.  California should=20
therefore begin immediately to phase the utility out of the procurement=20
function entirely, with the goal of having all customers served by a=20
non-utility provider within 36 months.  To execute the transition, Californ=
ia=20
should hold a series of competitive solicitations over the 36-month period =
in=20
which competing service providers would bid for the right to serve segments=
=20
of utility load.

Return California=01,s Investor-owned utilities to solvency=01*Legislative =
vehicle:=20
AB18X
Utility bankruptcy will not increase supply and it will not decrease demand=
. =20
In short, bankruptcy does nothing to solve California=01,s supply-demand=20
imbalance.  In addition, bankruptcy increases the likelihood that consumers=
=20
and businesses will bear the significant financial risks of having Californ=
ia=20
State government assume the role of =01&electricity buyer=018 for an extend=
ed=20
period of time.  Finally, bankruptcy will undermine both investor confidenc=
e=20
in California's energy markets and the private sector's willingness to=20
participate in that market.

California can return the utilities to financial solvency by implementing a=
=20
series of staged rate increases.  California should design those rate=20
increases with the dual goal of returning the utilities to solvency without=
=20
=01&shocking=018 the economy or household budgets For example, California c=
ould=20
amortize the recovery of the utilities=01, past debt over a 5-10 year perio=
d. =20
In addition, the magnitude of the rate increase can be reduced in two ways:=
=20
First, the utilities could absorb some portion of their existing debt in=20
recognition of the risk they accepted when they agreed to the structure of =
AB=20
1890.  Second, California can =01&net=018 the revenues the utilities have r=
eceived=20
from selling electricity into the Power Exchange against the debts they hav=
e=20
accrued due to the retail price cap.

Greetings, kiddo.  How's it going with this stuff.  Seems a wee bit like 
"stop and start, repeat."

Hang in there.  You're doing a fantastic job.

Best,
Jeff

Ken:  could you call me at 415.782.7822 re: Loretta's talk tomorrow (I'll be 
in Sacramento).  Thanks, Jeff

	"Ken Smith" <ken@kdscommunications.com>
	02/27/2001 06:58 PM
	Please respond to "Ken Smith"
		 
I will be unable to be on the conference call tomorrow... I'm at the Loretta
Lynch lunch.

I may try to call in on my cell for part of the conversation.  Is the number
and code the same for each call?

I'll report back on what she says in her appearance before the Press Club.
> (See attached file: War room agenda 2-28-01.doc)

You are so sweet.  Thanks so much.  What's new?  What are we doing on the 
Friday of Eldon's b-day?

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	02/27/2001 07:06 PM
		 
Finally - here is the name of the contact 

Greetings.  How's things?

You get this?  Someone that I know forwarded it along to me.  Know anything 
about it?

Best,
Jeff

 - Capacity Forum.doc

I'm scheduled to meet with Kari at 3:30 PST tomorrow, ostensibly to talk 
about demand buy-down.  Also presume to message the letter from Steve Kean to 
the Senators and our solution (perhaps in advance of meetings, phone calls 
that might take place later in the week with legislative leaders).  But would 
like to add to agenda for discussion on tomorrow's daily call in the event 
folks have additional suggestions.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks very much, Scott.  Shouldn't be a big problem.  Our buy-down auction 
would require the customer to commit to a fixed reduction over an extended 
period (for a price), and the reduction would have to be verifiable, i.e., 
the customer would need to have the equipment necessary to verify (which 
isn't a problem for large customers).  Sounds like a misunderstanding on the 
part of the legislator and something that we should be able to talk through.  
I'll be there tomorrow.  If it makes sense for me to meet with them, just let 
me know.  Who's the legislator  in charge of demand buy-down?

Best,
Jeff

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/27/2001 07:58 PM
		 
We met with the legislator who is in charge of the Summer 2001
subcommittee today to discuss Enron's buy down proposal.  Dave Freeman
had discussed the idea with her previously, however, his version
required that the contract be for a pre-arranged price, based on the
notice you were given presumably by the ISO, i.e. 24 hours = x, 12 hours
= y, etc.  Consequently, her concern with our proposal was the
uncertainty of allowing customers to choose whether or not they want to
shut down based on price versus requiring them to shut down to meet
demand, i.e. a modified interruptable.

She requested that we provide her with information about existing buy
down programs and their successes.

Thanks, Roger.  We'll need to determine whether we've turned the customer 
back.  Any help that you and Catherine can give in that regard is 
appreciated.  Then we can decide if, and how, we choose to respond to the PUC 
staffer.  Thanks very much for your help.

Best,
Jeff

	Roger O Ponce@EES
	02/27/2001 07:27 PM
		
On or about Oct .17th I returned a call to  Kathy Pantolo (sp) at 
818-846-8141 X 506 (according to my phone log).  As I recall the reason for 
her 
calling the office was that the Sept. invoice had just arrived and she 
questioned NGI price. The scope of our conversation was limited to gas
 prices and how high they were, this is the only conversation I can recall 
having with Providence Hospital ...
   
I hope this sheds a little more light on this issue.
Roger

will call shortly.

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	09/22/2000 01:40 PM
		 
Too hot a market: How energy producers manipulate California 

(Published Sept. 22, 2000) 
The priciest place to shop this August in California was in Pasadena. There 
at the California Power Exchange, where much of the state's electricity is 
bought and sold, prices that utilities paid for power (an average $166 per 
megawatt) were up fivefold from the previous August ($32). What is happening? 
Among other things, too much power on hot days is being purchased in the 
near-panic environment that develops in the hours before a possible crisis. 
Too little is being purchased as it should be -- days, or even months, in 
advance. 
How was this new market-based system of buying electricity supposed to work? 
Much of the action was supposed to take place at the Power Exchange. There 
vibrant trading was supposed to exist in a variety of markets. Some utilities 
would be busy shopping for electricity the next day. Others, depending on 
their needs, would be squirreling away supply a month, even a year, in 
advance. 
Selling this power are private companies that have been busy purchasing 
fossil-fuel burning generators from the state's investor-owned utilities. 
Under the state's restructuring of electricity, these utilities were 
obligated to sell their fossil-fuel burning plants, but not necessarily their 
nuclear or hydroelectric generators. 
On any given day, up to 95 percent of the power needed to fuel California was 
supposed to be already purchased. The idea was to leave just a little bit for 
the last minute. Headquartered in Folsom, the state's entire grid is managed 
by an agency known as the Independent System Operator. The ISO's job is to 
buy whatever extra power is necessary to keep the lights on. With literally 
only hours to work with, the ISO is ill-suited to drive hard bargains. The 
ISO pays up to $250 per megawatt. 
The problem is that the ISO's spot market is way too big, and too pricey. It 
is buying up to 30 percent of California's power on some days, particularly 
hot ones. This August, less power is being purchased in those struggling 
futures market down in Pasadena. More was being bought in Folsom. This is a 
telltale sign that California's electricity market is working for those who 
own power plants, not those who pay the bills that are poised to rise. 

It's always darkest before the light (though it may not get light in our 
lifetimes).

Looks great.  Couple of points:

1) Despite promises to the contrary--common theme in this exercise--Burton 
(as I understand) did not remove the condemnation (expropriation?) language 
from ABx6, i.e., the state can just take your power plant (or anything else, 
it seems), if it has the inkling.  That's an egregious provision in ABx6.

2) I don't recall trying to amend ABx18 to say, "pay them their PX credits."  
I understood the tactic to be--get a prospective, date certain end to the 
freeze in the bill, which then gives us very firm legal ground on which to 
seek and get the money owed to us.  We could seek the additional language, 
but if putting date certain does the same thing without attracting a lot of 
attention, may be a preferable path.

3) Forgive me if I've just overlooked it, but I got wind of a bill by Ms 
Migden (ABx8?)  that gives one whole heckuvalot of new power--power usually 
left to FERC--to the CA Electricity Oversight Board.  Anyone know about it?  
We may want to get details for inclusion in the discussion with Delainey.  

Best,
Jeff

To Jim's last point.  I understand that the good 'ol utility system was often 
operated with little regard for basic economic principles, but there's 
something in this that seems very odd and difficult to assess, and it seems 
to always be tied to this notion that "California is a net importer, even in 
the winter."  I'm going to start with the economics and then let folks 
describe why it seemingly doesn't apply in Western electricity markets.

Just about every theory of economics and trade would lead to one conclusion:  
If California closes it's doors the other Western states will pay higher 
prices for power and/or face increased threats to reliability.  I'm 
struggling to try to determine why these basic principles aren't applicable 
to Western power markets.  I understand that the PNW is a very complex place 
and that the reasons could be embedded in the arcane structure that has 
developed over the years.

To keep it simple (though not necessarily accurate), I've confined the 
analysis to a world in which only the PNW and California exist.

The basic situation: The PNW peaks in the winter; California peaks in the 
summer.

Let's take two scenarios:

1)  The West, less California, is so awash in electricity that even in its 
peak--the Winter--it still has power to send to California, i.e., it has so 
overbuilt it's system that it has persistent surpluses to sell to California.

Irrespective, there have (to my limited knowledge) always been sales from CA 
to the PNW during the winter, when the PNW is peaking.
The only conclusion that one can make, assuming that the PNW is awash in 
electricity, is that the PNW takes the power in California because it makes 
economic sense to do so. That is, during the winter peaking months, it must 
be cheaper on the margin for the PNW to buy from California rather than 
produce itself.  Otherwise, it's difficult to understand why it would buy 
from California during this month, particularly if they're long.  As such, at 
a minimum, the PNW's electric bill will necessarily increase if California 
closes its doors.

2) Neither the PNW , nor California, has indigenous capacity to meet peaking 
load.  Therefore, the PNW must buy California's power during its peaking 
summer period, and California must buy power during it's summer peaking 
period.  In this case, not only will the PNW's bill go up if California 
closes its doors, the lights are likely to go because they'll be short power.

I realize that this is a simplistic model, and that there could be other 
legitimate economic factors driving the flows out of California to the PNW 
(e.g., transmission costs).  And again, I also realize that economics may not 
have traditionally been a driver in the industry.  But I thought it might be 
useful to get a common framework in place as a starting point for the 
question that Jim asks.

With that, I'll pose the question (understanding the simplicity of the model 
set forth above):  Given that California sends power north--even if the PNW 
is long---how can California closing it doors not increase the PNW's cost of 
power?

Best,
Jeff

	James D Steffes
	02/28/2001 08:05 AM
		
It seems to me that this information leads one to conclude that the value of 
an open transmission network is that California does not have to build 5,000 
MW of power plant (4,500 MW max input + 10%) in state.  In other words, if 
California were to disconnect from the grid, someone would have to build 
additional power plants in-state.

The cost to California consumers is therefore the annual carrying cost of 10 
500 MW plants (made even more expensive after California expropriates the 
current fleet of merchant generation).

From the perspective of the remainder of the West, the question still remains 
- if California does go it alone, what is the economic impact?  Other than 
legal arguments about Interstate Commerce, why should the Federal Government 
want to continue to pursue open acess?  This is the hard question that we 
need to answer.  

Jim

	Alan Comnes@ECT
	02/27/2001 09:40 PM
		 
Jim, Jeff:

Jim asked me in a voice mail what would be the cost to California of moving 
from the current (evolving) system of open access to a "protectionist" 
environment where access to the grid would be determined by a political body 
responding to populist pressures.

Here are some things to consider.  We can talk more and I welcome Sue Mara or 
Steve Walton's input:

California is a net importer so any restraint of trade would risk the state 
being able to meet its own demand.  See attached slides that show PNW-CA 
trade.  Even in the winter, power on a net basis flows south.

Limiting open access would primarily act to hold in-state generators hostage.
 this will kill incentives for new investment

If the ISO's proposal for market power mitigation are any guide of where a 
protectionist ISO would go:
 in-state generators would be required to sell forward or lose their market 
based rate certificates
 load serving entities would be required to contract forward for load and a 
reserve margin.  
  This is costly: it will lead to centralized planning solutions to 
reliability rather than more efficient market     outcomes
 Artifical notions of "just and reasonable" rates (on top of unreasonable 
reserve requirements) would lead to severe   reliability problems.  (In other 
words, if Steve Peace has his way, the imports into the state will drop 
off     signficanly)

There is no reason the state would be more effective at expanding the grid 
(e.g., Path 15) than the current system.  (Although, admittedly the current 
system has flaws.  The CAISO was set up with little thought to transmission 
expansion planning.  Other RTOs are not repeating this mistake.).  

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/28/2001 11:00 AM
		 
Attached, please find the latest information from the direct access
coalition.

Received: (qmail 77871 invoked by uid 41); 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: from nycxims1.edelman.com (63.96.56.110)  by mx7.quiknet.com with 
SMTP; 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: by nycxims1.edelman.com with Internet Mail Service (5.5.2653.19) id 
<FY7A0FGF>; Tue, 27 Feb 2001 22:46:37 -0500

Hello to the Direct Access Coalition:

Below you will find a summary of the press strategy that Edelman Public
Relations intends to employ over the coming weeks in collaboration with the
Alliance for Retail Energy Markets and the broader Direct Access Coalition.
I will also outline the information that I need from Direct Access Coalition
members who are willing to be involved in media outreach and interviews.
And finally, I have attached supporting documents that you can use as
background material to prep for your responses to any media inquiries that
you may receive.

This Week

1.   We are drafting a "pitch letter" to send out by the end of this week
via blast e-mail and fax to the following media lists: 1)capitol press corps
reporters; 2) mainstream media reporters working the energy crisis; and 3)
trade media.  We may also outreach to our editorial board list as well.  Our
pitch will be focused on what it will really mean for small business and C&I
customers to lose the option of retail choice at a time when they are
suffering the financial hardships of skyrocketing energy bills. We will
address the effect on California's future business climate if direct access
is not preserved through legislation that corrects the problems that AB1x
caused for retail choice.  And finally, we will address the point that no
matter what direction California ultimately takes, direct access must be a
part of the solution.  Reporters have seen the recent polls which illustrate
California businesses' concerns with the path the state is on so this is a
prime opportunity to build on those recent media stories.

2.    We recommend a conference call with AReM and the Direct Access
Coalition on Friday to address the questions and suggestions on the press
strategy outlined here.

3.     Determine which people in the Direct Access Coalition are willing to
take media calls on behalf of the coalition.

Next Week

1.   Follow up with key reporters who received the pitch letter.

2.   Evaluate the language of SB 27x and determine whether there will be an
opportunity to hold a news conference with Sen. Bowen in the near future.
Monitor movement at the PUC and determine whether a press conference may be
effective in this arena, or whether we may need to use the option of sending
a media alert before the March 7 hearing, followed by a news release after
the hearing.

3.   Place op-eds (opinion pieces) with key newspapers.

4.   Contact radio news shows and TV public affairs shows (i.e. California
Capitol Week and the California Report) to secure
media interviews.

5.    Revise the SB 27x fact sheet (attached) to reflect the realities of
the amended language in SB 27x.

 What We Need From You

1.  If you are willing to speak with the media, or you have
customers/clients with a positive direct access story to tell, please
respond to this email as soon as you can with your name and contact
information.

2.  If you have draft op-eds written that need to be placed with newspapers
on behalf of your association and the broader coalition, we are willing to
do this for the you.

3.  If you have colleagues and/or staff that are already working with the
media it would be helpful to have this information so that we can
collaborate as necessary.

The Documents Below

>  All documents are works in progress, so if you have suggestions on
> potential changes, please feel free to share them with us.
>

Thank you.

>  <<AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc>>
>  <<Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc>>  <<AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc>>  <<AREM Fact
> FINAL3.doc>>
>
> Tracy Fairchild
> Account Supervisor
> Edelman Public Relations Worldwide
> (916) 442-2331
> tracy.fairchild@edelman.com
>

 - AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc
 - Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc
 - AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc
 - AREM Fact FINAL3.doc

Christian:

Could you let me know as soon as possible if 1) the proposed decision that I 
faxed you yesterday is go to go, i.e., adequately addresses our concerns 
regarding creditworthiness or if 2) we want to recommend some additional 
provisions?  If we want to recommend additional provisions, could you let me 
know what those are?  I want to make a run at getting this deal done at the 
CPUC ASAP,and would like to push Peevey to get Davis to have the PUC pass it 
out at their next meeting. But need to know if it's good as is or needs some 
tweeking.  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks very much for getting back to us.  So if I understand the bottom 
line:  1) the customer was mistakenly put back to SoCal (due to the dual 
service territory character of the customer's facilities), 2) the customer 
will be returned to our service, 3) the customer's contract with us expires 
on 5/31, and 4) the customer will have the option of re-signing with us, or 
returning to SoCalGas when the contracts ends on 5/31?  If I've confused 
anything, please let me know.  And thanks again for helping track down the 
info.

Best,
Jeff

	James D Foster@EES
	02/28/2001 12:56 PM
		
	

Upon research, it was discovered that this customer has two active meters in 
two different Utilities (PG&E, and SOCAL) under the same contract.  This is 
the reason for the confusion.  For tracking purposes, we "break-out" meters 
by LDC in order to assign our customers to reps familiar with a particular 
LDC. Those customers that have multiple LDC's under the same contract are 
assigned to the same rep.  This allows the customers to speak to the same 
individual for all of their accounts.

Unfortunately the site in question was identified in error as a single site 
only.  The site in PG&E was assigned to Dennis Harris, while the site in 
SOCAL, because of the low usage, was identified for transition to SOCAL.  
This was not our intention.  The data has been realigned and Dennis Harris 
now has access to both records.  

I spoke to Dennis regarding this issue, and he will contact the customer, 
explain why it occurred, stop the transition to SOCAL for this site, should 
the customer choose to; as well as coordinate a renewal for this customer 
going forward, as their current agreement is to expire 05/31/01.

Catherine Woods
02/28/2001 08:53 AM

Can you indentify the owner of this record?
Thank you!
Catherine/Roger:

Here are some more details forwarded by our outside counsel.

Best,
Jeff
	MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	02/27/2001 05:25 PM
		 
Jeff:

Here is some more useful information.  Sarita Sarvate of the CPUC spoke to
the woman in person.  The school in question is the Providence High School
in Burbank, California (not Ontario), operated by the Sisters of Providence.
Ms. Kathy Pentalio (sp?) at 818-846-8140 wrote to the CPUC asking about the
school's options after receiving phone and letter notification that their
gas service would be terminated by Enron.  Apparently the Sisters also
operate a hospital which is also served by Enron.  Ms. Pentalio indicated
that she was told that the school would no longer be served on the same
contract as the hospital (claimed to be an attractive 86 cents/th rate)
because the school's load was so small that it was a core customer, while
the hospital was a noncore customer with a larger load.   Neither Ms.
Sarvate nor Ms. Pentalio was clear if the school was served as a core
aggregation customer or as part of the Sisters of Providence noncore
contract.  Ms. Pentalio claimed she spoke with Enron employees Dennis Harris
in Dublin, Ohio as well as Roger Pons in New Mexico.  She indicated that
service would be terminated on June 1, 2001 and she is looking for
alternative sources of gas.

Sarita Sarvate of the CPUC Energy Division would like to understand the
specifics of this case, but her main concern, and the purpose for sending a
letter (if she does send one) is that Dynergy has told her that a number of
small noncore businesses are being returned to the utilities by marketers
because they no longer meet credit requirements.  She assumed that must be
true with Enron as well.  I indicated to her that she should never assume
that we are doing what Dynegy is doing and that we would respond and advise
her if there was any significant trend of noncore customer turnbacks.  The
Commission's concern, which I know you understand, is that it is phasing out
the core subscription schedule (and has a moratorium on switches to the
SoCalGas core subscription schedule) therefore leaving no place for such
customers to go if they cannot contract with a replacement aggregator.

Please advise me of what you discover about this matter and we can talk
further about a response to the CPUC.   Thank you.

Mike Day

har-dee-har-har.  I mean, will we be celebrating in some fashion.  I'm 
scheduled to go to Houston--I'm not kidding--but if there's something 
planned, which I assume there is, then I'm going to cancel my trip to 
Houston, like pronto.

Ironically,
Jeff

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	02/27/2001 07:09 PM
		 
cooking! 
You are so sweet.  Thanks so much.  What's new?  What are we doing on the 
Friday of Eldon's b-day? 

                                                                              
                       
                    Nancy 
Sellers                                                                    
                       
                                                                              
                       

Finally - here is the name of the contact 

Nancy, sorry this took a while, but it will be worth it.  If anybody knows 
about the Sonoma Coast, it's this guy.  He's done work with Flowers, 
Kistler, etc. out there.  His name is Greg Bjornstad (sp.?) and his number 
is (707) 829-1687.  He doesn't really know me from a hole in the ground but 
you can "double reference" my name as Todd Graff's friend.  Todd is the 
winemaker at Sonoma Creek and is a good friend of mine who worked with Eric 
on some projects. 

Eldon said that you were making dinner on Friday, the 9th, and that he was 
flying a plane to pick up Cameron and Rory in Carmel.  Have you guys spoken 
in the last few months!?!?!?  (kidding.)  And don't worry about my 
birthday--that's not the issue.  It's Eldon's 80th--that's huge.  Friday is 
the 9th.  So I'm just checking in to see what's up.  My very strong 
inclination--for a variety of reasons, but Eldon's b-day is the biggest 
one--is to cancel.

Signed,
confused

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	02/28/2001 01:10 PM
		 
I'm not sure what Friday will bring - the party as you know (for you and 
Eldon as far as I am concerned) is on Saturday - however, none of your 
friends will be there except us!  When would you normally get back?
har-dee-har-har.  I mean, will we be celebrating in some fashion.  I'm 
scheduled to go to Houston--I'm not kidding--but if there's something 
planned, which I assume there is, then I'm going to cancel my trip to 
Houston, like pronto. 
Ironically, 
Jeff 

                                                                              
                       
                    Nancy 
Sellers                                                                    
contact                                           
                                                                              
                       

cooking! 

You are so sweet.  Thanks so much.  What's new?  What are we doing on the 
Friday of Eldon's b-day? 

                    Nancy Sellers 
Finally - here is the name of the contact 

Nancy, sorry this took a while, but it will be worth it.  If anybody knows 
about the Sonoma Coast, it's this guy.  He's done work with Flowers, 
Kistler, etc. out there.  His name is Greg Bjornstad (sp.?) and his number 
is (707) 829-1687.  He doesn't really know me from a hole in the ground but 
you can "double reference" my name as Todd Graff's friend.  Todd is the 
winemaker at Sonoma Creek and is a good friend of mine who worked with Eric 
on some projects. 

Thanks.  It would of course be easiest to make the calls and say "pass it out 
now, as is,"  but if more is needed to fix the credit issue, want to be 
prepared to tell them how the decision needs to be modified.  If it's fine as 
is, all the better.

Best,
Jeff

	Christian Yoder@ECT
	02/28/2001 12:59 PM
		
We like the Alternate Order.  It is a big step in the right direction.  Jean 
Bennett is preparing a draft letter in support which we were going to file by 
no later than Friday.  Pat Boylston and I will go over the letter and discuss 
it with Jean.  I'm not really sure we are going to want to do any surgery on 
the wording or not.  I invite Jean and Pat to give you a quick comment on 
this.  ----cgy 

Christian:

Could you let me know as soon as possible if 1) the proposed decision that I 
faxed you yesterday is go to go, i.e., adequately addresses our concerns 
regarding creditworthiness or if 2) we want to recommend some additional 
provisions?  If we want to recommend additional provisions, could you let me 
know what those are?  I want to make a run at getting this deal done at the 
CPUC ASAP,and would like to push Peevey to get Davis to have the PUC pass it 
out at their next meeting. But need to know if it's good as is or needs some 
tweeking.  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks again.

	James D Foster@EES
	02/28/2001 01:09 PM
		
Your understanding of my previous dissertation is correct.  -Jim

Thanks very much for getting back to us.  So if I understand the bottom 
line:  1) the customer was mistakenly put back to SoCal (due to the dual 
service territory character of the customer's facilities), 2) the customer 
will be returned to our service, 3) the customer's contract with us expires 
on 5/31, and 4) the customer will have the option of re-signing with us, or 
returning to SoCalGas when the contracts ends on 5/31?  If I've confused 
anything, please let me know.  And thanks again for helping track down the 
info.

Best,
Jeff

	James D Foster@EES
	02/28/2001 12:56 PM
		
	

Upon research, it was discovered that this customer has two active meters in 
two different Utilities (PG&E, and SOCAL) under the same contract.  This is 
the reason for the confusion.  For tracking purposes, we "break-out" meters 
by LDC in order to assign our customers to reps familiar with a particular 
LDC. Those customers that have multiple LDC's under the same contract are 
assigned to the same rep.  This allows the customers to speak to the same 
individual for all of their accounts.

Unfortunately the site in question was identified in error as a single site 
only.  The site in PG&E was assigned to Dennis Harris, while the site in 
SOCAL, because of the low usage, was identified for transition to SOCAL.  
This was not our intention.  The data has been realigned and Dennis Harris 
now has access to both records.  

I spoke to Dennis regarding this issue, and he will contact the customer, 
explain why it occurred, stop the transition to SOCAL for this site, should 
the customer choose to; as well as coordinate a renewal for this customer 
going forward, as their current agreement is to expire 05/31/01.

Catherine Woods
02/28/2001 08:53 AM

Can you indentify the owner of this record?
Thank you!
Catherine/Roger:

Here are some more details forwarded by our outside counsel.

Best,
Jeff
	MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	02/27/2001 05:25 PM
		 
Jeff:

Here is some more useful information.  Sarita Sarvate of the CPUC spoke to
the woman in person.  The school in question is the Providence High School
in Burbank, California (not Ontario), operated by the Sisters of Providence.
Ms. Kathy Pentalio (sp?) at 818-846-8140 wrote to the CPUC asking about the
school's options after receiving phone and letter notification that their
gas service would be terminated by Enron.  Apparently the Sisters also
operate a hospital which is also served by Enron.  Ms. Pentalio indicated
that she was told that the school would no longer be served on the same
contract as the hospital (claimed to be an attractive 86 cents/th rate)
because the school's load was so small that it was a core customer, while
the hospital was a noncore customer with a larger load.   Neither Ms.
Sarvate nor Ms. Pentalio was clear if the school was served as a core
aggregation customer or as part of the Sisters of Providence noncore
contract.  Ms. Pentalio claimed she spoke with Enron employees Dennis Harris
in Dublin, Ohio as well as Roger Pons in New Mexico.  She indicated that
service would be terminated on June 1, 2001 and she is looking for
alternative sources of gas.

Sarita Sarvate of the CPUC Energy Division would like to understand the
specifics of this case, but her main concern, and the purpose for sending a
letter (if she does send one) is that Dynergy has told her that a number of
small noncore businesses are being returned to the utilities by marketers
because they no longer meet credit requirements.  She assumed that must be
true with Enron as well.  I indicated to her that she should never assume
that we are doing what Dynegy is doing and that we would respond and advise
her if there was any significant trend of noncore customer turnbacks.  The
Commission's concern, which I know you understand, is that it is phasing out
the core subscription schedule (and has a moratorium on switches to the
SoCalGas core subscription schedule) therefore leaving no place for such
customers to go if they cannot contract with a replacement aggregator.

Please advise me of what you discover about this matter and we can talk
further about a response to the CPUC.   Thank you.

Mike Day

Mike,
Here's the answer.  Please call me when you get a chance to discuss a 
response (if any).

Best,
Jeff
	James D Foster@EES
	02/28/2001 01:09 PM
		
Your understanding of my previous dissertation is correct.  -Jim

Thanks very much for getting back to us.  So if I understand the bottom 
line:  1) the customer was mistakenly put back to SoCal (due to the dual 
service territory character of the customer's facilities), 2) the customer 
will be returned to our service, 3) the customer's contract with us expires 
on 5/31, and 4) the customer will have the option of re-signing with us, or 
returning to SoCalGas when the contracts ends on 5/31?  If I've confused 
anything, please let me know.  And thanks again for helping track down the 
info.

Best,
Jeff

	James D Foster@EES
	02/28/2001 12:56 PM
		
	

Upon research, it was discovered that this customer has two active meters in 
two different Utilities (PG&E, and SOCAL) under the same contract.  This is 
the reason for the confusion.  For tracking purposes, we "break-out" meters 
by LDC in order to assign our customers to reps familiar with a particular 
LDC. Those customers that have multiple LDC's under the same contract are 
assigned to the same rep.  This allows the customers to speak to the same 
individual for all of their accounts.

Unfortunately the site in question was identified in error as a single site 
only.  The site in PG&E was assigned to Dennis Harris, while the site in 
SOCAL, because of the low usage, was identified for transition to SOCAL.  
This was not our intention.  The data has been realigned and Dennis Harris 
now has access to both records.  

I spoke to Dennis regarding this issue, and he will contact the customer, 
explain why it occurred, stop the transition to SOCAL for this site, should 
the customer choose to; as well as coordinate a renewal for this customer 
going forward, as their current agreement is to expire 05/31/01.

Catherine Woods
02/28/2001 08:53 AM

Can you indentify the owner of this record?
Thank you!
Catherine/Roger:

Here are some more details forwarded by our outside counsel.

Best,
Jeff
	MBD <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	02/27/2001 05:25 PM
		 
Jeff:

Here is some more useful information.  Sarita Sarvate of the CPUC spoke to
the woman in person.  The school in question is the Providence High School
in Burbank, California (not Ontario), operated by the Sisters of Providence.
Ms. Kathy Pentalio (sp?) at 818-846-8140 wrote to the CPUC asking about the
school's options after receiving phone and letter notification that their
gas service would be terminated by Enron.  Apparently the Sisters also
operate a hospital which is also served by Enron.  Ms. Pentalio indicated
that she was told that the school would no longer be served on the same
contract as the hospital (claimed to be an attractive 86 cents/th rate)
because the school's load was so small that it was a core customer, while
the hospital was a noncore customer with a larger load.   Neither Ms.
Sarvate nor Ms. Pentalio was clear if the school was served as a core
aggregation customer or as part of the Sisters of Providence noncore
contract.  Ms. Pentalio claimed she spoke with Enron employees Dennis Harris
in Dublin, Ohio as well as Roger Pons in New Mexico.  She indicated that
service would be terminated on June 1, 2001 and she is looking for
alternative sources of gas.

Sarita Sarvate of the CPUC Energy Division would like to understand the
specifics of this case, but her main concern, and the purpose for sending a
letter (if she does send one) is that Dynergy has told her that a number of
small noncore businesses are being returned to the utilities by marketers
because they no longer meet credit requirements.  She assumed that must be
true with Enron as well.  I indicated to her that she should never assume
that we are doing what Dynegy is doing and that we would respond and advise
her if there was any significant trend of noncore customer turnbacks.  The
Commission's concern, which I know you understand, is that it is phasing out
the core subscription schedule (and has a moratorium on switches to the
SoCalGas core subscription schedule) therefore leaving no place for such
customers to go if they cannot contract with a replacement aggregator.

Please advise me of what you discover about this matter and we can talk
further about a response to the CPUC.   Thank you.

Mike Day

Thank you.  FYI.  Seems that the problem was that the last letter in my IZIO 
login (that comes up automatically when pulling up the page) was being 
truncated (which may result from my regular work login pre-empting the IZIO 
login--the two are exactly the same, except that my work login truncates the 
last letter of my name).  Thanks very much for your help.

	Izio InfoPier <InfoPier@izio.com>
	09/22/2000 03:10 PM
		 
Dear Jeffrey,

We generated a new password for you, as you requested, to use with your login 
on the Izio InfoPier System of Haas School of Business - UC Berkeley.
Your new password is 6611030.  Please do not forget to change it by going to 
the system's home at haas.infopier.com.  Remember to avoid using regular 
words, which are easy to hack, and sprinkle a few '@$%' just in case.??Best wishes,?The Izio Team.?????

I understand that there may be a need to give no quarter on this, but given 
the circumstances--i.e., we talk every day and time and resources are 
extremely tight--is it reasonable to temporarily suspend filling this thing 
out for the next 60-90 days?  Lemme know.  

My sister just called and said that the earthquake in Seattle was 7.0.  
That's big.

Best,
Jeff

	Lysa Akin@ECT
	02/28/2001 09:57 AM
		 
Please review the attached form, and update any information necessary.  This 
will replace the Internal resource form we were using previously.  Please 
respond by COB Friday 3/2/01 with any changes.

Thank you.

Lysa

Ginger Dernehl@ENRON
02/22/2001 08:02 AM
Attached to this e:mail, you will find the ENA Government Affairs report for 
the month of January.  This will be the new monthly format that will take 
place of the IRTF.  As you will see from the style of this format, it should 
help in expediting the process of this report.

If you have any questions,

Attached please find the ENA Government Affairs report for Feb '01.  I tried 
to incorporate the material from the IRTF reports.

I have asked Eric Benson to help me put these together going forward so 
hopefully they will be out the first week of the month.  

My other request is to see if people can modify their IRTF to include some 
new data - WHAT ACTIONS WILL OCCUR IN NEXT 30 DAYS THAT NEED ATTENTION OF 
MANAGEMENT.  This report is too  backward looking in its current form.  I 
want to try and make this a listing of what is going to happen over the next 
30 days to begin to get ENA management thinking about the issues.

Thanks,

Jim

Sandi:

Apologies.  I meant and forgot to mention on the 11:30 call that the pipeline 
group is having their annual customer meeting (VPs of large energy companies 
throughout the West and Midwest) at the Santa Barbara Biltmore on April 12th 
and 13th.

They would very much like to get Bill Keese to speak (preferably on the 
morning of the 13th, but the morning of the 12th would work as well).  They'd 
like Bill to discuss the energy situation in California.  They can cover 
however much of Bill's costs--if any--that the State of California allows to 
be covered.

The folks at the pipeline group asked if we could make the contact with Bill 
and see if he's available and willing.  Given your relationship, thought you 
might be able to check.  They're anxious to get someone lined up as soon as 
possible.  Feel free to contact Laura Lantefield directly at 402.398.7080.  
Thanks very much for the help.

Best,
Jeff

Hi.  I was trying to get a fix on whether there's something going on on the 
Friday of your Dad's b-day to see if I need to cancel the Houston trip.  What 
do you think?

xoxoxxo

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	02/28/2001 01:34 PM
		 
It is going to be pretty casual on Friday!  Sausages, polenta, and salad type 
- around the kitchen table - we are pretending his birthday is the next day.  
However, your presence would indeed make it more festive and birthday 
celebrationy!!
Eldon said that you were making dinner on Friday, the 9th, and that he was 
flying a plane to pick up Cameron and Rory in Carmel.  Have you guys spoken 
in the last few months!?!?!?  (kidding.)  And don't worry about my 
birthday--that's not the issue.  It's Eldon's 80th--that's huge.  Friday is 
the 9th.  So I'm just checking in to see what's up.  My very strong 
inclination--for a variety of reasons, but Eldon's b-day is the biggest 
one--is to cancel. 
Signed, 
confused 

                                                                              
                       
                    Nancy 
Sellers                                                                    
contact                                           
                                                                              
                       

I'm not sure what Friday will bring - the party as you know (for you and 
Eldon as far as I am concerned) is on Saturday - however, none of your 
friends will be there except us!  When would you normally get back? 

har-dee-har-har.  I mean, will we be celebrating in some fashion.  I'm 
scheduled to go to Houston--I'm not kidding--but if there's something 
planned, which I assume there is, then I'm going to cancel my trip to 
Houston, like pronto. 

Ironically, 
Jeff 

                    Nancy Sellers 
cooking! 

You are so sweet.  Thanks so much.  What's new?  What are we doing on the 
Friday of Eldon's b-day? 

                    Nancy Sellers 

                    02/27/2001 07:06 PM            Subject:     FW: Sonoma 
Coast Viticulture contact 

Finally - here is the name of the contact 

Nancy, sorry this took a while, but it will be worth it.  If anybody knows 
about the Sonoma Coast, it's this guy.  He's done work with Flowers, 
Kistler, etc. out there.  His name is Greg Bjornstad (sp.?) and his number 
is (707) 829-1687.  He doesn't really know me from a hole in the ground but 

you can "double reference" my name as Todd Graff's friend.  Todd is the 
winemaker at Sonoma Creek and is a good friend of mine who worked with Eric 

on some projects. 

Apologies.  The first version incorrectly left in some DWR credit issues and 
had a couple of other goofs.  Please discard and review and comment on this 
one.  But if you've already reviewed the other, no worries, since the 
attached is extremely similar (less the couple of goofs).  Thanks.

Lad can play both roles pretty effectively.

	Drew Fossum
	02/28/2001 01:57 PM
		
Thanks.  My guess is that someone ought to go and represent TW.  Fawcett and 
Harris ought to make that call.  Jeff D:  I assume you know who Lad Lorenz 
is.  Either Jeff:  does Lad's involvement signal anything to us--i.e., is he 
their "get stuff done guy" or their "try to look like you are getting stuff 
done guy" ?  DF

You get this?  Someone that I know forwarded it along to me.  Know anything 
about it?

Best,
Jeff

 - Capacity Forum.doc

Pat/Christian:
I'm assuming that the IOUs wouldn't be dumb enough to recommend something 
that would have an adverse effect on DWR's creditworthiness, but wanted to 
make sure you had a chance to review--just in case they're not as smart as I 
assume.  Thanks.

Jeff

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	02/28/2001 04:44 PM
		 
Edison and PG&E?have jointly filed the attached?request that  the Commission 
immediately act to rescind D.01-01-061, or in the alternative  grant 
rehearing and then significantly modify D.01-01-061. They specify that the  
?Commission must act to:
?
(1) delete the requirement that the utilities send revenues to the  
California Department of Water Resources (CDWR) based on the ratio of load  
served; 
?
(2)?clarify that the decision does not modify existing decisions  affecting 
Utility Retained Generation (URG); 
?
(3)?clarify how the Commission wants SCE to modify Advice Letter (AL)  1514-E 
and to confirm that AL 1514-E should not be withdrawn until a replacement  
advice letteris filed; 
?
(4) remove the directive that the utilities be scheduling coordinators;  and

(5)?eliminate the requirement that the utilities hold sums owed to  CDWR in 
trust.
?
Dan
Received: from dymwsm05.mailwatch.com by ArterHadden.com; Wed, 28 Feb 2001 
14:17:35 -0800
Received: from dymw0105.mailwatch.com (dymw0105.allegro.net [204.253.83.227]) 
by dymwsm05.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with SMTP id f1SMIj027723; Wed, 28 
Feb 2001 17:18:45 -0500
Received: from 204.253.83.26 by dymw0105.mailwatch.com with SMTP ( 
WorldSecure Server SMTP Relay(WSS) v4.3); Wed, 28 Feb 01 17:16:14 -0500
X-Server-Uuid: c41a640a-a9e9-11d4-8124-00508bd3f8dc
Received: from dnsp1.sce.com (dnsp1.sce.com [155.13.48.3]) by 
dymwsm11.mailwatch.com (8.11.0/8.11.0) with ESMTP id f1SLoDE29280; Wed, 28 
Feb 2001 16:50:14 -0500
Received: from D058661.sce.com (D058661.sce.com [155.13.167.39]) by 
dnsp1.sce.com (AIX4.3/8.9.3/5.5.5) with ESMTP id NAA59688; Wed, 28 Feb 2001 
13:49:04 -0800
Received: from go2ntswpr01.sce.com (go2ntswpr01.sce.com [155.13.76.17]) by 
D058661.sce.com (AIX4.3/8.9.3/5.5.5) with ESMTP id NAA57416; Wed, 28 Feb 2001 
13:49:02 -0800
Received: from go2ntdomc01.sce.com (unverified) by go2ntswpr01.sce.com ( 
Content Technologies SMTPRS 2.0.15) with ESMTP id 
<B0005981399@go2ntswpr01.sce.com>; Wed, 28 Feb 2001 13:48:23 -0800

To all parties on the e-mail service list for A.00-11-038:

Attached is a copy of the Joint Application of SCE and PG&E for Rehearing
of D.01-01-06 which was filed today, February 28, 2001.   A copy is also
being served to all parties of record via U.S. mail.

(See attached file: JointApp.pdf)
 - JointApp.pdf

The author is a very well-know Republican, Dan Schnur. 

Needed - Star to Guide Us
As Gov. Gray Davis gets the state deeper into the energy business, PUC chair 
is no bright light 
Dan Schnur
Wednesday, February 28, 2001 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle 
URL: 
http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/chronicle/archive/2001/02/28/E
D102858.DTL 
IN A DEAL that serves mainly to malign the good name of white elephants, Gray 
Davis last week proposed to solve California's energy crisis by spending 
several billion dollars of taxpayer money to purchase more than 30,000 miles 
of transmission lines from the state's utilities. 
In addition to offering to pay the privately owned utilities more than twice 
the book value, Davis will put the state on the hook for more than a billion 
dollars in desperately needed repairs to the transmission system. None of 
which will do anything to keep the lights on this summer when temperatures 
start to rise and the state's lack of power capacity leads to regular rolling 
blackouts. 
Davis' proposal also raises the question of which state employees will take 
on this highly complex and technical challenge. Since assuming control of the 
purchase of electricity from the utilities last month, state bureaucrats have 
been folded, spindled and mutilated in their efforts to negotiate prices with 
seasoned private sector professionals. 
California is currently paying more than $50 million per day for electricity, 
running up a bill that will exceed $2 billion by the end of February. Not 
reassuring is the prospect of the same negotiators being entrusted with the 
operation and upkeep of the power lines. 
Facing re-election next year, Davis knows that any rate increase would be 
political hemlock. So the governor's other primary objective would seem to be 
identifying other words to describe the rate increases Californians will soon 
pay. 
Doing great damage to Capitol thesauruses, Davis has announced something he 
calls a "dedicated rate component." The practical effect will be the 
expiration of the temporary 10 percent rate reduction and a permanent 9 
percent rate increase. 
Translated into English from the original Davis-ese, the solution means most 
Californians will soon pay almost 20 percent more for their electricity. The 
billions of dollars in revenue bonds that Davis will issue have already been 
double-promised, both to pay back state coffers for the electricity currently 
being purchased and to subsidize the future cost of keeping the utilities 
solvent. It's a good bet that the 20 percent increase is just the beginning. 
Unfortunately, Davis' twin goals of spending billions of dollars to bail out 
the utilities and avoiding rate hikes are mutually and utterly contradictory. 
The reason that the utilities need saving in the first place is because the 
state has forbidden them from charging market prices for electricity. And the 
only way that the state can continue to offer artificially low rates is to 
either raise taxes, eliminate other spending programs, or pretend to 
subsidize the cost with the same bonds that have already been 
double-committed. 
Knowing that there's not nearly enough money available to allow Davis to keep 
all of his promises, the utilities themselves have done an admirable job of 
restraining their enthusiasm for the governor's proposal. Southern California 
Edison's leaders, recognizing a gun to their head when they saw it, signed 
onto the deal. PG&E seems ready to fight on, but they're not bargaining from 
a position of great strength. Public opinion is already solidly against the 
utilities, and it's not like they can start supplying power to Arizona if 
they can't come to terms with Davis. 
If the state is going to involve itself so deeply in the energy business, 
Davis needs to find some qualified assistance. Unfortunately, he has instead 
entrusted California's electricity future to a Democratic Party campaign 
worker with virtually no experience in energy or power-related issues. 
Just over a year ago, Davis appointed Loretta Lynch, a San Francisco trial 
lawyer and longtime Democratic campaign aide, to fill a vacancy on the state 
Public Utilities Commission. Less than 60 days after Lynch joined the 
commission, Davis promoted her to the chairmanship. 
Lynch prepared for her responsibilities through several years in state 
Democratic politics, including stints as assistant campaign manager for state 
Attorney General John Van de Kamp's unsuccessful campaign for governor in 
1990, 
as deputy campaign manager for Dianne Feinstein's successful U.S. Senate 
campaign in 1992 and as campaign manager for Delaine Eastin's 1994 race for 
state superintendent of public instruction. For good measure, Lynch worked 
with aides to then-Gov. Bill Clinton in 1992 to squelch media investigations 
into the earliest reports of the emerging Whitewater scandal. This is the 
resume of someone whose only previous experience with electricity had been 
turning on and off the lights at state Democratic Party headquarters. 
Lynch's lack of experience and knowledge about energy has undoubtedly helped 
turn a significant problem into a full-fledged disaster. California's 
utilities spent months begging for permission and guidelines to sign 
long-term agreements with suppliers that would have greatly reduced 
electricity prices. Both the utilities and their suppliers say that Lynch and 
her fellow commissioners turned a deaf ear. As late as December, Lynch was 
still telling the news media that no emergency existed and that California 
had all the electricity it needed. All things considered, Davis might as well 
have named James Carville as commander of the California National Guard. 
More than 20 years ago, then-California Gov. Jerry Brown appointed another 
young campaign worker to a critically important position in his 
administration. 
Rose Bird, whose only prior legal experience was as a deputy public defender 
in Santa Clara County, was named as Chief Justice of the state's Supreme 
Court. 
By the time California voters made her the first Supreme Court justice in the 
state's history to be recalled from the bench, she had managed to overturn 
more than 60 death sentences. 
Until her death in 1999, Bird helped define an entire generation of 
California politics and public safety debate. Ironically, one of the keys to 
Davis' election as governor was his ability to distance himself from the 
legacy of both Brown and Bird. But Davis may have repeated his former boss's 
worst mistake when he named an equally inexperienced campaign staffer to lead 
the state agency that is tasked with the responsibility for solving 
California's electricity crisis. 
There is still time for Davis to avoid punchline status. But he must 
immediately replace Lynch with someone who possesses the experience and 
expertise to help lead California through this critical time. 
Davis, who is the most politically calibrated of governors, may already be 
heading in this direction. Polls show that Californians disapprove of the job 
the state PUC is doing by overwhelming margins. By the time voters learn that 
it's the governor's job to oversee the PUC, Davis may decide that keeping a 
political crony in such an important position is a luxury he can't afford. 
Because the last thing he wants is to head into a re-election campaign being 
forced to defend the Rose Bird of electricity. 
Dan Schnur, longtime veteran of California politics, was communications 
director for Republican presidential candidate John McCain and for former 
Gov. Pete Wilson. 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle   Page A21 

I'd LOVE to.  Have class from 6:30 to 9:30......

	"Scott Laughlin" <scottwl@hotmail.com>
	02/28/2001 05:23 PM
		 
Tomorow night at Atlas Cafe the Dark Hollow Band is playing, featuring Larry 
Cohea on banjo, that guy who tried to kiss Prentice on guitar (John 
Kornhauser), and that thick-glasses, stick-thin, white-trash lookin' woman 
on bass (y'all know the one, 'specially you Cameron). I figure we should go 
on down there as a preliminary rage for Jeff's Fowtee-ieth. What you say? 
Goes from 8-10, so they say.

Here's the URL: http://members.home.net/ukecat/dkhollow.html

LATE!
_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

Minor edit.  No big deal. Check it out.

Thanks so much for responding, Sally.  Very interested in exploring the 
possibilities with you.  Greatly appreciated. 

Wow, that's the only other Jeff Dasovich I've ever heard of.  No kidding.  
Referred to you by Lee Green. Don't yet have soil test or temp profiles, but 
am in the process of figuring out how to get them done.  Any suggestions are 
welcome and appreciated.  I'll be around the weekend of March 10th.  If that 
works for you, great; otherwise, we can try another date.  

Again, can't thank you enough for responding.  I don't know where it'll lead, 
but I've got a hunch that it just might work out.

Enjoy drinking your wine (had the syrah recently) and very much look forward 
to meeting you.

All the best,
Jeff

	Sally Ottoson <pacstar@mcn.org>
	02/28/2001 05:05 PM
	Please respond to pacstar
		 
Hi Jeff:
I know a Jeff Dasovich, exact spelling, an attorney in
Oklahoma City...I'm looking forward to talking to you about
the potential for vineyard. Please call me at 707-964-1155,
I zoom around pretty fast but should be able to get down
there soon. Do you have soil test results/temp profiles -
were you referred to me by Alan Green of Greenwood Ridge?  Sally

Funny thing.  Right after we'd discussed my company's mark to market 
accounting in class on Monday, this article showed up on Wednesday.  Thought 
you might be interested.

TEXAS JOURNAL --- Energy Traders Cite Gains, But Some Math Is Missing ---- By 
Jonathan Weil Staff Reporter of The Wall Street Journal

Volatile prices for natural gas and electricity are creating high-voltage 
earnings growth at some companies with large energy-trading units. But 
investors 
counting on these gains could be in for a jolt down the road. 
 
  Shares of these companies have been on a tear lately. And some of the 
biggest 
players are in Houston, the center of the energy-trading industry. Dynegy 
Inc.'s 
stock is up more than fourfold so far this year at $53.438, and now trades 
for 
41 times what analysts project the company's 2000 earnings will be, according 
to 
First Call/Thomson Financial. Shares of Enron Corp., the largest trader of 
gas 
and electricity in North America, have nearly doubled this year to $84.875, 
or 
60 times earnings. Meanwhile, El Paso Energy Corp.'s stock has jumped 61% 
this 
year to $62.375, or 24 times earnings. 
 
  Traders at these and other companies are capitalizing on the wild price 
swings 
and supply fluctuations that have accompanied deregulation in some regional 
markets. Natural-gas prices have more than doubled in the past year, while 
supplies have tightened. And the rapid price fluctuations for electricity 
have 
prompted many large businesses to seek price protection through hedging or 
fixed-price contracts, generating large premiums for traders. 
 
  But what many investors may not realize is that much of these companies' 
recent profits constitute unrealized, noncash gains. Frequently, these 
profits 
depend on assumptions and estimates about future market factors, the details 
of 
which the companies do not provide, and which time may prove wrong. And 
because 
of minimal disclosure standards in these kinds of cases, it's difficult for 
investors to assess whose assumptions might be too aggressive, or what market 
changes might invalidate the assumptions -- and force earnings revisions. 
 
  "There could be a quality-of-earnings issue," says Tom Linsmeier, an 
associate 
professor of accounting at Michigan State University, who co-authored the 
U.S. 
Securities and Exchange Commission's rules on market-risk disclosures for 
financial instruments. "There certainly might be great volatility that could 
cause what now looks like a winning, locked-in gain to not arise sometime in 
the 
future." 
 
  The companies reject any suggestion that there may be quality problems with 
their earnings. 
 
  But at the heart of the situation is an accounting technique that allows 
companies to include as current earnings those profits they expect to realize 
from energy-related contracts and other derivative instruments in future 
periods, sometimes stretching over more than 20 years. 
 
  So-called mark-to-market accounting is mandated by accounting-rule makers 
when 
companies have outstanding energy-related contracts on their books at the end 
of 
a quarter, such as agreements to sell electricity or buy natural gas over a 
period of time at certain prices. Under those rules, companies estimate the 
fair 
market values of those contracts on their balance sheets each quarter as 
assets 
or liabilities. Changes in the value of a contract from quarter to quarter 
then 
are either added to or subtracted from net earnings. 
 
  If, for instance, the market price for natural gas rises above the price 
specified in a company's contract to buy gas, generally the company will 
record 
an unrealized gain. That gain is recognized as income and recorded as an 
asset 
on the company's balance sheet. At the end of each quarter, the contract is 
revalued. The value of the previously recorded asset is increased, and any 
increase in unrealized gain is recorded as additional income. Conversely, if 
the 
market value for gas falls, and the value of the contract has declined, any 
change in the contract's value is recorded on the company's balance sheet, 
and a 
loss is recorded on its income statement. e 
 
  Yet in their financial reports, the companies only vaguely describe the 
methods they use to come up with fair-value estimates on the contracts. 
Increasingly, quoted market prices offering independent guidance are becoming 
readily available for several years into the future. However, with some 
long-term derivative instruments, particularly electricity contracts, future 
market prices don't extend far enough to cover the full life of those 
contracts. 
And in those cases, companies are allowed to base valuations on their own 
undisclosed estimates, assumptions and pricing models. 
 
  "Ultimately they're telling you what they think the answer is, but they're 
not 
telling you how they got to that answer," says Stephen Campbell, an analyst 
at 
Business Valuation Services in Dallas. "That is essentially saying `trust 
me.'" 
 
  Accounting-rule makers at the Financial Accounting Standards Board have 
debated the subject of how to value energy-related contracts extensively in 
recent months. "Two companies in similar circumstances might apply different 
methods to estimate the fair value of their energy-related contracts and may 
arrive at widely different values," an FASB task force studying the issue 
wrote 
in a June report. "Those differences lead to the question of whether some of 
the 
methods in practice yield estimated amounts that are not representative of 
fair 
value." 
 
  Despite this concern, FASB isn't inclined to offer any explicit guidance 
for 
how such contracts should be valued. "There are just too many models and too 
many different types of instruments for us to have a one-size-fits-all type 
of 
model," explains Timothy Lucas, FASB's director of research in Norwalk, Conn. 
 
  One way to determine the size of a company's unrealized gains is to compare 
the change in the values of net assets from risk-management activities from 
quarter to quarter. Some companies also disclose how much they're adjusting 
their cash-flow statements to reflect unrealized gains that have been booked 
as 
earnings. That's how one can determine the size of the unrealized gains at 
Dynegy and Enron, for example, the two companies confirm. 
 
  A reporter's examination of Dynegy's financial filings shows the company's 
earnings are highly dependent on unrealized gains from risk-management 
activities. For its most recent quarter, ended June 30, Dynegy reported 
earnings 
of 38 cents a diluted share -- 71% of which came from unrealized gains, the 
company confirms. (The company's per-share earnings would have been 20 cents 
higher if not for a one-time stock dividend.) For all of 1999, Dynegy 
recorded 
$115 million in unrealized gains, accounting for 51% of its earnings. 
 
  Enron confirms it booked $747 million in unrealized gains from 
risk-management 
activities during the second quarter, more than the company's total $609 
million 
in earnings before interest and taxes. Absent unrealized gains, the company 
would have reported a quarterly loss. For the quarter, the company reported 
earnings of 34 cents a diluted share, up 26% from a year earlier. 
 
  But not all companies disclose enough information for investors to 
calculate 
how large their unrealized gains are. El Paso says that's the case with its 
own 
quarterly reports, which disclose short-term assets and liabilities from 
risk-management activities -- but not long-term risk-management assets and 
liabilities. 
 
  For the second quarter, El Paso reported that its energy marketing and 
trading 
unit earned $152 million before interest and taxes, 24 times what it earned a 
year earlier. In an interview, El Paso's chief financial officer, Brent 
Austin, 
says unrealized gains represented about a third of that total. He says most 
of 
the cash from those gains will materialize within a year. 
 
  In its financial reports, Dynegy highlights the uncertainties with some 
contract valuations. It explains that with some long-term contracts for which 
market-price quotes aren't available, "the lack of long-term pricing 
liquidity 
requires the use of mathematical models to value these commitments . . . 
[using] 
historical market data to forecast future elongated pricing curves." Dynegy 
cautions that actual cash returns may "vary, either positively or negatively, 
from the results estimated." 

 But like Enron, El Paso and others, Dynegy provides scant details about its 
mathematical models -- such as the assumptions they use for market volatility 
and long-term price forecasts for natural gas and electricity. Nor is the 
company required to disclose more. 
 
  "The disclosure mentions risks," says John Cassidy, an analyst who tracks 
Dynegy for Moody's Investors Service in New York. "But I don't know that the 
disclosure offers enough detail for you to be able to quantify how much risk 
there is." 
 
  El Paso's filings warn that "because the valuation of these financial 
instruments can involve estimates, changes in the assumptions underlying 
these 
estimates can occur, changing our valuation and potentially resulting in 
financial losses." Enron cautions that the values it assigns to various 
transactions are based on "management's best estimate." 
 
  The companies are required to disclose what they think their maximum 
potential 
single-day risk-management losses might be, figures that also are based on 
various undisclosed market assumptions. But energy traders cite competitive 
reasons for not disclosing more. 
 
  "You don't necessarily want to tip off everyone to what you're doing," says 
John Harrison, chief financial officer for El Paso's merchant-energy unit. 
 
  Echoing remarks by executives at other energy traders, Enron's executive 
vice 
president and chief accounting officer, Richard Causey, says Enron runs a 
relatively balanced portfolio and that the estimates factored into his 
company's 
valuations are conservative. In large part, he says, those estimates are 
based 
on quoted market prices where available. Where they're not available, Mr. 
Causey 
says Enron bases its estimates in part on long-term pricing trends, as well 
as 
the company's own trading experience, which dates to 1990. 
 
  Further, Mr. Causey says, Enron's unrealized gains don't depend heavily on 
gains from long-term contracts that extend beyond the periods for which 
market 
quotes are available, reducing the potential for significant earnings 
revisions. 
The average length of Enron's risk-management contracts is just two years, he 
says. To be sure, though, some of Enron's electricity contracts extend for 25 
years. 
 
  "We're getting the cash in quicker than you might think," Mr. Causey says. 
"They don't stay unrealized very long." 
 
  El Paso says its contracts have an average life of six years, with some 
running as long as 20 years. Dynegy says the longest risk-management 
contracts 
for which it uses mark-to-market accounting are 10 years, though it doesn't 
disclose an average length. Dynegy's chief financial officer, Robert Doty, 
says 
96% of the company's gas contracts close out by 2002, while 75% of its power 
contracts expire by 2003. "The cash will come in," he says. 
 
  As for why the company doesn't disclose the extent of any bias, bullish or 
bearish, it has in the market, Dynegy executives say that information, like 
the 
estimates behind its mathematical models, is proprietary. Such disclosures 
may 
be outdated anyway by the time they could be included in public financial 
filings, says Michael Mott, a Dynegy vice president. Mr. Mott further 
explains 
that Dynegy could be realizing more cash earnings now if it wanted to. But 
"we 
don't see that would be in the best interests of shareholders," Mr. Mott 
says, 
because the company figures it can earn more later by leaving much of its 
gains 
unrealized for now. 
 
  Mr. Linsmeier of Michigan State compares the current situation for energy 
traders with the accounting controversies that engulfed subprime automobile 
and 
residential lenders during the late 1990s, though he emphasizes it's too far 
early to tell whether the consequences will be similar. Using so-called 
gain-on-sale accounting (a form of mark-to-market accounting), those lenders 
booked earnings from loans as soon as they were made, rather than having to 
wait 
for them to be paid off, as banks typically do. 
 
  But as interest rates fell in 1998, many customers paid off their loans 
earlier than expected, slashing lenders' profit margins. Compounding matters, 
the market for mortgage-backed securities dried up in the wake of financial 
chaos in Russia and other foreign markets, leaving lenders to bear the higher 
risks of many new loans. 
 
  Many investors complained they were blindsided, in part because these 
lenders 
generally hadn't disclosed their assumptions about prepayment rates and other 
variables. After the crash, subprime lenders routinely began disclosing the 
key 
assumptions used to value their mortgage portfolios. 
 
  At New York University, accounting professor Baruch Lev says investors 
would 
be better served if energy traders' financial filings explained the effects 
of 
hypothetical commodity-price movements on the values of their risk-management 
assets, and disclosed the basic assumptions about future commodity-price 
movements ingrained in their mathematical models. Says Mr. Lev, "I would like 
to 
see much more disclosure, particularly given that this is now becoming a 
significant component of their earnings." 
 

- - - - - - - - - - - -  Document Released on 2000-09-20 02:20:08.0 EST - - - 
- - - - - - - - -

FYI.  Well if she ain't sweet....
	Sally Ottoson <pacstar@mcn.org>
	02/28/2001 05:05 PM
	Please respond to pacstar
		 
Hi Jeff:
I know a Jeff Dasovich, exact spelling, an attorney in
Oklahoma City...I'm looking forward to talking to you about
the potential for vineyard. Please call me at 707-964-1155,
I zoom around pretty fast but should be able to get down
there soon. Do you have soil test results/temp profiles -
were you referred to me by Alan Green of Greenwood Ridge?  Sally

FYI.  Looks like what we suspected is about to launch, i.e., an orchestrated 
effort by Davis to go after the suppliers.  Just found out the following from 
Sue Mara, who attended the ISO board meeting today:

The ISO is scheduled to release a "report" today claiming that suppliers are 
price gouging.
The California AG has subpoena-ed generator-members of the WPTF---very 
extensive questions asking for just about everything under the sun.

Likely that we can expect a loud call for regional price caps very soon.

Best,
Jeff

	Karen Denne
	02/28/2001 06:25 PM
		 
Davis Wants Generators to Accept Less Than Owed (Update2)
2/28/1 18:56 (New York)

Davis Wants Generators to Accept Less Than Owed (Update2)

     (Adds names of California generators in fifth paragraph, and
Reliant comment in sixth.)

     New York, Feb. 28 (Bloomberg) -- California Governor Gray
Davis said he intends to ask power generators to accept partial
payment for power sold to the state's cash-strapped utilities this
summer and winter, Wall Street analysts who attended a closed-door
meeting with the governor said.
     ``It looks like the people he wants sharing the pain are the
companies generating power sold to utilities,'' said Kevin Boone,
a bond analyst with Bear, Stearns & Co. who attended the meeting
in New York. ``He wants to force them to take cents on the dollar.
That seems to be what his initial proposal will be.''
      PG&E Corp.'s Pacific Gas & Electric, and Edison
International's Southern California Edison, the state's largest
utilities, are near bankruptcy after accumulating more than $12
billion in debt buying power from generators at soaring prices.
Regulators have not let the utilities pass on most of their power-
buying debt to consumers.
     Davis said some generators have approached him with offers to
accept less than full payment, said Michael Worms, a utility
analyst with Gerard Klauer Mattison & Co. Davis spoke to about 35
analysts from Wall Street and energy-research firms in New York in
a meeting that was criticized by investors and analysts who were
not allowed to attend.

                        No Names Mentioned

    Davis didn't specify which companies came to him with partial-
payment proposals, analysts said. Duke Energy Corp., Calpine
Corp., Willams Cos., Dynegy Inc. and Reliant Energy Inc. are among
the biggest suppliers of electricity to California utilities.
    ``I'm not aware of him talking to anyone at Duke about
forgiveness,'' Duke Energy spokesman Tom Williams said.
      Reliant spokesman Richard Wheatley said Davis's proposal
``doesn't really come as a surprise'' because politicians in
Sacramento, the capital of California, have been discussing the
idea for weeks. Reliant has opposed anything other than full
payment of its debts.
    ``Williams fully expects to be paid the money that is owed
us,'' spokeswoman Paula Hall-Collins said. ``We have worked in
very good faith with the state, selling voluntarily into the
market, negotiating with them for long-term contracts and working
with them to solve the problem.''
      Enron Corp., an energy trader that has set aside unspecified
reserve for possible losses in California, has not been approached
about debt forgiveness, said Karen Denne, a company spokeswoman.
      ``This proposal. . . is news to us,'' and does not address
the immediate problem of electricity shortages in California this
summer, Denne said. Industry analysts say California, which has
already had scattered blackouts this winter, will face more this
summer when power demand surges.

                     Buying the Grid

     Davis said at the meeting that negotiations to buy PG&E
Corp.'s power transmission system may take another 30 days, though
he was optimistic an agreement could be reached within two weeks,
analysts said. He offered few other specifics on the PG&E talks,
said Steve Fetter, group managing director of global power for
Fitch Inc.
     State officials are trying to reach agreement with PG&E and
Edison, as well as with Sempra Energy, to buy their transmission
lines as part of a plan to help them pay debt and borrow money at
low interest rates to avoid bankruptcy. A tentative agreement to
buy Edison's lines for $2.76 billion was reached last week. Talks
with Sempra are continuing.
     The governor said he was optimistic an agreement with PG&E
could be reached in two weeks, but negotiations could drag on
longer, Fetter said.
       ``We are making progress,'' Davis said at a news conference
after the analysts meeting at the Cornell Club on the east side of
Manhattan. ``We are close to a final agreement with (Edison) and
relatively close with Sempra.''
      The governor told analysts he's confident he can get a
utility rescue plan that doesn't require an immediate rate
increase, but Davis did say that rate increases are going to be
needed at some unspecified time in the future, Fetter said.
    Davis said he wasn't sure if he resolved all of analysts'
doubts about California's plans to save its utilities from
bankruptcy.
    ``He's in a hole and he's got a long way to go to get out of
it,'' said Paul Patterson, an analyst with Credit Suisse First
Boston who attended the meeting. ``We still don't have a final
solution in sight.''
     Shares of San Francisco-based PG&E fell 9 cents to $13.96.
Rosemead, California-based Edison shares fell 4 cents to $14.90.
San Diego-based Sempra fell 16 cents to $22.15.

--Mark Johnson and Jonathan Berr in New York (212) 318-2300 or
mjohnson7@bloomberg.net and jberr@bloomberg.net with reporting by
Margot Habiby in Dallas and Jim Kennett in Houston/alp

What kind of contract?

	William Gang@EES
	02/28/2001 06:32 PM
		 
Think the 6-8 months is baloney.  Can you verify?

Bill
Weaver Paul Civ 95 CEG/CEOEE <Leo.Weaver@edwards.af.mil> on 02/28/2001 
10:40:36 AM
Bill,
Info...in recent talks SCE ventured the opinion that based on thier alleged
experience it would take 6 or 8 months to get a new contract cycled thru the
CPUC for approval and implementation.  If this is true (which I doubt) it
could impact on the operational capability of our PDA which expires in 7
months.  Do you folks agree it could not happen quicker.  If need be, do you
know any strategy for getting thru that process quicker?
Paul

Laura:
Thanks so much for including me on the list.  Quick question:  Which committe 
is this and who's on the committe?  Is there an agenda for the meeting on the 
5th?  Thanks again.
Best,
Jeff

Yes, I would like to attend if that would be possible.  Thanks very much for 
the info.  I assume that the folks on the committe are the energy managers of 
the companies (like K.C. Mares, who I met when I met with Justin a few weeks 
ago)?

Jeff

	"Laura Goldseth" <lgoldseth@svmg.org>
	02/28/2001 07:30 PM
		 
Jeff - this is the Energy Committee Meeting.  I have invited well over 100
people, all who are on the Committee...not everyone is able to attend
however.  I am working on the agenda and expect to get that out to everyone
tomorrow.  Unfortunately, I have to get an estimated count to Cisco, who is
hosting the meeting, so that they can prepare for Monday.  We will be
discussing legislation that is of interest to us and our member company's
and we will be attempting to assemble a coalition of companies and
organizations to stand with us in regards to the legislation being
considered.  A lot of info will be passed around.  Do you think you may
attend?  Laura

Laura:
Thanks so much for including me on the list.  Quick question:  Which
committe is this and who's on the committe?  Is there an agenda for the
meeting on the 5th?  Thanks again.
Best,
Jeff

	Karen Denne
	02/28/2001 06:25 PM
		 
Davis Wants Generators to Accept Less Than Owed (Update2)
2/28/1 18:56 (New York)

Davis Wants Generators to Accept Less Than Owed (Update2)

     (Adds names of California generators in fifth paragraph, and
Reliant comment in sixth.)

     New York, Feb. 28 (Bloomberg) -- California Governor Gray
Davis said he intends to ask power generators to accept partial
payment for power sold to the state's cash-strapped utilities this
summer and winter, Wall Street analysts who attended a closed-door
meeting with the governor said.
     ``It looks like the people he wants sharing the pain are the
companies generating power sold to utilities,'' said Kevin Boone,
a bond analyst with Bear, Stearns & Co. who attended the meeting
in New York. ``He wants to force them to take cents on the dollar.
That seems to be what his initial proposal will be.''
      PG&E Corp.'s Pacific Gas & Electric, and Edison
International's Southern California Edison, the state's largest
utilities, are near bankruptcy after accumulating more than $12
billion in debt buying power from generators at soaring prices.
Regulators have not let the utilities pass on most of their power-
buying debt to consumers.
     Davis said some generators have approached him with offers to
accept less than full payment, said Michael Worms, a utility
analyst with Gerard Klauer Mattison & Co. Davis spoke to about 35
analysts from Wall Street and energy-research firms in New York in
a meeting that was criticized by investors and analysts who were
not allowed to attend.

                        No Names Mentioned

    Davis didn't specify which companies came to him with partial-
payment proposals, analysts said. Duke Energy Corp., Calpine
Corp., Willams Cos., Dynegy Inc. and Reliant Energy Inc. are among
the biggest suppliers of electricity to California utilities.
    ``I'm not aware of him talking to anyone at Duke about
forgiveness,'' Duke Energy spokesman Tom Williams said.
      Reliant spokesman Richard Wheatley said Davis's proposal
``doesn't really come as a surprise'' because politicians in
Sacramento, the capital of California, have been discussing the
idea for weeks. Reliant has opposed anything other than full
payment of its debts.
    ``Williams fully expects to be paid the money that is owed
us,'' spokeswoman Paula Hall-Collins said. ``We have worked in
very good faith with the state, selling voluntarily into the
market, negotiating with them for long-term contracts and working
with them to solve the problem.''
      Enron Corp., an energy trader that has set aside unspecified
reserve for possible losses in California, has not been approached
about debt forgiveness, said Karen Denne, a company spokeswoman.
      ``This proposal. . . is news to us,'' and does not address
the immediate problem of electricity shortages in California this
summer, Denne said. Industry analysts say California, which has
already had scattered blackouts this winter, will face more this
summer when power demand surges.

                     Buying the Grid

     Davis said at the meeting that negotiations to buy PG&E
Corp.'s power transmission system may take another 30 days, though
he was optimistic an agreement could be reached within two weeks,
analysts said. He offered few other specifics on the PG&E talks,
said Steve Fetter, group managing director of global power for
Fitch Inc.
     State officials are trying to reach agreement with PG&E and
Edison, as well as with Sempra Energy, to buy their transmission
lines as part of a plan to help them pay debt and borrow money at
low interest rates to avoid bankruptcy. A tentative agreement to
buy Edison's lines for $2.76 billion was reached last week. Talks
with Sempra are continuing.
     The governor said he was optimistic an agreement with PG&E
could be reached in two weeks, but negotiations could drag on
longer, Fetter said.
       ``We are making progress,'' Davis said at a news conference
after the analysts meeting at the Cornell Club on the east side of
Manhattan. ``We are close to a final agreement with (Edison) and
relatively close with Sempra.''
      The governor told analysts he's confident he can get a
utility rescue plan that doesn't require an immediate rate
increase, but Davis did say that rate increases are going to be
needed at some unspecified time in the future, Fetter said.
    Davis said he wasn't sure if he resolved all of analysts'
doubts about California's plans to save its utilities from
bankruptcy.
    ``He's in a hole and he's got a long way to go to get out of
it,'' said Paul Patterson, an analyst with Credit Suisse First
Boston who attended the meeting. ``We still don't have a final
solution in sight.''
     Shares of San Francisco-based PG&E fell 9 cents to $13.96.
Rosemead, California-based Edison shares fell 4 cents to $14.90.
San Diego-based Sempra fell 16 cents to $22.15.

--Mark Johnson and Jonathan Berr in New York (212) 318-2300 or
mjohnson7@bloomberg.net and jberr@bloomberg.net with reporting by
Margot Habiby in Dallas and Jim Kennett in Houston/alp

Here is the final version.  I'll bring copies with me tomorrow to Sacramento 
and can drop them off at Hedy's office.  I meet with Kari Dohn at 10 AM and 
will be attending the AB 1890 Implementation Group meeting at 1:30.  I can 
drop off copies before I head out for the Dohn meeting.  If there's anything 
else, just let me know.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

In that case, definitely baloney.

Thanks, Steve. That helps clear things up enormously (at least in my little 
mind).

Best,
Jeff

	Steve Walton@ECT
	02/28/2001 09:27 PM
		
Jeff,
 In order for California to "shut its doors" it must open its 
interconnections with the rest of the west and become a Texas-like electrical 
island.  This they cannot do.  California has a substantial investment in 
units located in Nevada, Arizona, New Mexico and Utah.  The lights would go 
out in California if they opened the ties.  In the 1970's there was a hue and 
cry over loop flow, with California claiming that it was being injured by 
others, particularly by the interior systems trading practices, however they 
never considered opening the ties, because the benefits of interconnection 
were so large that the "cost" of loop flow was far exceeded by the value of 
regional trade, i.e., they are economically interdependent.

 If such a foolish thing were done and California full "closed its doors" by 
opening its ties, cost would go up in the Northwest, in California and all 
the rest of the Western System.  There are "gains for trade" which accrue to 
all parties from interconnection.  The trade is more complicated than just 
summer/winter peaks (seasonal load diversity) there is also seasonal resource 
diversity (Spring run off effects) and finally there opportunity to 
capitalize on storage vs base load thermal operations.  I will address the 
last point first to illustrate the complexity of the trading patterns.

 The interior west (Montana, Wyoming, Utah, Arizona and New Mexico) has large 
amount of base load coal plants.  As load drops off in those areas, the 
energy flows to the coast to back off peaking plants and to back off hydro.  
The reduction of hydro production allows night time reservoir refill which 
can be used to meet peak load in the Northwest and California.  This can be 
seen in the attached file, which contains a set of plots for hourly flow on 
the Pacific DC Intertie Jun97, Dec 97, Jun 98, Dec 98, Jun 99, Dec 99, 
Jun00.  In these plots the clear day/night exchange of energy can be seen, 
especially in the Jun00 plot when sales are being made to California in the 
day and to the Northwest at night.  This day to night storage exchange 
benefits lowers costs for everyone.

 On top of this daily/weekly cycle, there is the seasonal shift in load 
diversity you noted.  For the Northwest, its peak load occurs when energy 
production is the lowest -- during the winter.  As a stand alone system, the 
Pacific Northwest (i.e., the Columbia Drainage area) is energy constrained.  
The hydro in that area does not produce enough energy to meet annual needs.  
There is plenty of generating capacity to meet any peak, but not enough to 
total water flow.  Energy imports from Wyoming and Montana (e.g. Colstrip and 
Bridger) are required to allow the Pacific Northwest to meet its annual 
energy requirement.  With these energy inputs from the coal fields, the 
seasonal water budget can be arranged to get the most value out of the hydro 
system, although fish, navigation, irrigation, etc. impose an increasing 
number of constraints.  Energy imports from in the winter from the South help 
to meet this energy balance during the winter so water can be reserved until 
the snow pack is better know in early Spring.  Some of the sales to the 
Northwest from California during the winter are a result of displacement from 
Desert Southwest energy moving through California and then up the Interties 
to the Northwest.  

 Finally, the Spring run off/fish flush when production on the river is at a 
maximum and load in the Northwest is down.  The sale of these surpluses paid 
for the Pacific Intertie lines and remain important to the entire system.  
Much system maintenance of base load units has been historically been planned 
to take advantage of this factor.  Again both California and the Northwest 
benefit from this trade.  

 In all cases, the parties would be worse off if the ties were open and 
everyone was on their own.  The Northwest may be capacity long, but it is 
typically energy short, even in flush hydro years.  The winter energy imports 
from the South hold Northwest costs down just as spring run off sales to the 
South lower energy costs in California.  California cannot craft a solo 
solution that ignores the rest of the West.  It is probably hard to decide 
who would be worst off if California "closed its doors".  It is only clear 
that total cost would rise in both California and the rest of the West from 
which it divorced itself.

 I hope this rambling response comes at the question you raise.

Steve

	Jeff Dasovich@ENRON
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich@ENRON
	02/28/2001 11:35 AM
		
To Jim's last point.  I understand that the good 'ol utility system was often 
operated with little regard for basic economic principles, but there's 
something in this that seems very odd and difficult to assess, and it seems 
to always be tied to this notion that "California is a net importer, even in 
the winter."  I'm going to start with the economics and then let folks 
describe why it seemingly doesn't apply in Western electricity markets.

Just about every theory of economics and trade would lead to one conclusion:  
If California closes it's doors the other Western states will pay higher 
prices for power and/or face increased threats to reliability.  I'm 
struggling to try to determine why these basic principles aren't applicable 
to Western power markets.  I understand that the PNW is a very complex place 
and that the reasons could be embedded in the arcane structure that has 
developed over the years.

To keep it simple (though not necessarily accurate), I've confined the 
analysis to a world in which only the PNW and California exist.

The basic situation: The PNW peaks in the winter; California peaks in the 
summer.

Let's take two scenarios:

1)  The West, less California, is so awash in electricity that even in its 
peak--the Winter--it still has power to send to California, i.e., it has so 
overbuilt it's system that it has persistent surpluses to sell to California.

Irrespective, there have (to my limited knowledge) always been sales from CA 
to the PNW during the winter, when the PNW is peaking.
The only conclusion that one can make, assuming that the PNW is awash in 
electricity, is that the PNW takes the power in California because it makes 
economic sense to do so. That is, during the winter peaking months, it must 
be cheaper on the margin for the PNW to buy from California rather than 
produce itself.  Otherwise, it's difficult to understand why it would buy 
from California during this month, particularly if they're long.  As such, at 
a minimum, the PNW's electric bill will necessarily increase if California 
closes its doors.

2) Neither the PNW , nor California, has indigenous capacity to meet peaking 
load.  Therefore, the PNW must buy California's power during its peaking 
summer period, and California must buy power during it's summer peaking 
period.  In this case, not only will the PNW's bill go up if California 
closes its doors, the lights are likely to go because they'll be short power.

I realize that this is a simplistic model, and that there could be other 
legitimate economic factors driving the flows out of California to the PNW 
(e.g., transmission costs).  And again, I also realize that economics may not 
have traditionally been a driver in the industry.  But I thought it might be 
useful to get a common framework in place as a starting point for the 
question that Jim asks.

With that, I'll pose the question (understanding the simplicity of the model 
set forth above):  Given that California sends power north--even if the PNW 
is long---how can California closing it doors not increase the PNW's cost of 
power?

Best,
Jeff

	James D Steffes
	02/28/2001 08:05 AM
		
It seems to me that this information leads one to conclude that the value of 
an open transmission network is that California does not have to build 5,000 
MW of power plant (4,500 MW max input + 10%) in state.  In other words, if 
California were to disconnect from the grid, someone would have to build 
additional power plants in-state.

The cost to California consumers is therefore the annual carrying cost of 10 
500 MW plants (made even more expensive after California expropriates the 
current fleet of merchant generation).

From the perspective of the remainder of the West, the question still remains 
- if California does go it alone, what is the economic impact?  Other than 
legal arguments about Interstate Commerce, why should the Federal Government 
want to continue to pursue open acess?  This is the hard question that we 
need to answer.  

Jim

	Alan Comnes@ECT
	02/27/2001 09:40 PM
		 
Jim, Jeff:

Jim asked me in a voice mail what would be the cost to California of moving 
from the current (evolving) system of open access to a "protectionist" 
environment where access to the grid would be determined by a political body 
responding to populist pressures.

Here are some things to consider.  We can talk more and I welcome Sue Mara or 
Steve Walton's input:

California is a net importer so any restraint of trade would risk the state 
being able to meet its own demand.  See attached slides that show PNW-CA 
trade.  Even in the winter, power on a net basis flows south.

Limiting open access would primarily act to hold in-state generators hostage.
 this will kill incentives for new investment

If the ISO's proposal for market power mitigation are any guide of where a 
protectionist ISO would go:
 in-state generators would be required to sell forward or lose their market 
based rate certificates
 load serving entities would be required to contract forward for load and a 
reserve margin.  
  This is costly: it will lead to centralized planning solutions to 
reliability rather than more efficient market     outcomes
 Artifical notions of "just and reasonable" rates (on top of unreasonable 
reserve requirements) would lead to severe   reliability problems.  (In other 
words, if Steve Peace has his way, the imports into the state will drop 
off     signficanly)

There is no reason the state would be more effective at expanding the grid 
(e.g., Path 15) than the current system.  (Although, admittedly the current 
system has flaws.  The CAISO was set up with little thought to transmission 
expansion planning.  Other RTOs are not repeating this mistake.).  

	Lynnette Barnes
	03/02/2001 09:36 AM
		 

Thanks.  Got if fixed.

=09saceves@att.net
=0909/22/2000 05:39 PM
=09=09=20
Greetings Jeff,
Sorry for the delay in responding.  I would call TJ at=20
Haas (510) 643-0435 and have her help you get to the=20
right person.
Kindly,
Salvador

--
Salvador D. Aceves
Assistant Professor, Accounting
Director, Executive Education
School of Business and Management
University of San Francisco
2130 Fulton Street
San Francisco, CA  94117
Tel (415) 422-6263 fax (415) 422-2502     =20
e-mail: acevess@usfca.edu  =20
        =20
        =20
        =20
        =20
>=20
>=20
> Greetings professor:
>=20
> Sorry to bother you with this.  Sad to say that things were working well,=
=20
but
> now, for some reason, Izio won't let me in, saying that my password is no=
t
> correct (the one they sent me).  When I try to have them send me a new on=
e,=20
I
receive nothing.>=20
> =01; Is there someone I should contact to try and resolve?
>=20
> Second, I've been informed that I will be travelling on business on Decem=
ber
> 11th, which conflicts with the final.=01;Is it possible to take the final=
 the
> preceding week, or on the 13th or 14th?=01; Apologies for any inconvenien=
ce.
>=20
> Best,
> Jeff
>=20

Bill:  In order to assess, I need to understand the structure.  What's the 
contract structure look like now?  What are we proposed to change, including 
counterparties?  What part of the existing contract required any PUC approval 
and why?  What is Edison saying needs to happen at the PUC?

Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

	William Gang@EES
	03/01/2001 10:48 AM
		 
Can we answer Paul's question?

Bill
Weaver Paul Civ 95 CEG/CEOEE <Leo.Weaver@edwards.af.mil> on 03/01/2001 
09:45:30 AM
Bill,
I was referring to the PDA (WAPA) which expires 1 OCT 01.  We've been
advised it would take 6-8 months to cycle thru the CPUC after submittal.
I'm thinking it doesn't necessarily have to take that long before
approval/implementation...what do you think?
Paul
Good morning, Paul.  I apologise for not getting back to you yesterday, but
I am stuck in Seattle, and because of the earthquake, all flights are
cancelled, andI haven't been able to get on line until this morning.  It
has affected the phone connections.

There hasn't been much movement in the positions regarding open access in
the past week, so a conference call will not be fruitful at the moment.
The possible exception to this may be provided by Jeff Dasovich, who is
going to a meeting in Sacramento today.  If new information is promulgated
by that meeting, Jeff will email me, and I will set up a call for tomorrow.
Otherwise, let's plan on next Friday.  As usual, I will get breaking
information to you when it happens.

Also, in your last email, you said that someone from SCE is telling you
that it will take 6-8 months for the CPUC to process a new contract, and
Edwards was concerned that this may impact the PDA.  For clarification, the
"new contract" you referred to--is that the potential contract for
electricity that  we have been working on, or are you referring to
something else?

Hope I can get out of here today!

Regards,
Bill
Sent by:  Jeff Dasovich@ENRON

                    Scott Govenar

                    adv.com>            cc:

                                        Subject:

                    02/28/2001

                    11:00 AM

Attached, please find the latest information from the direct access
coalition.

Received: (qmail 77871 invoked by uid 41); 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: from nycxims1.edelman.com (63.96.56.110)  by mx7.quiknet.com with
SMTP; 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: by nycxims1.edelman.com with Internet Mail Service (5.5.2653.19)
id <FY7A0FGF>; Tue, 27 Feb 2001 22:46:37 -0500

Hello to the Direct Access Coalition:

Below you will find a summary of the press strategy that Edelman Public
Relations intends to employ over the coming weeks in collaboration with the
Alliance for Retail Energy Markets and the broader Direct Access Coalition.
I will also outline the information that I need from Direct Access
Coalition
members who are willing to be involved in media outreach and interviews.
And finally, I have attached supporting documents that you can use as
background material to prep for your responses to any media inquiries that
you may receive.

This Week

1.   We are drafting a "pitch letter" to send out by the end of this week
via blast e-mail and fax to the following media lists: 1)capitol press
corps
reporters; 2) mainstream media reporters working the energy crisis; and 3)
trade media.  We may also outreach to our editorial board list as well.
Our
pitch will be focused on what it will really mean for small business and
C&I
customers to lose the option of retail choice at a time when they are
suffering the financial hardships of skyrocketing energy bills. We will
address the effect on California's future business climate if direct access
is not preserved through legislation that corrects the problems that AB1x
caused for retail choice.  And finally, we will address the point that no
matter what direction California ultimately takes, direct access must be a
part of the solution.  Reporters have seen the recent polls which
illustrate
California businesses' concerns with the path the state is on so this is a
prime opportunity to build on those recent media stories.

2.    We recommend a conference call with AReM and the Direct Access
Coalition on Friday to address the questions and suggestions on the press
strategy outlined here.

3.     Determine which people in the Direct Access Coalition are willing to
take media calls on behalf of the coalition.

Next Week

1.   Follow up with key reporters who received the pitch letter.

2.   Evaluate the language of SB 27x and determine whether there will be an
opportunity to hold a news conference with Sen. Bowen in the near future.
Monitor movement at the PUC and determine whether a press conference may be
effective in this arena, or whether we may need to use the option of
sending
a media alert before the March 7 hearing, followed by a news release after
the hearing.

3.   Place op-eds (opinion pieces) with key newspapers.

4.   Contact radio news shows and TV public affairs shows (i.e. California
Capitol Week and the California Report) to secure
media interviews.

5.    Revise the SB 27x fact sheet (attached) to reflect the realities of
the amended language in SB 27x.

 What We Need From You

1.  If you are willing to speak with the media, or you have
customers/clients with a positive direct access story to tell, please
respond to this email as soon as you can with your name and contact
information.

2.  If you have draft op-eds written that need to be placed with newspapers
on behalf of your association and the broader coalition, we are willing to
do this for the you.

3.  If you have colleagues and/or staff that are already working with the
media it would be helpful to have this information so that we can
collaborate as necessary.

The Documents Below

>  All documents are works in progress, so if you have suggestions on
> potential changes, please feel free to share them with us.
>

Thank you.

>  <<AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc>>
>  <<Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc>>  <<AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc>>  <<AREM Fact
> FINAL3.doc>>
>
> Tracy Fairchild
> Account Supervisor
> Edelman Public Relations Worldwide
> (916) 442-2331
> tracy.fairchild@edelman.com
>

(See attached file: AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc)
(See attached file: Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc)
(See attached file: AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc)
(See attached file: AREM Fact FINAL3.doc)

Greetings Justin and Laura:
As we discussed there is a significant coalition of folks working at the 
Legislature to try to remove the prohibition on Direct Access included in 
Hertzberg's AB1X and recently signed by the Governor.

Simply put, it is clear that the prohibition will only be removed if the 
business community communicates clearly  and unequivocally and vociferously 
to the Legislature that Direct Access is a priority for business, and that 
the Legislature must amend AB1X to permit Direct Access.

I've attached the media plan developed by the PR firm that's working with ARM 
(Alliance for Retail Markets) to increase the focus on the need to re-instate 
Direct Access.  The ARM coalition of energy service providers has been the 
focal point of the ever-growing coalition that has developed (and continues 
to develop) around the Direct Access issue.

In order to succeed, it is critical to get as many members of the Silicon 
Valley Manufactures' Group to join in the effort and participate actively, 
particularly in the media effort.  

My colleague Sue Mara has been a key player in the ARM coalition and in the 
development of the medial effort.  She can provide you with any information 
and/or assistance that you need and can also get you in contact with Edelman, 
the PR firm directing the media effort.  Sue's number is 415.782.7802.  Her 
email is smara@enron.com.

And, as always, you can contact me at any time (415.782.7822).

Looking forward to any participation that you folks can offer.

All the best,
Jeff
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/28/2001 11:00 AM
		 
Attached, please find the latest information from the direct access
coalition.

Received: (qmail 77871 invoked by uid 41); 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: from nycxims1.edelman.com (63.96.56.110)  by mx7.quiknet.com with 
SMTP; 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: by nycxims1.edelman.com with Internet Mail Service (5.5.2653.19) id 
<FY7A0FGF>; Tue, 27 Feb 2001 22:46:37 -0500

Hello to the Direct Access Coalition:

Below you will find a summary of the press strategy that Edelman Public
Relations intends to employ over the coming weeks in collaboration with the
Alliance for Retail Energy Markets and the broader Direct Access Coalition.
I will also outline the information that I need from Direct Access Coalition
members who are willing to be involved in media outreach and interviews.
And finally, I have attached supporting documents that you can use as
background material to prep for your responses to any media inquiries that
you may receive.

This Week

1.   We are drafting a "pitch letter" to send out by the end of this week
via blast e-mail and fax to the following media lists: 1)capitol press corps
reporters; 2) mainstream media reporters working the energy crisis; and 3)
trade media.  We may also outreach to our editorial board list as well.  Our
pitch will be focused on what it will really mean for small business and C&I
customers to lose the option of retail choice at a time when they are
suffering the financial hardships of skyrocketing energy bills. We will
address the effect on California's future business climate if direct access
is not preserved through legislation that corrects the problems that AB1x
caused for retail choice.  And finally, we will address the point that no
matter what direction California ultimately takes, direct access must be a
part of the solution.  Reporters have seen the recent polls which illustrate
California businesses' concerns with the path the state is on so this is a
prime opportunity to build on those recent media stories.

2.    We recommend a conference call with AReM and the Direct Access
Coalition on Friday to address the questions and suggestions on the press
strategy outlined here.

3.     Determine which people in the Direct Access Coalition are willing to
take media calls on behalf of the coalition.

Next Week

1.   Follow up with key reporters who received the pitch letter.

2.   Evaluate the language of SB 27x and determine whether there will be an
opportunity to hold a news conference with Sen. Bowen in the near future.
Monitor movement at the PUC and determine whether a press conference may be
effective in this arena, or whether we may need to use the option of sending
a media alert before the March 7 hearing, followed by a news release after
the hearing.

3.   Place op-eds (opinion pieces) with key newspapers.

4.   Contact radio news shows and TV public affairs shows (i.e. California
Capitol Week and the California Report) to secure
media interviews.

5.    Revise the SB 27x fact sheet (attached) to reflect the realities of
the amended language in SB 27x.

 What We Need From You

1.  If you are willing to speak with the media, or you have
customers/clients with a positive direct access story to tell, please
respond to this email as soon as you can with your name and contact
information.

2.  If you have draft op-eds written that need to be placed with newspapers
on behalf of your association and the broader coalition, we are willing to
do this for the you.

3.  If you have colleagues and/or staff that are already working with the
media it would be helpful to have this information so that we can
collaborate as necessary.

The Documents Below

>  All documents are works in progress, so if you have suggestions on
> potential changes, please feel free to share them with us.
>

Thank you.

>  <<AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc>>
>  <<Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc>>  <<AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc>>  <<AREM Fact
> FINAL3.doc>>
>
> Tracy Fairchild
> Account Supervisor
> Edelman Public Relations Worldwide
> (916) 442-2331
> tracy.fairchild@edelman.com
>

 - AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc
 - Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc
 - AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc
 - AREM Fact FINAL3.doc

whaddya mean?

	Susan J Mara
	03/02/2001 01:36 PM
		 
Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854

FYI. 
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/02/2001 01:36 PM
		 
Greetings Justin and Laura:
As we discussed there is a significant coalition of folks working at the 
Legislature to try to remove the prohibition on Direct Access included in 
Hertzberg's AB1X and recently signed by the Governor.

Simply put, it is clear that the prohibition will only be removed if the 
business community communicates clearly  and unequivocally and vociferously 
to the Legislature that Direct Access is a priority for business, and that 
the Legislature must amend AB1X to permit Direct Access.

I've attached the media plan developed by the PR firm that's working with ARM 
(Alliance for Retail Markets) to increase the focus on the need to re-instate 
Direct Access.  The ARM coalition of energy service providers has been the 
focal point of the ever-growing coalition that has developed (and continues 
to develop) around the Direct Access issue.

In order to succeed, it is critical to get as many members of the Silicon 
Valley Manufactures' Group to join in the effort and participate actively, 
particularly in the media effort.  

My colleague Sue Mara has been a key player in the ARM coalition and in the 
development of the medial effort.  She can provide you with any information 
and/or assistance that you need and can also get you in contact with Edelman, 
the PR firm directing the media effort.  Sue's number is 415.782.7802.  Her 
email is smara@enron.com.

And, as always, you can contact me at any time (415.782.7822).

Looking forward to any participation that you folks can offer.

All the best,
Jeff
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/28/2001 11:00 AM
		 
Attached, please find the latest information from the direct access
coalition.

Received: (qmail 77871 invoked by uid 41); 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: from nycxims1.edelman.com (63.96.56.110)  by mx7.quiknet.com with 
SMTP; 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: by nycxims1.edelman.com with Internet Mail Service (5.5.2653.19) id 
<FY7A0FGF>; Tue, 27 Feb 2001 22:46:37 -0500

Hello to the Direct Access Coalition:

Below you will find a summary of the press strategy that Edelman Public
Relations intends to employ over the coming weeks in collaboration with the
Alliance for Retail Energy Markets and the broader Direct Access Coalition.
I will also outline the information that I need from Direct Access Coalition
members who are willing to be involved in media outreach and interviews.
And finally, I have attached supporting documents that you can use as
background material to prep for your responses to any media inquiries that
you may receive.

This Week

1.   We are drafting a "pitch letter" to send out by the end of this week
via blast e-mail and fax to the following media lists: 1)capitol press corps
reporters; 2) mainstream media reporters working the energy crisis; and 3)
trade media.  We may also outreach to our editorial board list as well.  Our
pitch will be focused on what it will really mean for small business and C&I
customers to lose the option of retail choice at a time when they are
suffering the financial hardships of skyrocketing energy bills. We will
address the effect on California's future business climate if direct access
is not preserved through legislation that corrects the problems that AB1x
caused for retail choice.  And finally, we will address the point that no
matter what direction California ultimately takes, direct access must be a
part of the solution.  Reporters have seen the recent polls which illustrate
California businesses' concerns with the path the state is on so this is a
prime opportunity to build on those recent media stories.

2.    We recommend a conference call with AReM and the Direct Access
Coalition on Friday to address the questions and suggestions on the press
strategy outlined here.

3.     Determine which people in the Direct Access Coalition are willing to
take media calls on behalf of the coalition.

Next Week

1.   Follow up with key reporters who received the pitch letter.

2.   Evaluate the language of SB 27x and determine whether there will be an
opportunity to hold a news conference with Sen. Bowen in the near future.
Monitor movement at the PUC and determine whether a press conference may be
effective in this arena, or whether we may need to use the option of sending
a media alert before the March 7 hearing, followed by a news release after
the hearing.

3.   Place op-eds (opinion pieces) with key newspapers.

4.   Contact radio news shows and TV public affairs shows (i.e. California
Capitol Week and the California Report) to secure
media interviews.

5.    Revise the SB 27x fact sheet (attached) to reflect the realities of
the amended language in SB 27x.

 What We Need From You

1.  If you are willing to speak with the media, or you have
customers/clients with a positive direct access story to tell, please
respond to this email as soon as you can with your name and contact
information.

2.  If you have draft op-eds written that need to be placed with newspapers
on behalf of your association and the broader coalition, we are willing to
do this for the you.

3.  If you have colleagues and/or staff that are already working with the
media it would be helpful to have this information so that we can
collaborate as necessary.

The Documents Below

>  All documents are works in progress, so if you have suggestions on
> potential changes, please feel free to share them with us.
>

Thank you.

>  <<AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc>>
>  <<Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc>>  <<AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc>>  <<AREM Fact
> FINAL3.doc>>
>
> Tracy Fairchild
> Account Supervisor
> Edelman Public Relations Worldwide
> (916) 442-2331
> tracy.fairchild@edelman.com
>

 - AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc
 - Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc
 - AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc
 - AREM Fact FINAL3.doc

You're very sweet.  Thank you so much.

Do we want to position this as "let the market do it, cuz it can do it better 
than Socalgas; but the market ain't going to do anything if you don't create 
an hospitable investment climate?"

Hi Laura:

Thanks very much.  If it works for you, I'd be happy to come to your office 
on either day to meet and catch up.  Just let me know.  I can be flexible.  
Have fun in DC.

Best,
Jeff

	Laura Ipsen <lipsen@cisco.com>
	03/02/2001 02:34 AM
		 
Jeff,

Thanks for all of the updates. I am off to DC with Chambers, but would like 
to have an opportunity to talk again when I return later next week. Let me 
know what times are free for you Wed. (3/7) or Thurs. (3/8).

Regards,

Laura

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/02/2001 01:36 PM
		 
Greetings Justin and Laura:
As we discussed there is a significant coalition of folks working at the 
Legislature to try to remove the prohibition on Direct Access included in 
Hertzberg's AB1X and recently signed by the Governor.

Simply put, it is clear that the prohibition will only be removed if the 
business community communicates clearly  and unequivocally and vociferously 
to the Legislature that Direct Access is a priority for business, and that 
the Legislature must amend AB1X to permit Direct Access.

I've attached the media plan developed by the PR firm that's working with ARM 
(Alliance for Retail Markets) to increase the focus on the need to re-instate 
Direct Access.  The ARM coalition of energy service providers has been the 
focal point of the ever-growing coalition that has developed (and continues 
to develop) around the Direct Access issue.

In order to succeed, it is critical to get as many members of the Silicon 
Valley Manufactures' Group to join in the effort and participate actively, 
particularly in the media effort.  

My colleague Sue Mara has been a key player in the ARM coalition and in the 
development of the medial effort.  She can provide you with any information 
and/or assistance that you need and can also get you in contact with Edelman, 
the PR firm directing the media effort.  Sue's number is 415.782.7802.  Her 
email is smara@enron.com.

And, as always, you can contact me at any time (415.782.7822).

Looking forward to any participation that you folks can offer.

All the best,
Jeff
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/28/2001 11:00 AM
		 
Attached, please find the latest information from the direct access
coalition.

Received: (qmail 77871 invoked by uid 41); 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: from nycxims1.edelman.com (63.96.56.110)  by mx7.quiknet.com with 
SMTP; 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: by nycxims1.edelman.com with Internet Mail Service (5.5.2653.19) id 
<FY7A0FGF>; Tue, 27 Feb 2001 22:46:37 -0500

Hello to the Direct Access Coalition:

Below you will find a summary of the press strategy that Edelman Public
Relations intends to employ over the coming weeks in collaboration with the
Alliance for Retail Energy Markets and the broader Direct Access Coalition.
I will also outline the information that I need from Direct Access Coalition
members who are willing to be involved in media outreach and interviews.
And finally, I have attached supporting documents that you can use as
background material to prep for your responses to any media inquiries that
you may receive.

This Week

1.   We are drafting a "pitch letter" to send out by the end of this week
via blast e-mail and fax to the following media lists: 1)capitol press corps
reporters; 2) mainstream media reporters working the energy crisis; and 3)
trade media.  We may also outreach to our editorial board list as well.  Our
pitch will be focused on what it will really mean for small business and C&I
customers to lose the option of retail choice at a time when they are
suffering the financial hardships of skyrocketing energy bills. We will
address the effect on California's future business climate if direct access
is not preserved through legislation that corrects the problems that AB1x
caused for retail choice.  And finally, we will address the point that no
matter what direction California ultimately takes, direct access must be a
part of the solution.  Reporters have seen the recent polls which illustrate
California businesses' concerns with the path the state is on so this is a
prime opportunity to build on those recent media stories.

2.    We recommend a conference call with AReM and the Direct Access
Coalition on Friday to address the questions and suggestions on the press
strategy outlined here.

3.     Determine which people in the Direct Access Coalition are willing to
take media calls on behalf of the coalition.

Next Week

1.   Follow up with key reporters who received the pitch letter.

2.   Evaluate the language of SB 27x and determine whether there will be an
opportunity to hold a news conference with Sen. Bowen in the near future.
Monitor movement at the PUC and determine whether a press conference may be
effective in this arena, or whether we may need to use the option of sending
a media alert before the March 7 hearing, followed by a news release after
the hearing.

3.   Place op-eds (opinion pieces) with key newspapers.

4.   Contact radio news shows and TV public affairs shows (i.e. California
Capitol Week and the California Report) to secure
media interviews.

5.    Revise the SB 27x fact sheet (attached) to reflect the realities of
the amended language in SB 27x.

 What We Need From You

1.  If you are willing to speak with the media, or you have
customers/clients with a positive direct access story to tell, please
respond to this email as soon as you can with your name and contact
information.

2.  If you have draft op-eds written that need to be placed with newspapers
on behalf of your association and the broader coalition, we are willing to
do this for the you.

3.  If you have colleagues and/or staff that are already working with the
media it would be helpful to have this information so that we can
collaborate as necessary.

The Documents Below

>  All documents are works in progress, so if you have suggestions on
> potential changes, please feel free to share them with us.
>

Thank you.

>  <<AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc>>
>  <<Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc>>  <<AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc>>  <<AREM Fact
> FINAL3.doc>>
>
> Tracy Fairchild
> Account Supervisor
> Edelman Public Relations Worldwide
> (916) 442-2331
> tracy.fairchild@edelman.com
>

 - AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc
 - Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc
 - AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc
 - AREM Fact FINAL3.doc

Folks:

Here's a catalogue of issues that Sue, Mona and I put together using Paul's 
outline as a guide.  Just a start (but a pretty good one), with lots more to 
do, but it should provide a solid platform to get the strategy completed in 
short order.  

Best,
Jeff

Laura:  FYI

Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/02/2001 01:36 PM
		 
Greetings Justin and Laura:
As we discussed there is a significant coalition of folks working at the 
Legislature to try to remove the prohibition on Direct Access included in 
Hertzberg's AB1X and recently signed by the Governor.

Simply put, it is clear that the prohibition will only be removed if the 
business community communicates clearly  and unequivocally and vociferously 
to the Legislature that Direct Access is a priority for business, and that 
the Legislature must amend AB1X to permit Direct Access.

I've attached the media plan developed by the PR firm that's working with ARM 
(Alliance for Retail Markets) to increase the focus on the need to re-instate 
Direct Access.  The ARM coalition of energy service providers has been the 
focal point of the ever-growing coalition that has developed (and continues 
to develop) around the Direct Access issue.

In order to succeed, it is critical to get as many members of the Silicon 
Valley Manufactures' Group to join in the effort and participate actively, 
particularly in the media effort.  

My colleague Sue Mara has been a key player in the ARM coalition and in the 
development of the medial effort.  She can provide you with any information 
and/or assistance that you need and can also get you in contact with Edelman, 
the PR firm directing the media effort.  Sue's number is 415.782.7802.  Her 
email is smara@enron.com.

And, as always, you can contact me at any time (415.782.7822).

Looking forward to any participation that you folks can offer.

All the best,
Jeff
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/28/2001 11:00 AM
		 
Attached, please find the latest information from the direct access
coalition.

Received: (qmail 77871 invoked by uid 41); 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: from nycxims1.edelman.com (63.96.56.110)  by mx7.quiknet.com with 
SMTP; 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: by nycxims1.edelman.com with Internet Mail Service (5.5.2653.19) id 
<FY7A0FGF>; Tue, 27 Feb 2001 22:46:37 -0500

Hello to the Direct Access Coalition:

Below you will find a summary of the press strategy that Edelman Public
Relations intends to employ over the coming weeks in collaboration with the
Alliance for Retail Energy Markets and the broader Direct Access Coalition.
I will also outline the information that I need from Direct Access Coalition
members who are willing to be involved in media outreach and interviews.
And finally, I have attached supporting documents that you can use as
background material to prep for your responses to any media inquiries that
you may receive.

This Week

1.   We are drafting a "pitch letter" to send out by the end of this week
via blast e-mail and fax to the following media lists: 1)capitol press corps
reporters; 2) mainstream media reporters working the energy crisis; and 3)
trade media.  We may also outreach to our editorial board list as well.  Our
pitch will be focused on what it will really mean for small business and C&I
customers to lose the option of retail choice at a time when they are
suffering the financial hardships of skyrocketing energy bills. We will
address the effect on California's future business climate if direct access
is not preserved through legislation that corrects the problems that AB1x
caused for retail choice.  And finally, we will address the point that no
matter what direction California ultimately takes, direct access must be a
part of the solution.  Reporters have seen the recent polls which illustrate
California businesses' concerns with the path the state is on so this is a
prime opportunity to build on those recent media stories.

2.    We recommend a conference call with AReM and the Direct Access
Coalition on Friday to address the questions and suggestions on the press
strategy outlined here.

3.     Determine which people in the Direct Access Coalition are willing to
take media calls on behalf of the coalition.

Next Week

1.   Follow up with key reporters who received the pitch letter.

2.   Evaluate the language of SB 27x and determine whether there will be an
opportunity to hold a news conference with Sen. Bowen in the near future.
Monitor movement at the PUC and determine whether a press conference may be
effective in this arena, or whether we may need to use the option of sending
a media alert before the March 7 hearing, followed by a news release after
the hearing.

3.   Place op-eds (opinion pieces) with key newspapers.

4.   Contact radio news shows and TV public affairs shows (i.e. California
Capitol Week and the California Report) to secure
media interviews.

5.    Revise the SB 27x fact sheet (attached) to reflect the realities of
the amended language in SB 27x.

 What We Need From You

1.  If you are willing to speak with the media, or you have
customers/clients with a positive direct access story to tell, please
respond to this email as soon as you can with your name and contact
information.

2.  If you have draft op-eds written that need to be placed with newspapers
on behalf of your association and the broader coalition, we are willing to
do this for the you.

3.  If you have colleagues and/or staff that are already working with the
media it would be helpful to have this information so that we can
collaborate as necessary.

The Documents Below

>  All documents are works in progress, so if you have suggestions on
> potential changes, please feel free to share them with us.
>

Thank you.

>  <<AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc>>
>  <<Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc>>  <<AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc>>  <<AREM Fact
> FINAL3.doc>>
>
> Tracy Fairchild
> Account Supervisor
> Edelman Public Relations Worldwide
> (916) 442-2331
> tracy.fairchild@edelman.com
>

 - AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc
 - Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc
 - AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc
 - AREM Fact FINAL3.doc

Dude:  Thanks very much.  Looking forward to tonite.  You won't believe 
this--this morning, I heard on the radio that today--that's right, today--is 
Doc Watson's birthday.  Killer...

Best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/02/2001 03:05 PM
		 
Laura:  FYI

Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/02/2001 01:36 PM
		 
Greetings Justin and Laura:
As we discussed there is a significant coalition of folks working at the 
Legislature to try to remove the prohibition on Direct Access included in 
Hertzberg's AB1X and recently signed by the Governor.

Simply put, it is clear that the prohibition will only be removed if the 
business community communicates clearly  and unequivocally and vociferously 
to the Legislature that Direct Access is a priority for business, and that 
the Legislature must amend AB1X to permit Direct Access.

I've attached the media plan developed by the PR firm that's working with ARM 
(Alliance for Retail Markets) to increase the focus on the need to re-instate 
Direct Access.  The ARM coalition of energy service providers has been the 
focal point of the ever-growing coalition that has developed (and continues 
to develop) around the Direct Access issue.

In order to succeed, it is critical to get as many members of the Silicon 
Valley Manufactures' Group to join in the effort and participate actively, 
particularly in the media effort.  

My colleague Sue Mara has been a key player in the ARM coalition and in the 
development of the medial effort.  She can provide you with any information 
and/or assistance that you need and can also get you in contact with Edelman, 
the PR firm directing the media effort.  Sue's number is 415.782.7802.  Her 
email is smara@enron.com.

And, as always, you can contact me at any time (415.782.7822).

Looking forward to any participation that you folks can offer.

All the best,
Jeff
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	02/28/2001 11:00 AM
		 
Attached, please find the latest information from the direct access
coalition.

Received: (qmail 77871 invoked by uid 41); 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: from nycxims1.edelman.com (63.96.56.110)  by mx7.quiknet.com with 
SMTP; 28 Feb 2001 04:07:03 -0000
Received: by nycxims1.edelman.com with Internet Mail Service (5.5.2653.19) id 
<FY7A0FGF>; Tue, 27 Feb 2001 22:46:37 -0500

Hello to the Direct Access Coalition:

Below you will find a summary of the press strategy that Edelman Public
Relations intends to employ over the coming weeks in collaboration with the
Alliance for Retail Energy Markets and the broader Direct Access Coalition.
I will also outline the information that I need from Direct Access Coalition
members who are willing to be involved in media outreach and interviews.
And finally, I have attached supporting documents that you can use as
background material to prep for your responses to any media inquiries that
you may receive.

This Week

1.   We are drafting a "pitch letter" to send out by the end of this week
via blast e-mail and fax to the following media lists: 1)capitol press corps
reporters; 2) mainstream media reporters working the energy crisis; and 3)
trade media.  We may also outreach to our editorial board list as well.  Our
pitch will be focused on what it will really mean for small business and C&I
customers to lose the option of retail choice at a time when they are
suffering the financial hardships of skyrocketing energy bills. We will
address the effect on California's future business climate if direct access
is not preserved through legislation that corrects the problems that AB1x
caused for retail choice.  And finally, we will address the point that no
matter what direction California ultimately takes, direct access must be a
part of the solution.  Reporters have seen the recent polls which illustrate
California businesses' concerns with the path the state is on so this is a
prime opportunity to build on those recent media stories.

2.    We recommend a conference call with AReM and the Direct Access
Coalition on Friday to address the questions and suggestions on the press
strategy outlined here.

3.     Determine which people in the Direct Access Coalition are willing to
take media calls on behalf of the coalition.

Next Week

1.   Follow up with key reporters who received the pitch letter.

2.   Evaluate the language of SB 27x and determine whether there will be an
opportunity to hold a news conference with Sen. Bowen in the near future.
Monitor movement at the PUC and determine whether a press conference may be
effective in this arena, or whether we may need to use the option of sending
a media alert before the March 7 hearing, followed by a news release after
the hearing.

3.   Place op-eds (opinion pieces) with key newspapers.

4.   Contact radio news shows and TV public affairs shows (i.e. California
Capitol Week and the California Report) to secure
media interviews.

5.    Revise the SB 27x fact sheet (attached) to reflect the realities of
the amended language in SB 27x.

 What We Need From You

1.  If you are willing to speak with the media, or you have
customers/clients with a positive direct access story to tell, please
respond to this email as soon as you can with your name and contact
information.

2.  If you have draft op-eds written that need to be placed with newspapers
on behalf of your association and the broader coalition, we are willing to
do this for the you.

3.  If you have colleagues and/or staff that are already working with the
media it would be helpful to have this information so that we can
collaborate as necessary.

The Documents Below

>  All documents are works in progress, so if you have suggestions on
> potential changes, please feel free to share them with us.
>

Thank you.

>  <<AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc>>
>  <<Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc>>  <<AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc>>  <<AREM Fact
> FINAL3.doc>>
>
> Tracy Fairchild
> Account Supervisor
> Edelman Public Relations Worldwide
> (916) 442-2331
> tracy.fairchild@edelman.com
>

 - AREM Fact Sheet 2212001 ver 2272001.doc
 - Q&A @ ESP Reversions 22701.doc
 - AReM FAQ FINAL3.doc
 - AREM Fact FINAL3.doc

Just talked to Peevey.  He told me that he and Freeman personally worked with 
Bilas on Bilas' draft decision--the decision designed to make CDWR 
creditworthy and keep the PUC from touching Direct Access until the 
Legislature has a chance to fix the AB1X prohibition.

I made the pitch re: decision does what it takes to fix the creditworthy 
issue and the Commission needs to vote it out immediately.  He said he agreed 
but expressed his general frustration with the decision making process 
generally, and said that he is not certain right now if the decision is 
greased to get voted out at the next Commission meeting.

He said that he's going to be talking to the Governor this afternoon and will 
push the issue with him.  I asked him to keep me updated.  He said that he 
would.

I told him that it wasn't helpful that the Governor named names in New York 
regarding alleged agreements about "haircuts," particularly when folks are 
trying to negotiate deals with DWR. He wasn't aware of that and asked me to 
fax him the Merril press, which I did.  I'll also fax him our letter 
supporting the Bilas decision.

Best,
Jeff

zeigheil (sp?), dude.

Thanks very much, Laura.  If it's appropriate, I would like to attend?  Just 
let me know.  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/02/2001 07:05 PM
		 
Greetings:

There will be a PR call on Monday at 10:00 to discuss specific PR strategies
this week under the Market Response group. We will be discussing
distribution development and the Cal Journal ad for April as well as provide
an update on the polling.   We will send out a more detailed agenda this
weekend.

Conference Call in Number:
   1-800-486-2460

Pass code:

120895

It is important to note that this call is separate from the "Public Affairs"
call set up for 3:00 on Monday to discuss process, etc. From now on we will
also refer to the PR/Market Response team as the Public Affairs committee.

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/02/2001 07:08 PM
		 
Greetings:

As many of you know, the IEP Board met last week and decided upon a new
committee structure within IEP. The Public Affairs Committee was created to
replace the Market Response Committee with Greg Blue appointed as the
interim chairperson. We would like to move to establish this new committee
as soon as possible and meet to discuss direction, specific upcoming issues,
an overall plan, budget and structure for the year. We would like to start
this process with a conference call on Monday March 5, 2001 at 3:00 p.m.
Please see call in information below. (It is not necessary for any
consultants to participate in the Monday call.)   This conference call will
be followed by an in-person meeting here at IEP on Thursday March 8, 2001 at
2:00 p.m.

If you are interested in participating on this committee please signify that
with an e-mail response to this message.

For those planning on participating on the conference call we will send out
the agenda on Monday.  During that conference call we will also set the
agenda for the Thursday in person meeting. During the Thursday meeting we
would also like to move to select a permanent chairperson.

Thank you for your attention to this important matter and I look forward to
continuing to work with each of you and make this new committee structure a
success.
I have set up a permanent Conference Call in number and Pass-code for the
Public Affairs Committee that we will use every time we have a conference
call.  We will begin using this call-in number on Monday.
The call in number for Monday's 3:00 p.m. call is is:
   1-800-486-2460
The Pass-code is:
120895

Thanks,

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/02/2001 07:08 PM
		 
Greetings:

As many of you know, the IEP Board met last week and decided upon a new
committee structure within IEP. The Public Affairs Committee was created to
replace the Market Response Committee with Greg Blue appointed as the
interim chairperson. We would like to move to establish this new committee
as soon as possible and meet to discuss direction, specific upcoming issues,
an overall plan, budget and structure for the year. We would like to start
this process with a conference call on Monday March 5, 2001 at 3:00 p.m.
Please see call in information below. (It is not necessary for any
consultants to participate in the Monday call.)   This conference call will
be followed by an in-person meeting here at IEP on Thursday March 8, 2001 at
2:00 p.m.

If you are interested in participating on this committee please signify that
with an e-mail response to this message.

For those planning on participating on the conference call we will send out
the agenda on Monday.  During that conference call we will also set the
agenda for the Thursday in person meeting. During the Thursday meeting we
would also like to move to select a permanent chairperson.

Thank you for your attention to this important matter and I look forward to
continuing to work with each of you and make this new committee structure a
success.
I have set up a permanent Conference Call in number and Pass-code for the
Public Affairs Committee that we will use every time we have a conference
call.  We will begin using this call-in number on Monday.
The call in number for Monday's 3:00 p.m. call is is:
   1-800-486-2460
The Pass-code is:
120895

Thanks,

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

i send her just about everything.  if she wasn't on distribution list, it was 
an oversight that i'll correct, fellow "responder" on the upcoming panel in 
houston.

best,
jeff

Thank you very much for the tech data.  Margaret, is there data out there 
regarding the California utilities performance (i.e., how many rolling 
blackouts, etc. v. national average)?  Thanks again.

Sandi:
Apologies.  Inadvertently didn't include you on first distribution.
Best,
Jeff
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/02/2001 07:05 PM
		 
	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/02/2001 07:08 PM
		 
Greetings:

As many of you know, the IEP Board met last week and decided upon a new
committee structure within IEP. The Public Affairs Committee was created to
replace the Market Response Committee with Greg Blue appointed as the
interim chairperson. We would like to move to establish this new committee
as soon as possible and meet to discuss direction, specific upcoming issues,
an overall plan, budget and structure for the year. We would like to start
this process with a conference call on Monday March 5, 2001 at 3:00 p.m.
Please see call in information below. (It is not necessary for any
consultants to participate in the Monday call.)   This conference call will
be followed by an in-person meeting here at IEP on Thursday March 8, 2001 at
2:00 p.m.

If you are interested in participating on this committee please signify that
with an e-mail response to this message.

For those planning on participating on the conference call we will send out
the agenda on Monday.  During that conference call we will also set the
agenda for the Thursday in person meeting. During the Thursday meeting we
would also like to move to select a permanent chairperson.

Thank you for your attention to this important matter and I look forward to
continuing to work with each of you and make this new committee structure a
success.
I have set up a permanent Conference Call in number and Pass-code for the
Public Affairs Committee that we will use every time we have a conference
call.  We will begin using this call-in number on Monday.
The call in number for Monday's 3:00 p.m. call is is:
   1-800-486-2460
The Pass-code is:
120895

Thanks,

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

	JBennett <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	03/02/2001 04:53 PM
		 
 <<X22350.DOC>>  <<BILASALT.DOC>>

 - X22350.DOC
 - BILASALT.DOC

=09"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
=0903/02/2001 07:03 PM
=09Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
=09=09=20

Date: 3/2/01

RECENT EVENTS:

-- AB 8x (Migden), which would give the EOB additional and undefined powers
related to the coordination of operation and maintenance schedules, passed
the Assembly ECA committee 14 to 0.  This measure came from the Governor=01=
,s
office in response to one of his Executive Orders.  IEP, along with several
IEP members, opposed the bill in committee, but noted commitments to workin=
g
with the author on language.

IEP counsel drafted comments which are attached.  PLEASE PROVIDE COMMENT BY
NOON ON MONDAY so that these changes may be considered by the author before
the next committee hearing.  The measure will go to the Assembly
Appropriations Committee next.

-- AB 60x (Hertzberg), which would have required, as a condition of
permitting a powerplant, developers to offer to sell the power to Californi=
a
entities, was pulled from the Assembly ECA Committee hearing at the last
minute.  IEP is working with the Chair of the committee and the Speaker=01,=
s
office on appropriate language that would preferably not be tied to the
siting process but provide the needed political cover on this new, growing
=01&California First=018 concept.  Any suggestions on how to deal with the
=01&California First=018 issue is welcomed.

-- IEP, along with the other QF stakeholders, had an opportunity to brief
the Senate Energy Committee staff on SB 47x (Battin).  The measure will be
heard in the committee on Tuesday next week.

-- The Senate Environmental Quality committee met this week to hear SB 28x
(Sher/Battin) which makes various changes to the siting process including
many IEP-sponsored proposals.  So far this is the most comprehensive and
positive siting bill introduced, with the greatest chance of moving forward=
.
The bill passed out of the committee on a 7 to 0 vote even though most of
the environmental community testified in opposition.  Chris Ellison and I
are continuing to work with the authors=01, staff to develop additional
language which should be available before the measure is heard in the Senat=
e
Energy Committee on Tuesday.

-- AB 45x (Kelley) also passed 7 to 0 out of the Assembly Revenue and
Taxation Committee this week.  AB 45x would extend the manufacturers
investment credit (MIC) to include the generation of electricity through th=
e
use of solar, wind, geothermal, solid-fuel biomass, waste tire, municipal
solid waste, digester gas, or hydropower with a generating capacity of 30
megawatts or less.  The bill does not include a generator who produces
electricity for sale to a utility pursuant to a contract originally entered
into before January 1, 2001.  The committee staff estimates revenue losses
in the range of $5 to $10 million annually beginning in 2001-02. Sponsored
by CalEnergy, AB 45x will heard in the Assembly Appropriations Committee
next.

-- AB 36x (Wright), which would apply specified repower projects to the
6-month expedited siting process established in AB 970 (2000), passed out o=
f
the Assembly Energy Costs and Availability Committee 17 to 0.  IEP testifie=
d
in support of the bill, noting we were still working with the author on
language.  IEP continues to believe that with the current language, few, if
any, projects would qualify and is working with staff on fixing that.
Recent conversations, however, with one of Asm. Wright=01,s staff indicates
Wright would be willing to drop the bill if the language IEP wants is
already in another measure (SB 28x).  Wright would then carry some other
siting language IEP supports and not in any other vehicle.  I will be
follow-up on this next week and welcome any suggestions.

-- ACR 4x (Cohn), which urges the CEC to move swiftly to license the Metcal=
f
Energy Center and to permit its construction., passed off the Assembly floo=
r
71 to 0.  The measure, which has 5 primary authors and 42 co-authors, is
headed to the Senate a policy committee hearing.

-- A hearing in the Assembly Natural Resources Committee for AB 34x (La
Suer), which would make various changes to the siting process, including
some IEP-sponsored proposals, was put off again.  The author will be
accepting amendments that will make it a study bill in the special session.
The author will try to move the larger measure in its original form during
the regular session.

-- The Senate Energy Committee held an informational hearing on Energy
Market Reform this week.  Stakeholders, especially the generators, were
grilled on current market problems and solutions.  Senator Bowen, Chair of
the committee, was clearly unhappy with generator=01,s comments.  It is
unclear, however, how forthcoming her staff was regarding what participants
should have been prepare for in terms of the of the line of questioning tha=
t
came primarily from Senators Bowen and Dunn.  Bowen suggested she was going
to hold another hearing on the issue on a date to be determined later.

--  Attached is the most recent legislative tracking report of all the
special session bills introduced to date.  I have separated out the regular
session list of bills since the list was getting out of control.  I will
send that list under separate cover as I=01,m still plowing through the ove=
r
1,300 bills that were introduced last Friday.  Please let me know if you
need copies of any of these bills.

UPCOMING EVENTS:

MONDAY, March 5th
Senate Appropriations Committee
10 am, Room 4203
SB 39x (Speier) =01) defines a generator as a utility

Assembly Energy Costs and Availability Committee
Subcommittee on Energy Oversight
2 pm, Room 4202
Info Hearing on Electricity Supply and Demand for Summer 2001.

TUESDAY, March 6th
Assembly Natural Resources Committee
10 am, Room 437
AB 55x (Pacheco) =01) exempts CEQA for repowers.
AB 68x (Firebaugh) =01) California First
ACR 2x (Cogdill) =01) power production and long-term contracts

Senate Energy Committee
1:30 pm, Room 4203.
SB 28x (Sher/Battin) =01) makes various changes to the siting process.
SB 47x (Battin/Keeley) =01) QF bill

Assembly Energy Costs and Availability Committee
2 pm, Room 4202.

THURSDAY, March 8th
Assembly Natural Resources Committee
Room 437
AB 34x (La Suer) =01) makes various changes to siting.

--end--

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - 2001 Tracking Report.doc
 - ab08x.IEP comments.doc

	James D Steffes
	03/01/2001 01:18 PM
		 
FYI.  Info on Gov Davis meeting with Wall Street.

Jim

	Michael Tribolet/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/01/2001 11:30 AM
		 
This is one of the better overviews of all the issues from CSFB.

.

 - ppp030101.pdf

A meeting with Sen. Bowne's staffer Lawrence Lingbloom took place on 3.2.01 
to discuss fixing the DA prohibition in AB1X.
About 30+ other interested parties attended.  
On 3.1.01 Bowen's office had distributed a complex proposal; and the meeting 
was convened to discuss the proposal.
The proposal distributed by Lingbloom was unacceptable and rejected but at 
least it acknowledged the need to allow some level of DA, i.e., moved away 
from a complete prohibition on DA.
After much discussion, Lingbloom left the meeting for a while, during which 
time the group engaged in a productive discussion with CDWR/CA Dept. of 
Finance.
The group asked DWR/Finance if they could agree to a program that: 
a) treats bond financing costs as a nonbypassable charge designed to cover 
the period during which the customer consumed power subsidized and purchased 
by DWR;

b) includes an exit fee for customers switching to DA if, and only if, there 
are actual costs associated with power contracts signed by DWR that might be 
"stranded";

c) permits an open season for "free switching" to DA when demand exceeds the 
sum of DWR's firm contract portfolio, retained generation and QF cost. This 
would mean that the amount of load covered by DWR's spot purchases, plus new 
load growth, should not face restrictions on Direct Access.

DWR wanted to include an agreement on information exchange, which might 
include noncore customers advising DWR in advance when they will switch to DA.
In return, DWR offered to post information about their power contracts and 
terms AFTER contracts were executed. 
Enron's outside attorney is drafting language to capture the concepts 
discussed at the 3.2.01 meeting.
The draft will be distributed and discussed on Monday, 3.5.01.

in office mon-wed
travel to houston on thurs
in houston on friday

	Joseph Alamo
	03/02/2001 07:41 PM
		 
Please forward your *anticipated* schedules to me for next week, as soon as 
possible.

Thanks in advance for your assistance.

Joseph Alamo
Sr. Administrative Assistant
Government Affairs - The Americas
San Francisco CA 

Yes, I'll be in Houston this week.  We could discuss there. But might be 
useful to discuss tomorrow when you return.  I'm available.  Seems useful to 
try to get a start on it tomorrow.  You available for a quick call?  My 
schedule's pretty flexible.

Best,
Jeff

Apologies.  At a loss to figure out how in the heck your name disappeared 
from this mega-list.
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/04/2001 12:30 PM
		 
A meeting with Sen. Bowne's staffer Lawrence Lingbloom took place on 3.2.01 
to discuss fixing the DA prohibition in AB1X.
About 30+ other interested parties attended.  
On 3.1.01 Bowen's office had distributed a complex proposal; and the meeting 
was convened to discuss the proposal.
The proposal distributed by Lingbloom was unacceptable and rejected but at 
least it acknowledged the need to allow some level of DA, i.e., moved away 
from a complete prohibition on DA.
After much discussion, Lingbloom left the meeting for a while, during which 
time the group engaged in a productive discussion with CDWR/CA Dept. of 
Finance.
The group asked DWR/Finance if they could agree to a program that: 
a) treats bond financing costs as a nonbypassable charge designed to cover 
the period during which the customer consumed power subsidized and purchased 
by DWR;

b) includes an exit fee for customers switching to DA if, and only if, there 
are actual costs associated with power contracts signed by DWR that might be 
"stranded";

c) permits an open season for "free switching" to DA when demand exceeds the 
sum of DWR's firm contract portfolio, retained generation and QF cost. This 
would mean that the amount of load covered by DWR's spot purchases, plus new 
load growth, should not face restrictions on Direct Access.

DWR wanted to include an agreement on information exchange, which might 
include noncore customers advising DWR in advance when they will switch to DA.
In return, DWR offered to post information about their power contracts and 
terms AFTER contracts were executed. 
Enron's outside attorney is drafting language to capture the concepts 
discussed at the 3.2.01 meeting.
The draft will be distributed and discussed on Monday, 3.5.01.

Mike (Day):
As you know from the work with the DA coalition, UC/CSU is extremely 
interested in ensuring that the prohibition on DA included in AB1X gets 
"fixed" in SB27X.  Of couse we'd ideally like to make sure that the language 
providing the "fix" makes it crystal clear that customers retain the right 
going forward.  There's some concern that the "fix" language that's been 
floating around thus far needs some tightening to wring out the ambiguities.  
In that regard, Mike Smith is going to try to craft some language and forward 
it to you.  We'll need to try to get Mike (Smith's) language into the draft 
that you're putting together based on last Friday's meeting, preferably 
before  you circulate the next draft to the DA coalition.  Mike Smith, I'll 
assume that you'll contact Mike Day directly, but Mike (Day), if there's any 
questions, don't hesitate to contact me.  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

Brilliance begets brilliance.

you still at school?  call me at work.

thanks for a great dinner and a fun time.  eldon, thanks for slaughtering me 
at three--count 'em, three--games of cowboy.

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/05/2001 12:07 PM
		 
Greetings:
Attached please find the new draft of the "Seeing the Light".  You can see
that some holes remain to be filled in - particularly in the solutions
section at the end and we will be using the solutions we came up with at the
last in-person meeting as the foundation.  In light of recent activities it
may also be wise to add an Operations and Maintenance section with
comparisons as to how facilities were operated in the past and how they are
operated now.

On the production side, the graphs etc. have not been replicated yet and
McNally Temple will use the new data from MRW to make adjustments.

As always we invite comments and suggestions on this as well as any
suggested additions.  Please review this document this week and give me any
initial comments as soon as possible.  I would like the first round of
comments by COB on Thursday so we can turn it around for another review.
Thank you for taking the time to review this and as always please let me
know if you have any questions.

Thanks!

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

 - Update to Seeing the Light 3-1-01.doc

thanks.  who's jeff shields?

	Paul Kaufman@ECT
	03/05/2001 01:29 PM
		 
FYI.
Jeff Shields
02/26/2001 09:46 AM
I participated in a meeting on Friday afternoon in which staff of the 
California Energy Oversight Board and the Cal Energy Commission briefed 
representatives of the Governor's offices in Washington and Oregon on a 
variety of energy related matter. Prior to the meeting the California folks 
were given a list of topic areas and specific questions relating to the 
respective topics. I have a list of those questions that I will be happy to 
provide if your interested. Following are some notes regarding the discussion 
that took place.

The first topic area was about the projected load/resource balance for this 
summer in California. The Californian's provided a one page listing of the 
various resources and anticipated loads that they expect to exist this 
summer. They expect Peak Demand + 7% Reserves to be 61,125 MW's. They have 
59,209 in total "existing resources."  They expect to have 3,050 MW off the 
existing resources off-line for much of the summer. The net short position is 
4,966 MW. 

Governor Davis expects 5,053 MW of new generation. The Oversight Board and 
CEC believe this is probably going to be 2,500 MW at best. Many of the 
numbers were based on some suspect assumptions, including such things as an 
expectation that BPA will be in a position to make some exports to Cal this 
summer. 

A second topic area is air quality. Governor Davis has asked all of the local 
Air Quality management Districts to relax emission standards for this summer. 
The problem is that California has some rules requiring older plants to 
comply with BACT by 1-1-2002. Many plant owners have ordered the equipment to 
comply and are anticipating being down to install this. There is no single 
coordinator with reliable information on these planned outages. 

NW Power Planning Council staff told the Californian's that they should 
expect the NW Hydro system to be 4000 MW below normal through October, beyond 
that who knows.

It was interesting to listen to the CEC explain how California has gone from 
a system that didn't allow long-term energy contracts to the current effort 
to secure long-term contracts with little capability to manage spot and 
short-term transactions. 

According to the Cal guys, the state expects to be severely energy 
constrained starting in June, even if they manage to have capacity. This is 
largely a function of gas supply.

An economist from the Washington State Energy Office said the between 1997 
and 2004 Washington has seen a 150 % increase in demand for natural gas. He 
said Oregon is up 110% in that same time frame. Apparently much of the supply 
to get through this winter is coming from storage which will have to be 
replenished, creating a conflict with anticipated generation capability this 
summer. 

California is starting to discuss an industrial curtailment program for this 
summer. Like so many of California's efforts, there is no coordinated effort 
around this program. 

The CEC said they are bracing for 20-100 hours of blackouts this summer. 
While this doesn't sound like a lot, I believe the blackouts  at the end of 
the year were only about 5-10 hours ( this is a guess on my part based on 
what I recall from news reports). 

Jeff

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/05/2001 03:28 PM
		 
For the call today we will be discussing:
o Overall issues (how we got here)
o Issues facing industry which require Public Affairs response
o Overall Plan for the year
o Budget and Resources
o Structure, funding and decision making
o Plan for Thursday (do we want an in-person meeting?)

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Greetings:

As many of you know, the IEP Board met last week and decided upon a new
committee structure within IEP. The Public Affairs Committee was created to
replace the Market Response Committee with Greg Blue appointed as the
interim chairperson. We would like to move to establish this new committee
as soon as possible and meet to discuss direction, specific upcoming issues,
an overall plan, budget and structure for the year. We would like to start
this process with a conference call on Monday March 5, 2001 at 3:00 p.m.
Please see call in information below. (It is not necessary for any
consultants to participate in the Monday call.)   This conference call will
be followed by an in-person meeting here at IEP on Thursday March 8, 2001 at
2:00 p.m.

If you are interested in participating on this committee please signify that
with an e-mail response to this message.

For those planning on participating on the conference call we will send out
the agenda on Monday.  During that conference call we will also set the
agenda for the Thursday in person meeting. During the Thursday meeting we
would also like to move to select a permanent chairperson.

Thank you for your attention to this important matter and I look forward to
continuing to work with each of you and make this new committee structure a
success.
I have set up a permanent Conference Call in number and Pass-code for the
Public Affairs Committee that we will use every time we have a conference
call.  We will begin using this call-in number on Monday.
The call in number for Monday's 3:00 p.m. call is is:
        1-800-486-2460
The Pass-code is:
120895

Thanks,

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Thanks.  All comments/edits welcome and appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

	"Ken Smith" <ken@kdscommunications.com>
	03/05/2001 11:50 AM
	Please respond to "Ken Smith"
		 
Jeff --
?
I made a couple changes and saved them to my attached file (I  renamed it 
with my initials so you'd know which version had come from me).?  I want to 
take a closer look at this and maybe offer a few more later this  morning.? 
All in all, I think everyone's on the right  track.
 - Principles 0304 ks.doc

FYI.

can you send the ackerman email around?  calger wasn't there; left him a 
voice mail. expect to hear back shortly.

Best,
Jeff

FYI--Davis includes us as one of the companies he signed up. I'm only aware 
of a 30-day deal with an option to extend for 5 years (option ends toward the 
end of the month, as I understand it). Not aware of any other deals we've 
done with DWR at this time, though others are on the table----DWR's 
creditworthiness remains an issue.
Best,
Jeff

Davis announces first round of long-term power contracts 
DON THOMPSON, Associated Press Writer
Monday, March 5, 2001 
,2001 Associated Press 
(03-05) 12:31 PST SACRAMENTO (AP) -- The state has reached 40 long-sought 
long-term contracts and other agreements to keep power flowing to customers 
of two financially ailing utilities, Gov. Gray Davis announced Monday. 
The deals will supply an average of nearly 8,900 megawatts per year for 
Southern California Edison and Pacific Gas and Electric Co. customers over 
the next 10 years and let the state buy power for far less than it has been 
paying on the costly spot market, Davis said in a written statement. 
One megawatt is enough power for about 1,000 households. 
For the first five years, the contracts provide power at an average price of 
$79 per megawatt hour, about 75 percent below recent costs on the spot 
electricity market, Davis said. 
The price drops to an average of $61 per megawatt hour, about 80 percent 
below spot prices, he said. 
``These agreements are the bedrock of a long-term energy solution,'' Davis 
said in remarks prepared for delivery Monday afternoon in Los Angeles. ``The 
provide reliability at a reasonable price.'' 
Some of the contract negotiations will result in accelerated power plant 
construction, adding an estimated 5,000 megawatts to the state grid within 
the next two years, some by this summer, Davis said. 
The contracts amount to 75 percent of the long-term deals the Davis 
administration has sought under a new law that lets the state spend an 
estimated $10 billion over a decade to buy power for Edison and PG&E 
customers. 
Davis has pitched such contracts as one way to lift California out of its 
energy crisis. Negotiations have taken longer than expected, however, as his 
administration and power providers haggled over how much the state should 
pay. 
The Davis administration wants to stop paying for power on the expensive spot 
market, where desperation to keep the lights on leads to inflated prices. 
On Friday, the state released another $500 million to continue making such 
purchases on behalf of the state's two big cash-strapped utilities, bringing 
its spending so far to some $3.2 billion since early January. 
The agreements announced Monday include more than 20 power suppliers, 
including electricity giants Duke Energy, Calpine, Dynegy, Enron and Reliant. 
Davis declined to release details on individual contracts. 
Duke Energy said it has reached a $4 billion, nine-year agreement to sell 
electricity to the state. 
The memorandum of understanding calls for Duke to provide 550 megawatts 
starting next Jan. 1. That's enough power for roughly 550,000 households. 
That amount would rise to 800 megawatts Jan. 1, 2003, enough electricity for 
the equivalent of 800,000 households. The contract would continue through 
2010. 
``We believe long-term contracts provide the critical underpinning for a 
stable electricity market and are happy the state is moving in that 
direction,'' Bill Hall, head of Duke's California operations, said in a 
written statement. 
The state is buying about one-third of the power used by the customers of 
Edison and PG&E. Both have been denied credit by suppliers who fear the 
financially troubled utilities won't pay for the power. 
California plans to recover those costs by issuing $10 billion in revenue 
bonds in May, with the rest of that money going to finance the cheaper, 
long-term power contracts. 
In addition to the long-term contracts, the Department of Water Resources has 
reached 11 agreements letting it buy a substantial amount of power on the 
day-ahead market, cutting the state's payment of premium prices on the 
real-time market, Davis said. 
A Stage 1 power alert was called Monday morning with reserves threatening to 
drop to 7 percent due to power plant maintenance and low electricity imports, 
said Patrick Dorinson, spokesman for the Independent System Operator. The ISO 
manages the state's power grid. 

I'm worried about the commercial guys---they're in a "rock no boats" mode in 
anticipation of perhaps signing the 5-year deal.  I'll let you know what 
Calger sez soon as he gets back to me.  He's in a meeting.

Best,
Jeff

	Karen Denne
	03/05/2001 04:34 PM
		
30 days is hardly long-term.... i think we should call him on it.

FYI--Davis includes us as one of the companies he signed up. I'm only aware 
of a 30-day deal with an option to extend for 5 years (option ends toward the 
end of the month, as I understand it). Not aware of any other deals we've 
done with DWR at this time, though others are on the table----DWR's 
creditworthiness remains an issue.
Best,
Jeff

Davis announces first round of long-term power contracts 
DON THOMPSON, Associated Press Writer
Monday, March 5, 2001 
,2001 Associated Press 
(03-05) 12:31 PST SACRAMENTO (AP) -- The state has reached 40 long-sought 
long-term contracts and other agreements to keep power flowing to customers 
of two financially ailing utilities, Gov. Gray Davis announced Monday. 
The deals will supply an average of nearly 8,900 megawatts per year for 
Southern California Edison and Pacific Gas and Electric Co. customers over 
the next 10 years and let the state buy power for far less than it has been 
paying on the costly spot market, Davis said in a written statement. 
One megawatt is enough power for about 1,000 households. 
For the first five years, the contracts provide power at an average price of 
$79 per megawatt hour, about 75 percent below recent costs on the spot 
electricity market, Davis said. 
The price drops to an average of $61 per megawatt hour, about 80 percent 
below spot prices, he said. 
``These agreements are the bedrock of a long-term energy solution,'' Davis 
said in remarks prepared for delivery Monday afternoon in Los Angeles. ``The 
provide reliability at a reasonable price.'' 
Some of the contract negotiations will result in accelerated power plant 
construction, adding an estimated 5,000 megawatts to the state grid within 
the next two years, some by this summer, Davis said. 
The contracts amount to 75 percent of the long-term deals the Davis 
administration has sought under a new law that lets the state spend an 
estimated $10 billion over a decade to buy power for Edison and PG&E 
customers. 
Davis has pitched such contracts as one way to lift California out of its 
energy crisis. Negotiations have taken longer than expected, however, as his 
administration and power providers haggled over how much the state should 
pay. 
The Davis administration wants to stop paying for power on the expensive spot 
market, where desperation to keep the lights on leads to inflated prices. 
On Friday, the state released another $500 million to continue making such 
purchases on behalf of the state's two big cash-strapped utilities, bringing 
its spending so far to some $3.2 billion since early January. 
The agreements announced Monday include more than 20 power suppliers, 
including electricity giants Duke Energy, Calpine, Dynegy, Enron and Reliant. 
Davis declined to release details on individual contracts. 
Duke Energy said it has reached a $4 billion, nine-year agreement to sell 
electricity to the state. 
The memorandum of understanding calls for Duke to provide 550 megawatts 
starting next Jan. 1. That's enough power for roughly 550,000 households. 
That amount would rise to 800 megawatts Jan. 1, 2003, enough electricity for 
the equivalent of 800,000 households. The contract would continue through 
2010. 
``We believe long-term contracts provide the critical underpinning for a 
stable electricity market and are happy the state is moving in that 
direction,'' Bill Hall, head of Duke's California operations, said in a 
written statement. 
The state is buying about one-third of the power used by the customers of 
Edison and PG&E. Both have been denied credit by suppliers who fear the 
financially troubled utilities won't pay for the power. 
California plans to recover those costs by issuing $10 billion in revenue 
bonds in May, with the rest of that money going to finance the cheaper, 
long-term power contracts. 
In addition to the long-term contracts, the Department of Water Resources has 
reached 11 agreements letting it buy a substantial amount of power on the 
day-ahead market, cutting the state's payment of premium prices on the 
real-time market, Davis said. 
A Stage 1 power alert was called Monday morning with reserves threatening to 
drop to 7 percent due to power plant maintenance and low electricity imports, 
said Patrick Dorinson, spokesman for the Independent System Operator. The ISO 
manages the state's power grid. 

FYI. As if we weren't having enough fun with electricity....
Note last paragraph of press release calling on government to "get out of t=
he=20
way" and "let the private sector solve the problems in the gas market."

Jeff

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE   CONTACT: James Fisfis
March 5, 2001        (916) 319-2071

GOP MOVES NATURAL GAS TO FRONT BURNER
Assembly Republicans join together once again to request Davis to call=20
special session.

(SACRAMENTO) =01) Assembly Republicans united Monday in asking Governor Gra=
y=20
Davis to call a special session of the California legislature to deal with=
=20
skyrocketing natural gas prices.

=01&Families and businesses are reeling every month from extraordinary gas=
=20
prices.  Pardon the expression, but the natural gas crisis no longer belong=
s=20
on California=01,s back burner,=018 said Assembly Republican leader Bill Ca=
mpbell=20
(R =01) Villa Park).

Assembly Republicans unanimously signed a letter to Governor Gray Davis=20
asking for him to convene a special session of the legislature to deal with=
=20
California=01,s skyrocketing natural gas bills.  Republicans delivered the=
=20
letter to Davis this morning.

=01&A special session is both a symbolic and a practical necessity.  It tel=
ls=20
Californians that we care about their skyrocketing gas bills.  It tells=20
businesses everywhere that California is going to provide for its future=20
energy needs,=018 said Campbell.  =01&Practically speaking, a special sessi=
on also=20
allow us to pass legislation which can take effect immediately.=018

Republicans believe the electricity and natural gas crises are inextricably=
=20
linked.

=01&California=01,s natural gas crisis is completely intertwined with its=
=20
electricity crisis,=018 said Campbell.  =01&Any plan to deal with our elect=
ricity=20
crisis must have a natural gas component or Californians are going to pay=
=20
unacceptably high prices for both.=018

Assembly Republicans believe the natural gas crisis has many fronts, all of=
=20
which could be addressed comprehensively by a special session.

=01&Natural gas issues include pipeline capacity, storage, exploration,=20
alternative fuels and conservation,=018 said Campbell.  =01&A special sessi=
on lets=20
us put together a comprehensive solution.=018

=01&The private sector has the expertise and the capital to deal with these=
=20
issues if government would just get out of the way.  Republicans believe th=
at=20
a legislative solution to the natural gas crisis should leave the resources=
=20
and primary decision-making to the private sector,=018 said Campbell.

# # #
=09Susan J Mara
=0903/05/2001 05:14 PM
=09=09=20
in case you didn't see this

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854
=09"Costigan, Richard" <Richard.Costigan@asm.ca.gov>
=0903/05/2001 02:51 PM
=09=09=20

 <<press release.doc>>  <<Natgastps - rep legislation.doc>>  <<Republican
Energy Address.doc>>  <<QA.doc>>  <<DOE powerpoint.ppt>>

Attached are documents that were part of today's Assembly GOP press
conference on the pending natural gas crisis.  If you have any questions,
please call me.

Thanks,

RSC

Richard Costigan, III
Chief of Staff
Office of the Assembly Republican Leader
California State Assembly
(916) 319-2071

 - press release.doc
 - Natgastps - rep legislation.doc
 - Republican Energy Address.doc
 - QA.doc
 - DOE powerpoint.ppt

been on vacation.  i'm back.  would you like me to call?

Tom Chapman@ECT
08/21/2000 07:19 PM
Jeff-

This is a guy from South Carolina who works with a bunch of industrial 
customers there.  At the last GridSouth meeting, he cornered Joe Connor and I 
and asked us about California and the price spikes there.  I told him a bunch 
of reasons why the price spikes happened, but it appears that he wants more 
information.

I would appreciate it if you would call him or if you could find someone else 
out there in CA to give him a call.  He is not super sophisticated, but he is 
the representative of some big clients, so I try to keep him happy.  [I think 
he represents Michelin and Nucor steel--two huge energy users in South 
Carolina.]

Thank you very much.

Tom Chapman
Tom

Do you have a contact in California that I can continue my questioning about
the situation out there?

Bob Knight
Brett Public Relations
864-239-0616 Greenville
803-765-1955 Columbia
803-608-4207 mobile

 - Bob Knight.vcf

I'll be in town, though i'm going to the "leading edge" deal at haas on sat. 
morning.  home number is 415.621.8317.

=09Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
=0903/05/2001 05:26 PM
=09=09=20
IEP Response:

Contact:  Jean Munoz                FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
         916-447-8186                March 5, 2001

Statement by Jan Smutny-Jones,
Executive Director of Independent Energy Providers,
in Response to Today?s News Conference by Governor Davis

"We support the Governor?s efforts to secure power for California through
long-term contracts =01. a solution that we?ve been advocating for months t=
o
help stabilize energy prices and bring down the cost of electricity.

"Many of our companies were offering long-term contracts to the utilities
last summer that would have dramatically reduced the cost of power and
helped prevent the current crisis.  Likewise, many of our companies signed
or are negotiating long-term contracts with the California Department
of Water Resources.

"Long-term contracts are a very important first step in the long process
of increasing California?s generating capacity and securing reliable and
affordable power for the state?s homes and businesses.  As the people who
generate the power, we?re an  important part of the solution and pledge to
continue doing all we can to help keep the lights on.

"Another equally important step that must be taken quickly is to approve
SBx1 47 which will save ratepayers billions of dollars while protecting a
vital source of California?s electricity supply =01. the QF operators who
provide 30% of the state?s power using clean and renewable technologies lik=
e
solar, wind, geothermal and cogeneration.  Most of these generators are
small, independent businesses that have been providing power for months
without being paid.  SBx1 47 will be an important step to ensure their
ability to serve California customers."

#         #         #

on 3/5/01 3:02 PM, Katie Kaplan at kaplan@iepa.com wrote:

> He called "leading power generators"! That's good---  IEP is preparing a
> response we will be sending out later today.
>=20
>=20
> Governors Press Release
> GOVERNOR DAVIS ANNOUNCES PORTFOLIO OF CONTRACTS FOR ELECTRICITY 3/5/2001
>=20
> Price State Buys for Power to Drop Dramatically
>=20
>=20
> LOS ANGELES=20
>=20
> Governor Gray Davis today announced the signing of 40 long-term contracts
> and agreements between the California Department of Water Resources (DWR)
> and power generators, significantly reducing the price the state will pay
> for electricity over the next decade.
>=20
> "These agreements are the bedrock of a long-term energy solution," said
> Governor Davis. "They provide reliability at a reasonable price. With the=
se
> deals in place, California's energy future is looking a whole lot brighte=
r."
>=20
> The agreements announced by Governor Davis today, which will supply an
> average of 8,886 MW per year over the next 10 years, are the result of mo=
re
> than four weeks of negotiations between state officials from the DWR and
> more than two dozen power generators. Generators submitted bids to the st=
ate
> in Internet auctions held last month.
>=20
> The 40 agreements resulted in a diversified long-term portfolio with an
> average price of $69/MWh. For the first five years, the average price is
> $79/MWh - approximately 75 percent below the recent spot market prices. F=
or
> the second five years, the average price drops to $61/MWh - about 80 perc=
ent
> below recent spot market prices (all prices include "superpeak" periods).
>=20
> The contracts are of varying lengths - from four months to 10 years, with
> one contract for 20 years. A total of more than 629 million MWh is under
> contract under the agreements.
>=20
> The contracts include a diverse mix of more than 20 suppliers and power
> companies. They include leading power generators, such as Calpine, Duke,
> Dynegy, Enron, Reliant, and Williams as well as Sempra, Merrill Lynch,
> Morgan Stanley, El Paso, Constellation, Panda, Cal Peak, Avista, PX BFM,
> PacifiCorp, and Primary Power. Details of the individual contracts were n=
ot
> released.
>=20
> The agreements also include seasonal power exchanges with the Bonneville
> Power Administration (BPA) and Powerex. These agreements will offer
> significant operational benefits and reduce dependence on the spot market=
,
> according to Governor Davis.
>=20
> In addition, the negotiations for contracts will result in expediting
> construction of new power plants. Some 5,000 MW is slated to come on-line
> within 24 months, including some as early as this summer.
>=20
> According to Governor Davis, priority was given to contracts that will
> result in construction of new power plants and offer long term price
> stability. Ten-year contracts were limited to generators that can provide
> power supplies starting no later than the third quarter of 2001.
>=20
> Negotiations are continuing with generators for additional short- and
> long-term contracts. Further announcements are expected.
>=20
> The announcement today includes signed contracts as well as agreements st=
ill
> under legal review. The price, quantity, and terms of the agreements have
> been agreed upon by the state and suppliers, and detailed terms will be m=
ade
> final during the next few months.
>=20
> In addition to the announcement about long-term contracts, Governor Davis
> said that 11 short term contracts also have been signed by DWR. These
> ongoing contracts allow DWR to buy 75 percent of its power by the end of
> February on the less-expensive
> day-ahead markets and 95 percent in the day- and hour-ahead markets -
> substantially reducing dependence of the state's buying electricity at
> premium prices on the real-time market.
>=20
> These contracts also have slashed the price of DWR's average cost of
> purchases in the short term market from $330/MWh to $228/MWh by the end o=
f
> February.
>=20
> The state was given the authority to negotiate contracts as the result of=
 AB
> 1X, landmark legislation passed in this year's special emergency session =
of
> the legislature and signed by Governor Davis on February 2, 2001. The
> legislation was sponsored by Assembly Members Fred Keely (D-Boulder Creek=
)
> and Carole Migden (D-San Francisco). Assembly Speaker Robert Hertzberg wa=
s
> the principal author of the bill.
>=20
> Los Angeles Department of Water and Power Director David Freeman, who was
> appointed by Governor Davis to advise the Department of Water Resources
> (DWR) on the purchases while on leave from the municipal agency, was the
> lead negotiator for the state. Legal, technical, and analytic support was
> provided by the Department of Water Resources.
>=20
> Please link below to view the charts of Covered Net Short and Contract
> Prices Compared to Spot Prices.
>=20
>=20
> Katie Kaplan
> Manager of State Policy Affairs
> Independent Energy Producers Association
> (916) 448-9499
>=20
>=20

--
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE   CONTACT: James Fisfis
March 5, 2001        (916) 319-2071

GOP MOVES NATURAL GAS TO FRONT BURNER
Assembly Republicans join together once again to request Davis to call=20
special session.

(SACRAMENTO) =01) Assembly Republicans united Monday in asking Governor Gra=
y=20
Davis to call a special session of the California legislature to deal with=
=20
skyrocketing natural gas prices.

=01&Families and businesses are reeling every month from extraordinary gas=
=20
prices.  Pardon the expression, but the natural gas crisis no longer belong=
s=20
on California=01,s back burner,=018 said Assembly Republican leader Bill Ca=
mpbell=20
(R =01) Villa Park).

Assembly Republicans unanimously signed a letter to Governor Gray Davis=20
asking for him to convene a special session of the legislature to deal with=
=20
California=01,s skyrocketing natural gas bills.  Republicans delivered the=
=20
letter to Davis this morning.

=01&A special session is both a symbolic and a practical necessity.  It tel=
ls=20
Californians that we care about their skyrocketing gas bills.  It tells=20
businesses everywhere that California is going to provide for its future=20
energy needs,=018 said Campbell.  =01&Practically speaking, a special sessi=
on also=20
allow us to pass legislation which can take effect immediately.=018

Republicans believe the electricity and natural gas crises are inextricably=
=20
linked.

=01&California=01,s natural gas crisis is completely intertwined with its=
=20
electricity crisis,=018 said Campbell.  =01&Any plan to deal with our elect=
ricity=20
crisis must have a natural gas component or Californians are going to pay=
=20
unacceptably high prices for both.=018

Assembly Republicans believe the natural gas crisis has many fronts, all of=
=20
which could be addressed comprehensively by a special session.

=01&Natural gas issues include pipeline capacity, storage, exploration,=20
alternative fuels and conservation,=018 said Campbell.  =01&A special sessi=
on lets=20
us put together a comprehensive solution.=018

=01&The private sector has the expertise and the capital to deal with these=
=20
issues if government would just get out of the way.  Republicans believe th=
at=20
a legislative solution to the natural gas crisis should leave the resources=
=20
and primary decision-making to the private sector,=018 said Campbell.

# # #
=09Susan J Mara
=0903/05/2001 05:14 PM
=09=09=20
in case you didn't see this

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854
=09"Costigan, Richard" <Richard.Costigan@asm.ca.gov>
=0903/05/2001 02:51 PM
=09=09=20

 <<press release.doc>>  <<Natgastps - rep legislation.doc>>  <<Republican
Energy Address.doc>>  <<QA.doc>>  <<DOE powerpoint.ppt>>

Attached are documents that were part of today's Assembly GOP press
conference on the pending natural gas crisis.  If you have any questions,
please call me.

Thanks,

RSC

Richard Costigan, III
Chief of Staff
Office of the Assembly Republican Leader
California State Assembly
(916) 319-2071

 - press release.doc
 - Natgastps - rep legislation.doc
 - Republican Energy Address.doc
 - QA.doc
 - DOE powerpoint.ppt

Yes.

	Mike D Smith@EES
	03/05/2001 06:02 PM
		 
Jeff--it would be great if you could be on the internal call tomorrow at 2 to 
help us think through legislative issues, including AB X 27.  Any chance we 
can get a spot of your time?
This is to confirm the following two conference calls scheduled for tomorrow, 
Tuesday, 3/6/01.

? Pre-Client Internal Conference Call - 2:00pm - 3:00pm PST (4:00pm - 5:00pm 
CST and 10:00pm - 11:00pm London time)
Domestic Call in number:  888-329-7124
Passcode for both domestic and international:  56459
International Call in number:  212-547-0176
Confirmation #3315522

? UC/CSU Client Call - 3:00pm PST (5:00pm CST and 11:00pm London Time)
Domestic Call in number:  888-329-7124
Passcode for both domestic and international:  28464
International Call in number:  712-257-3072
Confirmation #3315412

Please call if you have any questions.
Michele
925-543-3716

Principles with edits received thus far.

Best,
Jeff

hi!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  gigi, o, gigi, you won't believe this.  i gave a talk 
on california at the plaza hotel in nyc about a month or so ago and guess who 
spoke on the panel before me?!?!?  you guessed it.  daniel william hissself.  
can't wait to tell you about it.  i, too, want to catch up.  how's coffee 
early tomorrow morning---like 8:30 am work for you.  otherwise, i'm in 
heewwwston for the rest of the week.  hey, we each had big 
birthdays--congratulations.  another decade well lived.  look forward to 
seeing you real soon.

best,
jeff

	"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
	03/06/2001 10:43 AM
	Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
		 
Attached is the amended version of SB 28x (Sher/Battin) which contains
several changes to the siting process, including many sponsored by IEP.  The
bill is being heard in the Senate Energy Committee today.

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - sbx1_28_bill_20010305_amended_sen.pdf

Concur with Harry, i.e., continue to take the position that the program 
should be available to all.  When I was in Sacramento last week at a meeting 
of all the players, the utilities argument against including DA customers was 
based on "double dipping," i.e., payments to customers/ESPs for curtailment, 
plus payments to customers/ESPs for the re-sale of power to the ISO resulting 
from the curtailment.

The utilities "double dipping" argument is off base.  As important, the state 
is facing the threat of frequent and severe supply disruptions this summer 
and it needs to take each and every step necessary to try to avoid them.  The 
utility position (apart from being incorrect) seems pretty short-sighted 
given the dire circumstances.  So seems clear that California should include 
both DA and bundled customers in the program.

Best,
Jeff

	Harry Kingerski
	03/06/2001 09:02 AM
		 
Mike Day left me a message saying in discussions yesterday on AB 31X 
(Wright's load curtailment bill), the utilities were making the point that 
31x should only address bundled customers since the utilities were making the 
incentive payments out of funds that would otherwise go to pay DWR  (in 
effect, the curtailments are reducing the utility net short position).  They 
were ok with having ESPs aggregate the loads of bundled customers (which will 
be a very significant win, if we get it).   They think DA customers can get 
curtailment benefits through existing (and new) ISO programs.

The dilemmas are:
the ISO programs may or may not be finalized for this summer and may or may 
not give incentives that are as beneficial as AB31X
the utility plan discriminates against DA 
preferably, the ISO would administer the programs described by AB31X for all 
customers but that puts the ISO in the position of having to get approvals 
from FERC for a CA-legislated program (they will have to do this anyway)
(nearly) all of our customers will be bundled this summer anyway, so there's 
no immediate loss from going with the utility's position

We owe Mike an answer today.  Any thoughts?  My suggestion at this point is 
to stick with the high road and argue for non-discriminatory treatment with 
equal incentives paid to bundled and DA customers.

Background:  AB31X would give $500/mwh incentives for day ahead curtailment, 
$750/mwh incentives for day-of curtailments, and incentives to be determined 
for scheduled load reductions.  The ISO would invoke the programs based on 
system conditions.

The ISO so far has put in place the equivalent of a scheduled load reduction 
program, with specific payments, but has not finalized any day ahead or day 
of programs.
 

	Jennifer Rudolph@EES
	03/06/2001 10:11 AM
		 
*  SBX1 43 (Alpert) was passed out of the Senate Appropriations Committee 
yesterday
*  This is the language that freezes all SDG&E customers at 6.5 cents/kWh 
retroactive to Feb 7, 2001 until Dec 31, 2002

BILL STATUS REPORT
http://www.leginfo.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx1_43_bill_20010305_stat
us.html

BILL
http://www.leginfo.ca.gov/pub/bill/sen/sb_0001-0050/sbx1_43_bill_20010301_amen
ded_sen.html

No rush, but thought I'd throw this out there just ot get the ball rolling:

Looks at this point like any of the presentation dates work for me, so I 
don't necessarily have a preference.
Options for project (and I'm really just throwing stuff out there to 
stimulate thought):
Analyze AOL/Time Warner merger
My company, Enron, is accused by some analysts of being nothing more than a 
Merrill-Lynch, or a Morgan-Stanley, or a Goldman-Sachs, etc.  These analysts 
claim that we should therefore trade at multiples that are in line with the 
investment houses.  We differ in that view (for a lot of reasons that I won't 
go into here).  Might be interesting to analyze strategies, differences, etc.

Anyway, just some thoughts to get the ball rolling.  I'm open to just about 
anything.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks, Steve:  Alan and Jim might want to join in the fun.  Does 1PM west 
coast time work for folks to have a brief kick-off discussion of how we might 
assess the costs of a "California for Californians" energy policy?

Best,
Jeff

	Steve Walton@ECT
	03/06/2001 11:27 AM
		
I will be at my desk for the next two days.  Call at your convenience.

Steve

	Jeff Dasovich@ENRON
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich@ENRON
	03/05/2001 10:54 AM
		
Yes, I'll be in Houston this week.  We could discuss there. But might be 
useful to discuss tomorrow when you return.  I'm available.  Seems useful to 
try to get a start on it tomorrow.  You available for a quick call?  My 
schedule's pretty flexible.

Best,
Jeff

It's a little far off into the future, but NARUC will be in San Diego on Nov. 
12-15 (odd coincidence?).  Might be a good place to do some messaging.

Just let me know when you'd like to chat.

Best,
Jeff

	Lara Leibman
	03/06/2001 11:29 AM
		 
Sarah,

The FTC info that you need is set forth below.  Please let me know when you 
have had a chance to review it and we can go from there.  Perhaps you and 
Jeff Dasovich and I could set up a call to discuss this?  If that sounds 
good, let me know when would be a good time to chat and I'll set it up.  
Thanks very much.

Lara
	Lara Leibman
	03/02/2001 04:32 PM
		 
Jeff,

This is the info that I referenced on my voice-mail.  Please call me after 
you have had a chance to review it.  Thanks.

Regards,

Lara

FTC Requests Comments on Retail Electricity Competition Plans

The Federal Trade Commission today announced that it is seeking information 
regarding the results to date of different regulatory approaches to the 
introduction of competition into the retail sale of electricity. The 
Commission has approved a Federal Register notice, to be published shortly, 
that contains a series of questions designed to help gather this information. 
The Commission will produce a report that discusses the advantages and 
disadvantages associated with different approaches to particular issues and 
that identifies, if warranted, areas in which additional federal legislative 
or regulatory action may be desirable.

As detailed in the notice, many states have enacted, and in some cases begun 
to implement, legislation designed to introduce competition into the retail 
sale of electricity to encourage lower prices, better service and greater 
innovation. To date, 24 states and the District of Columbia have set dates 
when customers will be allowed to choose their electric power supplier. 
Recently, however, substantial price increases and reliability problems in 
some areas undergoing this transition have raised questions about the best 
way this restructuring can be designed to benefit retail customers. In light 
of recent price increases and reliability problems in California and western 
states generally, some states have delayed, or are considering delaying, 
implementation of retail competition plans. 

The Chairman of the Energy and Commerce Committee of the United States House 
of Representatives, W.J. "Billy" Tauzin, and the Chairman of the Subcommittee 
on Energy and Air Quality, Joe Barton, have requested that the Commission 
examine various state retail competition programs and describe those features 
that appear to have resulted in consumer benefits and those that have not 
yielded consumer benefits. In addition, the Commission has been asked to 
examine possible jurisdictional limitations on the states' authority to 
design successful retail competition plans and whether there is a need for 
federal legislative or regulatory action. To comply with this request, the 
Commission will update its July 2000 staff report "Competition and Consumer 
Protection Perspectives on Electric Power Regulatory Reform."

For the updated report, the Commission proposes to examine state plans that 
allow customers to choose their generation supplier, and state plans with 
unique approaches to retail electricity competition. The Commission will work 
with the states to understand the various features of the plans and to gather 
facts relevant to understanding the market reaction to a particular state's 
plan. 

The Federal Register notice contains additional questions about which the 
Commission seeks public comment. The Commission seeks comments on features of 
state retail competition plans that have benefitted consumers and those that 
have not. The Commission is particularly interested in receiving information 
about the market response to various provisions of state retail competition 
plans. It is not necessary to respond to each question for every state. 

Written comments in response to the questions in the Federal Register notice 
are due by April 3, 2001 and will become part of the public record. They may 
be submitted to: Donald S. Clark, Office of the Secretary, Federal Trade 
Commission, 600 Pennsylvania Ave., N.W., Washington, D.C. 20580. Submissions 
should be captioned: "V010003 -- Comments Regarding Retail Energy 
Competition." Electronic submissions may be sent by e-mail to: 
"retailelectricity@ftc.gov" and may also be sent on floppy disk, as described 
in the notice.

The Commission vote to publish the Federal Register notice was 5-0. 

This is the FR Notice text from the FTC web site at 
http://www.ftc.gov/os/2001/02/eleccompetition.htm:     

tomorrow at 9 it is.  the place on either battery or sansome at California, 
right?  can't wait.  see you then.

jeff

	"Gigi Coe" <gcoe@firstworld.net>
	03/06/2001 12:46 PM
		 
I'd love to have coffee, but don't think that I can make it downtown before
9:00 what with kid dropoff, etc.  Meet at your little corner italian coffee
place at 9:00?  G.
>
>hi!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  gigi, o, gigi, you won't believe this.  i gave a
>talk on california at the plaza hotel in nyc about a month or so ago and
>guess who spoke on the panel before me?!?!?  you guessed it.  daniel
>william hissself.  can't wait to tell you about it.  i, too, want to catch
>up.  how's coffee early tomorrow morning---like 8:30 am work for you.
>otherwise, i'm in heewwwston for the rest of the week.  hey, we each had
>big birthdays--congratulations.  another decade well lived.  look forward
>to seeing you real soon.
>
>best,
>jeff
>
>

FYI.
	"Anne Kelly" <kelly@hnks.com>
	03/06/2001 11:41 AM
		 
Julie: I see that ABX1-8 (Migden) is set for hearing tomorrow morning in
Assem. Appropriations. Does IEP have proposed language yet?
> Attached is the amended version of SB 28x (Sher/Battin) which contains
> several changes to the siting process, including many sponsored by IEP.
The
> bill is being heard in the Senate Energy Committee today.
>
>
> Julee Malinowski-Ball
> Senior Associate
> Edson + Modisette
> 916-552-7070
> FAX-552-7075
> jmball@ns.net
>
>
>
>

=09Alan Comnes@ECT
=0903/06/2001 12:00 PM
=09=09=20
FYI.  Davis is including the CalPX BFM contracts that he seized a while bac=
k=20
and is valueing them at some undisclosed amount.

GAC

Credit Suisse First Boston
Paul Patterson
Good morning,
Recent developments in California's power crisis:

-Yesterday, Governor Davis announced that the DWR has signed 40 contracts f=
or=20
8,886 MW per year, over the next 10 years and at an average price of $69 pe=
r=20
mWh. The DWR also has agreements in =01&principle=018 to cover 65-70% of it=
s net=20
short power position this summer.
-We remain cautious on the power purchase agreements, given past results of=
=20
the state=01,s power auctions. At least two generators have indicated that,=
=20
while they have signed MOUs with the DWR, the agreements are not definitive=
=20
and issues still need to be resolved.
-Also yesterday, District Court Judge Lew scheduled a trial date of July 31=
=20
for Edison=01,s lawsuit against the CPUC.
-On Thursday, the CPUC will address several utility issues.  Of particular=
=20
importance is the allocation of customer revenues to the DWR. The method of=
=20
allocation is expected to determine whether the DWR or the utilities are at=
=20
greater risk for undercollection.
-We believe many uncertainties still remain. It is unclear when the state=
=01,s=20
conceptual agreements with the utilities and the generators will be finaliz=
ed=20
in addition to how the legislature will receive the agreements.
-Consequently, we believe that investors should avoid EIX ($15.21, Hold) an=
d=20
PCG ($14.75, Hold), unless they have a high tolerance for risk and volatili=
ty.

Please call us with any questions you may have.
Regards,
Paul Patterson, 212-325-5876
Neil Stein, 212-325-4217
Wen-Wen Chen, 212-538-0223
Emily Lao Chua, 212-325-1982

If you would prefer not to receive further messages from this sender, pleas=
e=20
click on the following link and confirm your request:
Mailto:K-2-62573-539027-2-151-US2-1F3DDD56@xmr3.com
You will receive one additional e-mail message confirming your removal.

 - ppp030601.pdf

FYI.  Appears that all went well, even though our communications remain a wee 
bit bumpy.  Sometimes outcome is the most important thing.

Signed,
Cuddles
	Laura Lantefield/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/06/2001 02:58 PM
		 
Sandra -- Thank you so much for your help arranging for Mr. Keese to speak at 
our customer meeting.  He is exactly the type of speaker we were looking for 
and we are very much looking forward to hearing his presentation.  Laura   

Glad to hear that it all worked out.  Have a great conference.
Best,
Jeff

	Laura Lantefield/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/06/2001 02:58 PM
		 
Sandra -- Thank you so much for your help arranging for Mr. Keese to speak at 
our customer meeting.  He is exactly the type of speaker we were looking for 
and we are very much looking forward to hearing his presentation.  Laura   

This is separate from our 2 PM UC/CSU meeting right?  Apologies.  Difficult 
to keep it al straight these days.

Best,
Jeff

	Leasa Lopez@EES
	03/06/2001 02:14 PM
		 
Vicki Sharp invites you to participate in the conference call described 
below.  Please call me to confirm your participation at x36899.

Thank you,
Leasa Lopez
x36899
	Enron Energy Services
	

Meeting Confirmation:

Day/Date: TODAY, Tuesday, March 6, 2001
Time:  6:00 p.m. (CST),  4:00 p.m. (PT)
Location: EB 872
Dial-in: 1-800-991-9019
PIN:  6364745#
Topic:  Negative CTC

Participants:
Vicki Sharp
Bob Williams
Mike Smith
Harry Kingerski
Jim Steffes*
Mike Day - Goodin, MacBride*
Jeanne Bennett - Goodin, MacBride*

*Pending confirmation.

Please call me if you are unable to participate.

Thank you,
Leasa Lopez
x36899

No need to apologize.  Thanks for bio.  Sorry about the long-winded voice 
mail.  Look forward to call from McKinsey.  If there's anything I can do, 
don't hesitate.

Best,
Jeff

	Kari Dohn <Kari.Dohn@GOV.CA.GOV>
	03/06/2001 02:01 PM
		 
Thanks for email.  will listen to the whole of it later today.  running
between meetings.  sorry!  mckinsey to be calling you.

attached is bio.

Thanks again for taking the time to meet.  We're very interested in
following up on the demand buy-down/energy efficiency issues and are glad
to assist if we can--and we think we can.

As I mentioned, I've attached the final version of the document we've been
distributing in Sacramento describing our proposed solution to California's
energy crisis. If you have any questions about it, or want to discuss it
further, just let me know.

Also attached is the letter we sent to the PUC supporting Comm'r Bilas'
alternative decision designed to 1) make CDWR a creditworthy entity and 2)
permit the Legislature to continue its work on a "Direct Access" fix
without interference from the PUC. It's critical that the PUC adopt the
Bilas decision as soon as possible.

In addition, I'm including a story regarding the EOB/ISO filing at FERC
alleging price gouging and demanding refunds.  As we discussed, it's
creating a good deal of consternation in the market.

Finally, we'd be very interested meeting with you and the folks from
McKinsey on our reverse-auction for demand reductions.

Have a nice weekend.  Look forward to talking again very soon.

Best,
Jeff

(See attached file: Hertzberg final.doc) (See attached file: Comments on
Bilas Alternate.DOC)

POWER POINTS: How To Raise Electricity Prices, ISO-Style
   By Mark Golden
   A Dow Jones Newswires Column

  NEW YORK (Dow Jones)--There they go again. The California Independent
System Operator has initiated another attempt to suppress wholesale
electricity
prices rather than deal with the fundamental reasons of why prices are
high.
  Like past anti-market moves, Thursday's request that the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission slash suppliers' unpaid invoices for December and
January power will fail in its stated aim. Also as with past attempts, the
ISO's
action this week will likely result in higher costs for Edison
International (EIX)
unit Southern California Edison, PG&E Corp. (PCG) unit Pacific Gas &
Electric,
Sempra Energy (SRE) unit San Diego Gas & Electric Co. and the state's
Department of
Water Resources.
  The ISO, which is responsible for maintaining the balance of power supply
and demand on most of the state's power grid, has suffered the unintended
consequences of its actions many times before. When the ISO passed a
$250/MWh price cap in the summer, the cap became a target and caused prices
to rise,
just as the ISO had been warned it would. When the ISO exercised its
ability to
buy power above its cap only from out-of-state utilities, California
generators
sold power to the out-of-state utilities, which in turn sold the power back
to
California at a markup.
  The latest attempt to suppress the market is mind-numbingly stupid. The
ISO wants the FERC to order retroactive discounts for power it says was
sold at
unreasonably high prices. Merchant generators, other western utilities and
power marketers sold about $3 billion worth of bulk power to the ISO in
December
and January. The ISO says overcharging accounts for $560 million of that
total.
Suppliers' prices, which the ISO agreed to pay at the time, exceeded
hypothetical generating costs by more than 10% and are therefore
unreasonable,the grid manager says.
  Actual refunds might greatly exceed $560 million, according to the ISO,
once the FERC looks at the suppliers' actual costs. Power from a generating
company that bought natural gas before the spot market ran up, for example,
should
be discounted the most. Generators that waited and paid the most for gas
would
make the bigger profit per megawatt hour. What a great idea: punish the
smart and
reward the stupid.
  Staffers lead by Anjali Sheffrin, the ISO's director of market analysis,
and Eric Hildebrandt, manager of market monitoring, spent a fair amount of
time
and money to establish this shocker: In a supply-short commodity market,
prices
exceed producers' costs.
  Where they vary from well-established economic principles is that they
find this "unreasonable."
  Sheffrin and Hildebrandt want the FERC to obtain extensive cost data from
all suppliers - including government-owned utilities Los Angeles Department
of
Water & Power and Canada's BC Hydro - and begin hearings on refunds. This
would
cover the vast majority of sales to the ISO during December and January
because
almost every seller to the ISO exceeded the $150 per megawatt-hour "soft"
price
cap, above which transactions must be reported to the FERC for possible
review.
  There is no question the ISO has been paying prices that exceed even the
already high market prices. On Tuesday, for example, the ISO paid an
average
price of $337/MWh for power that other western utilities had bought and
sold
for $175-$200/MWh. On that one day, the ISO paid almost $25 million for
power
that was worth about $14 million.
  The reason: The ISO has had to pay a premium to the rest of the market
since the middle of December, when suppliers correctly figured out that the
utilities were running out of cash and wouldn't be able to pay their ISO
bills. Once
northwestern utilities stopped selling to the ISO at any price, the ISO
asked some of the in-state generating companies like Williams Cos. (WMB) to
step
into the middle on its behalf. Williams did so for what it has called a
reasonable profit.
  Let's say that Williams bought from some other generator at $450/MWh and
sold to the ISO at $500/MWh. That would be reasonable based on Williams'
costs,
according to the ISO's view.
  But if the generator sold directly to the ISO in the first place at
$450/MWh,it would be ordered to provide a refund, because its generating
costs are
assuredly nowhere near $450/MWh.
  So, according to the ISO, $500/MWh is reasonable, but $450/MWh is too
high.
  If the FERC were to order refunds as the ISO has requested, no company
that generates power would ever again sell to the ISO. It would always sell
to
some third party, which in turn would sell the electricity to the ISO at a
markup.
  Does the ISO ever stop and think through the impact of what it tries to
do?
  "We certainly recognize that's a problem, and it's something FERC needs
to
grapple with," Hildebrandt said in an interview.
  What the FERC will do is save the ISO from itself. "We reject proposals
to
return to cost-based regulation," the FERC said in its Dec. 15 California
ruling.
  The FERC will review some of the high prices, as required. But refunds
will be ordered only if the FERC finds that a particular seller to
California - or a
colluding group of sellers - withheld supplies in order to increase prices,
according to the FERC ruling.
  But collusion won't likely be found. There have been many investigations
into whether sellers have created a "false scarcity." None have found it.
  In December, Republican FERC Commissioner Curt Hebert, now chairman,
applauded the commission's decision to "reserve 'price mitigation' for real
exercises
of market power rather than focusing on the price level itself."
  The issue of the ISO and utilities having to pay a credit-risk premium
arose after the FERC had decided what it would do about California. But,
according
to a source knowledgeable about FERC operations under Hebert's leadership,
the
commission will recognize the credit-risk premium as reasonable.
  In the meantime, however, the specter of retroactive price controls and
the increased hassle of dealing with the ISO makes suppliers even more
reluctant
to sell to the ISO. The ISO will have to overcome that reluctance by
offering
to pay an even higher premium.
  Good move.
  -By Mark Golden, Dow Jones Newswires; 201-938-4604;
mark.golden@dowjones.com

  (END) Dow Jones Newswires 02-03-01
  1844GMT(AP-DJ-03-02-01 1844GMT)

 - Kari's bio.doc

Lisa:
Here's the information regarding Edison's SO2 credits before the PUC.  Fax to 
follow.  If you need anything else, just let me know.

Best,
Jeff
	BCragg <BCragg@GMSSR.com>
	03/06/2001 03:56 PM
		 
Edison filed A.00-05-027, its applications to divest its remaining SO2
credits, on May 15, 2000.  ORA protested on June 30, and Edison and ORA
worked out their differences and filed a joint recommendation on October 2.
According to the joint recommendation, which I will fax over to you,
Edison's original proposal was to auction off its SO2 credits.  The joint
recommendation accepts the auction approach, except that if no bids are
received for some credits, then those credits will be retained within the
regulated utility, and any future net proceeds will be credited to
ratepayers.  It appears that Edison's original proposal would have
transferred such no-bid credits to an unregulated affiliate at zero cost.
The joint recommendation also states that any no-bid credits retained by the
regulated utility will be deemed to have been market valued, and will have a
zero market value for purposes of determining transition costs.
No Commission decision has been issued on this matter.  No decision in this
matter appears on the Commission's agenda for March 15.  I can follow up on
the status and likely date of decision if you like.
Other than the joint recommendation I am about to fax to you, the only other
documents filed in this case were Edison's application and ORA's protest.
Please let me know if you would like a copy of either of them.
Brian

	Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
	03/06/2001 02:36 PM
		 
More IEP news for today .... thanks!  Jean

-- 
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

_______________________________________________
March 6, 2001, Tuesday 02:30 PM Eastern Time
 
DISTRIBUTION: Business Editors
 
LENGTH: 1190 words
 
HEADLINE: Dynegy and NRG Energy Announce Long-term Agreement With California
 Department of Water Resources
 
DATELINE: HOUSTON & MINNEAPOLIS, March 6, 2001
 
BODY:
 
 
   Dynegy Inc. (NYSE:DYN) and NRG Energy, Inc. (NYSE:NRG) today announced
that their affiliates, El Segundo Power LLC, Long Beach Generation LLC and
Cabrillo I LLC, have entered into an agreement with the California
Department of Water Resources (DWR) to provide the state with up to 2,300
megawatts (MW) of energy through 2004.
 
   Under the terms of the agreement which begins today, Dynegy and NRG's
 affiliates will provide 1,000 MW to DWR for the balance of 2001, and
beginning January 1, 2002 will provide up to 2,300 MW. Financial and other
terms of the transaction were not disclosed.
 
   "Since last summer, Dynegy and NRG have continued to produce all the
power the state has requested. We have worked diligently with the DWR to
capture the value of our in-state generation, balanced with California's
long-term energy needs," said Steve Bergstrom, president and chief operating
officer of Dynegy Inc.
 
   Craig A. Mataczynski, president and chief executive officer of NRG North
 America, said, "Today's announcement solidifies our commitment to
eliminating uncertainty for our respective shareholders and restoring price
stability and future reliability to the California electricity market."
 
   Dynegy Inc. is a leading provider of energy and communications solutions
to customers in North America, the United Kingdom and Continental Europe.
The company's leadership position extends across the entire convergence
value chain, from power generation and wholesale and direct commercial and
industrial marketing and trading of power, natural gas, coal emission
allowances, weather
 derivatives, and broadband to transportation, gathering and processing of
 natural gas liquids. For more information on Dynegy visit our web site at
 www.dynegy.com.
 
   NRG Energy is a leading global energy company primarily engaged in the
 acquisition, development, construction, ownership and operation of power
 generation facilities. NRG owns all or a portion of 66 power generation
projects
 and its net ownership interest in these projects is 16,704 MW. The
company's
 operations utilize such diverse fuel sources as natural gas, oil, coal and
coal
 seam methane, biomass, landfill gas, and hydro, as well as refuse-derived
fuel.
 More information on NRG Energy is available at www.nrgenergy.com.
 
   Certain statements included in this news release are intended as
 "forward-looking statements" under the Private Securities Litigation Reform
Act
 of 1995. These statements include assumptions, expectations, predictions,
 intentions or beliefs about future events. Dynegy and NRG caution that
actual
 future results may vary materially from those expressed or implied in any
 forward-looking statements. Some of the key factors that could cause actual
 results to vary from those Dynegy and NRG expect include changes in
commodity
 prices for energy or communications products or services; the timing and
extent
 of deregulation of energy markets in the U.S.; general capital market
 conditions; the effectiveness of Dynegy's and NRG's risk management
policies and
 procedures; the liquidity and competitiveness of wholesale trading markets
for
 energy commodities, including the impact of electronic or online trading in
 these markets; operational factors affecting Dynegy's and NRG's power
generation
 or Dynegy's midstream natural gas facilities; and uncertainties regarding
 environmental regulations or litigation and other legal or regulatory
 developments affecting Dynegy's and NRG's businesses. More information
about the
 risks and uncertainties relating to these forward-looking statements are
found
 in Dynegy's and NRG's SEC filings, which are available free of charge on
the
 SEC's web site at http://www.sec.gov.
 
   CONTACT: NRG Energy, Inc., Minneapolis
 Media:
 Meredith Moore
 612/373-8892
 or
 Dynegy Inc.
 John Sousa
 713/767-5800
 or
 Analysts:
 Rick Huckle, NRG Energy
 612/313-8900
 or
 Margaret Nollen, Dynegy Inc.
 713/507-6466
 
   URL: http://www.businesswire.com
 
LOAD-DATE: March 6, 2001
 
                                2 of 8 DOCUMENTS
 
                  Copyright 2001 PR Newswire Association, Inc.
 
                                  PR Newswire
 
                  March 6, 2001, Tuesday 2:29 PM Eastern Time
 
SECTION: FINANCIAL NEWS
 
DISTRIBUTION: TO BUSINESS AND ENERGY EDITORS
 
LENGTH: 683 words
 
HEADLINE: Dynegy and NRG Energy Announce Long-Term Agreement With California
 Department Of Water Resources
 
DATELINE: HOUSTON and MINNEAPOLIS, March 6
 
BODY:
 
   Dynegy Inc. (NYSE: DYN) and NRG Energy, Inc. (NYSE: NRG) today announced
that
 their affiliates, El Segundo Power LLC, Long Beach Generation LLC and
Cabrillo I
 LLC, have entered into an agreement with the California Department of Water
 Resources (DWR) to provide the state with up to 2,300 megawatts (MW) of
energy
 through 2004.
 
    Under the terms of the agreement which begins today, Dynegy and NRG's
 affiliates will provide 1,000 MW to DWR for the balance of 2001, and
beginning
 January 1, 2002 will provide up to 2,300 MW.  Financial and other terms of
the
 transaction were not disclosed.
 
    "Since last summer, Dynegy and NRG have continued to produce all the
power
 the state has requested.  We have worked diligently with the DWR to capture
the
 value of our in-state generation, balanced with California's long-term
energy
 needs," said Steve Bergstrom, president and chief operating officer of
Dynegy
 Inc.
 
    Craig A. Mataczynski, president and chief executive officer of NRG North
 America, said, "Today's announcement solidifies our commitment to
eliminating
 uncertainty for our respective shareholders and restoring price stability
and
 future reliability to the California electricity market."
 
    Dynegy Inc. is a leading provider of energy and communications solutions
to
 customers in North America, the United Kingdom and Continental Europe.  The
 company's leadership position extends across the entire convergence value
chain,
 from power generation and wholesale and direct commercial and industrial
 marketing and trading of power, natural gas, coal emission allowances,
weather
 derivatives, and broadband to transportation, gathering and processing of
 natural gas liquids.  For more information about Dynegy, please visit the
 company's web site at www.dynegy.com.
 
    NRG Energy is a leading global energy company primarily engaged in the
 acquisition, development, construction, ownership and operation of power
 generation facilities.  NRG owns all or a portion of 66 power generation
 projects and its net ownership interest in these projects is 16,704 MW.
The
 company's operations utilize such diverse fuel sources as natural gas, oil,
coal
 and coal seam methane, biomass, landfill gas, and hydro, as well as
 refuse-derived fuel.  More information on NRG Energy is available at
 www.nrgenergy.com.
 
    Certain statements included in this news release are intended as
"forward-
 looking statements" under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of
1995.
 These statements include assumptions, expectations, predictions, intentions
or
 beliefs about future events.  Dynegy and NRG caution that actual future
results
 may vary materially from those expressed or implied in any forward-looking
 statements.  Some of the key factors that could cause actual results to
vary
 from those Dynegy and NRG expect include changes in commodity prices for
energy
 or communications products or services; the timing and extent of
deregulation of
 energy markets in the U.S.; general capital market conditions; the
effectiveness
 of Dynegy's and NRG's risk management policies and procedures; the
liquidity and
 competitiveness of wholesale trading markets for energy commodities,
including
 the impact of electronic or online trading in these markets; operational
factors
 affecting Dynegy's and NRG's power generation or Dynegy's midstream natural
gas
 facilities; and uncertainties regarding environmental regulations or
litigation
 and other legal or regulatory developments affecting Dynegy's and NRG's
 businesses.  More information about the risks and uncertainties relating to
 these forward- looking statements are found in Dynegy's and NRG's SEC
filings,
 which are available free of charge on the SEC's web site at
http://www.sec.gov.
 
   SOURCE Dynegy Inc. and NRG Energy, Inc.
 
CONTACT: media, John Sousa of Dynegy Inc., 713-767-5800; or Meredith Moore
of
 NRG Energy, Inc., 612-373-8892; or analysts, Margaret Nollen of Dynegy
Inc.,
 713-507-6466; or Rick Huckle of NRG Energy, Inc., 612-372-5414
 
URL: http://www.prnewswire.com
 
LOAD-DATE: March 6, 2001
 
                                5 of 8 DOCUMENTS
 
                 Copyright 2001 News World Communications, Inc.
 
                              The Washington Times
 
                     March 06, 2001, Tuesday, Final Edition
 
SECTION: PART B; BUSINESS; Pg. B9
 
LENGTH: 478 words
 
HEADLINE: California contracts for power at a lot less
 
BYLINE: BLOOMBERG
 
DATELINE: LOS ANGELES
 
BODY:
 
   LOS ANGELES (Bloomberg) - California Gov.  Gray Davis said the state
agreed
 to buy electricity from more than 20 suppliers over 10 years at an average
price
 of $69 per megawatt-hour, less than half the average price utilities paid
last
 year.
 
   California's Department of Water Resources will buy as much as 8,886
 megawatts, enough to light about 9 million homes, under contracts ranging
from
 four months to 20 years.  The suppliers include Enron Corp., Calpine Corp.,
Duke
 Energy Corp., Williams Cos Inc., Dynegy Inc.  and Reliant Energy.
 
   California's two biggest electric utilities, PG&E Corp.'s Pacific Gas &
 Electric and Edison International's Southern California Edison, owe more
than $
 12 billion to power generators and can't buy more.  The utilities have been
 paying more for power than California regulators allow them to charge
consumers.
 The state is buying power on behalf of the utilities.
 
   "These agreements are the bedrock of our long-term energy policy," Mr.
Davis
 told reporters in Los Angeles.  He expects the price of electricity in the
 contracts will prevent the need for further rate increases.
 
   Prices are higher in the first five years, averaging $79 a megawatt-hour,
 then fall to $61 in the past five years, Mr.  Davis said. The state also
signed
 11 short-term contracts last month to reduce purchases made in day-ahead
markets
 to an average of $228 a megawatt-hour, down from $330.
 
   In 2000, the price that California's three biggest utilities paid for
power
 averaged $120 a megawatt-hour, and reached a high of $1,500 on Dec. 12.
 
   The long-term contracts will supply about 75 percent of the power that
 utilities have been unable to purchase for their customers, Mr.  Davis
said.
 That's only about one quarter of California's consumption.
 
   "This is not a done deal.  We have additional deals that are being put to
 bed," said Davis negotiator David Freeman, general manager of the Los
Angeles
 Department of Water & Power.  The state expects to purchase another 2,000
 megawatts in contracts that are still being worked out, Mr.  Freeman said.
 
   Still, some generators have been unwilling to supply the state power
needed
 to avert blackouts this summer because of other contract obligations and
high
 natural gas prices.
 
   Earlier yesterday, Duke said it tentatively agreed to sell about $4
billion
 in electricity to California from 2002 to 2010, which would guarantee power
to
 the state after repeated shortages and emergencies this year.
 
   Calpine Corp.  agreed last week to supply 1,500 megawatts of power to the
DWR
 in 10-year and 20-year contracts valued at as much as $8.3 billion. Calpine
and
 Duke refused to sell the state power this summer because the supplies
already
 have been sold.
 
   "There are about 7,000 megawatts for this summer and deals are still in
the
 works," Mr.  Freeman said.
 
LOAD-DATE: March 6, 2001
 
                                6 of 8 DOCUMENTS
 
                      Copyright 2001 eMediaMillWorks, Inc.
 
                 (f/k/a Federal Document Clearing House, Inc.)
 
                          Congressional Press Releases
 
                             March 5, 2001, Monday
 
SECTION: PRESS RELEASE
 
LENGTH: 293 words
 
HEADLINE: PERSPECTIVES HEARING ON ENERGY ISSUES
 
BYLINE: JOE BARTON , REPRESENTATIVE , HOUSE , BARTON RELEASES WITNESS LIST
FOR
 TOMORROW'S CONGRESSIONAL
 
BODY:
  FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE: Monday, March 5, 2001 Barton Releases Witness List
for
 Tomorrow's Congressional Perspectives Hearing on Energy Issues Washington
(March
 5) -- The Energy and Commerce Committee's Energy and Air Quality
Subcommittee
 Chairman Joe Barton (R-TX) today released a tentative witness list for the
 subcommittee's hearing on Congressional perspectives on electricity markets
in
 California and the West and national energy policy. The hearing will take
place
 tomorrow, Tuesday, March 6, at 1:00 p.m. in room 2123 of the Rayburn House
 Office Building.  Members on the first panel will discuss electricity
markets,
 and Members on the second panel will testify on national energy policy. The
 following witnesses are tentatively scheduled to testify at Tuesday's
hearing:
 Panel I - The Honorable Duncan Hunter (R-CA) - The Honorable Peter A.
DeFazio
 (D-OR) - The Honorable Randy Cunningham (D-CA) - The Honorable Bob Filner
(D-CA)
 - The Honorable George Radanovich (R-CA_ - The Honorable Jay Inslee (D-WA)
- The
 Honorable Mary Bono (R-CA) - The Honorable Brad Sherman (D-CA) - The
Honorable
 Susan A. Davis (D-CA) - The Honorable Michael M. Honda (D-CA) - The
Honorable
 Darrell E. Issa (R-CA) - The Honorable C.L. "Butch" Otter (R-ID) - The
Honorable
 Mike Thompson (D-CA) Panel II - The Honorable Tom DeLay (R-TX) - The
Honorable
 J.C. Watts, Jr. (R-OK) - The Honorable Doug Bereuter (R-NE) - The Honorable
 Charles Stenholm (D-TX) - The Honorable Maurice D. Hinchey (D-NY) - The
 Honorable Lynn C. Woolsey (D-CA) - The Honorable Greg Ganske (R-IA) - The
 Honorable Robert B. Aderholt (R-AL) - The Honorable Jay Inslee (D-WA) - The
 Honorable Dennis J. Kucinich (D-OH) - The Honorable John Thune (R-SD) - The
 Honorable Shelly Moore Capito (R-WV)
 
LOAD-DATE: March 6, 2001, Tuesday
 
ENERGY UPDATE/Los Angeles Department of Water and Power Daily Energy Update
for Tuesday, March 6, 2001

Business Wire
03/06/01, 3:23p
(Copyright , 2001, Business Wire)

LOS ANGELES--(BUSINESS WIRE)--March 6, 2001--Los Angeles Department of Water
and Power Daily Energy Update for Tuesday, March 6, 2001:

-- The Los Angeles Department of Water and Power (DWP) continues to
   provide power to our native load customers and surplus energy to
   California. Yesterday, DWP provided between 75 Megawatts (MW) and
   125 MW for a three-hour period to the state through the
   California Energy Resource Scheduling unit.

-- DWP forecasts a peak energy load today in Los Angeles of 3,500 MW.

-- DWP has up to 100 MW of energy available today for sale.

-- This energy will be available to California entities to assist
   them in meeting their normal and emergency energy needs. No power
   will be sold outside of the state during any DOE-certified or ISO
   staged emergency.

-- DWP has 24 major thermal generating units at eight facilities.
   Today, fifteen units are operating including eight of ten base
   load units. Of the nine units not operating, three units have
   scheduled major maintenance activities underway; five units are
   undergoing minor maintenance; and the remaining unit is available
   for use, as the market requires. Hydro resources and pumped
   storage facilities can also be used to meet market demands.

-- The rolling blackouts from power shortages that have occurred in
   other parts of California will not be felt by DWP customers.

-- While electric rates have increased for some utilities in
   California, Los Angeles City residents continue to enjoy stable
   rates that have remained unchanged for nine years. DWP provides
   electricity and water to the city's 3.8 million residents.

    CONTACT: Los Angeles Department of Water and Power
             Darlene Battle, 213/367-1368

    

Let's try this.  Neither of us will say one critical thing of the other.  I 
won't say anything, in jest, or otherwise, and you do the same.  And if 
someone does, the other needs to bring it up. But Prentice, if I say, "that's 
critical" and then I have to have a long argument about the fact that I think 
it is, and you think it isn't, that isn't going to work.  So I'm willing to 
have a complete moratorium, if that's something that you're willing to try, 
too.

I hope you'll going sailing today.  Did I leave my sunglasses in your car?  I 
also left my gym bag in your bathroom, which has my sailing shoes in it.  I'm 
at work.  You can call me here.

	Prentice Sellers <psellers@pacbell.net>
	09/24/2000 03:31 AM
		 
Jeff, I love you, but I'm unhappy.  I just don't want to be criticized
anymore.  The thing is, I know you think a lot of it is funny, and I've just
lost my sense of humor, but the truth is, after a while, it's just not funny
anymore.  Like when you yawned last night when I was telling a story to your
friends.  Yes, it's funny.  But when you do it every time, after a while, it
just starts to hurt my feelings.  That's just one recent example.  You're
often telling everybody how neurotic and fucked up I am.  Or how I'm totally
overbearing about playing the banjo.  In fact, you just said that today to
my friends at Haas.  Do you know how embarassing that was for me?  You
should listen to yourself when you talk about me in front of your friends or
my friends or my family.  How often do you say nice things and how often do
you criticize me?  Why don't you ask them and see what they have to say.
I've tried to talk to you about it.  I asked you to spend some time trying
to say mostly nice things, just for a little while.  But apparantly, you
either can't or won't, and the end result is that I feel like you just don't
care.  I'm sure there are things you want me to do.  I'd like to try to do
them.  But I don't know what else I can do to make you understand that I
just can't take all the criticism from you anymore.  It makes me feel like
shit.  I don't know where else to go, Jeff.  I suggested talking to a
shrink, but you're not willing to do that either.  I'm sure that half of it
is my fault, and I'd like to work on this together, but you don't seem to be
willing to work on the one thing that's really hurting me and that I've
asked you to work on.  And maybe that means you need to think about how you
really feel.

 - Kari's bio.doc

Funny.  I sent it before you sent your note, I think.  You will have a very 
difficult time touching base with her.   Good luck.

Best,
Jeff

Thank you.  I'm not getting it.  Please continue sending if you can.  Thanks 
very much.  Jeff

	James D Steffes
	03/06/2001 04:42 PM
		 
FYI.  This information comes from ENA Competitive Analysis.  Not sure if 
you're getting this.

Jim

	Kristin Walsh/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/06/2001 04:04 PM
		 
Executive Summary
? If no comprehensive deal is reached by April 9th, chances of bankruptcy 
increase due to a one day "opt-out" clause in all long-term power contracts. 
? PG&E and State locked in tough negotiations, several issues on the table:
 PUC-imposed requirement forcing PG&E to ultimately be responsible for 
California energy supplies
 Price of the grid; state - 2.3 times book value vs. PG&E - 4 times book value
? PG&E will not use any of the $1B secured last week to help their ailing 
utility.
? Davis's announcement of long term power contract didn't include some 
details:
 Of the 8,800 megawatts secured this far, only 6,000 are available this 
summer 
 Some of the "long term contracts" are really only for three months
 None of the contracts prevent California from buying peak demand on the spot 
market
? One the same day Davis announced long term contracts, Davis also quietly 
announce a 10% rate hike.
? FERC may be the wild card in approving this deal.
 
PG&E
Transmissions deal
One thing that is still uncertain is PG&E.  Bankruptcy may still be a likely 
alternative if current negotiations to buy PG&E's share of the electric 
transmission grid fail to produce a deal by April 9 (when all long-term power 
contracts being negotiated have a one-day "opt-out" clause they can exercise 
unilaterally if a "comprehensive solution" has not been reached by the state 
and its major utilities).  According to sources close to senior PG&E 
officials, PG&E made it clear that any hope for a politically acceptable deal 
on the transmission lines depends on the California government's willingness 
to make a major financial commitment it has been completely unwilling to make 
until now. 

PG&E will not make a final deal to sell its grid unless Davis agrees to 
relieve it of the PUC-imposed requirement to be the "electricity buyer of 
last resort."  Current state regulations make the utility companies 
ultimately responsible for generating or purchasing enough electricity at all 
times to supply California's energy needs.  As long as the state steps in and 
makes those purchases, as it has for the past three months, the utilities are 
shielded from absorbing the losses generated by paying premiums for spot 
market power and selling to consumers who are shielded by low rate ceilings.  
But, PG&E officials are worried 1) this summer's supply and 2) Davis's 
concern over how fast he is draining the state's budget surplus.  If things 
get into a crunch this summer and Davis makes a new decision that the state 
will pay only for the electricity it buys through long-term contracts, then 
PG&E will be left holding the bag. 

Thus, as part of the negotiations over buying the electricity grid, PG&E is 
demanding a "comprehensive solution" that includes not being liable for cost 
differentials between the spot market purchase and what consumers are allowed 
to pay.  State officials are in no mood to grant that kind of "get out of 
jail free" card, so the two sides remain locked in extremely tough 
negotiations that are complicated by three other factors: (1) PG&E's public 
behavior and welter of announcements in the past few days that seem to 
encourage suppliers to force involuntary bankruptcy; (2) State legislative 
demands that the price Davis negotiate for PG&E's part of the electricity 
grid be no more than 2.3 times revenues from the grid; and (3) the FERC must 
"positively approve" any grid purchase by the state of California. 

The principal concern on the price front is that PG&E wants to sell the 
electricity grid for nearly four times the estimated book value of their 
transmission, while consumer groups insist that two times book value is the 
politically acceptable limit.  "We see 2.3 times book value as an absolute 
upper bound. There is no way PG&E will get more than that, whatever they 
think," according to the leader of one main consumer groups.  "We are going 
to try to force any deals down to about 2.0 in any case." Negotiators for 
Davis are also trying to 'proposition-proof' any transmission deal to protect 
against a later ballot proposal.  They think there are ways to do that, but 
not if the price of PG&E's part of the grid triggers a ballot initiative.  
Remember, if Davis's eventual solution triggers a ballot initiative, he will 
be running for re-election on the same ballot as a public initiative designed 
to overturn his solution.

On the Sacramento front - no one understands PG&E's motives
The one question no one in Sacramento can figure out is what kind of game 
PG&E is playing.  In a three day period PG&E made a series of announcements 
that left everyone scratching their heads. 
? Late Thursday, PG&E officials leaked information to California papers that 
they had agreed in principle to sell their part of the electricity 
transmission grid to the state, which seemed like obvious good news, but then 
made it clear in discussions that the price they were asking was at least 30% 
above what the state was currently offering.  While a deal can still be done, 
anything like the $10 billion PG&E wants would be very hard to get through 
the California legislature which needs to approve any purchase. 
? Late Friday, PG&E officials announced that they had secured a $1 billion 
loan for the parent company (not the electricity utility) and would use the 
money to pay off bondholders, other creditors and to return $161 million to 
shareholders in a new dividend payout.  Not a cent of that money was 
earmarked to help the struggling electricity orphan of PG&E and that left at 
least one rating agency convinced that the company was more ready to send the 
utility into bankruptcy than had been previously understood. 
? Over the weekend, PG&E leaked a story claiming that it was willing to pay 
off its energy suppliers' debt for 15 cents on the dollar right now.  For 
generators who are having to make decisions each morning about whether to 
start legal actions that protect their rights in any eventual bankruptcy 
action or hold off on the assumption that the politics of this process will 
"make them whole" in a couple of months, that kind of trial balloon is 
extremely unnerving.

Thus, in a very short time period, PG&E's corporate owners showed they could 
access public credit markets with relative ease and then showed that they 
were unwilling to use these funds to smooth the way toward a solution to the 
energy crisis.  Davis has demanded that all of the major utilities absorb at 
least a part of the $13 billion debt they have accumulated since last summer 
and PG&E's fund-raising will harden and deepen those demands.  As one senior 
political official told our source "just when you think the corporate 
leadership of that company has insulted us as completely as possible, they 
come up with something even more outrageous." 

PG&E's actions also complicate the broader solution Davis is trying to 
construct to solve California's problems.  State Democrats doubt they will 
get Republican support for a deal, which means a vote will fall short of the 
two-thirds majority necessary for immediate enactment (resulting in 90 days 
for the legislation to go into effect).  Additionally, in the past 48 hours, 
many Sacramento sources have reported that forcing creditors to take a less 
in any debt payback is gaining substantial support with the legislators and 
may be crafted into any legislation to authorize Davis to purchase the 
electricity grid.

Long-term Contracts - Davis didn't tell the whole truth
Yesterday, Davis announced that he had signed "long-term" power deals for 
8,800 megawatts of power, out of a total 12,000 megawatts he wanted to sign 
eventually. According to the press release, Davis is now 75% of the way 
toward his long-term goal and has already solved the hardest part of 
California's energy crisis. This means consumers would maybe pay more than 
necessary five years from now, but these contracts "guaranteed" that 
consumers would pay less for the next three years.  What Davis failed to 
highlight was that of the 8,800 megawatt commitment, actually only 6,000 
megawatts are available this summer (when demand is expected to 45,000 
megawatts); and some of these "long-term contracts" are actually only good 
for three months.  None of these contracts, however, keep California from 
having to buy the most expensive peak demand electricity on the spot market.

Davis Agrees on New Consumer Electricity Rate Hikes for Next Year
While the media was concern with Davis's announcement of long term contracts 
for California, of less concern to the media was Davis's quietly announced a 
decision to let rates rise again for electricity consumers. The state will 
accept the 10% emergency surcharge levied on consumers in January as a 
permanent increase as well as an additional 10% increase for consumers that 
will take effect early 2002 when the old 1996 rate cut legislation expires. 
That would bring the average charge to about 8 cents a kilowatt hour. 

FERC
The other major danger to the transmission line deal is that the Federal 
Energy Regulatory Commission can block the deal simply by failing to approve 
it in a positive vote. Senior California officials and legislators doubt that 
FERC has jurisdiction, and believe that FERC would not dare stop a deal. But 
they may be wrong. "The deal can only go through if FERC specifically signs 
off on the deal. Its power over transmission deal is absolute, no matter what 
anyone says," according to source close to the President. There are three 
possibilities: 1) FERC could "pocket veto" it by not even putting it on 
agenda for discussion; 2) the deal is put on the agenda but it gets voted 
down. The Democrat on the commission, William Massey, has already said he is 
opposed to it; or 3) the Commission could approve it but with condition that 
Davis has to agree to bring the lines into a regional grid system.

One complicating factor in the FERC decision, however, is that its chairman 
Curt Hebert, who is adamantly opposed to the transmission line sale, may not 
be around long enough to have his say. "Hebert is definitely not a shoo in 
for the FERC chairman position," says one Washington official. Two other 
appointments to the Commission will soon be named, this official notes, and 
one of them "could easily become chairman." 

Please distribute to rest of Sac team.  Thanks, Jeff
	JBennett <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	03/02/2001 04:53 PM
		 
 <<X22350.DOC>>  <<BILASALT.DOC>>

 - X22350.DOC
 - BILASALT.DOC

Also might add that it conflicts directly with and is likely to thwart Gov's 
efforts to dramatically reduce demand this summer and avoid rolling black 
outs.  Seems like legislators would benefit from more information, along the 
lines of the points that Harry makes, to better understand that this bill 
would only add to the problems.

Best,
Jeff

	Harry Kingerski
	03/06/2001 05:00 PM
		 
Regarding proposed rate freeze for large SDG&E customers at 6.5 cents:

Adds to DWR's burden of covering the net short positions without any further 
clarification of how shortfall will be funded.  The incentive these customers 
now have to participate in DA and thereby remove burden from DWR is removed.

Creates incentives to increase usage and decrease conservation, exactly at 
the time that just the opposite effect is desired.  Rate at frozen level 
removes all price signal effect in unregulated market.

These are customers who under existing law already have had choice, as an 
alternative to paying market price,  of 1) voluntarily opting in to a one 
year 6.5 cent rate freeze, with a true-up, or 2) buying commodity and risk 
management products in the competitive market, as many of them have already 
done, and 3) reducing usage to save money.  This bill takes takes away the 
last two choices/incentives. 

Adopting "rates by proxy" (in a sense, indexed to PG&E and SCE rates) creates 
the potential for a regulatory nightmare.

As an alternative, the Legislature should consider extending the voluntary 
opt-in program under existing law.  This would preserve existing protection, 
keep choices available to customers, and not unduly add to DWR's burden.

As another alternative, we could be a lot more willing to accept this IF the 
"end of the rate freeze" date in (f) were specified to occur no earlier than 
the date new rates are put in place (the proposed language from 18X, 
remember?) and it were clear that existing DA contracts were not overturned 
by this Act.

Yes, I will be joining folks for dinner.

FYI.  xoxoxoxoxo
	Margo Reyna
	03/06/2001 05:05 PM
		 
Margo Reyna
Regulatory Analyst
Enron Corp., Government Affairs
Phone:  713-853-9191

	djcustomclips@djinteractive.com
	03/06/2001 04:58 PM
	Please respond to nobody
		 
Bids Made For Broke NorthPoint 
Dick Kelsey, Newsbytes 
  
03/06/2001 
Newsbytes News Network 
(c) Copyright 2001 Post-Newsweek Business Information, Inc. All rights 
reserved. 
EMERYVILLE, CALIFORNIA, U.S.A., 2001 MAR 6 (NB). Bidding started today on 
bankrupt broadband services provider Northpoint Communications Group 
[NASDAQ:NPNTQ], more than three months after Verizon Communications [NYSE:VZ] 
killed the companies' merger plan.
Northpoint did not identify bidders or discuss the amount of bids received, 
citing a "quiet period" that precludes disclosure of such details. 
"It is our hope to sell the company as a whole, but we cannot speculate on 
the outcome of this structured sale process," Northpoint Communications 
President and CEO Liz Fetter said in a news release.
Bidding is scheduled to close on March 20 and the winning bid will be 
submitted to bankruptcy court the next day, Northpoint said.
Emeryville, Calif.-based Northpoint filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy 
protection on Jan. 16, six weeks after Verizon scuttled the companies' plans 
to merge. Northpoint has since sued Verizon for $1 billion in damages over 
cancellation of the merger.
Verizon on Nov. 29 pulled out of the $800 million merger agreement, citing 
Northpoint's deteriorating financial condition. The companies intended to 
merge their digital subscriber line (DSL) businesses into a national 
broadband company.
Northpoint spokesman Marvin Wamble told Newsbytes that the company currently 
employs 1,065 people, down from its peak level of 1,800 workers last year.
Northpoint Communications is on the Web at http://www.northpoint.net
Verizon can be found at http.www.verizon.com
Reported by Newsbytes.com, http://www.newsbytes.com .
16:22 CST Reposted 16:23 CST 

Press Contacts: Marvin Wamble, Northpoint, 510-450-7432, e-mail: 
mwamble@northpoint.net /WIRES ONLINE, LEGAL, TELECOM, 
BUSINESS/NORTHPOINT/PHOTO 

Folder Name: Telecom Services: Broadband Services 
Relevance Score on Scale of 100: 83

______________________________________________________________________ 
To review or revise your folder, visit Dow Jones CustomClips or contact Dow 
Jones Customer Service by e-mail at custom.news@bis.dowjones.com or by phone 
at 800-369-7466. (Outside the U.S. and Canada, call 609-452-1511 or contact 
your local sales representative.) 
______________________________________________________________________ 
Copyright (c) 2001 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. All Rights Reserved 

Note size of folks participanting as reflected in email distribution list.  
See attachment, which shows "official" list of coalition members and bullet 
points they're passing along to legislators.  Note UC is on the list.

Mike:  UC's participation in this coalition can be fairly characterized as 
"very active."

Best,
Jeff
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	03/06/2001 04:54 PM
		 
Jeff,

Per your voice mail, here are the e-mail addresses for the direct access
coalition, along with the latest letter of support.  The letter does not
include Calpine so I told Edelman to take care of it.

Scott

Received: (qmail 65371 invoked by uid 41); 1 Mar 2001 01:53:44 -0000
Received: from chixims1.edelman.com (63.104.92.15)  by mx7.quiknet.com with 
SMTP; 1 Mar 2001 01:53:44 -0000
Received: by chixims1.chicorp with Internet Mail Service (5.5.2653.19) id 
<F5VXRRGL>; Wed, 28 Feb 2001 19:33:23 -0600

Hello--

I neglected to attach the Direct Access Coalition fact sheet on SB 27x to
the media plan I sent out last night.  The document I sent out instead was a
fact sheet created specifically for AReM, so please feel free to disregard
it.  The attached fact sheet will  need to be updated when the Bowen
language is released but remains useful at this time.

   <<dacoalition.summary22101.doc>>

Tracy Fairchild
Account Supervisor
Edelman Public Relations Worldwide
(916) 442-2331
tracy.fairchild@edelman.com

 - dacoalition.summary22101.doc

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/06/2001 07:41 PM
		 
Greetings:
The ISO will be holding a conference call to discuss a Market Stabilization
Plan on Friday at 10:00 a.m. PST. They will be releasing the plan tomorrow
by COB (midnight) and IEP will review it ASAP.  We will also participate in
the Conference Call on Friday and let everyone know what is going on.  We'll
keep you posted....

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

                ISO Market Participants:
                The ISO has developed a market stabilization plan, designed
to stabilize operations and control costs in California, to be implemented
in the next two months.  It would remain in place for the near term (through
Summer, 2001 and beyond) and includes changes to existing ISO practices as
well as an expansion of the ISO's responsibilities.  Because of the need to
move quickly so that the plan can be implemented by this summer, we will be
unable to hold a full stakeholder review process.  But, we do want to
discuss the plan with you so that you can understand the proposal and the
reasoning behind it.
                The ISO will post this plan on the ISO web site at
http://www.caiso.com/stakeholders/ <http://www.caiso.com/stakeholders/> , by
COB tomorrow.  In addition, we will host a conference call from 10:00 a.m.
to 2:00 p.m. PST this Friday, March 9, to discuss the plan with you and
clarify any outstanding issues.  We then plan to request the Board's
approval for this plan on March 15th in order to be able to implement the
plan by summer.
                The call in information is as follows:
                Market Stabilization Conference Call
                Friday, March 9, 10:00 a.m. - 2:00 p.m. PST
                Call-In Number:         877-381-6005
                Conference ID #:        760357
                Leader Name:    Byron Woertz
                Following the call, you may submit any comments on the plan
to us by close of business on Tuesday, March 13.  You may send your comments
to bwoertz@caiso.com.  We will do our best to summarize your comments and
present them to the Board at their March 15 meeting. In addition, there will
be a public comment period on the 15th.
                Please contact me if you have any further questions.
                Byron B. Woertz, Jr.
                Director, Client Relations
                (916) 608-7066

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	03/06/2001 07:09 PM
		 
F.Y.I.

We have scheduled the California Chamber of Commerce's California Room for
Thursday, March 8 at 2 p.m. to discuss the media plan going forward.  Please
respond to this email and let me know if you will be able to attend. 

Thanks 

Tracy Fairchild
Account Supervisor
Edelman Public Relations Worldwide
(916) 442-2331
tracy.fairchild@edelman.com

Kim:  

Been having horrible computer problems.  (Just got switched over to Windows 
2000---I hate Microsoft; break it up into a million itty bitty pieces.)  

Haven't had a chance to read what you wrote.  Attaching what I cobbled 
together yesterday.  Will also take a look at what Mr. Jackson put together.  
You should feel free to go ahead and meld mine and yours, etc.  I'm at work.  
Will be here until  about 11-11:30.  After that, if you need me, page me at 
888.916.7184.  And thanks a million for pulling it together.

Best,
Jeff

well, wouldn't you know it.  i now have a 9 am meeting.  but i've opened up 
for lunch.  any chance of doing lunch?  i could also do coffee in the 
afternoon.  (i don't leave for hewwston now until Thursday at noon).  My 
apologies.  Hope one of these other times work?

your pal,
jeff

	"Gigi Coe" <gcoe@firstworld.net>
	03/06/2001 01:21 PM
		 
Yup, the place just up from your office on CA.  g.
>
>tomorrow at 9 it is.  the place on either battery or sansome at California,
>right?  can't wait.  see you then.
>
>jeff
>
>
>
>                    "Gigi Coe"

DA coalition's leg language.  Letter supporting Bilas from subset of 
coalition.  Coalition list to follow.
	MDay <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	03/06/2001 12:14 PM
		 
 <<X22480.DOC>>

Here is the redraft of the SB 27X amendments based on the input of the
direct access coalition yesterday.  The major thrust of the bill is to allow
customers to switch to direct access as easily as possible (without an exit
fee) when ever there is "headroom" between DWR's firm contracts and total
demand including recent load growth.  Once that free DA capacity is used up,
customers can still elect for DA, but must pay the exit fee.  All customers
will be on the hook for the financing costs they benefitted from while
taking DWR procured power before they switch to DA.

 - X22480.DOC

 
 - BILASALT.DOC

howzabout 11 or 11:15 at the coffee place?

	"Gigi Coe" <gcoe@firstworld.net>
	03/06/2001 10:31 PM
		 
Well, hmmm, lets see.  I have to be at my house at 1:00.  If it works for
you, I could meet you somewhere at about 11:00 or 11:30 for a bit.  I'll be
at my computer pretty much most of the morning after 10.  Just let me know.
G.
>
>well, wouldn't you know it.  i now have a 9 am meeting.  but i've opened up
>for lunch.  any chance of doing lunch?  i could also do coffee in the
>afternoon.  (i don't leave for hewwston now until Thursday at noon).  My
>apologies.  Hope one of these other times work?
>
>your pal,
>jeff
>
>
>
>                    "Gigi Coe"

I think we may have decided to start at 11 AM?  I have a 1 PM meeting.  
Possible to start at 11?

Best,
Jeff

	Marcia A Linton
	03/07/2001 08:22 AM
		 
A conference call meeting has been set up for 11:30 am today, March 7 to 
discuss EES Negative CTC.  Conference room EB-4746 has been reserved for the 
Houston participants.  The call-in number for the call will be:

    888-422-7137
    Host Code (for Jim only) - 438907
    Participant Code (for everyone else) - 865493

If you have any questions regarding this call, please give me a call at 
713-853-3226.

Thanks,
Marcia

I'll be in air (to Houston) at that time tomorrow.  Harry can you attend EES 
(San Diego team call)?
Best,
Jeff

Sue Mara was correct on the call yesterday.  While the PUC meets regularly on 
Thursdays, it appears they are having a meeting today at which the "Bilas 
Alternative" is up for a vote.  Our information is that there is some 
likelihood that the decision will be approved----but please don't hold your 
breath.  We'll disseminate information just as soon as we get it.

Best,
Jeff

The notion that it would have to be a monthly analysis sounds like pure 
Roger, and could likely be correct.  But we need to determine whether we can 
get what we need by doing a "less precise" annual versus a "monthly."  Seems 
that once we've made that call, we direct the scenario and they do it.  
Thoughts?

Best,
Jeff

	Robert Neustaedter@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	03/07/2001 09:36 AM
		 
Any suggestions to expedite the process?

Robert 

	"Bill Monsen" <wam@mrwassoc.com>
	03/06/2001 10:31 PM
		 
Robert,

Thanks for the note. A conference call at 12:30 pm PST would work for us.
However, on that call, we will not be able to present results of the
additional scenarios that you defined in your e-mail. The model that we
used was an annual rate model. The analysis that you are proposing would
require a monthly model, which would take additional time to develop.
Perhaps we should discuss this prior to the call at 2:30 pm CST. Roger and
I will give you a call when we get into the office on Wednesday morning.
This should be around 11 am CST.

Best regards,

Bill

At 05:32 PM 3/6/01 , Robert.Neustaedter@enron.com wrote:
>Bill and Roger,
>
>Thanks for the quick turn-around on the analysis.  I hope the weekend was
>not totally ruined.  After review of the study, we thought it would be
>useful to further expand the scenarios into a Worst, Base and Best Case.
>The scenarios we would like you to run are outlined in the attached file.
>Each scenario would reflect a wet, dry and normal weather case.
>Please note that each scenario has a different date for surcharge
>implementation.  The Best Case reflects the date included in your original
>analysis.  Along those lines, would you please expand on the rationale for
>assuming the 1/01/02 implementation date.
>
>In addition to reflecting the rate impact on a cents per kwh basis, please
>include a percent impact as well.
>
>Like our original request, we are on a fast-track.  We would like to
>schedule a conference call for 2:30 p.m. central time Wednesday (March 7)
>to discuss the results of your analysis.  Hopefully, the data you have
>already generated can be quickly "massaged" to accomodate the scenarios
>requested.
>
>Please call me at 713 853 3170 if you have any questions.
>
>Robert
>
>(See attached file: California Rate Scenarios.doc)

Attached is a rough draft of some scenario development around the PX credit 
and rate issues.  Few points:

Apologies in advance for any errors and inaccuracies.
Given time crunch, the model developed is quite crude and will need 
refinement (to be sure).
The bankruptcy scenario is included (scenario 4), but (again, given the time 
crunch) has not been analyzed to the same extent as the other scenarios.  
Tribolet should be able to provide good insights there, however.
The exposure has not been calculated since GA does not have the numbers, but 
EES should be able---once there's agreement on scenarios and 
probabilities---to run the numbers very quickly.
I've assigned my view of what the probabilities are.  These are key inputs 
and the team will need to scrub them thoroughly.
For ease of use by all, and given time considerations, I've done the 
conceptual model in word format, rather than excel.  It will be simple to 
translate this conceptual model to a spreadsheet model (in excel).

Best,
Jeff

	Marcia A Linton
	03/07/2001 08:22 AM
		 
A conference call meeting has been set up for 11:30 am today, March 7 to 
discuss EES Negative CTC.  Conference room EB-4746 has been reserved for the 
Houston participants.  The call-in number for the call will be:

    888-422-7137
    Host Code (for Jim only) - 438907
    Participant Code (for everyone else) - 865493

If you have any questions regarding this call, please give me a call at 
713-853-3226.

Thanks,
Marcia

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	03/07/2001 11:27 AM
		 
On Monday, 2 March 200, U.S. Representatives Jay Inslee and Peter Defazio 
(OR-04) requested that the investigative arm of Congress research whether 
energy producers have been "gaming the market" and unfairly jacking up energy 
prices in the Western United States.  "My constituents have seen huge 
increases in their energy prices, and I have seen some reports suggesting 
that energy producers have deliberately withheld energy from the market in 
order to drive prices even higher.  I am requesting that the GAO investigate 
this possible market manipulation, and determine whether these reports are 
accurate," said Inslee. 
 
Following is text of the Congressmen's letter to the General Accounting 
Office:
 
March 5, 2001
 
David Walker
Comptroller General of the United States
General Accounting Office
441 G Street NW
Washington, DC 20548
 
Dear Mr. Walker:
 
We are writing to request that the General Accounting Office (GAO) 
investigate whether power shortages and the subsequent skyrocketing energy 
prices in California, which has had serious ripple effects throughout the 
Western United States, was due to market manipulation by energy producers.  
We are concerned about allegations that energy producers have been 
manipulating the market by pulling generators offline for no justifiable 
reason, thus creating an artificial scarcity of energy in order to drive up 
prices.
 
The apparent energy shortages in the Western United States will undoubtedly 
raise issues as to whether we as a nation change our policies toward 
developing our energy resources and whether we change the manner in which we 
currently operate Federal hydroelectric facilities.  For example, many 
elected officials have used the energy crisis as an argument to drill for oil 
in the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge, and to open for oil and gas 
exploration millions of recently protected National Forest lands.  To answer 
these important policy questions which will be considered in the House 
Committee on Resource, a committee on which we both sit, we believe that we 
must have an accurate understanding of the causes of the current energy 
crisis. 
 
We recognize there are many contributing factors to the current energy 
crisis, including high natural gas prices, a lack of generation and 
transmission capacity, and California's failed effort to deregulate its 
energy market. 
 
While the economics of supply and demand lead to the conclusion that the 
scarcity of generation in California has contributed to the high energy 
prices, it is not clear why there is such a scarcity.  Many analysts point to 
such variables as inadequate water supplies and the need for increased 
maintenance as the cause for so much generation unexpectedly being taken 
offline in California.  According to information we have seen, however, these 
factors do not come close to fully explaining the scarcity of energy supplies 
in California. 
 
For example, it is our understanding that in an absolute low water year, 
California has more than 45,000 mW of generating capacity available.  
According to the Western Systems Coordinating Council (WSCC), the entity to 
which all power generators in the West are required to report their power 
availability, California has been importing more than 2,000 mW of power, 
while recent peak demand in California on those same days has hovered around 
only 30,000 mW.  While almost 10,000 mW of this 17,000 mW difference is duly 
accounted for as being offline either through planned or unplanned 
maintenance, there is apparently about 4,000 to 8,000 mW of potential 
generation in California which is not online for reasons that remain 
unexplained.
 
Meanwhile, prices for wholesale electricity have been going through the roof, 
with some generators and marketers of energy in California earning record 
high profits.   These energy companies have insisted they are operating their 
generators at maximum capacity and are not manipulating the market by pulling 
generation offline.  We have read evidence to the contrary.  For your 
reference, we have enclosed a report by the private consulting company 
McCullough Research Group, and a research paper by Massachusetts Institute of 
Technology economics professor, Mr. Paul Joskow.
 
The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC), the federal agency 
responsible for ensuring that energy costs are "just and reasonable," has 
studied the energy crisis in the West.  As you may know, while FERC concluded 
that energy prices in California are not "just and reasonable," based on a 
preliminary inquiry, they determined there is insufficient evidence of market 
manipulation as a contributing factor to the high prices.
 
Given independent reports that are at odds with FERC's conclusions, we are 
concerned FERC has not done an adequate job in its investigation of possible 
market manipulation.  Therefore, we request that you:
 
Compare the methodology used by FERC with that of Professor Joskow.
 
Determine whether or not the FERC methodology and investigation were thorough 
enough to determine whether generating capacity has been withheld without 
legitimate reason. 
 
Analyze whether California's deregulation of its electric utility market 
created a regulatory environment in which a small number of energy generators 
or marketers are more easily able to manipulate power prices by withholding 
generation.
 
Thank you for investigating this matter. Due to the time critical nature of 
this issue, it is our hope that your office can make this investigation a 
high priority.
 
Sincerely,
 
JAY INSLEE
Member of Congress 
 
PETER DEFAZIO
Member of Congress 
 
 

great.  see you there.

	"Gigi Coe" <gcoe@firstworld.net>
	03/07/2001 12:15 PM
		 
Fine.  See you there.
>
>howzabout 11 or 11:15 at the coffee place?
>
>
>
>                    "Gigi Coe"
>>>>big birthdays--congratulations.  another decade well lived.  look
>forward
>>>>to seeing you real soon.
>>>>
>>>>best,
>>>>jeff
>>>>
>>>>
>>>
>>>
>>>
>>>
>>>
>>>
>>
>>
>>
>>
>>
>>
>
>
>
>
>
>

Forgot to attach the file.  Here it is.

	Jeff Dasovich
	09/24/2000 12:53 PM
		
Kim:  

Been having horrible computer problems.  (Just got switched over to Windows 
2000---I hate Microsoft; break it up into a million itty bitty pieces.)  

Haven't had a chance to read what you wrote.  Attaching what I cobbled 
together yesterday.  Will also take a look at what Mr. Jackson put together.  
You should feel free to go ahead and meld mine and yours, etc.  I'm at work.  
Will be here until  about 11-11:30.  After that, if you need me, page me at 
888.916.7184.  And thanks a million for pulling it together.

Best,
Jeff

of course.

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	03/07/2001 03:14 PM
		 
is now planning a dome trip on April 27 - 29 - would you guys be able to 
supervise us on that weekend? 
Nancy 
(707) 251-4870 (phone) 
(707) 265-5446 (fax) 
"Plus je bois, mieux je chante" 

The Commission just voted out one half of the "Bilas Alternate."

The decision that got voted out included Bilas' DWR-based language stating 
that the PUC 1) would not second-guess DWR purchases and 2) would pass 
through DWR costs to customers.
However, in a move led by Commissioner Carl Wood, the decision removed the 
Bilas language on Direct Access.  The decision therefore did NOT include the 
Bilas language staying any Commission action on implementing the Direct 
Access prohibition.  Carl Wood called including Direct Access "the height of 
arrogance."  
The decision was voted out 3-2, with the 2 remaining Republicans dissenting.
That said, the Commission has no proposal before it implementing the 
prohibition, and there was no talk at the meeting of implementing the 
prohibition any time soon.

Best,
Jeff

Tell me it ain't so, Bob.  Hostile would be a gross understatement.  If you 
would like to chat further let me know.

Best,
Jeff

	Robert C Williams/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/07/2001 05:11 PM
		 
Jeff, Wood is our Commissioner on the Negative CTC Complaint.  Is he hostile 
to Direct Access?  I fear I already know the answer.

The Commission just voted out one half of the "Bilas Alternate."

The decision that got voted out included Bilas' DWR-based language stating 
that the PUC 1) would not second-guess DWR purchases and 2) would pass 
through DWR costs to customers.
However, in a move led by Commissioner Carl Wood, the decision removed the 
Bilas language on Direct Access.  The decision therefore did NOT include the 
Bilas language staying any Commission action on implementing the Direct 
Access prohibition.  Carl Wood called including Direct Access "the height of 
arrogance."  
The decision was voted out 3-2, with the 2 remaining Republicans dissenting.
That said, the Commission has no proposal before it implementing the 
prohibition, and there was no talk at the meeting of implementing the 
prohibition any time soon.

Best,
Jeff

FYI.  I've notified Bob and Mike about Carl Wood's proclivities.

Best,
Jeff
	Robert C Williams/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/07/2001 05:11 PM
		 
Jeff, Wood is our Commissioner on the Negative CTC Complaint.  Is he hostile 
to Direct Access?  I fear I already know the answer.

The Commission just voted out one half of the "Bilas Alternate."

The decision that got voted out included Bilas' DWR-based language stating 
that the PUC 1) would not second-guess DWR purchases and 2) would pass 
through DWR costs to customers.
However, in a move led by Commissioner Carl Wood, the decision removed the 
Bilas language on Direct Access.  The decision therefore did NOT include the 
Bilas language staying any Commission action on implementing the Direct 
Access prohibition.  Carl Wood called including Direct Access "the height of 
arrogance."  
The decision was voted out 3-2, with the 2 remaining Republicans dissenting.
That said, the Commission has no proposal before it implementing the 
prohibition, and there was no talk at the meeting of implementing the 
prohibition any time soon.

Best,
Jeff

I'm in SF.  I'll be here.

	Robert C Williams/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/07/2001 05:27 PM
		 
We are having a "brainstorming" session in SF Tuesday about how to handle the 
Complaint proceeding.  Do you have any time to call in?

Tell me it ain't so, Bob.  Hostile would be a gross understatement.  If you 
would like to chat further let me know.

Best,
Jeff

Jeff, Wood is our Commissioner on the Negative CTC Complaint.  Is he hostile 
to Direct Access?  I fear I already know the answer.

The Commission just voted out one half of the "Bilas Alternate."

The decision that got voted out included Bilas' DWR-based language stating 
that the PUC 1) would not second-guess DWR purchases and 2) would pass 
through DWR costs to customers.
However, in a move led by Commissioner Carl Wood, the decision removed the 
Bilas language on Direct Access.  The decision therefore did NOT include the 
Bilas language staying any Commission action on implementing the Direct 
Access prohibition.  Carl Wood called including Direct Access "the height of 
arrogance."  
The decision was voted out 3-2, with the 2 remaining Republicans dissenting.
That said, the Commission has no proposal before it implementing the 
prohibition, and there was no talk at the meeting of implementing the 
prohibition any time soon.

Best,
Jeff

It continues to be fun, fun, fun out here.  Give a call and I can 
explain--415.782.7822.

Best,
Jeff

FYI.
=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0903/05/2001 05:50 PM
=09=09=20
FYI. As if we weren't having enough fun with electricity....
Note last paragraph of press release calling on government to "get out of t=
he=20
way" and "let the private sector solve the problems in the gas market."

Jeff

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE   CONTACT: James Fisfis
March 5, 2001        (916) 319-2071

GOP MOVES NATURAL GAS TO FRONT BURNER
Assembly Republicans join together once again to request Davis to call=20
special session.

(SACRAMENTO) =01) Assembly Republicans united Monday in asking Governor Gra=
y=20
Davis to call a special session of the California legislature to deal with=
=20
skyrocketing natural gas prices.

=01&Families and businesses are reeling every month from extraordinary gas=
=20
prices.  Pardon the expression, but the natural gas crisis no longer belong=
s=20
on California=01,s back burner,=018 said Assembly Republican leader Bill Ca=
mpbell=20
(R =01) Villa Park).

Assembly Republicans unanimously signed a letter to Governor Gray Davis=20
asking for him to convene a special session of the legislature to deal with=
=20
California=01,s skyrocketing natural gas bills.  Republicans delivered the=
=20
letter to Davis this morning.

=01&A special session is both a symbolic and a practical necessity.  It tel=
ls=20
Californians that we care about their skyrocketing gas bills.  It tells=20
businesses everywhere that California is going to provide for its future=20
energy needs,=018 said Campbell.  =01&Practically speaking, a special sessi=
on also=20
allow us to pass legislation which can take effect immediately.=018

Republicans believe the electricity and natural gas crises are inextricably=
=20
linked.

=01&California=01,s natural gas crisis is completely intertwined with its=
=20
electricity crisis,=018 said Campbell.  =01&Any plan to deal with our elect=
ricity=20
crisis must have a natural gas component or Californians are going to pay=
=20
unacceptably high prices for both.=018

Assembly Republicans believe the natural gas crisis has many fronts, all of=
=20
which could be addressed comprehensively by a special session.

=01&Natural gas issues include pipeline capacity, storage, exploration,=20
alternative fuels and conservation,=018 said Campbell.  =01&A special sessi=
on lets=20
us put together a comprehensive solution.=018

=01&The private sector has the expertise and the capital to deal with these=
=20
issues if government would just get out of the way.  Republicans believe th=
at=20
a legislative solution to the natural gas crisis should leave the resources=
=20
and primary decision-making to the private sector,=018 said Campbell.

# # #
=09Susan J Mara
=0903/05/2001 05:14 PM
=09=09=20
in case you didn't see this

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854
=09"Costigan, Richard" <Richard.Costigan@asm.ca.gov>
=0903/05/2001 02:51 PM
=09=09=20

 <<press release.doc>>  <<Natgastps - rep legislation.doc>>  <<Republican
Energy Address.doc>>  <<QA.doc>>  <<DOE powerpoint.ppt>>

Attached are documents that were part of today's Assembly GOP press
conference on the pending natural gas crisis.  If you have any questions,
please call me.

Thanks,

RSC

Richard Costigan, III
Chief of Staff
Office of the Assembly Republican Leader
California State Assembly
(916) 319-2071

 - press release.doc
 - Natgastps - rep legislation.doc
 - Republican Energy Address.doc
 - QA.doc
 - DOE powerpoint.ppt

This version includes Jim's and Ken's suggestions.

Best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/07/2001 07:02 PM
		
This version includes Jim's and Ken's suggestions.

Best,
Jeff

This copy should correct all of the the typos identified on the call this 
morning.  Apologies if I've missed any.

Best,
Jeff

If there is any possibility of doing it on Wednesday and Thursday, that would 
work much better with my schedule, but I can be flexible if necessary.  
Thanks very much for coordinating.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks, Steve.  Alan, any word from Tim re: resource availability?  See you 
all in Houston.
Best,
Jeff

No.  The decision would have prevented the Commission from implementing the 
legislation that prohibits direct access, at least during the time that 
Legislature and the direct access coalition work together to try to come up 
with a compromise to continue to allow direct access.  So all this means is 
that the prohibition still has not been implemented and there currently is 
nothing before the commission to implement.  Sure would have been nice if the 
commission had passed it, though.

Also, did I tell you that i'm in a meeting all day tomorrow in houston and 
therefore can't do an update call with edward's?  i can, however, do it on 
monday.

best,
jeff

	William Gang@EES
	03/07/2001 08:28 PM
		
Does this mean that the Commission has, de facto, prohibited direct access?  
If so, when is it effective?

Bill

The Commission just voted out one half of the "Bilas Alternate."

The decision that got voted out included Bilas' DWR-based language stating 
that the PUC 1) would not second-guess DWR purchases and 2) would pass 
through DWR costs to customers.
However, in a move led by Commissioner Carl Wood, the decision removed the 
Bilas language on Direct Access.  The decision therefore did NOT include the 
Bilas language staying any Commission action on implementing the Direct 
Access prohibition.  Carl Wood called including Direct Access "the height of 
arrogance."  
The decision was voted out 3-2, with the 2 remaining Republicans dissenting.
That said, the Commission has no proposal before it implementing the 
prohibition, and there was no talk at the meeting of implementing the 
prohibition any time soon.

Best,
Jeff

i won't be in class tonite.  i'm open, too, but to tell you the truth, mark, 
the thought of comparing us and european accounting standards/practices makes 
me break out in a rash.  if there's any way that we can focus on strategy, 
valuation, or other sorts of financial analyses that we've focused on in the 
course, that would be preferable from my perspective.

best,
Jeff

	"Vavrek, Carolyn (US - San Francisco)" <cvavrek@deloitte.com>
	03/07/2001 08:13 PM
		 
either day works for me and i am open to anything for the group project
if we do look at aol/tw we should probably limit our scope to a relatively
specific issue 
i'll think about this some more and perhaps we can talk at the end of break
tomorrow (say around 8-ish)

Carolyn M. Vavrek
Manager - Human Capital Advisory Services
Deloitte & Touche
50 Fremont Street
San Francisco, CA  94105

phone: 415-783-5137
fax: 415-783-8760
e-mail: cvavrek@deloitte.com

The Enron idea is intriguing but could be extremely difficult to do.  If
most of
the Wall Street analysts are havig difficultly seeing through the financial
statements than what chance do we have?

AOL/Time Merger is a good idea.  Also, we can look at a foreign company like
Daimler and see how their financial statements change as they have to
convert to
US GAAP and what this tells us about their foreign accounting.

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax

____________________Reply Separator____________________
No rush, but thought I'd throw this out there just ot get the ball rolling:

   Looks at this point like any of the presentation dates work for me, so I
   don't necessarily have a preference.
   Options for project (and I'm really just throwing stuff out there to
   stimulate thought):
   Analyze AOL/Time Warner merger
   My company, Enron, is accused by some analysts of being nothing more
   than a Merrill-Lynch, or a Morgan-Stanley, or a Goldman-Sachs, etc.
   These analysts claim that we should therefore trade at multiples that
   are in line with the investment houses.  We differ in that view (for a
   lot of reasons that I won't go into here).  Might be interesting to
   analyze strategies, differences, etc.

Anyway, just some thoughts to get the ball rolling.  I'm open to just about
anything.

Best,
Jeff
- This message (including any attachments) contains confidential information
intended for a specific individual and purpose, and is protected by law.  -
If you are not the intended recipient, you should delete this message and
are hereby notified that any disclosure, copying, or distribution of this
message, or the taking of any action based on it, is strictly prohibited.

Wow.  Have a great trip.  I'll anxiously await your return.

Best,
Jeff

	"Gigi Coe" <gcoe@firstworld.net>
	03/07/2001 10:59 PM
		 
Yes - it truly was wonderful to see you.  Swan's it is.  Soon.  I have a too
hectic March and then will be in Europe for two weeks in April so it will be
late April or May before I see you again.  My 50th BD treat to myself is to
take Malcolm to London and Greenwich and Portsmouth and Paris and see all
the Napoleanic Wars sites.  Especially Nelson's ship the Victory which is in
Portsmouth.  (Mike and Kate are coming along, but I think they will probably
squeeze in a trip to Ireland to see horses...)

Anyway - realistically, it'll be farther along into spring.

Until then,  G.
>
>It was fantastic to see you.  You look and seem just great.  Don't be a
>stranger.  Let's go to lunch very soon.
>
>Best,
>Jeff
>
>

Thank you.

	Vicki Sharp@EES
	03/08/2001 08:23 AM
		 
please see the dial in number and call info below.  Please use the 
participant code. 
	Enron Energy Services
	

Vicki,

Your information for the conference call is as follows:

   Dial In #:              (888) 422-7109
   Host Passcode:    298822

	Enron Energy Services
	

Sent by: Leasa Lopez
Please plan to participate in the following conference call:

    Date:                Thursday, March 8, 2001
    Time:   Noon (CT) 
                                                                            
10:00 AM (PT)
    Dial In #:          (888) 422-7109
    Passcode:     423404

Please contact Leasa Lopez at (713) 853-6899, if you have any difficulty 
connecting to this call.

This, my friends, sounds ominous.....

	Linda Robertson
	Sent by: Lora Sullivan
	03/08/2001 10:31 AM
		 
Federal Government Affairs is convening a guest panel at tomorrow's GA 
meeting @ the Woodlands (12:30 PM).

We'd like you to serve as our "guest" panelists.  No preparation is involved!

Looking forward to seeing you at the Woodlands.

Linda

FYI.  Appears that the Davis administration has thrown down the gauntlet, 
looking to position itself in a way that will allow it to blame the FERC/Bush 
administration for California's electricity crisis, unless FERC agrees to the 
ISO's price cap plan.

Best,
Jeff

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/08/2001 10:44 AM
		 
Greetings:
Late last night the ISO released a Market Stabilization plan that would
essentially impose cost based pricing control caps and apply a strict
California First Policy.

Here's ISO's 3-page sketch to impose cost-based pricing intended to control
costs on consumers on very short order.  Unit-specific cost-based bid caps
will apply to ISO markets.  ISO will have dispatch control over all CA
generation.  Capital costs and return appear to be excluded from the bid
caps.  ISO will pick of the day-ahead and day-of energy markets lot to the
demise of CalPX, thus ending the "market separation."  There appears to be
language that intimates direct unit dispatch, but the document is very thin
on this. ISO proposes payments based either on the "as-bid" up to unit bid
cap, or apparently a uniform market-clearing price based on marginal units
cap.  Out of state resources are paid California capped rates.  Settlement
will be on numbers other than those posted (so much for transparency).
There's looking to procure AS based on optimization, although this is not
spelled out well (it appears that self-provision is gummed up completely).

To prevent "MW Laundering" CA will required in-area generation to make all
capacity
available whenever Stage 1 or higher emergency (i.e., reserves below 7%).
This California
First! rule means the generation must be scheduled against CA loads or bid
into day-ahead
market.  If you don't bid your bid cap is applied.  There will be a capacity
element
similar to RMR.  This change will require FERC buy-in, which obviously will
be
litigation-central, and its likely to create a cascade of similar
requirements from other
states ...

Thanks Andy for the quick summary!

IEP will monitor the Friday call and review all documents to let people know
what is happening.

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

                ISO Market Participants:
                Attached is the ISO's draft market stabilization plan.  This
document will be the basis of our conference call on Friday, March 9th at
10:00.
                 <<Market Stabilization Draft 010307.doc>>
                Byron B. Woertz, Jr.
                Director, Client Relations
                (916) 608-7066

 - Market Stabilization Draft 010307.doc

Katie:
Thanks so much for the info.  Do you have the call-in number for the ISO call 
today?

Best,
Jeff

State's Outlays for Electricity May Be Hard to Recover Without a Rate Hike
By REBECCA SMITH, MITCHEL BENSON and JOHN R. EMSHWILLER 
Staff Reporters of THE WALL STREET JOURNAL
SACRAMENTO, Calif. -- Earlier this year, Gov. Gray Davis made what may be the 
biggest bet in the history of the nation's biggest state: that he could tame 
an out-of-control electricity market and avoid devastating blackouts without 
busting the state's budget, antagonizing its consumers or derailing his own 
political career.

His wager is still on the table, but the assumptions that underlie it are 
looking increasingly shaky these days. The governor has already spent around 
$2 billion of public money buying hugely expensive wholesale power, taking 
over the role formerly played by the state's near-bankrupt electric 
utilities. And California will probably be obliged to spend billions more 
before its electricity market stabilizes and those utilities are restored to 
some semblance of financial health.
Under the governor's plan, California aims to recoup the money it is using to 
buy electricity by issuing $10 billion in bonds. That way it would still have 
a healthy budget surplus to finance new spending on roads, schools and other 
public services. But there's a potentially big obstacle to this plan. The 
state Legislature, worried about racking up billions in new debt, has put 
limits on the size of any bond offering. In broad terms, the Legislature's 
action would allow the state to borrow only four times as much as it can 
recover annually from utility customers.
Right now that doesn't appear to be much. Under the current rate structure, 
essentially set in place by California's flawed 1996 electricity-deregulation 
plan, consumers pay far less for power than the cost of acquiring it on the 
wholesale market. Preliminary estimates submitted by utilities last month to 
the California Public Utilities Commission show the state's share of the 
proceeds from electricity sales this year could be as little as $241 million 
-- not enough to support even $1 billion in bond sales under the 
Legislature's formula.

That would leave the state on the hook for much of the money it has already 
paid for power -- not to mention the billions more Gov. Davis will need to 
spend. That, in turn, raises the prospect that California's economy and its 
credit rating both could deteriorate significantly. But state finance 
officials say that, based on their own projections, they will be able to 
extract enough money to support a $10 billion bond issue.
Walking a careful line between fiscal prudence and political survival, Mr. 
Davis and others in his administration are scrambling to come up with ways to 
get around the legislative restrictions without raising rates for consumers. 
"If I wanted to raise rates, I could solve this problem in 20 minutes," Mr. 
Davis says.
The governor says he believes that the state can obtain enough affordable 
power through long-term power-supply contracts to avoid the need for a big 
rate increase. The billions of dollars the state hopes to borrow would be 
used to help pay for power until electricity prices drop, as they are 
expected to do when new power plants come online over the next few years.
The Davis administration fears that what may be its only other option -- a 
big increase in retail electric rates -- could prompt angry consumer groups 
to seek new electricity laws through a statewide ballot initiative during 
next year's election. That's when Mr. Davis is expected to run for a second 
term as governor.
But trying to save California without rate increases is forcing Mr. Davis to 
make some colossal gambles with the state's money. State officials estimate 
that in the next several months, California will need to spend as much as $6 
billion on power purchases -- equivalent to the state's entire fiscal 
surplus. Mr. Davis is also looking to spend several billion more to buy the 
transmission assets of three investor-owned utilities in order to restore two 
of them to credit-worthiness. He also has announced plans to spend several 
hundred million dollars more on conservation programs designed to reduce 
demand while new power plants are being built in the state.
In order to limit the state's financial exposure in the meantime, the 
governor and his aides have, in some cases, ignored state law. They have 
threatened appointed officials who have stood in the way. And they have 
sharply restricted the flow of information to the public.
None of those steps is expected to do much to reduce state spending on power 
in the coming months. In a few weeks, power usage is expected to begin a 
sharp seasonal rise as Californians switch on their air conditioners with the 
coming of warmer weather. By various estimates, demand during peak periods 
this summer could outstrip supply by 10%, or several thousand megawatts. That 
could produce more rolling blackouts like the ones that hit Northern 
California earlier this year. It is also likely to put strong upward pressure 
on wholesale electricity prices.
Steven Zimmerman, managing director of Standard & Poor's Corp., says Mr. 
Davis and his aides don't "have a lot of time" to put a cap on the state's 
financial exposure to the crisis. The credit-rating agency has put the state 
on credit watch for a possible downgrade, which would affect the value of all 
of California's outstanding public debt. Moody's Investor Service Inc. is 
also concerned. It said in a recent report that the power crisis could soon 
"seriously threaten the health" of the state's economy.
Mr. Davis, a Democrat and career politician, was dealt a bad hand when he 
took office in 1999. The deregulation plan that sparked the state's 
electricity crisis was enacted under his predecessor, Republican Pete Wilson. 
But Mr. Davis was slow to react to early signs of trouble this past summer 
and alarms sounded by members of the state Legislature. By the time Mr. Davis 
finally sprang into action earlier this year, a troublesome power-supply 
squeeze had escalated into a crisis.
In a Jan. 17 declaration of emergency, the governor designated the state 
Department of Water Resources to take the utilities' place as the daily buyer 
of huge quantities of electricity. His hope: that by making the state the 
dominant player in California's power sector, he would ease electricity 
producers' concerns about getting paid and give the state enough clout to 
negotiate lower long-term power prices.
Squeaky Summer
Earlier this week, Mr. Davis announced final or tentative agreements with 20 
power suppliers to furnish the state with a total of 8,900 megawatts for 
periods of as long as 20 years. But the supply situation remains extremely 
uncertain for this summer, when demand probably will top 45,000 megawatts. If 
the state can secure enough power under contract and push down demand through 
aggressive conservation, it might be able to squeak through the summer 
season. If not, it will be forced to keep buying huge amounts of costly power 
in the cash market.
Under deregulation, retail electric rates were frozen for several years, 
while wholesale-power costs were free to fluctuate. When the plan was 
conceived, wholesale prices were low and expected to go lower. However, a 
combination of unexpected growth in power demand and a lack of new generating 
capacity helped produce a supply squeeze. Average wholesale prices more than 
tripled last year from 1999. And in January those prices were up 10-fold from 
a year earlier.
By then, California's two biggest investor-owned utilities -- the Pacific Gas 
& Electric unit of PG&E Corp. and the Southern California Edison subsidiary 
of Edison International -- faced imminent financial collapse. They had racked 
up billions of dollars in wholesale power bills they couldn't afford to pay. 
As generators began shying away from selling to the two utilities, the 
Clinton administration forced them to sell power into the California market, 
an order left in place during the first weeks of the Bush administration. 
Still, northern California was hit by rolling blackouts on several days in 
early January.
Learning by Doing
Since then, the DWR, which does some electricity trading as an adjunct to its 
main mission of managing the state's giant system of aqueducts and 
reservoirs, has had to learn the ins and outs of power markets on the run. It 
hasn't been easy.
David Mills, trading-floor manager for the federal Bonneville Power 
Administration, says the water agency has at times offered to pay $50 to $100 
per megawatt hour more than the available market price. "They agree to prices 
that make you wonder," says Mr. Mills, whose organization markets electricity 
from federal dams in the Pacific Northwest. "You'd at least think they'd 
check to see what the prevailing price is before throwing out their offer." 
Mr. Mills says that "to cut California some slack," he occasionally has 
instructed his traders to sell at prices lower than the DWR had offered to 
pay.
Ray Hart, the water agency deputy director responsible for the power 
purchasing, says he isn't aware of any cases in which the DWR has overpaid. 
He says his team has been "extremely successful by all measures."
Ultimately, the DWR's trading acumen is far less important than the overall 
arithmetic of power supply and demand in California. With the price of 
natural gas that feeds many of the region's generating plants at near record 
levels and some suppliers reluctant to sell into the troubled California 
market, wholesale electric prices remain stubbornly high and, in recent days, 
have again been rising.
The Legislature has advanced the DWR about $3 billion from the state's 
general fund for power purchases. Under emergency legislation passed by the 
Legislature and signed by Mr. Davis on Feb. 1, the general fund is to be 
reimbursed from a planned bond sale later this year. But under terms of the 
emergency law, the water agency would have to wrest $2.5 billion a year in 
revenue from retail electricity rates in order to sell the $10 billion worth 
of bonds sought by Mr. Davis.
Assembly Speaker Robert Hertzberg, a Southern California Democrat, says the 
formula was created to ensure that there would be a way to repay the bonds 
without draining the state's coffers. "We didn't want to just open our 
wallets," he says.
According to the language of the Feb. 1 law, the water agency gets what's 
left of revenue collected from ratepayers after the utilities pay certain of 
their own power-supply bills and other expenses. And, in their filings with 
the PUC last month, the utilities reckoned, under their worst-case scenarios, 
that there would be only $241 million available to the DWR this year.
Changing the Formula
State officials are quietly pushing the PUC to rejigger the formula so that 
the water department gets more money -- even though that would clash with 
terms of the Feb. 1 law. Robert Miyashiro, deputy director of the Department 
of Finance, says the emergency law was "drafted poorly" and has led people to 
believe the DWR "only gets the leftover money." He predicts there will be 
"cleanup legislation."
At the request of the Davis administration, the PUC is considering a plan to 
use a different revenue-sharing formula than the one in the state law. The 
proposed new formula was written "in close consultation" with Mr. Davis's 
Finance Department, says PUC President Loretta Lynch, who supports the 
initiative and is hoping to rush it through.
The effort has drawn some opposition. Commissioner Richard Bilas at a recent 
PUC meeting questioned the legality of the commission attempting to change a 
formula set by the Legislature. PG&E is even more emphatic, since the DWR's 
extra money could come at the utility's expense. The formula "threatens to 
undo the very financial protections for the utilities that [the new law] 
attempted to provide," the utility said in a recent filing with the PUC.
Balking at Buying
As politicians and regulators wrestle with that issue, the Davis 
administration has taken a step to reduce the outflow of state cash that also 
seems to conflict with the Feb. 1 law. It was widely assumed that the law 
required the DWR to buy any electricity the state needed to keep its lights 
on. However, on many occasions, the DWR has refused to buy power on the 
grounds that it was too expensive, citing a portion of the new law that urges 
the agency to hold down costs.
The task of covering any remaining shortfall has passed to the California 
Independent System Operator, which manages the state's energy grid and is 
charged with buying power when necessary to avert shortages. However, the ISO 
doesn't have any power-purchasing money of its own, and the major parties it 
would normally bill are PG&E and Edison, whose inability to pay their power 
bills was the reason the state started buying electricity in the first place.
Amid criticism of its stance from generators, utilities and Wall Street, the 
DWR says it has started covering more of the utilities' electricity costs. 
The water agency is now buying 95% to 99% of what California needs in a given 
day, says the agency's Mr. Hart. But increased buying only adds to the 
uncertainty about the eventual tab.
The state's legislative analyst, Elizabeth Hill, recently recommended that 
lawmakers hold off considering more than $2 billion in state spending on 
items ranging from college construction to beach cleanups because of 
continuing questions about the financial impact of the electricity crisis. 
Like others, Ms. Hill complains that the governor's office and state agencies 
haven't been forthcoming with information.
Indeed, the DWR refuses to say precisely how much power it is purchasing and 
at what prices, though it has on several occasions gone back to the 
Legislature for more money. State officials say that data on its purchasing 
activities would give suppliers an advantage in continuing electricity-supply 
contract talks.
State Controller Kathleen Connell, who is running for mayor of Los Angeles in 
an April election, recently announced plans to post state power-spending 
information on her department's Web site. But within 24 hours, Ms. Connell 
suspended that plan after discussions with senior Davis administration 
officials. "I feel very strongly that this information should be publicly 
released," says Ms. Connell. "I just don't want to do anything that would 
weaken the state's effectiveness in negotiating."
In an effort to more tightly control events, the governor obtained 
legislative approval to abolish the 26-member ISO board, which was made up of 
everyone from utility executives to representatives of consumer groups. He 
then appointed a new five-member board. To ensure a quick transition, the 
California attorney general threatened the old board members with fines of as 
much as $5,000 each if they didn't immediately relinquish their positions. 
All did. "I was offended" at the "heavy-handed" treatment, says Karen 
Johanson, a former ISO board member.
One of the first acts of the ISO's new board was to close a meeting about the 
electricity crisis. The former ISO board routinely held such meetings in 
public. ISO attorneys say the meeting was largely designed as a private 
briefing for new board members and that the organization is committed to 
keeping its deliberations as open as possible. The Wall Street Journal and 
other news organizations have unsuccessfully challenged the closure in 
Sacramento state court.
Write to Rebecca Smith at rebecca.smith@wsj.com, Mitchel Benson at 
mitchel.benson@wsj.com and John R. Emshwiller at john.emshwiller@wsj.com

	"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
	03/08/2001 10:51 AM
	Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
		 
Today's agenda for the IEP member company lobbyist conference call at 2pm is
below.
Please call (800) 403-2013 and use code: 207814.

- SB 6x (Burton) status
- AB 8x (Migden) status
- SB 28x (Sher) status
- California First legislation
- QF Update and Lobbying Efforts
- Regulatory Update (ISO/CPUC)
- PR Update
- Next Week's Schedule

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

Yes, agree that another call to weave in the comments we received from the 
biz units would be useful.  Can we shoot for Wednesday, when Mr. Kaufman will 
be here in the SF office?

	Harry Kingerski
	09/25/2000 08:58 AM
		 
	Harry Kingerski
	09/25/2000 08:54 AM
		 
More feedback from Dennis .... I think this requires some 
scrutiny/scrubbing.  Also, I don't think it adheres to the "compromise" that 
was struck among EES participants in the earlier discussion.   I will pursue 
conflict in EES.   Jeff - think we need another conference call soon?

	Dennis Benevides@EES
	09/24/2000 09:36 PM
		
Please see comments on PG&E strategy.  I have made some modifications to be 
more consistent with the three main messages of the ISO MSC report dated 
9/6/00.  Any proposal should address the three messages of this report 1) 
Eliminate mandatory UDC day ahead purchase requirement from PX (this may 
allow generators to exercise mkt power during time periods of high demand) 
and allow utilities to hedge forward purchases in bilateral markets at 
shareholder risk, 2) Provide demand price signals in PG&E/SCE service 
territories ASAP but no later than 10/1/2001 and 3) eliminate incentive for 
large SCs to under schedule in ISO real time market (adopt ISO proposals for 
imbalances in excess of 250 MW per hour).

Dennis

Let me know how this looks.  I'll be shopping it around Govt Affairs.

Scott/Hedy/Mike:
What's the status of the DG bill?  As I recall, Burton amended the bill in a 
way that explicitly prohibit diesel DG units from helping California avoid 
rolling black outs this summer. I believe the exclusion was made on grounds 
that running diesel would be too environmentally damaging?  Could you provide 
a brief update?  Is there anything in the bills that addresses the 
restrictions on the number of hours that these units are permitted to run?  
Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff
	Roger A Larson@EES
	03/08/2001 10:58 AM
		 
We have been analyzing various opportunities of providing electric power into 
California.  One idea is to modify existing customer emergency diesel 
generators such that we could turn them on and supply power to the grid when 
the customer does not need the power.

We believe current regulations limit use of diesel (#2 fuel oil) fired 
emergency generators to only be operated when the utility is not currently 
supplying power to the facility and in that case, maximum of 500 hoursper 
year for hospitals and other critical services but only 200 hours per year 
for all others.

There may be legislation currently being submitted to the California 
legislature or other regulatory body (EPA?) to change this based on current 
need for power in that area.  Could you please advise me if there is 
currently any legislation like this under consideration and/or when this may 
occur?  

Thank you for your assistance.

Roger

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/08/2001 12:17 PM
		 
ISO Market Participants:
 The ISO has developed a market stabilization plan, designed
to stabilize operations and control costs in California, to be implemented
in the next two months.  It would remain in place for the near term (through
Summer, 2001 and beyond) and includes changes to existing ISO practices as
well as an expansion of the ISO's responsibilities.  Because of the need to
move quickly so that the plan can be implemented by this summer, we will be
unable to hold a full stakeholder review process.  But, we do want to
discuss the plan with you so that you can understand the proposal and the
reasoning behind it.
 The ISO will post this plan on the ISO web site at
http://www.caiso.com/stakeholders/ <http://www.caiso.com/stakeholders/> , by
COB tomorrow.  In addition, we will host a conference call from 10:00 a.m.
to 2:00 p.m. PST this Friday, March 9, to discuss the plan with you and
clarify any outstanding issues.  We then plan to request the Board's
approval for this plan on March 15th in order to be able to implement the
plan by summer.
 The call in information is as follows:
 Market Stabilization Conference Call
 Friday, March 9, 10:00 a.m. - 2:00 p.m. PST
 Call-In Number:    877-381-6005
 Conference ID #:    760357
 Leader Name:    Byron Woertz
 Following the call, you may submit any comments on the plan
to us by close of business on Tuesday, March 13.  You may send your comments
to bwoertz@caiso.com.  We will do our best to summarize your comments and
present them to the Board at their March 15 meeting. In addition, there will
be a public comment period on the 15th.
  Please contact me if you have any further questions.
  Byron B. Woertz, Jr.
  Director, Client Relations
  (916) 608-7066

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Katie:
Thanks so much for the info.  Do you have the call-in number for the ISO
call today?

Best,
Jeff

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	03/08/2001 12:12 PM
		 
It's about time!

By Mike Taugher

                       TIMES STAFF WRITER

                       An East Bay state senator is calling on the
                       governor to investigate what he called "price
                       gouging" by a taxpayer-supported agency in Los
                       Angeles.

                       "It's one thing to have some Texas guy ripping
                       you off, but it's another thing to have a public
                       agency in your own state," said Sen. Don Perata.
                       "I think they ought to give the money back."

                       The Oakland Democrat cited reports that put the
                       Los Angeles Department of Water and Power's
                       profits from sales to the state during the past
                       seven weeks at $400 million during a period when
                       the state's electricity bill has moved past $2
                       billion.

                       Perata, comparing the agency's electricity sales
                       to its raids on northern counties' water during
Los
                       Angeles' formative years, said a rebate is in
order
                       to prevent heightened conflicts between Northern
                       and Southern California.

                       "I think it's perfectly legal," Perata said. "I
think
                       it's immoral."

                       But Frank Salas, chief of staff for the Los
Angeles
                       agency, said his department is selling
electricity
                       at a reasonable 15 percent profit. He said recent

                       sales to the state have been in the range of $300

                       to $350 per megawatt-hour and that the $400
                       million profit figure cited by Perata was grossly

                       inflated.

                       "We would welcome an investigation," Salas said.
                       "If there is an investigation, we would be shown
to
                       be a good neighbor to the state and not a price
                       gouger."

                       Perata said that if Davis does not investigate
the
                       state's purchases from the Southern California
                       agency, he will file a formal request under the
                       public records law to force disclosure regarding
                       the purchases.

                       Details about the state electricity purchases
have
                       been shrouded in secrecy because the governor
                       says release of the information will allow power
                       generators to manipulate prices and drive them
                       higher.

                       "This whole area is a like a star chamber,"
Perata
                       said. "This stuff can't be proprietary if it
involves
                       public agencies."

                       Meanwhile, the head of the Los Angeles water
                       and power agency, who has been tapped by
                       Davis to lead the state's efforts to obtain
                       long-term electricity contracts, said that even
                       though the state is spending about $55 million a
                       day to keep the lights on, state coffers can be
                       refilled without raising consumer rates.

                       "There is no basis for any rate (increase) ...
                       maybe ever," said S. David Freeman, director of
                       the Los Angeles water agency.

                       Freeman was responding to an order issued
                       Wednesday by the state Public Utilities
                       Commission clearing the way for the state
                       treasury to be reimbursed for its power
                       purchases.

                       The PUC, meeting in San Francisco, delayed for
                       at least a week a decision on the more
                       controversial issue of how much the state should
                       be repaid. But it did issue an order that said
the
                       state Department of Water Resources is entitled
                       to reimbursement.

                       Pacific Gas & Electric Co. contends that under a
                       formula set up by lawmakers, the utility is
entitled
                       to collect its costs for buying power before
                       reimbursing the state. According to the utility's

                       calculations, that would mean it would keep all
of
                       the money paid to it by customers even though
                       the state today is buying up to one-third of the
                       electricity used each day.

                       Freeman countered that for every kilowatt-hour
                       the state purchases, its utilities are required
to
                       pass on the roughly 6 cents or 7 cents that
                       customers pay on their bills to buy those
                       kilowatt-hours.

                       "They are whistling Dixie," Freeman said. "The
                       law is very clear it is not their money."

                       PUC President Loretta Lynch said she hoped the
                       commission would decide the question next
                       week.

                       Freeman said he has deliberately kept his
                       distance in transactions between the state and
                       his employer and that he does not know how
                       much electricity the Department of Water and
                       Power is selling to the state. Freeman has been
                       working with Davis for the period of time Perata
is
                       examining.

                       "On my watch there was no price gouging,"
                       Freeman said.

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/08/2001 12:14 PM
		 
Here is the "kick-off" memo requested by the folks on the Public Affairs
call on Monday.  Please review the document an send me any comments.  Just a
reminder... we will hold a Public Affairs call on Monday March 12, 2001 at
1:00 PST to discuss this memo and other issues.
The call in number is:  1-800-486-2460
The Pass code is:  120895

As always, please let me know if you have any questions.
Thanks!

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Greetings:

As many of you know, the IEP Board met last week and decided upon a new
committee structure within IEP. The Public Affairs Committee was created to
replace the Market Response Committee with Greg Blue appointed as the
interim chairperson. We would like to move to establish this new committee
as soon as possible and meet to discuss direction, specific upcoming issues,
an overall plan, budget and structure for the year. We would like to start
this process with a conference call on Monday March 5, 2001 at 3:00 p.m.
Please see call in information below. (It is not necessary for any
consultants to participate in the Monday call.)   This conference call will
be followed by an in-person meeting here at IEP on Thursday March 8, 2001 at
2:00 p.m.

If you are interested in participating on this committee please signify that
with an e-mail response to this message.

For those planning on participating on the conference call we will send out
the agenda on Monday.  During that conference call we will also set the
agenda for the Thursday in person meeting. During the Thursday meeting we
would also like to move to select a permanent chairperson.

Thank you for your attention to this important matter and I look forward to
continuing to work with each of you and make this new committee structure a
success.
I have set up a permanent Conference Call in number and Pass-code for the
Public Affairs Committee that we will use every time we have a conference
call.  We will begin using this call-in number on Monday.
The call in number for Monday's 3:00 p.m. call is is:
        1-800-486-2460
The Pass-code is:
120895

Thanks,

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

 - Public Affairs memo.doc

	Jennifer Rudolph@EES
	03/08/2001 03:31 PM
		 
* CA Senate passed SBX1 43 today
* Now, the bill goes to the Assembly
* Looking for article...
* More to come

yes, monday works.

	JBennett <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	03/08/2001 06:17 PM
		 
Attached is the weekly update of events at the California Public Utilities
Commission.  As always, call if you have any questions.

 <<X20615.DOC>>

Jeanne Bennett

 - X20615.DOC

=09"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
=0903/09/2001 06:59 PM
=09Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
=09=09=20

Date: 3/9/01

RECENT EVENTS:

-- AB 60x (Hertzberg) is going to be amended before its hearing on Monday.
The original version would have required, as a condition of permitting a
powerplant, developers to offer to sell the power to California entities.
The new amendments do not appear to address IEP=01,s concerns with the meas=
ure
and may be even worse.  IEP is currently reviewing the following language
and is expected to maintain its opposition:

Section 25525.3 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission shall
require, as a condition of certification, that the applicant shall offer to
enter into a contract to sell to an electrical corporation as defined in
Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code, a municipal corporation as define=
d
in Section 9601 of the Public Utilities Code, or the Department of Water
Resources, electrical power generated by the facility as its initial and
continuing available capacity on terms not less favorable than the terms of
the next offer that the applicant makes for the sale of electrical power
generated by that facility.
(b) This section applies to applications filed prior to the effective date
of the act that added this section that have not been certified by the
commission prior to that date.
(c)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the commission
to delay the adoption of a final decision in any proceeding in which public
record has been closed and submitted for a final decision.
(d)  The commission shall adopt rules and regulations for the implementatio=
n
and enforcement of this section.

-- AB 8x (Migden), which would give the EOB additional and undefined powers
related to the coordination of operation and maintenance schedules, passed
the Assembly Appropriations committee.  As a follow-up to the policy
committee hearing, IEP submitted comments and amendments to the author=01,s
office.  Before any changes to the bill are made, Migden=01,s office has
indicated their preference for a larger stakeholder meeting to address thes=
e
and others concerns, which is unlikely to occur before the bill passes off
the Assembly floor next week.  IEP=01,s primary interest is getting changes=
 to
the bill that it can live with before it reaches the Senate policy
committee.

-- SB 39x (Speier), which would define generators as public utilities and
put the CPUC in the role of coordinating outages and maintenance schedules,
passed out of the Senate Appropriations Committee with little change.  One
of the amendments taken would clarify that only owners of the divested
plants would be subject to the provisions in the bill.  Several generators
met with Speier this week to plead their case with little affect.  The
measure will go to the Senate floor next and is expected to pass.  Where
this measure will find difficulties is in the Assembly, which will have
already passed out AB 8x (Migden), which accomplishes the same goals as SB
39x.  Chances are that the Assembly ECA committee would hold SB 39x in
deference to the committee=01,s position on AB 8x.  The same could be said =
for
AB 8x on the Senate side, but AB 8x came from the Administration which may
give it more weight to move it forward.

-- The Senate Energy Committee heard SB 47x (Battin), which lowers the
payments of the purchase power agreements between the QFs and the IOUs, but
did not vote on the measure.  Senator Bowen, Chair of the committee, was
intent on discussing selected provisions of the bill and their relationship
to public policy objectives before she felt comfortable taking a vote.  She
indicated a desire to continue discussions with stakeholders to address and
clarify issues and concerns in the bill, and bring it up for another hearin=
g
and vote most likely next Tuesday.  IEP continues to seek support for the
measure and add co-authors.

-- The Senate Energy Committee also heard SB 28x (Sher/Battin), which makes
various changes to the siting process including many IEP-sponsored
proposals.  So far this is the most comprehensive and positive siting bill
introduced, with the greatest chance of moving forward.  The bill passed ou=
t
of the committee on a 9 to 0 vote even though most of the environmental
community testified in opposition.  Chris Ellison and I are continuing to
work with the authors=01, staff to develop additional language which should=
 be
available before the measure goes to the Assembly.  Senator Bowen, however,
has indicated she will bring it back to her committee for another hearing i=
f
there are any significant changes, slowing the bill=01,s progress.

-- AB 36x (Wright), which would apply specified repower projects to the
6-month expedited siting process established in AB 970 (2000), passed out o=
f
the Assembly Appropriations Committee.  IEP testified in support of the
bill, still noting we were still working with the author on language.  IEP
continues to believe that with the current language, few, if any, projects
would qualify and is working with staff on fixing that.

--  Attached is the most recent legislative tracking reports, both the
special session and regular session.  Please let me know if you need copies
of any of these bills.

UPCOMING EVENTS:

MONDAY, March 5th
Senate Appropriations Committee
SB 28x (Speier) =01) makes various changes to siting process

Assembly Energy Costs and Availability Committee
AB 38x (Jackson) =01) provides financial incentives for renewable generatio=
n
AB 60x (Hertzberg) =01) ties =01&California first=018 language to the sitin=
g process.

Assembly Revenue and Taxation Committee
AB 62x (Cohn) =01) relating to local property taxes

--end--

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - 2001 Tracking Report.doc
 - 2001 Tracking Report.special session.doc

	Vicki Sharp@EES
	03/10/2001 10:35 AM
		
UC/CSU has brought an action in Federal Court in Oakland seeking to have its 
physical delivery service returned to direct access.
Would the  regulatory affairs team I am copying on this letter decide who the 
point person should be for us to communicate with.  We would hope  that you 
could participate in the call or we could debrief you afterwards.   Thanks. 

Dan Leff
03/10/2001 05:56 AM
Mike Smith needs to be involved in all of this communication

Thank you - Dan

Donna Teal
03/09/2001 10:48 PM
	

Please plan to attend this meeting; Tom and Doug, please call in.  

Date:  Sunday, March 11
Time:  1:00 - 5:00 pm
Location: EB872
Topic:  UC/CSU
Host:  Jeff Messina
Dial In No.: 1-800-991-9019
Passcode: 6 0 6 9 9 6 3

Conference call phone number 800-766-1863 - - confirmation no. 3702121

If you have any questions, please call Jeff Messina at 281-361-9185.

Regards,
Donna for Jeff Messina

Contact Information

Name	Office No.	Pager No.	Home No.	Cell No.
V. Sharpe	713-853-7413		713-472-8072	713-822-3048
T. Riley	925-543-3703	888-937-4479	925-254-6416	510-928-9292
D. Huth	925-543-3709	888-797-9446	925-362-0008	925-381-7205
P. Mahoney	713-345-7034		713-667-8511	713-504-4338
M. Sunde	713-853-7797	888-753-9478	713-355-9138	713-553-1582
D. Leff	713-853-7903		713-688-1622	281-650-1199
E. Hughes	713-345-3311			713-444-3125
J. Messina	713-853-9293	888-395-3127	281-361-9185	713-504-9031

FYI.
	Ed Ghalib/Western Region/The Bentley Company@Exchange
	03/09/2001 11:47 AM
		 
Joseph,

Per our telephone conversation, attached is the draft program for the 
activities scheduled for our client's Grand Opening which will be attended by 
Governor Gray Davis and other Government VIP's.  As I told you, my company, 
The Bentley Company (Architecture/Engineering/Construction company within 
EES), was responsible for a prominent part of this facility's construction 
(involving the conversion of a large Boeing factory that SR Technics acquired 
with much involvement from the Governor's office) and Enron/Bentley will be 
part of the Grand Opening through possible sponsorship of some event(s), full 
page ad in the souvenir program, Enron name brand recognition through 
banners, etc.  I am working out the details of our involvement with the event 
coordinator right now.  I suspect Enron governmental affairs would like 
involvement given the relatively high exposure this event will garner 
politically and through the news media (please refer to the attachment).

Please contact me ASAP at 661-609-4886 to discuss.

Regards,

Ed Ghalib, S.E.
Director, Client Management

email: ed_ghalib@enron.com
voice: 714.434.1800, ext 310
mobile: 661.609.4886

ENRON/Bentley
611 Anton Blvd., Suite 700
Costa Mesa, CA  92626

Hi. I'm ready to go postal with all the computer problems I'm having.  Did 
you get the document I sent yesterday morning? 

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	03/09/2001 12:12 PM
		 
Attached, please find this article "California Power Costs Hijack New
Campus Funds Science institutes, UC Merced out of proposed budget" from
today's San Francisco Chronicle.

http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/chronicle/archive/2001/03/09/M
N221037.DTL

Bill:
As ususal, there's another crisis today.  I'll be able to do the call, but we 
need to keep it brief.  Apologies.  What's the cal-in number?  Thanks.
Best,
Jeff

	William Gang@EES
	03/09/2001 11:50 AM
		 
Set for Monday.  Thanks, Jeff.

Regards,
Bill
Hoffer Amy C Capt 95 CEG/CEOE <Amy.Hoffer@edwards.af.mil> on 03/08/2001 
06:28:15 PM
The conference call with Enron for tomorrow has been moved to Monday at 0900
PST, 1100 CST. Sorry for the last min change.

Capt Amy Hoffer
Paul, I just found out that Jeff Dasovich has been called to a meeting in
Houston, and will be out all day tomorrow.  He is available on Monday.  Can
we do our conference call at 0900?  I have asked him to confirm the time.
I have to leave for Ft Leavenworth at 1030 hrs on Monday, so 0900 works
well for me.  Hope it works at your end.

Regards,
Bill
---

FYI.  Should be of interest.
Best,
Jeff

DISCRETIONARY LOAD CURTAILMENT PROGRAM

The California Independent System Operator (ISO) has created the=20
Discretionary Load Curtailment Program (DLCP) to provide additional resourc=
es=20
to the grid for the management of potential system emergency conditions. =
=20
This program provides an energy-only payment and gives Loads total control=
=20
over their curtailments, the control that many need to feel comfortable=20
participating in a demand response program. =20
The DLCP consists of two parts:=20
? a Day Ahead Request, and=20
? a Day Of Request for curtailment. =20
The ISO will pay Load Aggregators $500/MWh for Demand they offer and curtai=
l=20
in the Day Ahead portion, and $750/MWh for Demand they offer and curtail on=
=20
the Day Of portion. =20
This program will act as an umbrella for certain UDCs=01, programs under=20
Assembly Bill AB31x and also attracts any other aggregator that can bid loa=
d=20
curtailments into the program.  A Load Aggregator (LA) can be any company w=
ho=20
enters into a DLCP Agreement with the ISO.  Because AB31x provides payments=
=20
for the bundled customers that are aggregated by the UDCs, an alternate=20
agreement will be made with them regarding procedures of operation.  Non-UD=
C=20
Load Aggregators will receive the performance payments from the ISO through=
=20
their elected Scheduling Coordinator. =20
The DLCP will operate year-round during the hours of 7:00AM until 8:00PM fr=
om=20
now until December 31, 2001.  The need for this program will be evaluated=
=20
throughout 2001 and implemented for 2002 if needed. Some provisions includi=
ng=20
trigger mechanisms and payments may be re-evaluated and changed based on=20
Summer 2001 experience. =20
The ISO is accepting proposals from those interested in being a Load=20
Aggregator, starting on March XX, 2001 and continuing until the end of this=
=20
program. For more information and a copy of the Request for Proposals, plea=
se=20
visit our web site (www.caiso.com/clientserv/load) (this will be posted aft=
er=20
the DLCP is approved).
The DLCP is intended to provide the ISO with Demand curtailment from Loads=
=20
that may not be able to participate in the ISO=01,s Participating Load Prog=
ram=20
(Ancillary Services and Supplemental Energy) or the ISO=01,s Summer 2001 De=
mand=20
Relief Program.  However, contracted DRP Loads may participate in the DLCP=
=20
during months outside of the DRP period. Additionally, existing UDC=20
interruptible customers that have met their yearly contractual obligation m=
ay=20
participate. This new program is intended to allow end-use Loads to=20
participate, through a Load Aggregator, in a curtailment program while givi=
ng=20
those Loads total discretion whether to participate in any day the program =
is=20
activated by the ISO.

Key Features of the DLCP
Feature=09
DLCP Availability=09March XX, 2001 =01) December 31, 2002
Minimum Load Aggregator Portfolio=091MW
Curtailed Energy Payment=09Day Ahead: $500/MWh
=09Day Of:        $750/MWh=20
Curtailment Window=097:00 AM =01) 8:00 PM
DLCP Request=09Day Ahead Request:
=09Upon ISO projecting a need for demand response (the ISO may call on this=
=20
program based upon the best available temperature, load, and resource=20
forecast information) for specified hours of the next day.  The DLCP Day=20
Ahead Request will be issued by 4:00PM
=09Day Of Request:
=09Upon ISO projecting a need for demand response (the ISO may call on this=
=20
program based upon the best available temperature, load, and resource=20
forecast information) for specific hours on that day.  The DLCP Day Of=20
Request will be issued by 8:00AM. =20
DLCP Offer=09LAs shall respond to the DLCP Day Ahead Request by 6:00pm of t=
he day of=20
the DLCP Request.=20
=09
=09LAs shall respond to the DLCP Day Of Request by 9:00AM.   =20
DLCP Confirmation =09The ISO will issue a DLCP Day Ahead Confirmation notic=
e to=20
the LAs no later than 7:00 PM of the day before the curtailment.  =20
=09
=09The ISO will issue a DLCP Day Of Confirmation notice to the LAs no later=
 than=20
9:30AM of the day of the curtailment. =20
DLCP Curtailment=09The LA shall assure that the Load is notified and curtai=
ls in the=20
hour(s) as per the DLCP Confirmation notice.  =20
Use of Generation=09Less than 1MW total behind each interval meter, with ap=
proval from=20
AQMD.
Order / Timing of Curtailment=09Because the DLCP Curtailment will be based =
on the times=20
identified in the DLCP Confirmation notice the curtailments could occur=20
irrespective of the Emergency Status.

Eligibility
DLCP Load Aggregator
In order to be eligible for the DLCP, Load Aggregators (including UDCs):
1. Must be able to provide a portfolio that contains a net reduction in=20
Demand of at least 1MW, either alone or when aggregated with other customer=
s,
2. Must sign a DLCP Agreement,
3. Must have an ISO approved performance measurement process,=20
4. Must be capable of interacting with the ISO=01,s DLCP infrastructure as =
well=20
as communicate with the end-use Load customer,
5. Must nominate an SC for settlement transactions with the ISO.

DLCP End-Use Load Customer
In order to be eligible for the DLCP, an end-use Load customer:
1. Must be able to provide a net reduction in Demand that meets the criteri=
a=20
of the LA, or the Local Regulatory Authority,
2. Must have an interval meter approved by the Local Regulatory Authority, =
or=20
have the appropriate measuring device(s) as required by the approved LA=01,=
s=20
performance measurement process,
3. Must be located inside the ISO Control Area (ask your LA, if you are not=
=20
sure),
4. Must not concurrently participate in the ISO=01,s Summer 2001 DRP, howev=
er=20
may participate during months outside of the DRP contracted period (May=20
15-September 30, 2001),=20
5. If the end-use load is a UDC interruptible customer, the customer may=20
participate in the DLCP as long as the customer has met all the contractual=
=20
obligations of an interruptible customer,
6. Must not have a Participating Load Agreement (PLA) with the ISO for the=
=20
same Load offered under the DLCP,
7. Must obtain and provide positive proof of all necessary permits of=20
operation or approvals from the local Air Pollution Control District or Air=
=20
Quality Management District for each individual Generating Unit designated=
=20
for participation in the DLCP.=20

DLCP Process:
? DLCP Request
1. DLCP Day Ahead Request:
The ISO will project the need for demand response. The ISO may call on this=
=20
program based upon the best temperature, load, and resource forecast=20
information available by 4:00PM the day ahead.  The ISO will issue a DLCP D=
ay=20
Ahead Request by e-mail to all contracted Load Aggregators.  The e-mail=20
notice will request the curtailment amounts for two-hour blocks within the=
=20
ISO specified curtailment timeframe.  The ISO will provide any constraints =
in=20
the notice.
2. DLCP Day Of Request:
The ISO will project the need for demand response.  The ISO will base this=
=20
projection upon the best temperature, load, and resource forecast informati=
on=20
available by 8:00AM of the day of the request. The ISO will issue a DLCP Da=
y=20
Of Request by e-mail to all Load Aggregators.  The e-mail notice will reque=
st=20
the curtailment amounts for each two-hour block requested.  The ISO will=20
provide any constraints in the notice.

? DLCP Offer
1. By 6:00PM on the Day Ahead, the Load Aggregators will submit to the ISO,=
=20
through the ISO DLCP website, their committed amounts of Load Curtailment. =
=20
The ISO expects that the Load Aggregators will have contacted the End-Use=
=20
Loads in their program to determine how much curtailment will be available=
=20
and for which hours of the day.=20
2. By 9:00AM of the Day Of, the Load Aggregators will submit their committe=
d=20
amounts of curtailment. =20

? DLCP Confirmation
Once the ISO reviews submitted DLCP Offers, ISO Operations will issue an=20
e-mail notice to both the Load Aggregators and their Scheduling Coordinator=
s=20
accepting specific DLCP Offers.  The ISO will issue the DLCP Confirmation=
=20
notice by 7:00PM on the day the Day Ahead Request was made and by 9:30AM fo=
r=20
the Day Of Requests. These confirmation notices will request that the Load=
=20
Aggregators communicate to the End-Use Loads the required curtailment amoun=
t=20
and duration.  This will be the only communication (dispatch) to the Load=
=20
Aggregators detailing the curtailment. =20
? DLCP Performance
The effectiveness of the DLCP will be based on the performance of each=20
End-Use Load in curtailing their confirmed curtailment amount. The ISO=20
expects that the committed curtailment will occur based on the hours as=20
confirmed through the DLCP Confirmation notices.  An aggregator has the=20
responsibility to produce the demand reduction it confirms.  There is no se=
t=20
penalty, except that continued poor performance could result in revocation =
of=20
the DLCP Agreement. =20

? Performance Measurement Guidelines
The measurement of performance for each End-Use Load will be performed by t=
he=20
Load Aggregators.  Each Load Aggregator will have an ISO approved performan=
ce=20
measurement plan, which will be used to calculate the DLCP performance.  Th=
e=20
performance measurement plan shall include the following:
? For interval metered End-Use Loads the Load Aggregator will calculate a=
=20
baseline Load profile.  DLCP performance will be measured by the difference=
=20
between baseline Load profile and the meter read for the hour(s) of=20
curtailment. =20
? For non-interval metered Loads, DLCP performance will be calculated by=20
using a combination of sample measurements, historic data, process controls=
,=20
use of data loggers, and any other performance measurement method approved =
by=20
the ISO.  Load Aggregators shall obtained ISO approval prior to offering DL=
CP=20
for non-interval metered End-Use Loads.  (It should be noted that the ISO=
=20
favors interval meters.)
? DLCP Settlement
Each DLCP Offer for which a DLCP Confirmation was issued by the ISO shall b=
e=20
uniquely identified.  Therefore, DLCP Day Ahead and DLCP Day Of offers must=
=20
be separately identified. The Load Aggregators (except for the UDCs) shall=
=20
submit the DLCP Performance Measurement for each confirmed offer by using t=
he=20
DLCP website no later than 45 days following the operating day of the DLCP=
=20
Curtailment.  The ISO will calculate the performance payment by simply=20
multiplying the DLCP energy price ($500/MWh for DLCP Day Ahead and $750/MWh=
=20
for DLCP Day Of) by the amount of DLCP (in MWs) for each hour of confirmed=
=20
curtailment. For each month the performance payments will be summed up for=
=20
all the confirmed curtailments and paid to the Load Aggregator=01,s nominat=
ed=20
Scheduling Coordinator.  The payment will be made to the Scheduling=20
Coordinator in accordance to the ISO Payment Calendar timeline. =20
The ISO recognizes that UDCs acting as Load Aggregators will have specific=
=20
rules to follow for the settlement of the dispatched curtailment.  The UDCs=
=20
will be responsible for following the settlement rules and regulations set=
=20
forth by the CPUC for the End-Use Loads. =20

How to enroll in the DLCP:
Load Aggregator
1. For a Load Aggregator, contact the ISO.  The DLCP Request for Proposal=
=20
(RFP) and Agreement are posted on the ISO website:=20
www.caiso.com/clientserv/load,
2. Contact the ISO.  The ISO contact for the DLCP is:
Glen Perez, Manager Data Quality
California ISO
gperez@caiso.com
3. Submit a proposal and enter into a DLCP Agreement.  Responses to the RFP=
=20
should be submitted to:
California Independent System Operator
151 Blue Ravine Road
Folsom, CA 95630

Attention:  John Counsil, Contracts=20

End-Use Customers
1. Contact a Load Aggregator.  A list of approved Load Aggregators will be=
=20
posted on the ISO website: www.caiso.com/clientserv/load,
2. Contact your UDC.  They may have an enrollment process to be followed. =
=20
3. Any questions contact the ISO.  The ISO contact for the DLCP is:

Glen Perez, Manager Data Quality
California ISO
gperez@caiso.com

=09Jeff Dasovich
=09Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
=0903/12/2001 10:05 AM
=09=09=20
FYI.  Should be of interest.
Best,
Jeff

DISCRETIONARY LOAD CURTAILMENT PROGRAM

The California Independent System Operator (ISO) has created the=20
Discretionary Load Curtailment Program (DLCP) to provide additional resourc=
es=20
to the grid for the management of potential system emergency conditions. =
=20
This program provides an energy-only payment and gives Loads total control=
=20
over their curtailments, the control that many need to feel comfortable=20
participating in a demand response program. =20
The DLCP consists of two parts:=20
? a Day Ahead Request, and=20
? a Day Of Request for curtailment. =20
The ISO will pay Load Aggregators $500/MWh for Demand they offer and curtai=
l=20
in the Day Ahead portion, and $750/MWh for Demand they offer and curtail on=
=20
the Day Of portion. =20
This program will act as an umbrella for certain UDCs=01, programs under=20
Assembly Bill AB31x and also attracts any other aggregator that can bid loa=
d=20
curtailments into the program.  A Load Aggregator (LA) can be any company w=
ho=20
enters into a DLCP Agreement with the ISO.  Because AB31x provides payments=
=20
for the bundled customers that are aggregated by the UDCs, an alternate=20
agreement will be made with them regarding procedures of operation.  Non-UD=
C=20
Load Aggregators will receive the performance payments from the ISO through=
=20
their elected Scheduling Coordinator. =20
The DLCP will operate year-round during the hours of 7:00AM until 8:00PM fr=
om=20
now until December 31, 2001.  The need for this program will be evaluated=
=20
throughout 2001 and implemented for 2002 if needed. Some provisions includi=
ng=20
trigger mechanisms and payments may be re-evaluated and changed based on=20
Summer 2001 experience. =20
The ISO is accepting proposals from those interested in being a Load=20
Aggregator, starting on March XX, 2001 and continuing until the end of this=
=20
program. For more information and a copy of the Request for Proposals, plea=
se=20
visit our web site (www.caiso.com/clientserv/load) (this will be posted aft=
er=20
the DLCP is approved).
The DLCP is intended to provide the ISO with Demand curtailment from Loads=
=20
that may not be able to participate in the ISO=01,s Participating Load Prog=
ram=20
(Ancillary Services and Supplemental Energy) or the ISO=01,s Summer 2001 De=
mand=20
Relief Program.  However, contracted DRP Loads may participate in the DLCP=
=20
during months outside of the DRP period. Additionally, existing UDC=20
interruptible customers that have met their yearly contractual obligation m=
ay=20
participate. This new program is intended to allow end-use Loads to=20
participate, through a Load Aggregator, in a curtailment program while givi=
ng=20
those Loads total discretion whether to participate in any day the program =
is=20
activated by the ISO.

Key Features of the DLCP
Feature=09
DLCP Availability=09March XX, 2001 =01) December 31, 2002
Minimum Load Aggregator Portfolio=091MW
Curtailed Energy Payment=09Day Ahead: $500/MWh
=09Day Of:        $750/MWh=20
Curtailment Window=097:00 AM =01) 8:00 PM
DLCP Request=09Day Ahead Request:
=09Upon ISO projecting a need for demand response (the ISO may call on this=
=20
program based upon the best available temperature, load, and resource=20
forecast information) for specified hours of the next day.  The DLCP Day=20
Ahead Request will be issued by 4:00PM
=09Day Of Request:
=09Upon ISO projecting a need for demand response (the ISO may call on this=
=20
program based upon the best available temperature, load, and resource=20
forecast information) for specific hours on that day.  The DLCP Day Of=20
Request will be issued by 8:00AM. =20
DLCP Offer=09LAs shall respond to the DLCP Day Ahead Request by 6:00pm of t=
he day of=20
the DLCP Request.=20
=09
=09LAs shall respond to the DLCP Day Of Request by 9:00AM.   =20
DLCP Confirmation =09The ISO will issue a DLCP Day Ahead Confirmation notic=
e to=20
the LAs no later than 7:00 PM of the day before the curtailment.  =20
=09
=09The ISO will issue a DLCP Day Of Confirmation notice to the LAs no later=
 than=20
9:30AM of the day of the curtailment. =20
DLCP Curtailment=09The LA shall assure that the Load is notified and curtai=
ls in the=20
hour(s) as per the DLCP Confirmation notice.  =20
Use of Generation=09Less than 1MW total behind each interval meter, with ap=
proval from=20
AQMD.
Order / Timing of Curtailment=09Because the DLCP Curtailment will be based =
on the times=20
identified in the DLCP Confirmation notice the curtailments could occur=20
irrespective of the Emergency Status.

Eligibility
DLCP Load Aggregator
In order to be eligible for the DLCP, Load Aggregators (including UDCs):
1. Must be able to provide a portfolio that contains a net reduction in=20
Demand of at least 1MW, either alone or when aggregated with other customer=
s,
2. Must sign a DLCP Agreement,
3. Must have an ISO approved performance measurement process,=20
4. Must be capable of interacting with the ISO=01,s DLCP infrastructure as =
well=20
as communicate with the end-use Load customer,
5. Must nominate an SC for settlement transactions with the ISO.

DLCP End-Use Load Customer
In order to be eligible for the DLCP, an end-use Load customer:
1. Must be able to provide a net reduction in Demand that meets the criteri=
a=20
of the LA, or the Local Regulatory Authority,
2. Must have an interval meter approved by the Local Regulatory Authority, =
or=20
have the appropriate measuring device(s) as required by the approved LA=01,=
s=20
performance measurement process,
3. Must be located inside the ISO Control Area (ask your LA, if you are not=
=20
sure),
4. Must not concurrently participate in the ISO=01,s Summer 2001 DRP, howev=
er=20
may participate during months outside of the DRP contracted period (May=20
15-September 30, 2001),=20
5. If the end-use load is a UDC interruptible customer, the customer may=20
participate in the DLCP as long as the customer has met all the contractual=
=20
obligations of an interruptible customer,
6. Must not have a Participating Load Agreement (PLA) with the ISO for the=
=20
same Load offered under the DLCP,
7. Must obtain and provide positive proof of all necessary permits of=20
operation or approvals from the local Air Pollution Control District or Air=
=20
Quality Management District for each individual Generating Unit designated=
=20
for participation in the DLCP.=20

DLCP Process:
? DLCP Request
1. DLCP Day Ahead Request:
The ISO will project the need for demand response. The ISO may call on this=
=20
program based upon the best temperature, load, and resource forecast=20
information available by 4:00PM the day ahead.  The ISO will issue a DLCP D=
ay=20
Ahead Request by e-mail to all contracted Load Aggregators.  The e-mail=20
notice will request the curtailment amounts for two-hour blocks within the=
=20
ISO specified curtailment timeframe.  The ISO will provide any constraints =
in=20
the notice.
2. DLCP Day Of Request:
The ISO will project the need for demand response.  The ISO will base this=
=20
projection upon the best temperature, load, and resource forecast informati=
on=20
available by 8:00AM of the day of the request. The ISO will issue a DLCP Da=
y=20
Of Request by e-mail to all Load Aggregators.  The e-mail notice will reque=
st=20
the curtailment amounts for each two-hour block requested.  The ISO will=20
provide any constraints in the notice.

? DLCP Offer
1. By 6:00PM on the Day Ahead, the Load Aggregators will submit to the ISO,=
=20
through the ISO DLCP website, their committed amounts of Load Curtailment. =
=20
The ISO expects that the Load Aggregators will have contacted the End-Use=
=20
Loads in their program to determine how much curtailment will be available=
=20
and for which hours of the day.=20
2. By 9:00AM of the Day Of, the Load Aggregators will submit their committe=
d=20
amounts of curtailment. =20

? DLCP Confirmation
Once the ISO reviews submitted DLCP Offers, ISO Operations will issue an=20
e-mail notice to both the Load Aggregators and their Scheduling Coordinator=
s=20
accepting specific DLCP Offers.  The ISO will issue the DLCP Confirmation=
=20
notice by 7:00PM on the day the Day Ahead Request was made and by 9:30AM fo=
r=20
the Day Of Requests. These confirmation notices will request that the Load=
=20
Aggregators communicate to the End-Use Loads the required curtailment amoun=
t=20
and duration.  This will be the only communication (dispatch) to the Load=
=20
Aggregators detailing the curtailment. =20
? DLCP Performance
The effectiveness of the DLCP will be based on the performance of each=20
End-Use Load in curtailing their confirmed curtailment amount. The ISO=20
expects that the committed curtailment will occur based on the hours as=20
confirmed through the DLCP Confirmation notices.  An aggregator has the=20
responsibility to produce the demand reduction it confirms.  There is no se=
t=20
penalty, except that continued poor performance could result in revocation =
of=20
the DLCP Agreement. =20

? Performance Measurement Guidelines
The measurement of performance for each End-Use Load will be performed by t=
he=20
Load Aggregators.  Each Load Aggregator will have an ISO approved performan=
ce=20
measurement plan, which will be used to calculate the DLCP performance.  Th=
e=20
performance measurement plan shall include the following:
? For interval metered End-Use Loads the Load Aggregator will calculate a=
=20
baseline Load profile.  DLCP performance will be measured by the difference=
=20
between baseline Load profile and the meter read for the hour(s) of=20
curtailment. =20
? For non-interval metered Loads, DLCP performance will be calculated by=20
using a combination of sample measurements, historic data, process controls=
,=20
use of data loggers, and any other performance measurement method approved =
by=20
the ISO.  Load Aggregators shall obtained ISO approval prior to offering DL=
CP=20
for non-interval metered End-Use Loads.  (It should be noted that the ISO=
=20
favors interval meters.)
? DLCP Settlement
Each DLCP Offer for which a DLCP Confirmation was issued by the ISO shall b=
e=20
uniquely identified.  Therefore, DLCP Day Ahead and DLCP Day Of offers must=
=20
be separately identified. The Load Aggregators (except for the UDCs) shall=
=20
submit the DLCP Performance Measurement for each confirmed offer by using t=
he=20
DLCP website no later than 45 days following the operating day of the DLCP=
=20
Curtailment.  The ISO will calculate the performance payment by simply=20
multiplying the DLCP energy price ($500/MWh for DLCP Day Ahead and $750/MWh=
=20
for DLCP Day Of) by the amount of DLCP (in MWs) for each hour of confirmed=
=20
curtailment. For each month the performance payments will be summed up for=
=20
all the confirmed curtailments and paid to the Load Aggregator=01,s nominat=
ed=20
Scheduling Coordinator.  The payment will be made to the Scheduling=20
Coordinator in accordance to the ISO Payment Calendar timeline. =20
The ISO recognizes that UDCs acting as Load Aggregators will have specific=
=20
rules to follow for the settlement of the dispatched curtailment.  The UDCs=
=20
will be responsible for following the settlement rules and regulations set=
=20
forth by the CPUC for the End-Use Loads. =20

How to enroll in the DLCP:
Load Aggregator
1. For a Load Aggregator, contact the ISO.  The DLCP Request for Proposal=
=20
(RFP) and Agreement are posted on the ISO website:=20
www.caiso.com/clientserv/load,
2. Contact the ISO.  The ISO contact for the DLCP is:
Glen Perez, Manager Data Quality
California ISO
gperez@caiso.com
3. Submit a proposal and enter into a DLCP Agreement.  Responses to the RFP=
=20
should be submitted to:
California Independent System Operator
151 Blue Ravine Road
Folsom, CA 95630

Attention:  John Counsil, Contracts=20

End-Use Customers
1. Contact a Load Aggregator.  A list of approved Load Aggregators will be=
=20
posted on the ISO website: www.caiso.com/clientserv/load,
2. Contact your UDC.  They may have an enrollment process to be followed. =
=20
3. Any questions contact the ISO.  The ISO contact for the DLCP is:

Glen Perez, Manager Data Quality
California ISO
gperez@caiso.com

Janel & Co.:
This is a group that we should try to tie into our PR efforts.

Best,
Jeff
	"Carl Guardino" <cguardino@svmg.org>
	03/08/2001 07:01 PM
	Please respond to cguardino
		 
Dear SVMG Members:

As you may know, the Silicon Valley Manufacturing Group Board of Directors
met this morning and voted to support two Energy proposals: The Los Esteros
Transmission Facility and the Metcalf Energy Center.

Please find below the news release on SVMG's position, and an attachment
that reviews SVMG's criteria and evaluation for both projects.

Thank you for your time.

Sincerely,

Carl Guardino

Local proposals part of a comprehensive platform to meet energy needs of
Silicon Valley working families and economy

For Immediate Release:         Contact: Michelle Montague-Bruno
March 8, 2001             (408) 501-7853

This morning the Silicon Valley Manufacturing Group Board of Directors voted
in support of the proposed Metcalf Energy Center and the Los Esteros
Transmission Project to help meet Silicon Valley's need for reliable energy.
Completing a thoughtful and deliberative process the SVMG board of directors
voted to support the generating facility, which would offer 580 megawatts of
new power supply to Silicon Valley and provide enough power to service
approximately 580,000 households.  Additionally, the Los Esteros
Transmission Project, proposed for north San Jose, provides another 800
megawatts of new transmission capacity that will help bring power into the
region - an issue that caused blackouts here on June 14, 2000.
"The Silicon Valley Manufacturing Group has always been a very analytical
organization," said Dr. James Woody, president & CEO of Roche
Pharmaceuticals and chairman of the board of SVMG.  "With the energy
infrastructure projects we developed an analytical process, and a systematic
review of the Metcalf and Los Esteros proposals, recommending approval after
thoughtful consideration."
This deliberative process included the development of criteria (see
attachment) utilized by five separate working bodies in the organization
(three SVMG committees, its Working Council and the Board of Directors) to
evaluate the projects and determine a position.  The organization does not
support these two facilities as an exclusive means to fulfilling the energy
needs of Silicon Valley families and employers, and believes our energy
challenge requires the individual efforts of every Californian.
"The Silicon Valley Manufacturing Group board completed a very thoughtful
and deliberative process that supports the generation and transmission of
power in our back yard," said Carl Guardino, president & CEO of the Silicon
Valley Manufacturing Group.  "The criteria are a prism through which the
organization assesses energy infrastructure proposals.  It was agreed that
the Metcalf and Los Esteros projects would provide much needed energy to
support working families, and the economy of Silicon Valley."
Attached are the criteria utilized by the SVMG Energy Committee, SVMG Land
Use Committee, SVMG Environment Committee, SVMG Working Council and the SVMG
Board of Directors to review the energy projects.
Solving California's energy challenges is going to require steps beyond the
development of the Metcalf and Los Esteros facilities, and must include
additional generation and transmission projects throughout the region and
state.  However, an immediate solution to help get us through the summer and
beyond is for more energy conservation at the office and at home.  The
E-Energy Conservation Campaign ('E' stands for email), launched on February
7, between SVMG and Governor Davis' cabinet secretary for technology, trade
and commerce, Lon Hatamiya, is reaching out to more than four million public
and private employees to provide tips on ways to conserve power and save
money at home and at the office.  For more information on the E-Energy
Conservation Campaign, visit the SVMG Web site at www.svmg.org, and click on
the icon for the campaign.

Expressing the need for a diverse portfolio of solutions in addressing the
energy crisis, Carl Guardino will discuss everything from conservation to
generation at the upcoming Energy Summit on March 16, and co-sponsored by
San Jose Mayor Ron Gonzales, the Santa Clara County Board of Supervisors and
the Silicon Valley Manufacturing Group.
"I am proud and honored to stand with Mayor Gonzales and Supervisor Jim
Beall to co-chair an event that will look for regional solutions to help
solve the issue," said Guardino. "We support the mayor's plan for
alleviating our energy problems, and believe that a comprehensive approach
must be implemented to survive this crisis.  No matter how one feels about
specific energy projects, there is no single solution, and we need a menu of
options, including conservation, co-generation, onsite generation,
transmission and major generating facilities."
Attachment:  SVMG criteria to review generation and transmission proposals,
and how the Metcalf Energy Center and the Los Esteros Transmission project
weigh up to those criteria.

 - criteria MEC & Los esteros.doc

Could you check on this.  It should not apply to me. Thanks very much.
Jeff
	Tara Rafter/ENRON@enronXgate
	03/12/2001 10:40 AM
		 
As of yet, I have not yet received your completed lobbying questionnaire.  If 
it is in the mail, please disregard this message.  If it is not in the mail, 
please fill out the questionnaire as soon as possible and return to me via 
email or interoffice mail so that we can be in compliance with Federal income 
tax laws.  If you did not engage in lobbying activity in 2000, a short email 
to that effect is sufficient.  Many thanks for your cooperation.

Tara Rafter
Director
Corporate Tax Planning

Please provide your assistance in completing the attached questionnaire 
relating to 2000 lobbying activities.  I would like to receive all completed 
questionnaires on or before March 9, 2001.  If you have any questions, please 
feel free to contact me at 713-345-8362.  Thanks so much for your help.

Tara Rafter
Director
Enron Corp. Tax Planning

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	03/08/2001 06:43 PM
		 
??? ??? ISO Market  Participants:
??? ??? Governor Gray Davis has  identified a goal of bringing an
additional 1,000 megawatts of new peaking  resources on line to meet summer
2001 demand across the state of  California.? The California Department of
Water Resources (CDWR) intends  to purchase a significant amount of capacity
and associated energy from these  new resources.? In order to help identify
potential new resources and  describe the means available to accelerate the
schedule for development of  these resources, CDWR in cooperation with the
Governor's office, has  scheduled a workshop with key representatives of
state agencies and the  investor owned utilities.? The workshop will be on
March 15, 2001 from  2:00 p.m. to 6:00 p.m. at the Doubletree Hotel in
Sacramento and will be  followed by a reception/networking session.
???  ??? Attached is the agenda for this meeting along with  sources
of additional information.
??? ???  <<Generation Resource Development Workshop.doc>>  
??? ??? Byron B. Woertz,  Jr.
??? ??? Director, Client  Relations
??? ??? (916) 608-7066
 - Generation Resource Development Workshop.doc

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	03/08/2001 10:20 AM
		 
Calif. clears state water agency to collect power payments

SAN FRANCISCO, March 7 (Reuters) - California regulators took another step on 
Wednesday to allow the state's Department of Water Resources (DWR) to collect 
payments for power supplies purchased by the state agency.

The California Public Utilities Commission (CPUC), which sets gas and 
electric rates, approved an order for the water agency to recover the 
taxpayers' money it is spending to buy electricity for customers of the 
state's two biggest -- and nearly bankrupt -- utilities.

There currently is no mechanism allowing the DWR to collect money for buying 
power on behalf of the utilities.

The CPUC's approval, however, did not set actual rates for the 24 million 
people served by PG&E Corp.'s (NYSE:PCG - news) Pacific Gas and Electric unit 
(PG&E) and Edison International's (NYSE:EIX - news) Southern California 
Edison subsidiary.

An ``interim'' rate -- called the California Procurement Adjustment -- may be 
proposed by late next week and will require another vote by the regulators.

Under Gov. Gray Davis's plan to stabilize the California power business, the 
water agency has been charged with purchasing electricity to meet the state's 
short and long-term needs.

Davis, however, is trying to avoid politically unpopular rate hikes, instead 
recovering the water agency's cost from a portion of existing utility 
electricity rates.

DWR has been spending up to $50 million a day for short-term energy supplies 
and negotiating long-term contracts with independent power generators.

On Monday, Davis announced 40 deals or preliminary agreements to buy power 
from 20 generators, with delivery scheduled anywhere from four months to 10 
years, and one deal lasting 20 years.

The state government has been thrust into the power business because PG&E and 
SoCal Edison are awash in some $13 billion of red ink and generators will no 
longer do business with them.

The utilities have accumulated the debt since last spring due to terms of 
California's flawed electricity deregulation scheme that forced them to pay 
soaring prices for wholesale power that they could not collect from their 
retail customers because of a rate freeze.

A California consumer group warned after the CPUC action today that once a 
rate is decided, the water agency may be in a position to set higher rates 
for the utilities' customers.

Nettie Hoge, head of The Utility Reform Network (TURN), a consumer advocate 
group, warned the water agency ``could say that it needs more revenue from 
ratepayers for its costs and there would be no reviews by the CPUC to decide 
if the increases were prudent.'' 

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	03/12/2001 10:56 AM
		 
DJ Calif PX Files For Chapter 11 Bankruptcy Protection 
Copyright , 2001 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. 

LOS ANGELES (Dow Jones)--The California Power Exchange, the marketplace where 
electricity is bought and sold in the state, filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy 
protection Friday afternoon, citing multiple lawsuits filed against the 
non-profit corporation by generators since the exchange announced it was 
closing down in January, according to a filing made in U.S. Bankruptcy Court, 
Central District of California. 

     A CalPX official said a bankruptcy court could better sort out the 
lawsuits and make sure generators owed hundreds of millions of dollars get 
paid. 

     A bankruptcy court judge may decide the outcome of a lawsuit filed 
against the CalPX and Gov. Gray Davis by Duke Energy (DUK), which alleged 
that forward power contracts held by the CalPX and seized by the governor 
were done so unlawfully. 

     The CalPX was set to liquidate forward power contracts totaling about $1 
billion to pay power suppliers hundreds of millions of dollars owed by PG&E 
Corp. (PCG) unit Pacific Gas & Electric and Edison International (EIX) unit 
Southern California Edison. Both utilities defaulted on payments to the 
CalPX. 

     Gov. Davis seized the contracts minutes before the CalPX was set to 
liquidate them. 

     A spokesman for Gov. Gray Davis would not comment on the CalPX's 
bankruptcy filing. 

     Duke has reached an interim agreement with the state to continue 
supplying the power, but it has yet to agree on a price the company expects 
the state to pay for the contracts. 

     Then in late February, the CalPX still having to pay suppliers for the 
utilities defaults, attempted to bill companies such as Enron Corp. (ENE) and 
Avista Corp. (AVA), for money the utilities failed to pay. 

     The "charge-back" would have occurred under a CalPX insurance mechanism, 
which states that defaults by the exchange's participants are charged back to 
creditors' based on creditors' level of participation in the exchange in the 
three months prior to the default. 

     Enron and the other suppliers sued the CalPX in federal court in attempt 
to block the CalPX from holding the companies' responsible for PG&E and SoCal 
Ed defaults. 

     The case was postponed pending action by federal regulators. 

     The CalPX, which at one point controlled about 85% of the state's 
wholesale power market transactions, was established under the state's 1996 
landmark deregulation law. The exchange was set up to ensure that utilities 
paid a transparent price for power during the transition to deregulation. 

     The exchange operated a uniform price auction, meaning all sellers were 
paid the highest accepted bid for power regardless of what their actual bid 
may have been. The state's three investor-owned utilities were required to 
buy the bulk of their power through the CalPX. 

     In December, federal regulators announced that the CalPX's tariff, which 
allows it to operate in the state as a Power Exchange, would not be renewed 
because it was one of the flaws that contributed to the failure of 
California's wholesale power market. 

     In January, the CalPX announced that it would suspend its day-ahead, 
day-of and block forward market and that it would permanently shut down in 
April and began laying off its staff of 200 employees. 

     -By Jason Leopold, Dow Jones Newswires; 323-658-3874; 
mailto:jason.leopold@dowjones.com 

     (END) Dow Jones Newswires 10-03-01 

Soaring Electric Use More Fiction Than Fact 
Chronicle investigation finds power companies manipulate data to excuse their 
towering rates Christian Berthelsen, Scott Winokur, Chronicle Staff Writers
Sunday, March 11, 2001 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle 
URL: 
http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/chronicle/archive/2001/03/11/M
N213155.DTL 

Power companies say it so often, and with such certainty, that it has become 
a virtual mantra: "Skyrocketing" energy use by Californians is a root cause 
of the state's power crisis, and justification for surging electricity 
prices. 
But a computer analysis of electricity usage data by The Chronicle reveals 
that the mantra is a myth -- that overall growth in electricity demand hasn't 
been nearly as great as the industry portrays it. 
The industry has painted the summer of 2000 as the equivalent of a 100-year 
storm in meteorology -- an event so powerful and unexpected that the existing 
infrastructure was devastated by its force. 
The statistics show that 2000, taken in total, was nothing of the sort. 
Moreover, two independent state agencies' assessments of California's power 
plant capacity appear to show that the growth should have been easily 
accommodated. 
The companies have defended their practice of increasingly taking power- 
generation plants out of service by arguing that heavy demand and consequent 
plant usage necessitated major, time-consuming repairs. 
"The claims that demand growth is rampant and that it was totally unexpected 
and due to the Internet economy, to Silicon Valley, or server farms, 
or people recharging cell phones -- that's bogus," said Tom Kelly, assistant 
executive director of the California Energy Commission. "About as bogus as 
you can get." 
The Chronicle's findings are based on data collected by the California 
Independent System Operator, a manager of the state's electricity grid. They 
show: 
-- Total electricity consumption in California increased only 4.75 percent in 
2000 from 1999, a sharp contrast to claims of industry representatives, who 
have repeatedly relied on isolated, loose or selective comparisons that make 
growth appear as high as 20 percent. In fact, the single greatest hour of 
electricity usage in 2000 was actually lower than any peak demand period in 
1999 or 1998. 
-- Average peak demand -- the average of the highest hour of electricity 
usage for each day -- increased only 4.79 percent from 1999 to 2000. Even 
during the months of May to September in 2000, when the greatest spikes in 
electricity usage occur, demand growth was only 8.31 percent higher than the 
same period the year before. 
-- More than 30 days of critical power shortage warnings, so-called Stage 3 
emergencies, and two days of blackouts this year occurred at times of 
moderate energy use -- levels often below those at which neither warnings nor 
blackouts have occurred in the past. 
The findings appear to buttress suspicions that the "skyrocketing demand" 
explanation for rising energy prices is a cover for what is really happening 
-- 
that power companies have simply started charging more for an essential 
commodity, regardless of whether it is in short supply. 
Presented with The Chronicle's findings, Gary Ackerman, a representative for 
the Western Power Trading Forum, a trade group representing power companies, 
said the calculations support the industry position that electricity demand 
is growing strong. 
"That's pretty healthy growth for California as opposed to the long-term 
historical average, which is close to 2 percent," he said. "To me, that's 
really strong growth." 
Energy demand is certainly on the rise in California -- growth of more than 4 
percent is still double what was projected -- and the state has obviously 
fallen behind in building power plants. 
Even though a recent study found California ranked 47th out of the 50 states 
in per-capita energy consumption, the surging demand explanation has become 
so accepted that leading officials accept it as gospel. Gov. Gray Davis has 
made energy conservation -- 10 percent, at that -- a centerpiece of his 
efforts to solve the crisis. 
"Energy use is growing," said state Sen. John Burton, D-San Francisco, citing 
the growth of Silicon Valley and high-tech operations statewide. "There's 
been tremendous growth, whether manufacturing or high tech -- cell phones, 
faxes, whatever. The stuff is growing." 
Yet the energy industry has been steadfast in its insistence that the 
consumer is largely to blame. In testimony and submissions to government 
bodies considering prescriptions for the crisis, energy demand growth has 
consistently been overstated. 
Joe Bob Perkins, the chief operating officer of Houston-based Reliant Energy 
Inc., told the U.S. Senate in January that California's growing economy and 
high summer temperatures caused electricity use to "surge dramatically" -- a 
demand growth of 13 percent. 
Richard Wheatley, a spokesman for Reliant, said Perkins' testimony was based 
on estimates by the federal Energy Information Administration of monthly 
retail electricity sales. 
"We do stand by that," Wheatley said. "Unfortunately, it does not track with 
ISO data." 
The industry-backed Edison Electric Institute said in a report that 
electricity demand grew by anywhere from 5 percent to 21 percent during the 
spring of 2000, compared with the same period a year earlier. 
Russell Tucker, an economist for the institute, said the group's figures were 
derived by identifying the single highest hour of electricity demand for each 
spring month of 1999 and 2000 and comparing them, finding the May peak rose 
21 percent. 
Granted, the state Energy Commission uses the same model to determine whether 
California has enough plant capacity to meet demand. But the presentation 
makes it appear that overall demand, not just the absolute peak, is growing 
by 21 percent. When the peak of each day is averaged and compared from year 
to year, May's figure was much lower: 12.79 percent. 
Also, nowhere did Edison's report note that the peak hour of 2000, a load of 
43,784 megawatts on Aug. 16, was actually lower than the peak hours of either 
of the previous two years -- 45,884 on July 12, 1999, or 44,406 on Sept. 
1, 1998. 
The Chronicle analysis of average peak demand showed that no month last year 
grew more than June's 15.34 percent, though no blackouts occurred in that 
month. May and June were the only months when demand growth exceeded 10 
percent, the analysis showed. Most months recorded 4 percent or 5 percent, 
and some -- such as September -- were less than 3 percent. 
Two months, October and December, had demand levels lower than the year 
before -- 4.22 percent less for October, 1.46 percent lower for December. 
Mike Florio, a consumer lawyer and board member of the ISO, said that even 
growth of less than 5 percent from 1999 to 2000 would seem overstated, since 
1999 was a relatively mild weather year and 2000 was a much hotter one. "You 
are quite right," Florio said. " 'Skyrocketing' demand is a myth." 
MARKET MANIPULATION?
Consumer representatives and some politicians have long suspected that, 
rather than dire imbalances between supply and demand, market manipulation is 
behind the crisis. 
Generators and power marketers adamantly deny this, saying they have done 
everything they could to keep the lights on. They say they ran aging, 
decrepit plants at higher-than-normal levels last summer to accommodate what 
they described as unprecedented demand. They also say that, at great expense, 
they delayed much-needed maintenance in order to keep the power flowing. 
Their claims have received some support from the Federal Energy Regulatory 
Commission, which said in a report last month that it found no evidence power 
companies were using maintenance schedules to manipulate supply. The report, 
however, was heavily qualified by the FERC, which said it did not investigate 
other forms of manipulation. Moreover, the agency acknowledged that the bulk 
of its investigation was conducted by simply calling power plants and 
questioning them over the telephone. 
The supply side of the energy equation is harder to penetrate, in part 
because supply data are confidential. Thus, the question of how blackouts 
could have occurred at such low levels of demand in January is hard to 
answer. What is clear is that, at times, during the crisis this year, as much 
as 12, 000 megawatts of electricity supply have been unavailable for use, 
mostly because of unplanned plant outages -- about four times the level 
anticipated by the ISO. 
Power companies say the old plants they bought were not capable of producing 
to the levels sketched out by the ISO and the Energy Commission, and that 
everything from low water conditions, emissions limitations and high 
temperatures last year caused less energy to be available than was 
anticipated. 
But others suggest that what began as a shortage caused by a withholding of 
supply to drive up price has turned into one caused by withholdings out of 
fear of not being paid. 
What did go up, unquestionably, were wholesale electricity prices. 
While average electricity usage during the heaviest hours last year increased 
by less than 5 percent, prices charged by power companies to the utilities 
that deliver juice to consumers increased more than 289 percent. 
In June, the cost of a megawatt hour increased more than fivefold, going from 
the 1999 level of $30.53 to $170.60. In October, prices doubled over the same 
period a year earlier, going from $53.47 to $111.04. And in December -- 
despite a 1.46 percent decline in electricity usage from the previous 
December -- peak wholesale electricity prices hit $425.59. They'd been $31.88 
one year before. 
Then the pace of price increases began to accelerate within the last six 
months of 2000. Overall, average peak usage during December was about 31,200 
megawatts, about a fifth lower than it was in August. Average prices in 
December? They just about doubled, to $425 a megawatt hour. 
The companies' explanation for rising prices despite falling demand was that 
more and more plants had to be taken offline for repairs, decreasing supply. 
Even given the high number of inoperable plants, questions remain about why 
the existing supply could not cover demand. 
On the blackout days of Jan. 17 and 18 fewer plants were offline -- and more 
electricity was available -- than on days when the state managed to squeeze 
by without turning out the lights. 
Even today, with Stage 3 alerts having faded away, at least temporarily, 
demand levels remain more or less the same as when California was in a 
constant state of emergency. Moreover, the lists of offline plants are as 
long as ever. 
AMPLE POWER SHOULD EXIST
The Energy Commission and the ISO have concluded that California's power 
plants are capable of generating more than 45,000 megawatts of electricity. 
That means that even with plant repair outages, low water levels decreasing 
hydraulic generation, air-pollution rules and other environmental 
constraints, the power companies should be able to accommodate all but the 
most extreme spikes in demand. 
According to industry data obtained by The Chronicle, the Western Systems 
Coordinating Council, a government-backed trade group in Salt Lake City, 
concluded California would have considerable surpluses throughout 2000, 
including margins as high as 39 percent in December, based on data provided 
to it by the ISO. Even under low water conditions, the ISO reported, the 
state would have total power resources of 47,532 megawatts in that month. Yet 
unplanned outages were far higher, and the system began to crash that month 
and into this year, at far lower levels of demand. 
"Clearly," Florio said, "we should not be having a shortage at 2 a.m. on 
Christmas Eve, when the only person awake is Santa Claus." 
Chronicle Database Editor Erin McCormick assisted in data analysis for this 
report. Chronicle editorial assistant Claire Smith assisted in data 
collection for this report. / E-mail Christian Berthelsen at 
cberthelsen@sfchronicle.com and Scott Winokur at s 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle ? Page?A - 1 

Greetings (or Hola!):

Talked to Jeff Green.  He said he'd do the road, but can't do it with the 
wood that's in the driveway.  Eldon, are you and Bob planning to go up this 
week?  If so, any chance of getting the wood moved?  Otherwise, going to be 
tough to do the road.  Jeff starts on my road on Wednesday and I'll be going 
up this weekend to monitor (and start organizing some of the chopped up wood 
that's lying around the yard at the dome.

Welcome back.  Hope you had a good time in Mexico.  

Best,
Jeff

State PUC Takes On High Cost Of Energy 
Regulators foresee more rate increases 
Robert Salladay, Lynda Gledhill, Chronicle Sacramento Bureau
Monday, March 12, 2001 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle 
URL: 
http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/chronicle/archive/2001/03/12/M
N227831.DTL 
Sacramento -- Starting this week, state regulators will begin debating how 
much is enough when it comes to asking Californians to shoulder the 
electricity crisis by paying higher utility rates. 
Right now, there doesn't appear to be enough money to go around. The state 
government and the utilities have racked up monumental bills because of 
California's flawed deregulation system. And even with recent rate increases, 
not enough cash is coming in to pay off the debts and buy power. 
Over the next three weeks, deciding how that money gets divvied up to pay the 
state's debt will be one of the toughest jobs of the year. State Treasurer 
Philip Angelides said the state Public Utilities Commission would be 
essentially filling a shoe box with debts and commitments during a series of 
meetings and workshops this month, and it's going to be a tight fit without 
raising power bills even more. 
"The rubber hits the road in the next few weeks at the PUC," Angelides said. 
"There is a box that has to be filled up, and a no-rate-increase scenario is 
putting all of these things into this box. It'll be tough work." 
Under the law, the PUC has the power to essentially determine how much profit 
the utilities can make. It's a set formula, designed to give the power 
companies a comfortable margin and to keep power bills reasonable for 
consumers. 
But with the 1996 deregulation an utter failure in California, there are many 
more demands on that money. The utilities claim to be $14 billion in debt. 
The state of California is spending $45 million a day to buy power. Taxpayers 
have spent $3.2 billion so far, and the PUC recently said utility customers 
would be required to pay that money back. 
Then there is the $10 billion in bonds the state is selling to buy long- term 
contracts for power. Angelides said the PUC also must guarantee him an 
estimated $1.3 billion a year from consumers to pay off the bonds, which his 
office expects to begin selling by the end of May. 
That money could end up running out by September, or June 2002 under the most 
optimistic prediction, Angelides said. That could mean California would have 
to borrow even more money beyond the $10 billion -- money that consumers will 
most likely have to pay back through their bills. 
Gov. Gray Davis has said repeatedly that it is his "hope and expectation" 
that rates will not increase. But he has been criticized for seeming to say 
that a temporary rate increase approved in January will be made permanent and 
that a 10 percent rate decrease imposed when deregulation was implemented 
will be lifted next year. 
"If I wanted to raise rates, I could have solved this in 20 minutes," Davis 
said last month. 
But others are convinced now that rates will go up even more than the 19 
percent. And PUC Commissioner Richard Bilas said he thinks the rates should 
go up before the summer to encourage conservation. 
'FUNDAMENTALS DON'T CHANGE' 
"It doesn't matter what is done in terms of rhetoric, legislation, ideas or 
proposals at the commission -- the fundamentals don't change," said Bilas, a 
Republican. "There is not enough supply and too much demand. The only 
function on the demand side is a rate increase. Otherwise, people won't stop 
using electricity." 
Since the state is buying roughly 30 percent of the power used by the 
utilities -- and at the highest prices so far -- the state should be entitled 
to an equivalent share of the money coming in from consumers. 
"If we're going to issue bonds, we must have first (crack at) that money," 
Angelides said. His office believes that "a failure to (issue bonds) in the 
appropriate manner will directly and negatively impact consumer rates." 
Angelides also needs a commitment from the PUC over how the state will get 
repaid for the money it's spending to buy emergency power the utilities 
cannot afford to purchase. 
Bilas said the PUC, which will take up some of these issues at their meeting 
on Thursday, would have to face reality soon. 
'IT'S A BAND-AID' 
"It's the direction we have been moving in," he said. "We're having to face 
up to fact that there needs to be rate increase. What is being done isn't a 
solution to the problem -- it's a Band-Aid." 
The utilities, among others, are eyeing the money as well for their 
significant costs. They have accumulated massive debts that need to be 
repaid, and have investors to satisfy. 
Also looking for a slice of the pie are the alternative energy producers -- 
including wind and solar producers -- who depend on payments from the 
utilities to buy the natural gas they need to operate. 
These facilities account for nearly a third of the energy produced in 
California, and any scenario that has the state getting through the summer 
without significant blackouts requires full operation. 
"What everybody has told me is this summer is going to be murder, because we 
don't have enough," state Senate President pro tem John Burton, D-San 
Francisco, said recently. 
Three things are occurring that are designed to make sure the money going out 
to pay for debts and power is slightly less than the money coming in from 
consumers: 
Small alternative energy providers are expected to start getting lower 
payments. 
Utilities, as part of a state rescue plan still being negotiated, will be 
required to sell the electricity they generate themselves at cost. 
The state is signing long-term contracts for its share of power, which 
reduces demands on ratepayers. 
The idea is to leave enough headroom that will pay back the state for what it 
is spending over a long period of time. 
Angelides said the difference -- that headroom -- should be returned to the 
state to pay off the debts it incurred from the long-term contracts financed 
with the bond money and to buy emergency power. 
STATE WANTS ITS SHARE
"We stepped into the breach here," Angelides said. "We're entitled to a fair 
slice of the pie." 
Angelides said the new rate schedule, which the PUC is determining this 
month, should not be used to pay back utilities for any of their debts from 
before Jan. 17. That's when the state started buying power for the utilities. 
So far, the utilities are not asking for their past debts to be repaid. Some 
other financing for those must be developed, such as selling thousands of 
miles of electrical transmission lines to raise billions of dollars. 
But there may not be much headroom left to pay off all the other debts. 
Chris Danforth with the Office of Ratepayer Advocates, which is designed to 
make sure consumers get a good deal out of the PUC, said the future payments 
to the alternative facilities and contracts signed by the state were going to 
cost more than originally planned. 
That eats up some of the headroom and "is indicative of a rate increase," 
Danforth said. 
Paying the Bill 
Most of what PG&E customers pay for electricity is spoken for but the demands 
are about to get a lot bigger. . 
Breakdown of contributors to electricity production 
PG&E generated power -- What the utility produces at its own plants. 
Alternative energy -- Electricity generated by solar, wind and biomass 
companies. 
Independent generators -- Power produced at non-PG&E plants in California and 
elsewhere. . 
PG&E customers currently pay 6.5 cents per kilowatt hour 
Combined sources of electricity cost 6.134 cents per kilowatt hour 
This portion represents 0.366 cents of leftover money . 
Claims on leftover money 
-- Money owed to the Independent System Operator, which has been forced to 
buy electricity at very high prices in recent months. 
-- Money owed to the alternative energy providers. Many of these small units 
have stopped operating because they have not been paid. 
-- Emergency power purchases likely to be necessary this summer, since the 
state has not secured enough long-term contracts to provide all the power it 
needs. That could drain either the state's coffers, or be paid for by 
consumers. . 
Source: Chronicle research Chronicle Graphic 
E-mail the reporters at rsalladay@sfchronicle.com and 
lgledhill@sfchronicle.com. 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle ? Page?A - 1 

Feds Hint at Power Bill Refunds 
Firms ordered to justify high rates 
David Lazarus and Lynda Gledhill, Chronicle Staff Writers
Saturday, March 10, 2001 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle 
URL: 
http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/chronicle/archive/2001/03/10/M
N144141.DTL 
Federal regulators warned power companies yesterday that they may have to 
refund $69 million to California ratepayers for charging unreasonable prices 
during recent electricity shortages. 
However, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission left the door wide open for 
the unnamed 13 generators to avoid refund payments if they could offer 
"further justification" for why their rates should be considered fair. 
Consumer activists were quick to note that the commission's order was 
significant. 
"They have acknowledged for the first time that there has been abuse of the 
marketplace," said Doug Heller, assistant organizing director for the 
Foundation for Taxpayer and Consumer Rights in Santa Monica. "It's an 
acknowledgment that the power companies have been ripping us off." 
However, consumer groups also pointed out that the order -- issued late in 
the day -- was partly a political ploy intended to make the Bush 
administration look more sympathetic to California's plight. 
The proposed $69 million refund also represents only a fraction of the 
billions of dollars that utilities have had to pay due to rising electricity 
rates. 
The commission set narrow parameters for power charges in January that may be 
considered unreasonable. It is only considering charges above $273 per 
megawatt hour during the series of Stage 3 energy emergencies that threatened 
statewide blackouts. 
William Massey, the lone commissioner who voted against the order, noted that 
of 70,300 power transactions in January above $150 per megawatt hour, only 
about 13,000 fall within the regulatory commission's parameters for potential 
refunds. 
"This order is arbitrary, capricious and unlawful," he said. "Eighty percent 
of the transactions have been excluded from refunds." 
But commission Chairman Curt Hebert characterized the order as an aggressive 
effort to safeguard California consumers. 
"Today's refund order demonstrates the commission's commitment to ensure 
appropriate and reasonable prices in the wholesale electricity market given 
the supply and demand imbalance in California," he said in a statement. 
POWER COMPANIES NOT WORRIED
Gary Ackerman, executive director of the Western Power Trading Forum, an 
energy-industry association in Menlo Park, said power companies are not 
worried about the prospect of having to pay out millions of dollars in 
refunds. 
"The people I've talked to said they can justify the costs for a majority of 
hours where FERC said there may have been overcharges," he said. 
"We will be supplying supporting data to FERC," said Richard Wheatley, a 
spokesman for Reliant Energy in Houston. "We commend them for doing this 
review. We believe this can be resolved and we can all move on." 
Jan Smutny-Jones, president of the Independent Energy Producers, a trade 
group representing out-of-state generators, said the commission's order shows 
that the system is working. 
"In my opinion, what has been identified is talking about potential refunds, 
" he said. "The generators will have a chance to justify their rates. I'm not 
terribly troubled by that." 
The California Independent System Operator, which oversees the state's power 
grid, welcomed the order, although it said $69 million is lower than its own 
estimates of potential overcharges. 
The ISO had asked the commission earlier this month to review $350 million in 
January power charges that exceeded the regulatory commission's "soft cap" of 
$150 per megawatt hour. 
A soft cap means the price can exceed the prescribed amount as long as a 
supplier can justify the charge. 
REFUND ORDERS ARE RARE
"The granting of refunds by FERC is not a common occurrence," said Charles 
Robinson, the ISO's general counsel. "We're treading new ground." 
Considering the potential ramifications of the order, the commission was 
oddly furtive in issuing its press release at the very end of the business 
week. 
The commission's press office already was closed by the time of the 
announcement, and the commissioners had left for the day. 
Reached at his home, Massey acknowledged that the commission was all but 
inviting power companies to bury the commission in paperwork to support their 
wholesale rates. 
"Welcome to the Hebert chairmanship," he said. 
Hebert was appointed head of the commission last month by President Bush. 
Since then, the regulatory commission and the Bush administration have 
maintained a largely hands-off approach to California's energy crisis. 
"We have said from the beginning that obviously the state of California has 
to address these problems and these challenges," U.S. Energy Secretary 
Spencer Abraham said this week. 
E-mail David Lazarus at dlazarus@sfchronicle.com and Lynda Gledhill at 
lgledhill@sfchronicle.com. 
,2001 San Francisco Chronicle ? Page?A - 1 

Quick question to Joe and/or Christian, John and Mary:

I'm assuming that any deal we sign with DWR that falls below the $150/MWH 
soft cap is free and clear of the order FERC issued on Friday as well as any 
other refund risk associated with FERC's December order.  Is that correct? 
Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

PUC SET TO MAKE KEY RULING ON UTILITY BILLS;

ELECTRICITY: REGULATORS ARE ABOUT TO DECIDE HOW TO SPLIT PAYMENTS BETWEEN THE
STATE AND UTILITIES. THE FORMULA COULD AFFECT FURTHER RATE HIKES.

BYLINE: RONE TEMPEST, TIMES SACRAMENTO BUREAU CHIEF

DATELINE: SACRAMENTO

BODY:

??How much of utility customers' monthly bills will be used to pay for
California's multibillion-dollar entry into the power market?

??That's the question as regulators set out in coming days to determine how to
split ratepayers' bills between the state, which has been buying electricity 
at
the rate of $ 45 million a day since late January, and the debt-laden 
utilities,
which continue to deliver that power and collect customers' payments.

??The issue has moved center stage as Gov. Gray Davis continues to negotiate a
rescue of the near-bankrupt Pacific Gas & Electric Co. and Southern 
California 
Edison. The resolution is crucial to Davis' complex plan to pull California 
out
of its costly energy crisis.

??When the Legislature put the state in the power-buying business, it needed 
to
ensure eventual reimbursement for its purchases. The result was the CPA, for
California Procurement Adjustment, essentially the portion of customers' bills
left over after the utilities subtract their cost of operations.

??After weeks of wrangling in Sacramento, the front lines in the utility 
debate
will now shift for a time to San Francisco, where the California Public
Utilities Commission will determine the size of the CPA and the way it is to 
be
divvied up.

??How the commission rules will be the main factor in determining if customers
of the three big investor-owned utilities--PG&E, Edison and San Diego Gas &
Electric--will face rate hikes above the 19% already set in motion. It also 
will
have a direct bearing on the state's ability to sell the $ 10 billion in bonds
it needs to finance its long-term power buys without having to commit taxpayer
money.

??"What happens at the PUC is fundamental, in terms of our ability to issue
bonds with investment-grade ratings," state Treasurer Phil Angelides said. 
"How
they allocate moneys between the state and utilities will be fundamentally
important to how far our $ 10 billion will go. And it will be fundamentally
important if it is not done in the right way, because it will have a direct 
and
negative impact on consumer rates."

??Utility executives disagree with the state on how to allocate the CPA but
agree on its importance.

??"One issue is: How do you divide the pie? And an important and related issue
is: Is the pie big enough?" said Ted Craver, chief financial officer of 
utility
parent Edison International, during a conference call Friday with debt 
holders.

??Before skyrocketing wholesale electricity prices turned PG&E and Edison into
financial basket cases, the money left over after subtracting their costs of
delivering power to customers was called "headroom," and that was where the
utilities paid off past investments, retired debt and took their profits.

??Under Davis' plan, most such money would be reserved by the state to pay off
the $ 10 billion in bonds to buy electricity and reimburse the treasury for 
the
billions the state has already spent to buy power.

??Some consider this a gamble and wonder if there will be enough money
available without either dipping into the state general fund or, more likely,
raising customer rates even further.

??Under the January law, AB 1X, that put California in the power-buying
business, the CPA needs to total at least $ 2.5 billion annually from utility
customers. Angelides on Thursday estimated that the state needs $ 1.3 billion
from CPA funds just to service the bonds.

??PG&E and Edison both say they believe the utilities are entitled to be paid
first out of ratepayer bills under AB 1X.

??The Department of Water Resources, the agency empowered by the state to buy
electricity for utility customers, would get whatever is left over after 
utility
expenses are covered, the two companies say. If nothing is left, rates would 
be
allowed to rise high enough to pay the water agency what it needs to cover its
electricity expenses under an interim order issued Wednesday by the PUC.

??"If that means rate increases, then the commission has affirmed it will pass
through those rate increases," said Ann Cohn, assistant general counsel for
Southern California Edison. "The DWR will have to determine what its own 
revenue
requirement is."

??In filings with the commission, PG&E, the state's largest electric utility,
insists that once its obligations are subtracted the CPA would be virtually
penniless. The most financially troubled of the utilities, PG&E is believed 
not
to have ruled out filing for bankruptcy as a way out of its $ 8-billion debt.

??What percentage the commission allots PG&E from customer bills could be a
factor in the utility's decision about seeking protection from creditors under
Chapter 11 of the federal bankruptcy code.

??Meanwhile, Davis is faced with a dilemma of his own that is no less
wrenching. For his rescue plan to work, four things must happen:

??* The cost of electricity purchased by the state must be reduced through
long-term contracts.

??* The amount of money paid by the utilities to alternative-energy
suppliers--generators of solar, wind and other forms of power, which 
constitute
about one-fourth of the electricity used by utility customers--must be cut in
half.

??* The utilities must agree to sell electricity to the state from their own
generators, including nuclear plants and hydropower facilities, at slightly
above cost.

??* And the state must obtain favorable rates on its massive bond sales.

??Although some progress has been made on all these fronts, none have been
finalized.

??For example, Davis announced a week ago that 40 long-term supply contracts
had been negotiated with major generators at terms favorable to the state. But
by Friday, fewer than a dozen of the contracts had been signed.

??Moreover, because of the secrecy the Davis administration has imposed on
details of the contracts, it is impossible to tell if the prices negotiated by
the state are low enough to be covered by the $ 10 billion in power bonds 
beyond
September.

??Several California newspapers, including The Times, have been denied by 
Davis
in repeated requests to obtain details under the California Public Records 
Act.
On Friday, Assemblyman Tony Strickland (R-Moorpark) said he plans to file a
lawsuit today demanding that contract details be disclosed.

??If any one of the four key fronts blows up on Davis, the governor would then
be faced with either dipping into the state budget surplus or asking the PUC 
to
raise rates beyond the level now in motion. The currently programmed average 
19%
hike comes from a temporary 9% increase approved by the commission in December
(and generally expected to be made permanent) and a further 10% boost by next
March (when a rate rollback ordered under the state's 1996 deregulation law
expires).

??Davis has publicly opposed using tax funds to bail out the investor-owned
utilities, on grounds that such a move would be unfair to customers of 
municipal
utilities, such as the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power, that remain
financially healthy.

??In its action last week, the PUC made clear that if enough money is not 
found
in the CPA to repay the Department of Water Resources, then customer rates 
would
have to rise.

??While acknowledging that it will be a close call, administration officials
last week repeated their contention that the governor's rescue plan can be
accomplished without raising rates beyond the 19%.

??"Conceptually, I'm confident that the CPA mechanism operates in a manner 
that
gets us appropriate bond capacity," state Finance Director Tim Gage said.

??Angelides warned that the state needs to be wary of the utilities' taking
more than their fair share.

??"As the final divisions of the pie are made," Angelides said, "the utilities
should recover no more out of that pie than the actual cost of generation plus
their regulated return, and the state must be accorded the balance."

??*

??Times staff writer Nancy Rivera Brooks contributed to this story.

LOAD-DATE: March 12, 2001

Greetings Mark:

Here is the latest.  

ENA signed a short-term deal (5 -week term, I believe) with DWR that goes 
through the end of the month, at which time we have the option to extend the 
deal to a five-year term.  We are discussing other longer-term deals, too.

As Steve points out, we've had serious concerns regarding DWR's 
creditworthiness.  (DWR, the Dept. of Water Resources, is the state agency 
that Davis made the purchaser of power when the utilities hit the financial 
skids a few months ago and the market stopped selling them power.)

The problem has been simple and significant---while our brilliant Governor 
and Legislature gave DWR the authority to buy power on behalf of the 
cash-strapped utilities, they neglected to t spell out how DWR would recover 
its costs of buying the power.

Based on comments from us and other suppliers regarding the creditworthiness 
issue, the California PUC issued an order last week establishing that 1) the 
PUC would indeed pass DWR's power costs through to ratepayers and 2) the PUC 
would NOT second-guess (i.e., impose "reasonabless" standards) on any 
contracts signed by DWR as a condition of passing the costs through to 
ratepayers.

With the CPUC decision (and other language that ENA's negotiated into the DWR 
contract), ENA is close to being comfortable signing the 5-year deal, even in 
the face of the FERC order.  That's predominantly due to the fact that the 
power price in the 5-year deal would come in well under the $150/MWH 
threshold that FERC has set up for any sort of "refund review."  But other 
things could crop up between now and the exercise date that could muck things 
up. I'll keep you posted on developments  as they transpire.  

The big problem (as Steve notes) is that the State is on the verge of (some 
say hell bent on) taking over the entire electricity industry in California 
in perpetuity.  Our original proposal focused on getting price volatility and 
the utilities' financial position back under control.  Our contracting 
proposals have always been couched in the context of a temporary, stop-gap 
measure.  That is, the state would do the minimum amount needed via contracts 
to stabilize prices while simultaneoulsly doing what was necessary to get 
de-regulation back on track in California.  And once the situation had been 
righted, the State would as soon as possible exit the industry and let the 
market step back in.  Unfortunately, command-and-control, anti-deregulation 
policymakers have taken hold of the agenda (with the blessing, seemingly, of 
the Governor), and are moving the state toward a "takeover" response.  That's 
what we're actively opposing.

If you have any questions, don't hesitate.

Best,
Jeff

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/12/2001 01:24 PM
		 
Just a reminder of the call at 1:00 today!

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Here is the "kick-off" memo requested by the folks on the Public Affairs
call on Monday.  Please review the document an send me any comments.  Just a
reminder... we will hold a Public Affairs call on Monday March 12, 2001 at
1:00 PST to discuss this memo and other issues.
The call in number is:  1-800-486-2460
The Pass code is:               120895

As always, please let me know if you have any questions.
Thanks!

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Greetings:

As many of you know, the IEP Board met last week and decided upon a new
committee structure within IEP. The Public Affairs Committee was created to
replace the Market Response Committee with Greg Blue appointed as the
interim chairperson. We would like to move to establish this new committee
as soon as possible and meet to discuss direction, specific upcoming issues,
an overall plan, budget and structure for the year. We would like to start
this process with a conference call on Monday March 5, 2001 at 3:00 p.m.
Please see call in information below. (It is not necessary for any
consultants to participate in the Monday call.)   This conference call will
be followed by an in-person meeting here at IEP on Thursday March 8, 2001 at
2:00 p.m.

If you are interested in participating on this committee please signify that
with an e-mail response to this message.

For those planning on participating on the conference call we will send out
the agenda on Monday.  During that conference call we will also set the
agenda for the Thursday in person meeting. During the Thursday meeting we
would also like to move to select a permanent chairperson.

Thank you for your attention to this important matter and I look forward to
continuing to work with each of you and make this new committee structure a
success.
I have set up a permanent Conference Call in number and Pass-code for the
Public Affairs Committee that we will use every time we have a conference
call.  We will begin using this call-in number on Monday.
The call in number for Monday's 3:00 p.m. call is is:
        1-800-486-2460
The Pass-code is:
120895

Thanks,

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

FYI.
	"JOHN G KLAUBERG" <JKLAUBER@LLGM.COM>
	03/12/2001 01:43 PM
		 
Jeff:  I am assuming you have already heard back from the FERC experts, but 
that generally would be my understanding (subject to a change in the 
order)--and, as we discussed, hopefully the bilateral forward market contract 
deals with CDWR ultimately will be specificaly excluded from the cap rules, 
etc. (Joe Hartsoe indicated this morning that no one has indicated that the 
bilaterals should be subject to the FERC order).  John

"This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is 
confidential and it may be protected by the attorney/client or other 
privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public 
information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If 
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments and notify me by return mail, e-mail or by phone at 212 
424-8125.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction 
of the e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
jklauber@llgm.com

>>> <Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com> 03/12/01 01:00PM >>>
Quick question to Joe and/or Christian, John and Mary:

I'm assuming that any deal we sign with DWR that falls below the $150/MWH
soft cap is free and clear of the order FERC issued on Friday as well as
any other refund risk associated with FERC's December order.  Is that
correct? Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/12/2001 01:24 PM
		 
Just a reminder of the call at 1:00 today!

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Here is the "kick-off" memo requested by the folks on the Public Affairs
call on Monday.  Please review the document an send me any comments.  Just a
reminder... we will hold a Public Affairs call on Monday March 12, 2001 at
1:00 PST to discuss this memo and other issues.
The call in number is:  1-800-486-2460
The Pass code is:               120895

As always, please let me know if you have any questions.
Thanks!

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Greetings:

As many of you know, the IEP Board met last week and decided upon a new
committee structure within IEP. The Public Affairs Committee was created to
replace the Market Response Committee with Greg Blue appointed as the
interim chairperson. We would like to move to establish this new committee
as soon as possible and meet to discuss direction, specific upcoming issues,
an overall plan, budget and structure for the year. We would like to start
this process with a conference call on Monday March 5, 2001 at 3:00 p.m.
Please see call in information below. (It is not necessary for any
consultants to participate in the Monday call.)   This conference call will
be followed by an in-person meeting here at IEP on Thursday March 8, 2001 at
2:00 p.m.

If you are interested in participating on this committee please signify that
with an e-mail response to this message.

For those planning on participating on the conference call we will send out
the agenda on Monday.  During that conference call we will also set the
agenda for the Thursday in person meeting. During the Thursday meeting we
would also like to move to select a permanent chairperson.

Thank you for your attention to this important matter and I look forward to
continuing to work with each of you and make this new committee structure a
success.
I have set up a permanent Conference Call in number and Pass-code for the
Public Affairs Committee that we will use every time we have a conference
call.  We will begin using this call-in number on Monday.
The call in number for Monday's 3:00 p.m. call is is:
        1-800-486-2460
The Pass-code is:
120895

Thanks,

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

I have forwarded the info to Ken, and just spoke with him.  Unless there are 
particular concerns, he will cover today's PR call with IEP.  Otherwise, Sue 
or I can listen in at 1.  Just let me know.

Best,
Jeff

	Janel Guerrero
	03/12/2001 02:32 PM
		 
Paul:  While we've got coverage of the IEPA working group and the Direct 
Access Coaltion, I think it would be useful to have coverage of both groups 
PR activities.  I'm not sure if our SF/SaCTO people are already covering 
this, but if not, maybe Ken can spend some time monitoring their plans etc. 

Today's public affairs call for IEPA is at 1:00 pm PST.  

1800-486-2460
passcode: 120895

I keep hearing about a Direct Access press conference but have yet to hear 
details.  Any updates would be useful, and daily/weekly reports on both of 
these groups would be terrific!

My calendar shows free, but you'll have to check with ms prentice.

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	09/25/2000 10:49 AM
		 
Hi there - long time no see!!  I honestly do need to know if you and PP want 
to join us for the October 7 dinner cause I honestly am ordering the foie 
gras and will need to get two if you will be with us (cuz you eat so much!)  
I know that Scotty and Cameron will be in Europe
Greetings (or Hola!): 
Talked to Jeff Green.  He said he'd do the road, but can't do it with the 
wood that's in the driveway.  Eldon, are you and Bob planning to go up this 
week?  If so, any chance of getting the wood moved?  Otherwise, going to be 
tough to do the road.  Jeff starts on my road on Wednesday and I'll be 
going up this weekend to monitor (and start organizing some of the chopped 
up wood that's lying around the yard at the dome. 
Welcome back.  Hope you had a good time in Mexico. 
Best, 
Jeff 

Dylan:  Don't kill me.  Is this case due today or next Monday?

Roger.

in all week.

	Joseph Alamo
	03/12/2001 02:00 PM
		 
	Joseph Alamo
	03/07/2001 02:36 PM
	
Please forward your *anticipated* schedules to me for next week, as soon as 
possible.

Thanks in advance for your assistance.

Joseph Alamo
Sr. Administrative Assistant
Government Affairs - The Americas
San Francisco CA 

Thanks.  Just wanted to make sure that I wasn't losing my mind......

See you tonite.

Best,
Jeff

	Dylan Windham <dwindham@uclink4.berkeley.edu>
	03/12/2001 03:09 PM
		 
What did you just wake up.  It is due today and it is worth 98% of our 
grade!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

No next week.  I have a take home midterm to work on this coming weekend 
and wanted to get a head start on this one.
We can talk about it tonight.

Dylan

At 02:39 PM 03/12/01 -0600, you wrote:

>Dylan:  Don't kill me.  Is this case due today or next Monday?

Ken:

Could you please write a very brief synopsis of what took place on the IEP PR 
call?  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff
	Janel Guerrero
	03/12/2001 02:32 PM
		 
Paul:  While we've got coverage of the IEPA working group and the Direct 
Access Coaltion, I think it would be useful to have coverage of both groups 
PR activities.  I'm not sure if our SF/SaCTO people are already covering 
this, but if not, maybe Ken can spend some time monitoring their plans etc. 

Today's public affairs call for IEPA is at 1:00 pm PST.  

1800-486-2460
passcode: 120895

I keep hearing about a Direct Access press conference but have yet to hear 
details.  Any updates would be useful, and daily/weekly reports on both of 
these groups would be terrific!

Just got a call from a fellow named Jame Edgerly at the Enterprise Zone, 
Inc.  He told me that Ken Lay (through Ken's secretary Vanessa) referred me 
to him.  He is very interested in getting us to help him work with the 
Legislature to establish an "Enterprise Zone" energy tariff to encourage 
investment in California's Enterprice Zones.  Before I launch on the effort, 
just wanted to check in and see if this rings a bell with you.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

nope.

	Joseph Alamo
	03/12/2001 04:04 PM
		
thanks.......happen to know where Sue went?? 

	Scott Bolton@ENRON COMMUNICATIONS
	03/12/2001 02:25 PM
		 
I am forwarding the talking points and briefing info on the Blockbuster/EBS 
situation from the EBS PR Dept.  Sue/Steve/Allison - they have asked for 
guidance and a dowload on the cable issue in anticipation on the NAB 
conference in mid-April.  Let's discuss on the next call.  Thanks.

Scott
	Donna Kocourek
	03/12/01 11:16 AM
		 
___________________________
Donna M.R. Kocourek
Enron Broadband Services, Inc.
Manager, Event Marketing

PH:  503/886-0181
CELL:  503/701-6866
FAX:  503/425-6008
donna_kocourek@enron.net
www.enron.net

	Kelly Kimberly
	Sent by: Stacy Walker
	03/12/01 09:21 AM
		 
Attached are the EBS news release, message points and Q&As regarding our 
termination of our contract with Blockbuster.  You may distribute the news 
release, but use the message points and Q and As only for communicating with 
your audiences--do not distribute them.  Please refer all media inquiries to 
me.  Let me know if you have questions.

	"Katie Kaplan" <kaplan@iepa.com>
	03/12/2001 04:29 PM
		 
Greetings:
The ISO FERC Committee will hold a conference call tomorrow at 3:00 p.m. PST
to discuss the ISO Market Stabilization proposal, the FERC Market Report and
IEP's response.  Please plan on reviewing any materials we send out today
and tomorrow morning prior to the call.
Thank you.

The permanent call in number for the ISO/FERC committee is:
1-800-486-2726
The pass code is:
120895

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

We held the first ISO/FERC call today with several participants.  If you
were not on the call but would like to be on the committee please let me
know.

Overall issues discussed:
o ISO Governance Issue and Stakeholder Advisory Committee
o ISO Market Stabilization Plan
o Andy Brown and I will monitor this and prepare comments for review before
submitting to the ISO on Tuesday
o Andy was asked to look at several legal issues surrounding the proposal
and to do the foundation work for a FERC filing

What to look for:
o We will hold an additional conference call next week (probably Monday)
o IEP comments on Market Stabilization plan to ISO
o Possible language for a FERC filing regarding issue (ISO may file tariff
language as early as next week)

We'll keep you posted!

Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499
Greetings:

As many of you know the IEP board established a new committee for the
remainder of 2001 to cover ISO/FERC related issues. Roger Pelote was
appointed as the interim chairperson.  We have worked to develop the
attached description of issues, resources, budget and a straw man proposal
for decision-making procedures. This is a work in progress and we plan to
discuss the overall direction as well as next steps on Thursday March 8,
2001 at 9:00 a.m. PST.

If you are interested in participating in this task force please plan on
taking part on the Thursday conference call.  If you cannot participate
please send me an e-mail and I will provide you with an update and summary.

The permanent call in number for the ISO/FERC committee is:
1-800-486-2726

The pass code is:

120895
Please let me know if you have any questions or comments.
Katie Kaplan
Manager of State Policy Affairs
Independent Energy Producers Association
(916) 448-9499

Greetings Michelle:

As we talked about it last week---and now that I'm back in the office, I'm 
having folks check to make sure that this is 100% accurate:

Rates for core subscription customers are forecasted (I believe based on 
previous month's gas prices).
Bills for core subscription customers are lagged (I believe by 30 days after 
consumption).
The IOUs face a PBR mechanism that incents them to buy index (though they may 
have engaged in a modest amount of hedging).
The California PUC issued an order (about 2 months ago) prohibiting noncore 
customers from switching to core subscription status.

I'm back in the office today, and have folks checking on this.  I need to pin 
down with certainty 1) the forecast period, and 2) the bill lag period.  Will 
get back to you as soon as we get the info.  If there's anything, just let me 
know.

Best,
Jeff

	Michelle Robichaux@EES
	03/12/2001 04:33 PM
		 
Art/Scott

I have been trying to locate the right person in the organization to assist 
with some questions about   Socal Gas.  

Comment/Question:  Tricon, an EES gas customer behind Socal, paid 
significantly  more for marketer gas service (IF SOCAL BORDER)   in Q4 00' 
when compared to the cost of gas for Socal Gas customers.  How does Socal Gas 
adjust for its cost of gas?  Is there a delayed true-up mechanism???  What 
options are available should the customer return to utility service?

Tricon has been asking for the information for over a week.  I need an update 
as soon as possible.

I appreciate your help.  Call me at X35976 if you have any questions,

Michelle

Glad to be of help.  Glad to hear it went well.  Someone sent me some press 
on the hearing that looked great.

Steven J Kean@ENRON
08/22/2000 04:38 PM
Sent by: Steven J Kean@ENRON
thanks for your help in preparing for the Texas hearing.  I think Texas 
legislators are viewing the California experience in the proper context and I 
think I was at least marginally articulate on the emissions issues as well.

thanks again.

Thank you.  Sounds like Tues and Wed it is.

Thank you.

	Steven J Kean
	03/12/2001 04:46 PM
		
It was not mentioned to me.  I'm copying rosie and vanessa to find out if 
this was a simple referral (in which case you should keep the work to a 
minimum -- return the call, but don't get distracted from your other efforts) 
or whether Ken is especially interested in this and wants us to follow 
through.

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/12/2001 03:54 PM
		 
Just got a call from a fellow named Jame Edgerly at the Enterprise Zone, 
Inc.  He told me that Ken Lay (through Ken's secretary Vanessa) referred me 
to him.  He is very interested in getting us to help him work with the 
Legislature to establish an "Enterprise Zone" energy tariff to encourage 
investment in California's Enterprice Zones.  Before I launch on the effort, 
just wanted to check in and see if this rings a bell with you.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

For what it's worth, here are my edits overlayed on Jim's, Harry's and 
whomever else provided comments.

Best,
Jeff

	James D Steffes
	03/12/2001 04:28 PM
		 

Thanks, Scott. Did it include the "Sierra Pacific language" discussed on the 
call today?
Best,
Jeff

P.S.  Must be beautiful in Sacramento today.

Same.  Remember, it will soon be 135 degrees there.......

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	03/12/2001 06:41 PM
		 
It did not.  Just the lousy California first stuff. It is beautiful here.
There?

Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com wrote:

> Thanks, Scott. Did it include the "Sierra Pacific language" discussed on
> the call today?
> Best,
> Jeff
>
> P.S.  Must be beautiful in Sacramento today.

Let it go.  Ken is PR, and PR only.  There are also calls where substance is 
discussed. Ken can't do that.

	Susan J Mara
	03/12/2001 06:38 PM
		 
Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854
	Paul Kaufman@ECT
	03/12/2001 04:21 PM
		
O.K.  Just received Janel's call re: Sue's concerns with utlizing Ken for PR 
calls.  

Here are my thoughts:

(1) There are three, and only three, purposes for spending money on the IEP, 
ARM and Direct Access Coalition efforts and thus three, and only three 
reasons,  for covering the IEP, ARM, and Direct Access Coalition calls.  The 
three reasons are:  

 (a) to find out what these various Coalitions are doing; 
 (b) to try and influence what they are doing so their activities advance our 
interests; and 
 (c) to coordinate what they are doing with what we are doing so we aren't 
wasting time, money or opportunities.

If these purposes are not being met, then let's stop wasting our time and 
money on these efforts (and the associated phone calls).

(2) From my standpoint, to meet these four purposes we need to have:  

 (a) somebody on the calls consistently that can advance our interests and 
answer questions when asked; 
 (b) somebody on the call that knows what we are doing in our national, 
California, and New York efforts; 
 (c) somebody preparing an email explaining what was discussed on the calls; 
and 
 (d) Janel coordinating what happens on the calls with what is going on in 
our national, Calilfornia, and New York efforts.  

(3) The only question given the above is:  "who can meet our purposes in 
participating in the IEP, ARM and Direct Access Coalition efforts."  
Originally I thought Ken was the person, because Ken is a PR person that we 
can count on (because we are paying him) to participate regularly in the 
calls and e-mail reports.  
(4)  Given Sue's concerns, I certainly don't object to Sue handling the 
calls.  However, we need to be consistent in our participation or be 
satisfied with inconsistent coverage.  It makes no sense to me to have Ken 
assigned sporadically to participate in calls that Sue can't participate in 
due to a conflict.   California is moving too quickly and too unpredictably 
for sporadic participation to provide any  value.  

Susan J Mara@ENRON
03/12/2001 03:22 PM
That's fine.  Just realize that I try to cover the same calls. There is also 
someone from ARM's PR firm, Edelman,  covering the IEP calls.

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854

	Paul Kaufman@ECT
	03/12/2001 02:50 PM
		 
I just spoke with Janel and we concluded that we need to better coordinate 
our use of Ken's time.  We agreed that it would be a good idea for Ken to 
cover the IEP and Direct Access Coalition calls, meetings, etc. and report 
back to us about any conclusions reached.  

All future assignments for Ken should be coordinated through Janel.

	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	03/01/2001 05:47 PM
		 
Here is the revised Hertzberg memo.

Speak to you soon.

Scott

 - Hertzberg final.doc

	James D Steffes
	02/27/2001 08:30 AM
		 
FYI.  Here are letters Enron (Steve Kean) sent to US Senators about real 
solutions for California.  The Feinstein / Murkowski letters are very good 
overviews of our recommendations on what to do and what not to do.

Jim

	Maureen McVicker
	02/26/2001 05:27 PM
		 
Attached are the letters sent to Senators Wyden, Feinstein & Murkowski.

Michelle:  I've verified the information below.  If you'd like to drill down 
deeper into any particular issue listed below, just let me know.

Best,
Jeff
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/12/2001 04:41 PM
		
Greetings Michelle:

As we talked about it last week---and now that I'm back in the office, I'm 
having folks check to make sure that this is 100% accurate:

Rates for core subscription customers are forecasted (I believe based on 
previous month's gas prices).
Bills for core subscription customers are lagged (I believe by 30 days after 
consumption).
The IOUs face a PBR mechanism that incents them to buy index (though they may 
have engaged in a modest amount of hedging).
The California PUC issued an order (about 2 months ago) prohibiting noncore 
customers from switching to core subscription status.

I'm back in the office today, and have folks checking on this.  I need to pin 
down with certainty 1) the forecast period, and 2) the bill lag period.  Will 
get back to you as soon as we get the info.  If there's anything, just let me 
know.

Best,
Jeff

	Michelle Robichaux@EES
	03/12/2001 04:33 PM
		 
Art/Scott

I have been trying to locate the right person in the organization to assist 
with some questions about   Socal Gas.  

Comment/Question:  Tricon, an EES gas customer behind Socal, paid 
significantly  more for marketer gas service (IF SOCAL BORDER)   in Q4 00' 
when compared to the cost of gas for Socal Gas customers.  How does Socal Gas 
adjust for its cost of gas?  Is there a delayed true-up mechanism???  What 
options are available should the customer return to utility service?

Tricon has been asking for the information for over a week.  I need an update 
as soon as possible.

I appreciate your help.  Call me at X35976 if you have any questions,

Michelle

This sounds like a good idea.

=09"Daniel Douglass" <douglass@ArterHadden.com>
=0903/12/2001 06:43 PM
=09=09=20
Gary Ackerman asked that the attached proposal from Ben Zycher be sent to t=
he=20
board.
=20
Dan
bzycher@rand.org
bennyz@pacbell.net

Dear Dan and Gary,

     Given the FERC order for refunds from the power producers, I think
that the time has come for a serious paper critiquing the underlying
analyses and explaining market fundamentals.  Analytic errors are a
prominent feature of the Cal ISO "Report" on supply costs (February 28,
2001), and I would be surprised if the same were not true of the FERC
order and any supporting analyses that may have been prepared.  (Dan is
sending me a couple of relevant FERC documents now, but I will not be
able to review them in detail until Tuesday or Wednesday.)  In general,
however, it is fair to say that a common set of analytic errors
underlies such bureaucratic thinking, and the dangers inherent in the
ISO and FERC orders suggest that a detailed refutation is something that
ought to be done.  The central points that I believe I would make
include the following, among others.  (I'm using a small amount of
economic jargon here that I would not use in a report, but I really am
quite experienced at making such arguments in plain English.)

    1. Such analyses typically are incomplete, in that they ignore (a) a
risk premium for non- or under- or late payment.  They ignore also (b)
the fact that part of the marginal cost of selling today is the forgone
opportunity to sell tomorrow, given that units have to be taken down for
maintenance and the like.  In this sense, electricity can be "stored" in
the form of dispatch availability, and it is in the interest of
consumers for suppliers to produce when supplies are needed the most,
i.e., when (expected) prices are highest.  This is true even during a
stage 3 alert: Suppose, for example, that even greater problems are
foreseen for the ensuing summer.  Accordingly, this is not
"manipulation."  In addition, as explained in my paper in the current
issue of Regulation, (c) market prices under competition include a price
premium for the provision of optimal reliability.  These three
components of cost are important, with measurement requiring econometric
and other tools; and they perhaps are impossible to "verify" in
regulatory methodology.

    2. The ISO and FERC analyses confuse marginal and (average) variable
cost, average and marginal producers, average and marginal units of
production, etc.  Other errors are likely as well: The ISO, and, I
suspect, FERC implicitly assume away rising input prices as demand
conditions increase.  This would yield in perfectly competitive markets
a supply curve steeper and a market price higher than measured "marginal
cost."  Moreover, the ISO, and, again, FERC in all probability,
implicitly assume perfectly elastic supply at whatever input "costs"
happen to prevail.  That is simply incorrect: In the short run,
production capacity is limited, so that even if input prices do not rise
with demand, there is a "kink" in the competitive supply curve.  If
demand intersects supply above the kink=02=05that is, if the amount demande=
d
exceeds production capacity at the "marginal cost" that the regulators
measure=02=05price will exceed that "marginal cost."  Think about the
wholesale market for wheat, for example, which is close to a perfectly
competitive market.  In the face of bad weather in some agricultural
regions, the market price of wheat will rise, even though "costs" for
the remaining wheat farmers=02=05labor, insecticide, land rents, fuel, wate=
r,
etc.=02=05will not have changed, and indeed might actually fall because of
reduced demand from farmers affected by the adverse weather.

     3. The ISO report admits explicitly that it does not know market
marginal cost, because it complains that some suppliers bidding above
the "soft cap" have not submitted cost data.  Moreover, marginal cost
properly defined is for the market as a whole, rather than just for the
producers who bid in California.  This means, quite literally, even
apart from all of the other problems, that the conclusion of
"uncompetitiveness" or "unreasonableness" cannot follow from the ISO
analysis or from what is likely to be the underlying FERC analysis,
because price will equal the marginal cost (defined correctly) of the
last unit produced in a competitive market.  In short: The sort of
analysis offered by the ISO and FERC cannot even in principle determine
competitive prices because the regulators lack data for marginal cost
for the marginal producer.

     4. The implicit definition of consumer welfare ("wellbeing") used
by most regulators is incorrect.  Consumers are interested not in low
electricity prices alone, but in a maximization of the value of the
entire consumption basket.  Average electricity prices lower than
marginal cost reduce consumer welfare by engendering resource use in the
electricity sector that is too big, and thus prices in other sectors
that are too high.  Moreover, price controls of whatever form must
create shortages even in markets with inelastic demand, and the true
price with a shortage is unambiguously higher than the price that would
clear the market in the absence of the controls.  (Think about the
"cost" of electricity during a blackout.)  This is easy to demonstrate
analytically.
     The ISO and FERC clearly are shunting aside the effects of price
controls masquerading as "refunds" upon long run expectations and other
parameters, which easily can be shown to make consumers worse off over
time.  Part of this problem is the creation of an asymmetric
distribution of expected returns, since suppliers clearly will not be
subsidized when prices are low.

     5. The ISO errs in its assumption that bids above the soft cap
reflect higher capital costs.  I would not be surprised if FERC is
making a similar error.  Capital costs, having been sunk, cannot affect
short run pricing; the differing engineering efficiencies of generating
units will be reflected in their market values, and thus the opportunity
cost of production.  This means, in a strict textbook sense, that
different generating units cannot have costs that differ, as
counterintuitive as that sounds.  More efficient units will have lower
fuel costs (for example), but higher opportunity costs for employment of
the capital assets.  I would make this point in a report, simply to
erode the credibility of the regulators, but I would not push it too
hard, since some people cannot understand it.

     6. The Report ignores the market power of the respective regulatory
bodies as monopsonists under the implicit system of price controls and
refunds.

     7. The definition of "market power" is entirely obscure, except
implicitly as bids higher than marginal cost as measured by the
regulators.  This is incorrect, and I think that this needs to be
explained clearly.

     I am sure that other errors and omissions will emerge as the
relevant documents and arguments are reviewed.  Anyway, I'd like to
prepare such a report.  I would have to see precisely what it is that
must be refuted, but my guess is that this is about a two-week project
in terms of required analytic and writing time.  An effort to measure
marginal cost correctly would be a good deal more involved and
time-consuming, and my sense is that at this stage a refutation is more
important.  If it is a two-week project, then I think that $15,000 would
be reasonable.

    Looking forward to hearing from you.  Ben

Hi Jeannie:

My apologies.  I've been switched over to Windows 2000 and, well, things have 
been somewhat bumpy.  I have a few comments on the Frevert piece but can't 
find the document you sent.  Could you resend it?

Best,
Jeff

Are we supporting this (at least conceptually)?  Seems important to have a 
tangible alternative to the horrible plan that the ISO Board/Staff is 
contemplating.

Best,
Jeff

	Jacqlynn Wu <jwu@apx.com>
	03/12/2001 06:45 PM
		 

Greetings:
This was reported on the news this morning.  I'll see if I can retrieve 
anything off of our illustrious Governorn's web site.  Any reports of it in 
Washington D.C.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

Sue:
FYI--I'll be on the call and am covering.  You're welcome to join.
Best,
Jeff

	Susan J Mara
	03/12/2001 06:56 PM
		 
I'd like to be on the call, to the extent I'm available.  

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854
	JBennett <JBennett@GMSSR.com>
	03/12/2001 01:42 PM
		 
Sue -- did not know whether you wanted to be on this call -- its to talk
about the complaint cases and plot our strategy.  Jeanne

Please be advised that the meeting scheduled for tomorrow, March 13,
2001, in San Francisco will not take place in person.  However, the
meeting will still go forward via telephone conference call starting at
10:30 a.m. CST.  The dial-in number is (800)991-9019, passcode: 6762894,
confirmation#: 3700464.  Please call me at (713) 345-5965 should you
have any questions

	Karen Denne
	03/12/2001 10:31 PM
		 
Can you imagine working for a company that has a little more than 500
employees and has the following statistics:

  *29 have been accused of spousal abuse
  *7 have been arrested for fraud
  *19 have been accused of writing bad checks
  *117 have directly or indirectly bankrupted at leased 2 businesses
  *3 have done time for assault
  *71 cannot get a credit card due to bad credit
  *14 have been arrested on drug-related charges
  *8 have been arrested for shoplifting
  *21 are currently defendants in lawsuits
  *84 have been arrested for drunk driving in the last year

Can you guess which organization this is?

Give up yet?

It's the 535 members of the United States Congress.  The same group that
cranks out hundreds of new laws each year designed to keep the rest of us
in line.  You gotta pass this one on!

Thanks, Rosalee.

Best,
Jeff

	Rosalee Fleming
	03/13/2001 08:46 AM
		
Hi Steve and Jeff -

This was a cold call to Ken that Vanessa took while we were in Exec. Comm. 
meeting.  She had asked Ginger who to refer him to as it was CA. and she 
mentioned Jeff.  Please only call if there is any interest.

Rosie 

It was not mentioned to me.  I'm copying rosie and vanessa to find out if 
this was a simple referral (in which case you should keep the work to a 
minimum -- return the call, but don't get distracted from your other efforts) 
or whether Ken is especially interested in this and wants us to follow 
through.

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/12/2001 03:54 PM
		 
Just got a call from a fellow named Jame Edgerly at the Enterprise Zone, 
Inc.  He told me that Ken Lay (through Ken's secretary Vanessa) referred me 
to him.  He is very interested in getting us to help him work with the 
Legislature to establish an "Enterprise Zone" energy tariff to encourage 
investment in California's Enterprice Zones.  Before I launch on the effort, 
just wanted to check in and see if this rings a bell with you.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	03/13/2001 08:50 AM
		 
Colleges Sue Enron for Pulling Power Plug / UC, CSU Say Firm Plans Resale at 
Higher Price 
( March 13, 2001 ) 

The University of California and the California State University system are 
accusing energy giant Enron of breaking contracts to provide low-cost 
electricity to state campuses so the company can sell the power at higher 
prices on the spot market. 

      The two university systems are asking a federal judge to block the 
Houston-based energy broker from abandoning four-year contracts. Those 
contracts guaranteed the universities a reliable supply of power at prices 5 
percent below the capped rate created under the state's 1996 deregulation 
law. 

      The schools say Enron Energy Systems Inc., which promised them 
protection from the uncertainties of California's deregulation, is now trying 
to force them to rely on Pacific Gas and Electric Co. and Southern California 
Edison -- the two utilities nearly bankrupted by skyrocketing electricity 
prices. 

      Enron says the universities will still be guaranteed the price provided 
in the contracts until the deals run out in March 2002. But at least some of 
the electricity will now have to be purchased for the campuses by the state 
Department of Water Resources on the expensive spot market. 

      Prices on the short-term market can be many times greater than prices 
in long-term deals like those between Enron and the universities. The state 
or utilities, which cannot charge customers the full cost of electricity 
because of the rate cap, would be liable for the difference between the 
current utility rate and the spot market cost. 

      The state, which stepped in as buyer of power in January after the 
debt-ridden utilities defaulted on payments to power plants, has already 
spent $3.2 billion buying electricity for utility customers. If Enron gets 
out of its contracts with UC and CSU, the state also would have to buy as 
much as 450 megawatts for the two universities. That's enough to power 
450,000 homes. 

      In a civil complaint filed Friday in federal court in Oakland, the 
universities contend that Enron wants to be free to take advantage of soaring 
market prices for electricity by reselling low-cost power it controls under 
contracts originally meant to serve the college campuses. 

      "Enron is seeking to capitalize on the energy crisis to reap enormous 
profits," the civil suit alleges. 

      Enron spokeswoman Peggy Mahoney denied the accusation. 

      "We do not have any power purchased in blocks," Mahoney said. "It is 
fundamentally not true." 

      Nettie Hoge, executive director of the Utility Reform Network in San 
Francisco, called the move by Enron "outrageous." 

      "These people have been gouging us and making profits," she said. "If 
they are making less on some long-term contracts, they should stay with it." 

      Marty Sunde, vice chairman of Enron Energy Services, said he was 
"shocked" by the lawsuit and believes it is driven by fear of the unknown. 

      "We absolutely, positively are honoring our contract," Sunde said. 
"(The universities) have a 5 percent discount off the frozen tariff rate." 

      Mahoney said Enron will continue to honor other terms of the contracts 
by providing billing and advice on how the colleges can minimize their energy 
use. 

      But Eric Behrens, an attorney for UC, said Enron cannot fulfill those 
parts of the contracts because it has asked the utilities to rip out 
thousands of meters that provided information to the company about 
electricity use on the campuses. The utilities are installing their own 
meters at the schools. 

      Behrens said UC, one of the largest single users of electricity in the 
state, went through a laborious process to shift onto Enron's system, 
spending $1,500 for each of the 2,000 new meters. 

      Even if Enron honors the low rate until the contracts expire, Behrens 
said, its abrogation of the deals could expose UC and CSU to extra costs of 
as much as $297 million in coming years by forcing them to become utility 
customers again. 

      Those customers will probably have to cover a major share of the 
billions in debt that the utilities and the state have racked up over the 
past year as wholesale prices for power went through the roof. 

      Until Feb. 1, when Enron took steps to drop them, the universities were 
so-called direct access customers of Enron. Direct access, a key piece of the 
state's deregulation plan, was originally intended to lower prices for 
consumers by allowing companies to compete with the utilities. 

      But the state Legislature, concerned that too many customers were 
fleeing the utilities, recently passed a bill that could suspend any new 
contracts under the direct access program. 

      Mahoney said Enron is being forced to release all its direct access 
customers because the debt-laden utilities have stopped paying Enron and 
other providers a required rebate. 

      Other residential and institutional customers also are being returned 
to the utilities. Enron, for example, is returning the San Francisco Giants 
to PG&E even though the energy company signed a contract to provide 
electricity to Pacific Bell Park through 2010.

Jim, et al:
FYI.  Lots of expansion plans going on, including TW.  We can discuss further 
on the call.  Expansions generally create some level of concern from shippers 
due to the fact that capacity to the boarder exceeds takeaway in California.  
It's particularly prickly at Wheeler, through which, I'm assuming, the Kern 
expansion will flow.  We can discuss further on the call.

Best,
Jeff

	James D Steffes
	03/13/2001 09:45 AM
		 
Becky --

Can you please find out (a) details about the emergency expansion on Kern 
River and (b) key Firm Shippers on Kern River, Mojave, PGT?

Philip Allen called me this morning and asked about our ability to "get a 
read" on the potential for other Firm Shippers on Kern River to oppose this 
expansion.  Can we quietly reach out to our industry contacts (other Govt 
Affairs shops) to get their opinions?

His concern is primarily about Kern expanding into CA will limit other Firm 
Shippers given the limitations on the SoCal system [Jeff, give me a call to 
see how this plays in CA].  

While we are not a Firm Shipper (and we probably don't want to get directly 
in front of this - Enron fights expansion), how will FERC and its Staff look 
at this issue [Donna & Leslie}?

Let's try and have the info and a call on Thursday at 4pm Houston time to get 
back to him afterwards.

Jim

Thank you very much.

Jeff

	Jennifer Rudolph@EES
	03/13/2001 10:52 AM
		 
LA Times
Today

Tuesday, March 13, 2001 
UC, Cal State Systems Sue Power Seller to Retain Pact's Low Prices 

Electricity: Officials want to prevent Enron from switching their accounts to 
Edison and PG&E. They fear losing discounted rates. 
By MASSIE RITSCH, Times Staff Writer

Faced with losing their protection from sky-high electricity bills, the 
University of California and California State University have sued to stop 
their power supplier from halting service. 
The UC and Cal State systems signed a four-year contract with Enron Energy 
Services in 1998, locking into discounted fixed rates for electricity from 
the Houston-based energy giant. 
Last month, Enron notified its commercial and industrial customers in 
California, including the universities, that their power would be supplied by 
Pacific Gas & Electric and Southern California Edison. 
Because of the complicated rules of the state's deregulated utility market, 
the shift saves Enron money, but the universities fear that it could subject 
them to the fluctuating--but always expensive--prices that most Californians 
have been paying recently for power. 
UC and Cal State accuse Enron of breaking its contract so that it can sell 
power earmarked for the campuses to other customers for more money. 
On Friday, the public universities asked the U.S. District Court in Oakland 
to issue a preliminary injunction to stop the switch-over. No hearing has 
been scheduled, UC spokesman Charles McFadden said. 
"We don't object to Enron making more money," McFadden said. "What we do 
object to is Enron seeking to increase their profits at the expense of 
California's students, parents and taxpayers." 
Enron denied Monday that the company will resell power to boost profits, and 
an executive guaranteed that, for this final year of its contract with the 
universities, Enron will reimburse them for any increase in their power bills 
when they return to the customer rolls of PG&E and Edison. 
"All the value that caused the [UC and Cal State systems] to want a contract 
with us, we are retaining. . . . The only reason we did [this] is because we 
found a better cost alternative to keep us in the game," Enron Vice Chairman 
Marty Sunde said. 
The universities estimate that their contract with Enron has saved their 
campuses $30 million. Being returned to the in-state power suppliers could 
cost them an additional $132 million to $297 million over 10 years, they say. 
That figure includes the cost of switching meters on the campuses and 
changing billing systems. More significant, the higher price the universities 
would pay for power would include a projected rate increase that would help 
PG&E and Edison reduce the billions in debt they have incurred in 
California's deregulated electricity market. 
While other colleges in the state pay super high rates for power, UC, Cal 
State and Enron have proudly promoted their arrangement. In January, the 
university systems put out a news release that extolled the contract and 
assured that electricity rates would remain stable until at least March 31, 
2002, when the contract was scheduled to expire. 
When the agreement was reached in 1998, Enron said it was "honored" to serve 
UC and Cal State, and the firm boasts on its Web site that the university 
systems are "notable customers." 
"We were and are proud of the contract," UC's McFadden said. "That's why 
we're fighting so hard to preserve it." 
UC and Cal State are among the state's biggest consumers of electricity, 
paying more than $125 million annually for power. Both systems meet a portion 
of their power needs by generating electricity at on-campus plants. 
Not all of the universities' campuses have been served by Enron. UCLA, for 
example, buys its power from the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power, 
and UC Riverside purchases it from the city of Riverside. 

Given everything that we've got on our plate, and the relative priority of 
the affiliate issue, and the fact that ARM and Wild Goose are involved, I 
would propose that we take a pass on this one.  Thoughts?

Best,
Jeff
	JMcTarnaghan <JMcTarnaghan@GMSSR.COM>
	03/13/2001 10:59 AM
		 
Dear Jeff and Sue:

Sorry to be a broken record on this one....but I don't know what you want to
do about the Affiliates case.  There is a PHC tomorrow and comments were
filed.  SCE's comments make a nasty jab at Enron for proposing the rules in
the first place.  I see that AReM is participating as well.  If your plan is
to participate in this proceeding only through AReM, that's fine but please
let me know so that I can remove my appearance.  I will be at the PHC for
Wild Goose but would like to be very clear about who I am representing in
the docket in order to avoid confusion.  

Thanks,

Jim McTarnaghan
Goodin, MacBride, Squeri, Ritchie & Day
505 Sansome Street, Suite 900
San Francisco, CA 94111
415-765-8409 (Direct Line)
415-398-4321 (Fax)
jmct@gmssr.com (Email)

Thanks very much for taking care of the case.  See you tonite.  

It's a love fest!  How goes it?

	Paul Kaufman@ECT
	03/13/2001 11:26 AM
		
I agree as well.  

Richard Shapiro@ENRON
03/13/2001 09:28 AM
Agree.

Given everything that we've got on our plate, and the relative priority of 
the affiliate issue, and the fact that ARM and Wild Goose are involved, I 
would propose that we take a pass on this one.  Thoughts?

Best,
Jeff
	JMcTarnaghan <JMcTarnaghan@GMSSR.COM>
	03/13/2001 10:59 AM
		 
Dear Jeff and Sue:

Sorry to be a broken record on this one....but I don't know what you want to
do about the Affiliates case.  There is a PHC tomorrow and comments were
filed.  SCE's comments make a nasty jab at Enron for proposing the rules in
the first place.  I see that AReM is participating as well.  If your plan is
to participate in this proceeding only through AReM, that's fine but please
let me know so that I can remove my appearance.  I will be at the PHC for
Wild Goose but would like to be very clear about who I am representing in
the docket in order to avoid confusion.  

Thanks,

Jim McTarnaghan
Goodin, MacBride, Squeri, Ritchie & Day
505 Sansome Street, Suite 900
San Francisco, CA 94111
415-765-8409 (Direct Line)
415-398-4321 (Fax)
jmct@gmssr.com (Email)

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	03/13/2001 08:44 AM
		 
PR01:089
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
03/12/2001 4:45 PM 

GOVERNOR DAVIS, WESTERN GOVERNORS ASK FERC 
FOR CAPS ON WHOLESALE POWER COSTS

SACRAMENTO 

Governor Gray Davis, joined by Governor Gary Locke of Washington and Governor 
John Kitzhaber of Oregon, today wrote the Federal Energy Regulatory 
Commission (FERC) to request a temporary price cap on the cost of power 
charged by generators in the western states.

The three governors suggested a "cost-based" price cap for power purchased in 
the spot market. Under the proposal, generators would be allowed to recover 
all of their costs and provide a small level of profit of approximately 
$25/Mwh. A similar proposal was offered by FERC Commissioner William Masey.

"While we fully recognize the benefits of a free market, our problem is that 
we have a shortage of electricity," wrote the governors. "In spite of our 
aggressive and urgent efforts, the problem will only get worse throughout the 
year and particularly this summer. This shortage has enabled generators to 
receive 'unjust and unreasonable' charges for their wholesale energy.

"A substantial portion of the power necessary to serve load will still be 
required to be purchased in the more expensive hour/ahead and spot markets. 
The relief we are requesting will be necessary only in the event of a 
shortage and only for this year," said the governors.

Under the proposal, bilateral contracts and long term contracts would be 
exempt. Federal power marketing agencies not controlled by FERC (such as the 
Bonneville Power Administration) would be requested to voluntarily adhere to 
such a plan.

The governors asked for prompt action on their request.
 

###

 

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	03/13/2001 08:44 AM
		 
PR01:089
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
03/12/2001 4:45 PM 

GOVERNOR DAVIS, WESTERN GOVERNORS ASK FERC 
FOR CAPS ON WHOLESALE POWER COSTS

SACRAMENTO 

Governor Gray Davis, joined by Governor Gary Locke of Washington and Governor 
John Kitzhaber of Oregon, today wrote the Federal Energy Regulatory 
Commission (FERC) to request a temporary price cap on the cost of power 
charged by generators in the western states.

The three governors suggested a "cost-based" price cap for power purchased in 
the spot market. Under the proposal, generators would be allowed to recover 
all of their costs and provide a small level of profit of approximately 
$25/Mwh. A similar proposal was offered by FERC Commissioner William Masey.

"While we fully recognize the benefits of a free market, our problem is that 
we have a shortage of electricity," wrote the governors. "In spite of our 
aggressive and urgent efforts, the problem will only get worse throughout the 
year and particularly this summer. This shortage has enabled generators to 
receive 'unjust and unreasonable' charges for their wholesale energy.

"A substantial portion of the power necessary to serve load will still be 
required to be purchased in the more expensive hour/ahead and spot markets. 
The relief we are requesting will be necessary only in the event of a 
shortage and only for this year," said the governors.

Under the proposal, bilateral contracts and long term contracts would be 
exempt. Federal power marketing agencies not controlled by FERC (such as the 
Bonneville Power Administration) would be requested to voluntarily adhere to 
such a plan.

The governors asked for prompt action on their request.
 

###

 

Steve:
Based on the note from Rosalee, and if you agree, I'm going to assign low 
priority to the issue.

Jeff

	Rosalee Fleming
	03/13/2001 08:46 AM
		
Hi Steve and Jeff -

This was a cold call to Ken that Vanessa took while we were in Exec. Comm. 
meeting.  She had asked Ginger who to refer him to as it was CA. and she 
mentioned Jeff.  Please only call if there is any interest.

Rosie 

It was not mentioned to me.  I'm copying rosie and vanessa to find out if 
this was a simple referral (in which case you should keep the work to a 
minimum -- return the call, but don't get distracted from your other efforts) 
or whether Ken is especially interested in this and wants us to follow 
through.

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/12/2001 03:54 PM
		 
Just got a call from a fellow named Jame Edgerly at the Enterprise Zone, 
Inc.  He told me that Ken Lay (through Ken's secretary Vanessa) referred me 
to him.  He is very interested in getting us to help him work with the 
Legislature to establish an "Enterprise Zone" energy tariff to encourage 
investment in California's Enterprice Zones.  Before I launch on the effort, 
just wanted to check in and see if this rings a bell with you.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

FYI.  Silicon Manufacturer Group's comments on interruptible rates, etc.
	"Laura Goldseth" <lgoldseth@svmg.org>
	03/13/2001 11:46 AM
		 
PLEASE OPEN THE ATTACHMENTS

Could you please send these to Blackout Busters? THanks. BB

 - Comments of the SVMG on Outages and OBMC 3-13-01 FINAL.doc
 - SVMG request to formally intervene in inter case re OBMC 3-12-01.doc
 - Request to late file comments in inter case on OBMC.doc

greetings.  could you please call me at 415.782.7822.  thanks.
Jeff

Prior to the UC/CSU blow-up, I would have said yes.  Now my inclination is to 
lay low.  But there may be other good reasons for getting out there.  I just 
can't think of any....

Best,
Jeff

	Susan J Mara
	03/13/2001 01:30 PM
		 
I have been discouraging Edelman (ARM's PR firm) from using Enron as one of 
the spokespeople.  Edelman asked again today if Enron wanted to be making 
comments on direct access. So, Edelman would ask interested reporters to call 
us to discuss AReM issues.  -- either Houston people or SF people.  What do 
you think?

Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854

Yes.

	Susan J Mara
	03/13/2001 01:47 PM
		 
Sue Mara
Enron Corp.
Tel: (415) 782-7802
Fax:(415) 782-7854

Apologies, if I had your phone number, I'd have called you.  I'm tied up for 
the next hour or so.  If you give me your number, I can call you.

Best,
Jeff

	"JOHN G KLAUBERG" <JKLAUBER@LLGM.COM>
	03/13/2001 02:26 PM
		 
Jeff:  I received your message but have been jammed up on a long call.  I 
will try to get you in about an hour if that is ok.  Thanks  John

"This e-mail, including attachments, contains information that is 
confidential and it may be protected by the attorney/client or other 
privileges.  This e-mail, including attachments, constitutes non-public 
information intended to be conveyed only to the designated recipient(s).  If 
you are not an intended recipient, please delete this e-mail, including 
attachments and notify me by return mail, e-mail or by phone at 212 
424-8125.  The unauthorized use, dissemination, distribution or reproduction 
of the e-mail, including attachments, is prohibited and may be unlawful.

John Klauberg
LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae, L.L.P.
212 424-8125
jklauber@llgm.com

>>> <Jeff.Dasovich@enron.com> 03/13/01 01:56PM >>>
greetings.  could you please call me at 415.782.7822.  thanks.
Jeff

Jim: I'm assuming that I'll participate by phone in the meeting with Vicki 
and by phone in the meeting with Dave.  That right?

Best,
Jeff
	Vicki Sharp@EES
	03/13/2001 01:46 PM
		 
We are set to talk about these issues with Dave Delainey Thursday at 11.  
Lets meet in my office at 10:30 for a premeeting.  Thanks. 

Agreed.  Also, Margaret, do we have numbers on what portion of GDP and 
California's "GDP" the tech sector represents? 

Best,
Jeff

	Rob Bradley
	09/24/2000 11:51 AM
		
I think it will be extra important to add "lost demand" from brownouts and 
blackouts to consumption to get the real growth rate of power demand this 
year.  There was an increment of this for 1999 given the problems in New York 
City and Chicago and maybe elsewhere.

- Rob

Robert L. Bradley Jr.
Director, Public Policy Analysis
Enron Corp.
P.O Box 1188, Room 4724a
[1400 Smith Street 77002]
Houston, Texas 77251-1188

(P) 713-853-3062
(F) 713-646-4702

Assistant: Joan Stransky 713-853-4702
jstrans@enron.com

	Jeff Dasovich
	09/22/2000 06:24 PM
		
Thank you very much for the tech data.  Margaret, is there data out there 
regarding the California utilities performance (i.e., how many rolling 
blackouts, etc. v. national average)?  Thanks again.

can't wait to see the headlines:  "congressman has hitman kill pregnant 
girlfriend, but supreme court ruling will allow him to vote on big budget 
bill this sunday anyway!"

	"Scott Laughlin" <scottwl@hotmail.com>
	03/13/2001 04:07 PM
		 
I thought for sure you were just picking on the NFL! After this, no more 
jokes about football, Jeff... We now expect all your vitriol to go to 
Congress.

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com

Ain't got one.  Please call Scott Govenar at 916.448.8240 for info.

	Robert Frank
	03/13/2001 04:15 PM
		 
Jeff - would you forward any response(s) to your question below - there are 
EES people asking around about this issue.
	Harry Kingerski
	03/12/2001 08:43 AM
		 
	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/08/2001 11:11 AM
		 
Scott/Hedy/Mike:
What's the status of the DG bill?  As I recall, Burton amended the bill in a 
way that explicitly prohibit diesel DG units from helping California avoid 
rolling black outs this summer. I believe the exclusion was made on grounds 
that running diesel would be too environmentally damaging?  Could you provide 
a brief update?  Is there anything in the bills that addresses the 
restrictions on the number of hours that these units are permitted to run?  
Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff
	Roger A Larson@EES
	03/08/2001 10:58 AM
		 
We have been analyzing various opportunities of providing electric power into 
California.  One idea is to modify existing customer emergency diesel 
generators such that we could turn them on and supply power to the grid when 
the customer does not need the power.

We believe current regulations limit use of diesel (#2 fuel oil) fired 
emergency generators to only be operated when the utility is not currently 
supplying power to the facility and in that case, maximum of 500 hoursper 
year for hospitals and other critical services but only 200 hours per year 
for all others.

There may be legislation currently being submitted to the California 
legislature or other regulatory body (EPA?) to change this based on current 
need for power in that area.  Could you please advise me if there is 
currently any legislation like this under consideration and/or when this may 
occur?  

Thank you for your assistance.

Roger

Greetings folks:  Great to see you (missed you, Donald) in Houston.  Please=
=20
see attached.  This guy's been after me for some time.  I finally spoke wit=
h=20
him and told him that I'd pass it along.  I don't know who (if anyone) in E=
BS=20
is interested in OSS---I can't recall if it's a component of our=20
architecture, or not.  If there is someone who might be interested, could y=
ou=20
forward this along?  They can choose to follow up, or not.  Hope all is wel=
l,=20
and hope to see you again very soon.

Best,
Jeff
=09"Paul Severin" <paul_severin@mail-net.com>
=0903/13/2001 04:55 PM
=09=09=20

Hello?Jeff,
??=20
Thank you for?returning my call and speaking with metoday?about  Visionael,=
=20
the  Network Knowledge Management solutionfor OSS (Operational Support =20
Systems).? Our  software?streamlines every aspect of  managing?avoice and=
=20
data network, thus saving time  and MONEY.
?
...and thank you for forwarding this email to  appropriate parties at?ENRON=
.
?
Attached,  please find?our latestPDF  that will further describeour?softwar=
e=20
in further?detail.??Visionael?can?manage?a network's resources throughout=
=20
it's  entirelifecycle.? These stagesinclude:  discovery,  designing,=20
deployment,  provisioning, and operations. =20
?
Were you aware  oftheCISCO paper that?recommends  Visionael?
?
In a key white paper, Cisco discusses the role  of inventory andconfigurati=
on=20
management  within the context of defining configurationmanagement best=20
practices. Cisco points to Visionael as the leadingprovider of this=20
technology.??=20

To read  the Cisco white paper, click here:?http:
//www.cisco.com/warp/public/126/configmgmt.html?? ?select: Maintain Network=
 =20
Documentation

Once you have had an opportunity to  review ourmaterial, please feel free t=
o=20
call me  ith any questions that you may  have so that we can determine if =
=20
Visionael is a viable solution foryour?company.? I am interested in learnin=
g=20
your  opinions and?I look forward to your response.? =20

Thank you very much for  your consideration. =20
Sincerely,
?
Paul  Severin
Telemarketing?Representative
?
Visionael  Corporation
=20
Website: www.visionael.com
Toll free:  877-334-3694
 - Visionael 6.0 - ent.pdf

http://www.governor.ca.gov/state/govsite/gov_htmldisplay.jsp?BV_SessionID=@@@@
0703495593.0984525677@@@@&BV_EngineID=calkghdfhiibemfcfkmchcgi.0&sCatTitle=Pre
ss+Release&sFilePath=/govsite/press_release/2001_03/20010313_PR01091_2020_ener
gy_program.html&sTitle=GO

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
03/13/2001 11:30 AM=20

GOVERNOR DAVIS UNVEILS 20/20 ENERGY REBATE=20
PROGRAM FOR SUMMER 2001
SACRAMENTO=20
California ratepayers will receive a 20 percent rebate on their summer=20
electric bill if they cut back their electricity use by 20 percent over las=
t=20
summer's levels under a new initiative unveiled by Governor Davis today.
The "20/20" program, created by the Governor under executive order, is=20
designed to help the state avoid the likelihood of blackouts this summer an=
d=20
reward consumers who significantly conserve energy. In addition, it could=
=20
save the state up to $1.3 billion in power costs by reducing the amount of=
=20
electricity the state must buy during expensive summer peak periods.
?=14 ?=01AThis program helps us take control of our own energy destiny,?=14=
 ?=0F_ Governor=20
Davis said. ?=14 ?=01AWe will save money and reduce costs to consumers. The=
 20/20=20
program will save up to 2,200 megawatts during the summer peak period.=20
That?=14 ?=01vs power the state won?=14 ?=01vt have to purchase. Instead of=
 paying=20
exorbitant rates to out-of-state generators, I?=14 ?=01vd rather pay Califo=
rnia=20
consumers to conserve.?=14 ?=0F_=20
The voluntary program is designed to cover all households and businesses in=
=20
California. Under the Governor?=14 ?=01vs plan, customers will receive a 20=
 percent=20
rebate on Summer 2001 bills if they achieve 20 percent or greater reduction=
=20
in electricity consumption between June and September versus last year.=20
Residential and small commercial rebates will be based on 20 percent=20
reduction of total=20
consumption, while commercial and industrial customer rebates will be based=
=20
on 20 percent reduction of peak load.=20
Rebates will be issued at the end of the June-September period.
The 20/20 program for Summer 2001 is a major component of Governor Davis?=
=14 ?=01v=20
comprehensive energy efficiency and demand reduction program. Since January=
,=20
Governor Davis has instituted conservation measures to help Californians=20
conserve energy, including:=20
Directing more than $800 million for programs to improve conservation and=
=20
efficiency.=20
Implementing aggressive conservation measures in state buildings, resulting=
=20
in about 200 MW of savings during energy emergencies.=20
Developing a comprehensive outreach and education campaign to reach=20
businesses,=20
organizations, and millions of California consumers.=20
Partnering with other governmental entities, including school districts to=
=20
ensure that all 475 cities, 58 counties, and 8,300 schools in California=20
reduce consumption.=20
Adopting the strongest energy efficiency standards in the world for=20
residential and non-residential buildings and appliances.=20
Incorporating energy efficient, sustainable building designs in new state=
=20
building projects.=20
Issuing 15 Governor's Executive Orders on energy.=20

PR01: 090
FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
03/13/2001 8:00 AM=20

CALIFORNIA RECEIVES FIRST=20
PEAKER POWER PLANT PROPOSALS
SACRAMENTO=20
Governor Gray Davis announced that the first two proposals for power plants=
=20
to provide electricity at peak use times this summer have been received by=
=20
the California Energy Commission.
"We are doing everything we can to greatly streamline the time it takes to=
=20
get new generation up and running this summer," Governor Davis said. "These=
=20
new peaker proposals are examples of our determination to meet California's=
=20
energy challenge."
A 90-megawatt plant called the Larkspur Energy Facility would be located in=
=20
the Otay Mesa area of the City of San Diego, at the corner of Harvest Road=
=20
and Otay Mesa Road.=20
The second proposal is for the Indigo Energy Facility, a 135-megawatt plant=
=20
that would be located near an existing wind generating facility in the City=
=20
of Palm Springs in Riverside County. The project is north of Interstate 10,=
=20
on 19th Avenue, east of North Indian Avenue.=20
Both projects use natural gas-fueled simple-cycle turbine generators equipp=
ed=20
with state of the art air pollution control features. They are being propos=
ed=20
by Wildflower Energy LP, a Houston, Texas-based company. The two projects a=
re=20
part of the Independent System Operator's reliability generation agreements=
=20
planned to come on-line this summer.
On February 8, 2001, Governor Davis directed the Energy Commission to use i=
ts=20
emergency power plant permitting authority to permit new peaking and=20
renewable power plants that can be on-line by July 31, 2001. The emergency=
=20
permitting authority extended to peaker projects that have ISO contracts an=
d=20
have not begun the licensing process with the local jurisdictions. Peaker=
=20
power plants are simple cycle generators that can be constructed in a=20
relatively small area and can readily connect to the existing electricity=
=20
transmission and natural gas system.=20
The Energy Commission review of the proposed projects will include site tou=
rs=20
and informational hearings in both local areas. Both applications are=20
currently under review by Energy Commission staff for data adequacy. Once=
=20
they are accepted as data adequate, the Energy Commission plans to expedite=
=20
the licensing process under its emergency process to approve projects in as=
=20
soon as 21 days.=20
Provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act do not apply to=20
emergency power plant projects.

Hi TJ.  I forgot to request that last week's class be video-ed and I was 
wondering if someone else requested a video-taping.  It was for Tasker's 
(E221?) class that meets on Thursdays.  Thanks very much.

Best,
Jeff

=09Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
=0903/13/2001 05:47 PM
=09=09=20

JONES DENOUNCES LACK OF OVERSIGHT AND ACCOUNTABILITY
OVER MONTHS OF FREE-WHEELING ENERGY SPENDING SPREE
CALLS FOR STATE CONTROLLER TO AUDIT ALL ENERGY-RELATED EXPENSES AND=20
CONTRACTS; URGES GOVERNOR TO BEGIN MONTHLY BRIEFINGS WITH LEGISLATIVE=20
BI-PARTISAN LEADERSHIP ON PROGRESS OF POWER PLANT CONSTRUCTION AND DETAILS =
OF=20
LONG-TERM CONTRACTS

LOS ANGELES - Denouncing the fact that there is currently no oversight or=
=20
accountability for the billions of taxpayers' dollars that are being spent =
by=20
the Governor and his administration, Secretary of State Bill Jones totals=
=20
called on State Controller Kathleen Connell to begin an immediate full and=
=20
complete audit of all energy-related financial transactions. As chief=20
financial of officer for the state, the controller has the sole=20
responsibility to "provide sound fiscal control over both receipts and=20
disbursements of public funds and to determine legality and accuracy of eve=
ry=20
claim against the state."

"There is no oversight and no accountability to ensure that the taxpayers' =
=20
money is being spent wisely," Jones sad. "The enormous outlays of money to=
=20
purchase energy on a daily basis as well as these binding long-terrn=20
contracts will have a tremendous fiscal impact on the state for years to co=
me=20
- I believe essentially, mortgaging our future for our children and=20
grandchildren."

Additionally, Jones called on Governor Davis to immediately meet with=20
legislative bi-partisan leaders to brief them fully as to the terms and cos=
ts=20
of all contracts and purchases on the spot market just as the President's=
=20
team meets with congressional leaders to discuss issues of
national security.

Jones also strongly urged the Governor to begun monthly briefings immediate=
ly=20
w=06=15th legislative leaders to provide on-going updates on the progress o=
f new=20
power plant construction and an up-to-date report of California's power=20
supplies to ensure adequate resources for the upcoming summer months

"The Governor believes that the solution to our energy crisis lies in the=
=20
state getting into the power business - I do not. As a result, Davis has=20
created a de-facto state Power Authority that's spending cash at an alarmin=
g=20
rate, some $45 million a day; $1.5 billion a month," said Jones. "And he's=
=20
just signed the state up for some $43 billion in long-tern contracts for=20
which we don't know the terms, length or total energy supply secured."=20

Jones noted that when the utility companies were regulate the Public=20
Utilities Commission (PUC) had the responsibility to look over their should=
er=20
and ensure that the ratepayers were protected and fairly treated. Yet all t=
he=20
governmental agencies that should be looking into the energy spending spree=
=20
are now controlled or appointed by the govemor, including the PUC, the Litt=
le=20
Hoover Commission, the Electricity Oversight Board, the Department of=20
Finance, the Resources Agency, the Department of Water Resources, the Energ=
y=20
Commissions the Independent Systems Operator and the now-defunct Power=20
Exchange.

According to a recent Wall Street Journal article (3/08/01), David Mills,=
=20
trading floor manager of the Bonneville Power A.dndnistation questioned=20
Califomia's purchases on the spot market, saying that the water agency=20
[California Departnent of Water Resources] has at times offered to pay $50 =
to=20
$100 per megawatt hour more than the available market price." Mills added=
=20
that power buyers for the state "agree to prices that make you wonder =06? =
you?d=20
at least think they?d check to see what the prevailing price is before=20
throwing out their offer."=20

"As President Bush has said so often, it's not the government's money, it's=
=20
the people's money" Jones sa=06=15d.  "The people of California deserve to =
know=20
what the terms of this high-stakes energy game are since it's being played=
=20
with taxpayers' money."

Jones criticized the governor?s repeated refusal to fulfill numerous Public=
=20
Records Act requests from Assemblyman Tony Strickland (R-Thousand Oaks),=20
several news media and other organizations, calling his denial for=20
information based on a government code provision regarding protection of th=
e=20
"public interest " an assault on the public's common sense.

"I believe that the real =01@public interest' lies in a full accounting to =
the=20
public of how the Governor has spent their money - and what kind of a deal=
=20
we're actually getting," Jones concluded.

#       #    #

            

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/13/2001 06:27 PM
		 

If you're referring to the conversation we had on today's call, it's actually 
a bill by Dede Alpert (sp?) that, if signed by the Governor, would cause 
demand to go up.  Were you referring to that or something more general?

Best,
Jeff

	Janel Guerrero
	03/13/2001 06:47 PM
		 
is it possible to get a one-pager talking points on the san diego situation 
and how the govenor is increasing the demand on the system as we head into 
summer?  who can do this?

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/13/2001 07:10 PM
		
If you're referring to the conversation we had on today's call, it's actually 
a bill by Dede Alpert (sp?) that, if signed by the Governor, would cause 
demand to go up.  Were you referring to that or something more general?

Best,
Jeff

	Janel Guerrero
	03/13/2001 06:47 PM
		 
is it possible to get a one-pager talking points on the san diego situation 
and how the govenor is increasing the demand on the system as we head into 
summer?  who can do this?

I'll check.  In the meantime, I'm in the SF office all week.

	Joseph Alamo
	09/25/2000 01:02 PM
		 
Jeff - 
you DO have a new address via Corp, so you *may* not have received the 
attached (see orig. e-mail below).  I would be curious, however, to know if 
you did or not.

Thanks,
Joseph
Paul Kaufman@ECT
09/25/2000 10:52 AM
Monday--Portland
Tuesday--Portland
Wednesday--San Francisco
Thursday--Carson City
Friday--Portland

Joseph Alamo@ENRON
09/21/2000 03:07 PM
Please forward to me your schedules for next week, September 25 - 29, as soon 
as possible.

Thanks in advance for your cooperation.

Joseph Alamo
Sr. Administrative Assistant
Government Affairs - The Americas
San Francisco CA 

Greetings:

Sounds like I'm glad that I missed the quiz last week.

Hate to be a nag, but we've got to turn in what we're doing for our project 
on Thursday.  I propose doing a nice, clean merger, which would allow us to 
do both comparative analysis (who are these companies?) and merger/valuation 
analysis.  Mark and I talked last night and I pleaded again not to do strict 
accounting stuff, but if that's what folks would like to do, I can certainly 
suck it up.  Any thoughts?

Best,
Jeff

absolutely NO need to be sorry, my dear.

	Janel Guerrero
	03/13/2001 07:42 PM
		
that's right....it was a bill, i forgot.  maybe we are already lobbying on 
that.  sorry.

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/13/2001 07:10 PM
		
If you're referring to the conversation we had on today's call, it's actually 
a bill by Dede Alpert (sp?) that, if signed by the Governor, would cause 
demand to go up.  Were you referring to that or something more general?

Best,
Jeff

	Janel Guerrero
	03/13/2001 06:47 PM
		 
is it possible to get a one-pager talking points on the san diego situation 
and how the govenor is increasing the demand on the system as we head into 
summer?  who can do this?

Kristen:
My edits to the declaration.

Best,
Jeff

415.782.7822

	"Kristen Bird" <kb@quinnemanuel.com>
	03/13/2001 05:19 PM
		 
Jeff,
I am attaching a draft declaration for your review.  Please let me know if 
you have any comments or changes or if you think we could explain things a 
little better.  Obviously, if you think we have misrepresented something, 
please let me know so that we can correct it.  I believe we have most of the 
exhibits.
Call me when you have had a chance to review.  My direct dial is 213.615.8774.

As I said, we need to file this in support of our Opposition to the 
plaintiffs' motion for shortened time, which is due tomorrow.  Accordingly, 
we would like to have this finalized and signed tonight, if possible.  Thanks 
Jeff.

Regards,
Kristen

 - 0345604.01

Apologies.  This is the correct version.

Best,
Jeff

Soda Springs used to be a ski place (on the summit).  Hopefully, there's 
still something there (but with these conditions, could be very Spring-ee).

	Prentice Sellers <psellers@Haas.Berkeley.EDU>
	03/13/2001 07:45 PM
		 
Here's where the Clair Tapaan lodge is located.  Is it close to the ski 
resorts?

Location

Clair Tappaan is located at 7000 feet, 45 minutes drive west of Reno and one 
and a half hours drive east of Sacramento just off of Interstate 80. From 
eastbound I-80, take the exit for Soda Springs/Norden and go 2.4 miles east 
on Donner Pass road. Look for our sign slightly up the hill on your left and 
the wide footpath leading up to the Lodge. Parking is available on either 
side of the road. You can check road conditions online at the CAL-TRANS 
website.

unavailable between 8 am and 1030 am and 1130 and 1230.  otherwise ok.

best,
jeff

	Lysa Akin@ECT
	03/13/2001 06:08 PM
		 
Mary Hain has asked that I set a conference call to discuss the topice 
reference above.

I would like to schedule the meeting for Thursday, March 15th.

Please advise ASAP your availability Thursday.

If I have left anyone off this list that you feel should participate, please 
forward this e-mail.

Thank you.

Lysa Akin
Ass't to Mary Hain
503/464-7927

Chris:
Did you find out who the folks are from Navigant working on the contracts?

Best,
Jeff

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/13/2001 08:06 PM
		 
Chris:
Did you find out who the folks are from Navigant working on the contracts?

Best,
Jeff

Margaret:  Congratulations.  Sounds very exciting.  You will be sorely, 
sorely missed.  Your family's (immense) gain is Enron's loss. It's been an 
incredible pleasure working with you.

Best,
Jeff

	Margaret Carson
	03/14/2001 09:29 AM
		 
Hi to my  friends and  associates here at Enron!!!  After  14  great  years  
at  Enron I am retiring soon to spend  time  with my husband and family  and 
to have more  time to  travel,  to  do   watercolor paintings  and  work on 
my art website.

For general referrals on  energy information that you may need  that  I have 
been providing,  please call Joan Stransky   and  she  can assist you in 
finding  alternate sources for this information. For information related to  
competition and state restructuring updates  kindly contact  Elizabeth 
Linnell in Enron Government  Affairs.   For  Cambridge Energy Research 
Associates Contract matters  please  call Jim Steffes.  On  Enron executive 
and officers speech matters kindly call Rob Bradley.  Kindly  contact Joan if 
you need  assistance  with gaining  access  to the CERA  research documents 
we obtain under our Corporate  License  agreement.   On queries covering  
international  data, please  contact  Fiona  Grant in our London Office.  

 
 I have   enjoyed working with you all  here  at Enron and I wish you all the 
best.  Regards,  Margaret

Hey Buddy:

Hope your weekend was nice.  Tried to call, but I think your voicemail is 
messed up out there today.  Checking in to see whether Hoecker said it or 
not.  Any word?  Also, looks like we're on for Portland next 
Tuesday/Wednesday.  Would definitely like to gather (phone call or something) 
prior to the meeting so we (me, you, Rick, Richard) are clear on what our 
goals are for the meeting and what the agenda needs to look like.  Finally, I 
should have a draft of my "Tech Section" ready by tomorrow sometime.  That 
was our deadline, correct?  Any other follow-info from last 
Tuesday'Wednesday's meeting that I should be aware of?  Finally, you see 
Harry's note?  Can you make a call to discuss the PG&E strategy on Wednesday?

Best,
Jeff

I'll be there.  Thanks.

	Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
	03/14/2001 10:32 AM
		 
Senator Burton and Senator Joe Dunn will "Make an announcement regarding 
potential manipulation in the wholesale energy market" today at 11am in room 
1190 at the state capitol." (See article below for details).

We will keep you posted.

Thanks,
Jean

-- 
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

State Senate panel will probe power pricing 

March 14, 2001

By KIMBERLY KINDY
The Orange County Register 

SACRAMENTO A newly formed Senate committee will investigate whether power 
producers manipulated the electricity market and overcharged the state for 
energy.

State Sen. Joe Dunn, D-Santa Ana, will chair the committee, which will 
immediately request records from the power merchants and next month will 
interview employees in an attempt to determine whether allegations of 
collusion among energy producers are true.

"What has really caused me to push for this investigation is their behavior 
mirrors one another,'' Dunn said. "I don't know how that could occur. They 
seem to be clones of each other."

The power producers said the investigation is a waste of time, that they have 
done nothing to manipulate the marketplace.

"They can look all they want,'' said Gary Ackerman, executive director of the 
Western Power Trading Forum, a trade group representing power merchants. 
"They aren't going to find evidence."

Dunn said hearings will be held to review the documents and to conduct the 
interviews in public. The investigation is expected to be completed within 
two months. 

The aim is to identify problems with the structure of the market that may 
have allowed generators to manipulate prices, and to determine whether there 
was any illegal activity.

In the case of market structure flaws, Dunn said senators would work to make 
necessary changes through legislation or by working with federal regulatory 
officials. Any proof of illegal activity would be forwarded to state Attorney 
General Bill Lockyer, whose office is conducting its own investigation. 

    

We'll do our best.  It'll be that much tougher w/out your help.  Go to 
Giverny and paint some flower gardens for me.

Best,
Jeff

	Margaret Carson
	03/14/2001 10:52 AM
		
WOW  Jeff   thanks for  such powerfully  kind words,   I know  I will miss  
you and all
the fine folks  here  at  Enron.  Fix  California, please, for me  (and you)  
as  stockholders.. OK??
Best  regards  Margaret Carson

Could be a move to create some negotiating leverage to persuade suppliers to 
take a haircut on the utilities undercollection.
	Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
	03/14/2001 10:32 AM
		 
Senator Burton and Senator Joe Dunn will "Make an announcement regarding 
potential manipulation in the wholesale energy market" today at 11am in room 
1190 at the state capitol." (See article below for details).

We will keep you posted.

Thanks,
Jean

-- 
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

State Senate panel will probe power pricing 

March 14, 2001

By KIMBERLY KINDY
The Orange County Register 

SACRAMENTO A newly formed Senate committee will investigate whether power 
producers manipulated the electricity market and overcharged the state for 
energy.

State Sen. Joe Dunn, D-Santa Ana, will chair the committee, which will 
immediately request records from the power merchants and next month will 
interview employees in an attempt to determine whether allegations of 
collusion among energy producers are true.

"What has really caused me to push for this investigation is their behavior 
mirrors one another,'' Dunn said. "I don't know how that could occur. They 
seem to be clones of each other."

The power producers said the investigation is a waste of time, that they have 
done nothing to manipulate the marketplace.

"They can look all they want,'' said Gary Ackerman, executive director of the 
Western Power Trading Forum, a trade group representing power merchants. 
"They aren't going to find evidence."

Dunn said hearings will be held to review the documents and to conduct the 
interviews in public. The investigation is expected to be completed within 
two months. 

The aim is to identify problems with the structure of the market that may 
have allowed generators to manipulate prices, and to determine whether there 
was any illegal activity.

In the case of market structure flaws, Dunn said senators would work to make 
necessary changes through legislation or by working with federal regulatory 
officials. Any proof of illegal activity would be forwarded to state Attorney 
General Bill Lockyer, whose office is conducting its own investigation. 

    

I'm having the same problem.  She states on the izio site that that the cases 
are in the reader.  they ain't.  if anyone has them and could fax them to me 
at 415.782.7854, would be greatly appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

Also, I like both ideas--Anil's and Mark's.  I think that we could discuss at 
break and write it up then and turn in at beginning of second half of class.  
I'd lean a bit toward the Amazon suggestion, but could go either way.

	"Mark Guinney" <Mark_Guinney@watsonwyatt.com>
	03/14/2001 07:39 AM
		 
Where did we get the readings for Thursday?  I can't seem to find them 
anywhere.
 Can someone please fax me a copy?  My fax number is (415) 733-4190.

Thanks

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax

____________________Reply Separator____________________
Greetings:

Sounds like I'm glad that I missed the quiz last week.

Hate to be a nag, but we've got to turn in what we're doing for our project
on Thursday.  I propose doing a nice, clean merger, which would allow us to
do both comparative analysis (who are these companies?) and
merger/valuation analysis.  Mark and I talked last night and I pleaded
again not to do strict accounting stuff, but if that's what folks would
like to do, I can certainly suck it up.  Any thoughts?

Best,
Jeff

	Joe Ronan <JoeR@calpine.com>
	03/14/2001 11:02 AM
		 
The Wyden Amendment to the Bankruptcy Bill is being debated on the Senate 
floor as we speak. If it passes,the QF's in California will be severly 
imnpaired ina bankruptcy proceeding. I hope that you have contacted your 
Congressional representatives. Feinstein is fighting this and Boxer has 
suppoted, then opposed it, and may be supporting it again. EPSA and EEI 
opposed the Amendment. Jan--has IEP weighed in yet?

ok wiseguy, what the hell is an npvcd (why do i have the sinking feeling that 
i'll be sorry that i asked?).

what specifically are you referring to?  could you call me?  i'm supposed to 
finalize, like now.  thanks.

Shoulda known.  Congratulations.  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

	Linda Robertson
	03/14/2001 11:54 AM
		
In concert with others, the Enron legislative team participated in defeating 
the Wyden Amendment.  It was tabled 67-30.   very good outcome.  

	Jeff Dasovich
	Sent by: Jeff Dasovich
	03/14/2001 12:11 PM
		 
	Joe Ronan <JoeR@calpine.com>
	03/14/2001 11:02 AM
		 
The Wyden Amendment to the Bankruptcy Bill is being debated on the Senate 
floor as we speak. If it passes,the QF's in California will be severly 
imnpaired ina bankruptcy proceeding. I hope that you have contacted your 
Congressional representatives. Feinstein is fighting this and Boxer has 
suppoted, then opposed it, and may be supporting it again. EPSA and EEI 
opposed the Amendment. Jan--has IEP weighed in yet?

Kirsten:  I've made two small changes.  
Moved the last sentence in paragraph 5 to the second sentence in paragraph 
6.  I think it makes more sense there.
I've modified the last sentence in paragraph 10 to be what I think is a more 
accurate statement.  It now reads:
"It could instead prohibit further direct access arrangements as of the 
issuance of the order, when and if that occurs, or as of some other 
unspecified date in the future. "

Let me know if you're comfortable with these changes and I'll print out the 
last page, sign and fax to your SF office.

Best,
Jeff

Appears that PG&E has joined the "refund" chorus.

	Miyung Buster@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	09/25/2000 02:31 PM
		 
PG&E Calls For Price Cap To Be Reduced Below $250 MWh
  
09/25/2000 
Dow Jones Energy Service 
(Copyright (c) 2000, Dow Jones & Company, Inc.) 
LOS ANGELES -(Dow Jones)- Pacific Gas & Electric Co. has asked federal 
regulators to lower the wholesale power price cap at the state's Independent 
System Operator real-time market and lift a state-mandated rate freeze so it 
can charge its customers market-based rates for electricity, according to 
documents obtained by Dow Jones Newswires. 
The PG&E Corp. unit filed documents with the Federal Energy Regulatory 
Commission Friday saying the wholesale price of power it pays and what it 
charges consumers has forced the company into a $2.2 million debt. 
In addition, the utility says independent energy companies are charging 
"unfair" prices for electricity and that they should refund some money to 
customers to ease the "shock" its 4.5 million customers will feel when the 
rate-freeze is lifted. 
The company wants FERC to cap wholesale electricity prices at the ISO's 
"immediately," at a price lower than $250 per megawatt-hour. 
The rate-freeze, which protected consumers as the state moved to electricity 
competition, is scheduled to end in March 2002, but the company has 
petitioned state regulators to lift the rate-freeze sooner so it can avoid 
further debt. 
Gov. Gray Davis and the state's Public Utilities Commission said last week 
they do not support such a measure and that it would likely not happen before 
2002. 
   -By Jason Leopold; Dow Jones Newswires; 323-658-3874;
jason.leopold@dowjones.com

thanks.  did she hand out the second reader last thursday?

FYI.  As part of our defense against the UC/CSU suit, I've been asked to 
provide a declaration.  The gist of the declaration is that the future of 
Direct Access in California is very uncertain.

Best,
Jeff
	"Kristen Bird" <kb@quinnemanuel.com>
	03/14/2001 12:41 PM
		 
This is the final for your signature.

 - Dasovich.

FYI.  In a letter to the California Legislature, the independent California 
Legislative Analyst is predicting significant shortages for this summer in 
excess of those predicted by the governor and the Cal Energy Commission.

FYI.
	"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
	03/14/2001 02:46 PM
	Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
		 
Attached are amendments to AB 60x which IEP is presenting today at a 2:30
meeting with Assembly Speaker Bob Hertzberg.  As a follow-up to the meeting,
IEP member company lobbyists will join me on a conference call at 3:45 today
to discuss strategy on "shopping" this language to the Assembly
Appropriations Committee members.  You are welcome to join in on that
conference call.

Dial In Number     (800) 891-9585
Participant Code   756453

-- Julee

> Here it is as we discussed.
>
> Bullets on the amendments:
>
> 1) Amendments are intended to help load serving entities secure contract
for
> power for California loads from California resources without unnecessarily
> delaying or disrupting the development of projects within California.
> 2) It is necessary to remove vague and ambiguous language from the bill
that
> could disrupt current or new projects or undermine commercial arrangements
> already in place. Specifically, the language that calls for comparisons of
> offers is particularly difficult to implement and will It is necessary to
> remove language
>
> Andy Brown
> Ellison, Schneider & Harris

My comments on Bob's memo.

Best,
Jeff

	Vicki Sharp@EES
	03/14/2001 02:05 PM
		 
would like your comments
Please review the attached if you have time and let me have any comments.  
Thanks.

Visionary's one thing, but, oy, the talent.  Talk about the talent!

oops, no attachment.

thanks very much, counselor, for you advice on the (stinking) declaration.  I 
modified that last sentence to be much more general (and, arguably, 
accurate).  much appreciated.

Best,
Jeff

I'd wait until, for example, Ginger and Maureen say they're happy and all the 
bugs have been worked out--my productivity has dropped by about 99%.  I'll do 
some minor strike-out-underline and some minor suggestions and send back by 5 
pm California time. 

=09Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
=0903/14/2001 03:44 PM
=09=09=20

As you know, ?Senator Burton held a press conference announcing Joe Dunn=20
chair of new senate committee to investigate energy market manipulation in=
=20
the wholesale energy market. ?Other members serving on the committee includ=
e:=20
?Debra Bowen, Martha Escutia, Maurice Johannessen, Sheila Kuehl, Bill Morro=
w=20
and Byron Sher.=20

The Committee's information gathering activities will begin immediately, an=
d=20
the first hearing of the committee is planned for the first week in April.=
=20
(press release attached)

IEP responded with the following statement, and Jan responded to TV, Radio=
=20
and Print media immediately following the news conference at the state=20
capitol.

Thanks,
Jean

--=20
Jean Munoz
McNally Temple Associates, Inc.
916-447-8186
916-447-6326 (fx)

=20

Statement by Jan Smutny-Jones,
Executive Director of Independent Energy Producers,=20
in Response to State Senate Energy Probe
=20

"We understand that it is the responsibility of the legislature to ensure=
=20
that California ratepayers are protected =01. and we will fully cooperate, =
as we=20
have with other investigations, because we have nothing to hide.

"We believe this investigation will find nothing except that power producer=
s=20
have been working around-the-clock to help keep the lights on in California=
.=20
?In fact, there have already been several investigations by the Federal=20
Energy Regulatory Commission the Public Utilities Commission and the=20
California Independent System Operator =01. and they have found no evidence=
 of=20
withholding or wrong doing.

"As we have continued to state: the industry does not condone business=20
practices that lead to unreasonable prices. ?It is our objective to help=20
create a stable regulatory environment in which robust retail markets can=
=20
flourish to protect ratepayers.

"This crisis can only be resolved if we all work together to find solutions=
=20
and stop pointing fingers, which only creates an unstable political and=20
regulatory environment which will do nothing to increase supply or reduce=
=20
demand in California.

"If this turns into, in fact, a =01@witch-hunt? against generators who have=
 been=20
providing electricity to California for months despite being owed billions =
of=20
dollars, my only question is who in their right mind would come to Californ=
ia=20
and invest in building new power plants? ?This sends a dangerous and chilli=
ng=20
signal to not only power providers, but anyone doing business or planning t=
o=20
do business in California."
=20

# ????????# ???????#
=20

 - Burton Press Release

thanks.  no problem.

	"Daniel Douglass" <Douglass@ArterHadden.com>
	03/14/2001 04:54 PM
		 
ALJ Michelle Cooke has just issued the attached ruling in the SRAC  
proceeding which requests that DWR provide the following information:

1. The total number of megawatt-hours that DWR has contracted for on  behalf 
of California utility ratepayers;
?
2. The total dollar cost of those contracts.
?
The information has to be provided in a sworn declaration by March  19.? 
Nothing is said about confidentiality, but is reasonable to expect  that DWR 
may seek to provide the information solely to the Commission, rather  than to 
all market participants.
?
Dan
 - CPUC01-#92379-v1-R9911022_Cooke_Ruling__.doc

We can discuss and decide over the break.

Best,
Jeff

	"Mark Guinney" <Mark_Guinney@watsonwyatt.com>
	03/14/2001 09:35 AM
		 
Anil,

Questions for you:  Is Zircom in an easily definable industry so we can make
comparable studies and valuations?  Is their much public history of the firm? 
Will such an acquisition have a significant influence on Intel's earnings (my
guess is no since Zircom's latest annual revenue was only $500 million versus
Intel's $20+ billion revenue)?  Can we make reasonable future estimates of
Zircom's financial statements and business lines?

I, for one, have little knowledge or confidence in myself of analyzing a tech
company.  Given the fact that Anil is the only person in the industry from our
group we would be heavily reliant on him to give us strategic insight on the
companies and their businesses.  My preference- an industry that is relatively
more stable and simple for all of us to understand.  While we don't have to do
Amazon specifically, I would like an industry or company that won't require an
immersion of readings just to understand the product, sales distribution,
clients, distributors, etc.  Remember, we have to make guestimates about the
future of the industry and predict sales, costs, etc.  The nice thing about
Amazon (or a similar company) is that it is merely an Internet twist on an
industry with a very long history and an easy to understand business model. 
Webvan could be another example.

Another idea:  Trying to value Fidelity Investments- a private company.  The
nice thing about this exercise is that there is a lot of data on comparable
companies (T. Rowe Price, Zurich Scudder, Franklin Templeton) and some public
information on Fidelity.  A good portion of our valuation would be based on
assumptions which means that as long as we can support our assumptions we 
can't
be wrong.  

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax

____________________Reply Separator____________________
My vote is for analyzing the Intel purchase because we have access to some
inside info, Anil is well versed in this industry (I assume) so we could do
some good comps analysis and it seems like the right size case for us.  We
could easily send Sarah the link Anil sent us and say that we are going to
analyze this acquisition.  I am also open to the Amazon analysis, although I
am not as excited about analyzing such a popular issue.

Carolyn M. Vavrek
Manager - Human Capital Advisory Services
Deloitte & Touche
50 Fremont Street
San Francisco, CA  94105

phone: 415-783-5137
fax: 415-783-8760
e-mail: cvavrek@deloitte.com

I was just brainstorming on potential projects.  I thought that an
interesting
and fairly relevant topic could be a current evaluation of Amazon.com and
how
the projected revenues & profits relate to the current stock price.  We
could
also provide some historical perspective on all realistic Amazon's stock
price
was a year or two ago relative to a discounted cash flow.  I can fairly
easily
get my hands on some Wall Street analyst research reports that could provide
us
with some insights and hints as to what Wall Street is expecting.  Most of
our
time can be spent creating a discounted cash flow model similar to what we
have
been doing in class.  Since the jury is still out on Amazon's business
model, I
think it would make for some interesting debate in class when we present our
model.

**********************************************
Mark D. Guinney, CFA
Consultant
Watson Wyatt Investment Consulting
345 California Street, Ste. 1400
San Francisco, CA  94104
(415) 733-4487 ph.
(415) 733-4190 fax

This message (including any attachments) contains confidential information
intended for a specific individual and purpose, and is protected by law.  If
you are not the intended recipient, you should delete this message and are
hereby notified that any disclosure, copying, or distribution of this
message, or the taking of any action based on it, is strictly prohibited.

Vicki:
I'll assume that for the meeting tomorrow, you folks will call me at my 
office number--415.782.7822.

Best,
Jeff

=09Jean Munoz <jmunoz@mcnallytemple.com>
=0903/14/2001 05:49 PM
=09=09=20
Following is the latest IEP news =01. including an Associated Press story t=
hat=20
quotes Jan's response to the State Senate Investigation announced earlier=
=20
today.

Thanks,
Jean

______________________________________
March 14, 2001, Wednesday, BC cycle
5:10 PM Eastern Time

SECTION: State and Regional

LENGTH: 941 words

HEADLINE: California lawmakers probe energy markets for manipulation

BYLINE: By JENNIFER COLEMAN, Associated Press Writer

DATELINE: SACRAMENTO, Calif.

BODY:

  State lawmakers announced Wednesday they will investigate whether energy
wholesalers manipulated California's power and natural gas markets to drive=
 up
prices, a probe they say could lead to action by the state attorney general=
.

  Meanwhile, federal regulators said they will make several changes in
oversight to expand the West's power supply, including speeding approval of
natural gas pipeline projects and letting major power users who cut=20
consumption
resell the electricity they save.

  In California, Senate leader John Burton announced creation of a committe=
e=20
to
investigate the state's volatile electricity market. A similar Assembly pan=
el
has been formed to look into natural gas prices. Both expect to begin heari=
ngs
next month.

  The state has been struggling with a tight electricity supply since summe=
r
due in part to high natural gas prices and power plant outages for schedule=
d=20
and
unplanned maintenance.

  Burton said he suspected electricity wholesalers shut down plants to crea=
te
an artificial shortage and boost prices. If lawmakers find evidence of that=
,
they will turn it over to the state attorney general for action, which coul=
d
include prosecution and court action to seek refunds.

  "Clearly, early evidence suggests that there has been market manipulation=
 by
the power generators which led to rolling blackouts and then higher=20
electricity
prices," said Burton, D-San Francisco, referring to outages that hit Northe=
rn
Californians twice in January.

  California saw a modest 4 percent increase in demand in one year, while
wholesale power prices in that time rose 328 percent, he said.

  Committee Chairman Joe Dunn said the panel will ask energy wholesale
executives to testify, and issuing subpoenaes if necessary. Duke, Dynegy,=
=20
Mirant
and Reliant will be among major providers included, he said.

  Jan Smutny-Jones, executive director of the Independent Energy Producers=
=20
industry group, said wholesalers will cooperate, but warned that if it=20
becomes a
"witch hunt" it could discourage them from building plants in California.

  "We believe this investigation will find nothing except that power produc=
ers
have been working around the clock to keep the lights on in California," he=
=20
said
in a written statement.

  Burton said the investigation could affect any rescue deal Gov. Gray Davi=
s=20
crafts with the state's two largest utilities, Pacific Gas and Electric and
Southern California Edison.

  Davis is negotiating the state purchase of transmission lines owned by
Edison, PG&E and a third investor-owned utility, San Diego Gas & Electric, =
to
help Edison and PG&E pay their wholesale power bills.

  Lawmakers need to know how much of the money owed to the wholesalers "is
reasonable and how much of it was basically gaming the system," Burton said=
.

  The power generators blame the high prices on poor planning by California=
=20
lawmakers who voted to deregulate the state's electricity market in 1996.

  That law prevents PG&E and Edison from passing on high wholesale prices t=
o
their customers. The utilities say they are nearly $14 billion in debt and =
on
the brink of bankruptcy due to wholesale power prices that have soared sinc=
e
June, in part because of rising natural gas prices.

  Wholesalers have cut off their credit, leading the state to buy power for
them. California has committed $3.7 billion in tax money to such purchases=
=20
since
early January and plans to recoup it from utility customers over several=20
years.

  The California Independent System Operator, which oversees the state's po=
wer
grid, says generators imposed "unjust and unreasonable" charges totaling $5=
55
million during December and January.

  The Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, a strong supporter of=20
deregulation,
last week found that wholesalers have been overcharging for California=20
electricity, ordering 13 companies to refund $69 million. It gave the=20
companies
until March 23 to appeal.

  Attorneys general in California, Washington and Oregon are pursuing simil=
ar
investigations. U.S. Rep. Anna Eshoo, D-Calif., has asked the Justice=20
Department
and Federal Trade Commission to launch inquiries.

  Sen. Bill Morrow, R-Oceanside, said he wasn't "overly impressed with
investigative efforts so far on the federal level with FERC and others in=
=20
their
willingness to actually turn over the stones."

  Tom Williams, spokesman for North Carolina-based Duke Energy, expressed
annoyance at the news of a Senate probe.

  "It is wearing thin," said Williams, noting that Duke already has been
subjected to federal investigations and has testified twice before the stat=
e's
legislative energy committee, with no findings of wrongdoing.

  The Assembly committee is investigating natural gas pipeline capacity and
reserves. That committee plans to call gas company executives and FERC
representatives to testify.

  Because natural gas is largely regulated by the federal government,=20
lawmakers
are trying to determine whether they have authority to investigate market
manipulation, said Assemblyman Fred Keeley, D-Boulder Creek.

  In Washington, FERC said it would overhaul its regulation of the Western
energy market to increase supply. Changes include:

  - Letting large commercial power users sell power they save at a wholesal=
e
rate to be set by the commission.

  - Reallocating FERC staff to work on applications for natural gas pipelin=
e
and hydroelectric projects.

  - Urging hydroelectric plant operators to examine how they can more fully=
=20
use
their available water resources by adding or upgrading turbines or making=
=20
other
improvements.

  On the Net:

  California ISO: www.caiso.com

  FERC: www.ferc.fed.us

GRAPHIC: AP Photos SC101-102

LOAD-DATE: March 14, 2001

                              10 of 28 DOCUMENTS

                   The Associated Press State & Local Wire

The materials in the AP file were compiled by The Associated Press.  These
materials may not be republished without the express written consent of The
Associated Press.

                     March 14, 2001, Wednesday, BC cycle

                             4:13 PM Eastern Time

SECTION: State and Regional

LENGTH: 203 words

HEADLINE: Senate rejects utility bankruptcy bill

BYLINE: By MARCY GORDON, AP Business Writer

DATELINE: WASHINGTON

BODY:

  A proposal that would have required California's financially troubled
utilities to pay their power bills even if they file for bankruptcy protect=
ion
was rejected Wednesday by the Senate.

  Senaourt to avoid their debts," Wyden said.

  The proposal had brought objections from Sen. Dianne Feinstein, D-Calif.,=
=20
who
said it would put the Senate in the inappropriate position of deciding the
"pecking order" of creditors in a bankruptcy proceeding.

  California's two biggest utilities, Southern California Edison and Pacifi=
c
Gas and Electric, say they've been pushed to the brink of bankruptcy by mor=
e
than $13 billion in high wholesale power costs that state law has barred th=
em
from recouping from consumers.

  Both were denied credit by electricity wholesalers earlier this year. To=
=20
keep
the lights on for their customers, the state in early January began spendin=
g
billions to buy power on their behalf.

  Meanwhile, Gov. Gray Davis is negotiating with Edison, PG&E and the state=
's
third investor-owned utility, San Diego Gas & Electric Co., to purchase the=
ir
transmission lines.

  The governor says the state acquisition would give the utilities a
much-needed influx of cash and help them pay their debts.

LOAD-DATE: March 14, 2001

                              12 of 28 DOCUMENTS

                   The Associated Press State & Local Wire

The materials in the AP file were compiled by The Associated Press.  These
materials may not be republished without the express written consent of The
Associated Press.

                     March 14, 2001, Wednesday, BC cycle

                             2:37 PM Eastern Time

SECTION: State and Regional

LENGTH: 1326 words

HEADLINE: California's electricity crisis at-a-glance

BYLINE: By The Associated Press

BODY:

  Here is a look at developments in California's electricity crisis:

  WEDNESDAY:

  - Sens. John Burton and Joe Dunn announce a Senate committee will=20
investigate
whether power generators illegally manipulated California's electricity mar=
ket
to drive up prices over the past year. If the panel finds wrongdoing, the=
=20
state
attorney general should sue for refunds, Burton said.

  The committee will ask wholesalers' executives to testify, and subpoena t=
hem
if they refuse, said Burton, D-San Francisco, the Senate leader.

  - A legislative aide says the Senate panel is considering issuing subpoen=
aes
for wholesaler documents on the California market and asking the companies'
executives to testify.

  - Duke Energy spokesman Tom Williams expresses annoyance at the news of a
Senate probe, saying there have already been several investigations and no
finding of wrongdoing.

  - Assemblyman Fred Keeley says the Assembly has formed a committee to loo=
k
into natural gas issues. Because natural gas is largely regulated by the=20
federal
government, lawmakers are trying to figure out whether they have the author=
ity
to investigate whether supply and prices were manipulated.

  - Gov. Gray Davis' administration continues negotiations with Edison, PG&=
E
and San Diego Gas & Electric over the governor's plan to buy their=20
transmission
lines to help Edison and PG&E pay their debts.

  - The state remained free of power alerts as power reserves stayed at=20
healthy
levels.

  - Assembly members Fred Keeley and Hannah-Beth Jackson and environmental
groups plan a news conference to urge approval of energy conservation and
renewable energy proposals.

  TUESDAY:

  - Davis issues an executive order promising 20 percent rebates to Souther=
n
California Edison, Pacific Gas and Electric Co. and San Diego utility=20
customers
who cut power use 20 percent this summer.

  - Legislative Analyst Elizabeth Hill's office says Davis is underestimati=
ng
California's summer electricity shortage. The state faces a shortfall of 3,=
900
to 7,100 megawatts during daily periods of peak demand, the report says. On=
e
megawatt is enough for about 1,000 homes.

  Using flawed state Energy Commission numbers, the governor is overestimat=
ing
how much new electricity generation will be online this summer, especially=
=20
early
in the season, and overestimates savings from conservation, the report says=
.

  - The state Senate plans to form a special committee to investigate wheth=
er
power generators illegally manipulated California's electricity market to=
=20
drive
up prices. The suppliers vehemently deny such allegations.

  - Citing skyrocketing energy costs, particularly in the West, President B=
ush
backs off a campaign pledge and tells Congress he will not regulate carbon
dioxide emissions from power plants. The decision comes after heavy lobbyin=
g
from the coal industry and is a blow to conservationists who see curbing
emissions of such "greenhouse gases" as key to reducing global warming.

  - State Controller Kathleen Connell says legal issues prevent her from
releasing records on state power purchases sought under the state open reco=
rds
law by The Associated Press and several other news organizations. Connell s=
ays
she is awaiting an opinion by Attorney General Bill Lockyer on whether she =
can
release the information. Davis opposes releasing it.

  - Secretary of State Bill Jones calls for an audit of the state's energy
spending, saying the secrecy around the contracts for power purchases has l=
ed=20
to
a lack of oversight and accountability.

  - Proposals for two new power plants that could be running by summer have
been received by the California Energy Commission. The plants, which togeth=
er
will produce 225 megawatts, will be fast-tracked through the application=20
process
to help meet higher electricity demands this summer. That's roughly enough=
=20
power
for 225,000 homes.

  - Officials say guidelines expected Wednesday on whether Edison, PG&E or
their customers will begin paying off the $3.7 billion in taxpayer money
committed to buying power on their behalf will likely be delayed.

  - No power alerts are declared, as operators of the state grid continue t=
o
find enough electricity to meet demand.

  - Eight California counties expect to lose $11.1 million in property taxe=
s=20
in
the next five months because the five energy producers who owe the money sa=
y
they are due even more from Southern California Edison. Some school distric=
ts=20
in
those counties - Imperial, San Joaquin, Riverside, Alameda, Contra Costa,=
=20
Inyo,
Kern and San Bernardino - say the defaults could hurt their ability to fina=
nce
expansions or repairs.

  - Utah Gov. Mike Leavitt meets with Los Angeles city officials to discuss
expanding a coal-fired power station in Utah to send electricity to Souther=
n
California.=20

  - The United Farmworkers Union holds a protest in Blythe, a desert commun=
ity
near the Arizona border, to protest a proposed power plant opponents conten=
d
would pollute the air farmworkers breathe.

  - U.S. Rep. Anna Eshoo, a Palo Alto Democrat, asks U.S. Attorney General=
=20
John
Ashcroft to investigate whether electricity wholesalers engaged in unlawful
trade practices to drive prices higher.

  - A 510-megawatt power plant in western San Diego County moved a step clo=
ser
to final approval. The Otay Mesa generating project won approval from the
California Energy Commission's siting committee. The public 30 days to comm=
ent
on the plan.

  - Edison International stock falls 47 cents a share to close at $14.88;
Pacific Gas and Electric Corp. stock closes at $14.24, dropping 28 cents a
share.

  WHAT'S NEXT:

  - The Legislature considers dozens of bills to encourage energy=20
conservation,
increase alternative power and streamline power plant siting.

  - The California Public Utility Commission meets Thursday to consider=20
whether
to bar PG&E and Edison from laying off about 3,000 workers. The utilities s=
ay=20
it
could help them cut costs and ease their $14 billion debt. A PUC=20
administrative
law judge says the layoffs could cause response times to customer outages t=
o
suffer.

  The PUC will also discuss restructuring the interruptible customer progra=
m.
The program gives big electricity users a discounted rate in return for=20
shutting
down their power when the state is short of electricity. After January's=20
rolling
blackouts, the PUC froze the program and said PG&E and Edison could no long=
er
fine interruptible customers for not complying.

  - An order from Davis requiring businesses to substantially reduce outdoo=
r
lighting after business hours takes effect Thursday. Businesses that fail t=
o
comply face a potential fine of $1,000 a day.

  - Attorneys for three generators and the ISO return to federal court Marc=
h
19, when a judge is expected to decide whether power suppliers can be force=
d=20
to
sell to the grid.

  - Generators have until March 23 to appeal an order by federal regulators=
 to
refund $69 million in January power charges. The Federal Energy Regulatory
Commission required suppliers to justify prices exceeding $150 per megawatt
hour. It determined last week that some sales were priced too high, even=20
taking
into account high natural gas prices, air quality control costs and plant
maintenance.

  THE PROBLEM:

  - High demand, high wholesale energy costs, transmission bottlenecks and =
a
tight supply worsened by scarce hydroelectric power in the Northwest and
maintenance at aging California power plants are all factors in California'=
s=20
electricity crisis.

  Edison and PG&E say they've lost $13.7 billion since June to high wholesa=
le
prices that the state's electricity deregulation law bars them from passing=
=20
onto
ratepayers, and are close to bankruptcy.

  Electricity and natural gas suppliers, scared off by the two companies' p=
oor
credit ratings, are refusing to sell to them, leading the state to start=20
buying
power for the utilities' nearly 9 million residential and business customer=
s.

LOAD-DATE: March 14, 2001

Steve:
Jim mentioned that Ken Lay was trying to talk to Glynn today about getting 
the PX credit issue resolved.  Any progress made?

Best,
Jeff

=09"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
=0903/14/2001 07:03 PM
=09Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
=09=09=20

Summary of today=01,s emergency IEP member company lobbyist conference call=
:

Discussion re: AB 60x (Hertzberg)

- Edson + Modisette will seek final approval from IEP member companies on
amendments to AB 60x by Thursday morning (attached)

- E+M will distribute the approved language to IEP members and lobbyists,
and IEP will present them to the Speaker=01,s office in the morning (a
scheduled meeting with Rick Simpson is still pending).

- All available IEP member company lobbyists will make contact with the
Speaker=01,s office urging the Speaker=01,s support for the IEP amendments.

- E+M will hold the regularly scheduled lobbyist conference call on Thursda=
y
at 2pm (call-in info below) to discuss the status of the meeting and the
amendments (i.e., either they are workable or not, and if so, timeframe on
when and where changes can be made, and action agenda for lobbyists).

Discussion re: AB 8x (Migden)

- E+M  provided a status report on IEP=01,s proposed amendments to AB 8x
(attached).  The author has committed to meeting with IEP on these
amendments.  Despite all efforts, this has not happened to date.

- All available IEP member company lobbyists will make contact with Assembl=
y
Member Migden=01,s office to support such a meeting taking place because IE=
P
would like to make this bill work.

IEP member company lobbyist conference call info:
(800) 403-2013
code: 207814.

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - ab60x.iep amendments.doc
 - ab08x.IEP comments.doc

See update on SBX47, below.
	Scott Govenar <sgovenar@govadv.com>
	03/14/2001 07:36 PM
		 
Per Senator Battin, he may ask for a vote on Tuesday for SBX 47 even
though he doesn't have the votes.  Senator Bowen has been dragging her
heels and he's tired of waiting, especially because he sees little if
any hope for the bill at this point.  With the exception of the wind
folks trying to cut a separate deal, this leaves the QF issue wide open
in the Legislature.

Regarding SBX 27, WSPA just met with Senator Bowen's staff and came away
from the meeting with the distinct impression that Bowen has no
intention of moving this anytime soon unless the bond council who she's
consulting signs off.

Oh great, he gets married, but his kids die from pollution.

FYI.
	Vicki Sharp@EES
	03/14/2001 03:03 PM
		 
Attached is a summary of the Enron's motion in opposition to  UC/CSU's motion 
for an expedited hearing schedule.  The documents will be filed later today 
and circulated to the working group.  Once this filing is made we will turn 
our efforts to preparing our answer to their complaint, and continue 
developing our strategy on the counterclaim. 

Thanks to Bob Williams, Mike Smith,  Evan Hughes,  Jeff Dasovich, Dennis 
Benevides, Peggy Mahoney,and Tom Riley for their efforts in this matter. 

That's the right story.  Only thing I'd be prepared for is the following, 
"OK, Mr. Belden, California's stupid, they did it wrong, and your company 
told them so right at the outset.  Does that give you the right to rob 
California's consumers and businesses blind?"  

Regarding the story with Peace quoted saying "we exported our stranded costs 
out of state."  I recall seeing that story on several occasions.  Karen, do 
we have someone who can do a search (lexis/nexis) and find those articles?  
Shouldn't be too tough.

Best,
Jeff

	Tim Belden@ECT
	03/14/2001 07:47 PM
		 
I am giving a speech in Santa Fe in a couple of weeks.  One of the points 
that I want to make is that California set up the rules, made a strategic bet 
to go short, decided to buy all of their power on the spot market, and is now 
crying that their massive bet didn't work.  I remember reading an article in 
the San Diego Tribune from sometime in 1998 or 1999 with a quote from Steve 
Peace.  Peace talked about how the state of California ripped off a bunch of 
dumb out of state generators and wisely solved their stranded cost problem.  
Does anybody remember this article?  Does anybody have this article?  Is 
there a service that we can use to find it if we don't have it?  Let me know.

you better be at home and not in the office.  you are very smooth.  to wit, 
"tim you could get some pointed questions....."  
god bless you.

Best,
Jeff

	"Ronald Carroll" <rcarroll@bracepatt.com>
	03/15/2001 08:40 AM
		 
DJ Calif Utils,State Not Close To Pwr Lines Sales Deal -Exec 
Copyright , 2001 Dow Jones & Company, Inc. 

LOS ANGELES (Dow Jones)--California doesn't appear to be close to reaching a 
deal to buy the power lines owned by the state's three investor-owned 
utilities and restore the companies to financial stability, a utility 
executive told Dow Jones Newswires Wednesday.
 
     Gov. Gray Davis said this week that progress was being made and a final 
agreement between the state and PG&E Corp. (PCG) unit Pacific Gas & Electric, 
Edison International (EIX) unit Southern California Edison and Sempra Energy 
(SRE) unit San Diego Gas & Electric could be reached in either "days or 
weeks." 

     But the tone in Davis's office when asked about the negotiations has 
changed. 

     "The governor realizes it's in everyone's interest to resolve this as 
quickly as possible, but only if we get a good deal for California 
ratepayers, not at the expense of California ratepayers," said Steve 
Maviglio, the governor's press secretary. 

     A senior executive with Edison International, which has already reached 
an agreement in principle with Davis to sell the state its power lines for 
$2.76 billion, said Wednesday the company is "not getting much reaction from 
the state on a final agreement and there is a growing concern that time is 
running out." 

     "Obviously I don't think the status quo can go on much longer," the 
executive said. "The urgency rests with the governor's office. The ball is in 
his court." 

     The executive wouldn't say what is delaying a final resolution. 

     The Davis plan, introduced last month, would have the state buy the 
power lines owned by the utilities for about $7.5 billion and allow the 
utilities to issue bonds to restructure any remaining debt. 

     Maviglio wouldn't elaborate on the negotiations, but an aide to Davis 
who is familiar with the negotiations said the talks between PG&E have fallen 
through. 

     "They've completely broke down," the aide said. "The (Davis 
administration) hasn't negotiated with PG&E for about a week." 

     A PG&E spokesman wouldn't comment on the negotiations. 

     -By Jason Leopold, Dow Jones Newswires; 323-658-3874; 
mailto:jason.leopold@dowjones.com 

     (END) Dow Jones Newswires 15-03-01 
          

      DJ Calif Utils -2: Calif Gov: Talks Continue, Progress Made 

     The Davis administration said on the record that negotiations continue 
and they are meeting with all three utilities and continue to make progress, 
said Steve Maviglio, press secretary to Governor Davis. 

     (END) Dow Jones Newswires 15-03-01 

FYI.
	Mike D Smith@EES
	03/15/2001 09:13 AM
		 
Attached you will find the brief we filed yesterday in the UC-CSU matter and 
the declarations of several Enron people and an expert supporting our 
positions.  The filing yesterday was only to oppose the universities' request 
to shorten the briefing and hearing schedule on their motion for a 
preliminary injunction.  Next step will be to file our opposition to the 
motion for preliminary injunction, and the date for filing those documents 
will be set by the court.  Please let us know if you have any questions.

Hi Katie:
Thought IEP folks might be interested.
Best,
Jeff

Wednesday March 14, 12:22 pm Eastern Time

US Senate rejects California utility bankruptcy measure
By Patrick Connole

WASHINGTON, March 14 (Reuters) - The U.S. Senate on Wednesday rejected a bid 
to force California utility companies to repay power generators for 
electricity they bought under a federal government sales order, even if 
utilities go bankrupt.

In a motion on the Senate floor, lawmakers killed an amendment to a broader 
bankruptcy reform bill that opponents said was a dangerous proposal that 
would have opened the door to involuntary bankruptcy filings by troubled 
California utilities. The utilities in question are PG&E Corp.'s (NYSE:PCG - 
news) Pacific Gas & Electric and Edison International's (NYSE:EIX - news) 
Southern California Edison.

The amendment was sponsored by Oregon Democrat Sen. Ron Wyden, Montana 
Democrat Sen. Max Baucus and Oregon Republican Sen. Gordon Smith.

Proponents said the measure would have protected the customers of the 
federally-owned Bonneville Power Administration and other Northwest utilities 
from unfair rate increases due to the California energy crisis.

``I don't think it's fair for consumers in other Western states to get caught 
holding the bag if California utilities take our power and then run into 
bankruptcy court to avoid their debts,'' Wyden said.

``The Northwest has been more than a good neighbor to California during this 
crisis,'' he said.

Interestingly, the California Senate delegation was split on the matter. 
Democrat Dianne Feinstein opposed the amendment, while fellow Democrat 
Barbara Boxer supported it.

Feinstein called the proposal a ``dangerous amendment'' that would create two 
classes of creditors and ``probably force an involuntary bankruptcy.''

The broader bankruptcy reform bill is expected to be approved by the Senate 
by the end of the week.

Separately, talks between California and its three investor owned utilities 
on a deal under which the state might buy their transmission assets continued 
this week with no deal in sight.

The state is negotiating with PG&E and Edison, along with Sempra Energy 
(NYSE:SRE - news) unit San Diego Gas and Electric.

The deals are aimed mainly at pumping money into PG&E and SoCal Edison to 
keep them out of bankruptcy after they recorded about $13 billion in red ink 
since last spring, paying sky-high prices for power in the wholesale market.

PG&E and SoCal Edison, under the terms of the state's disastrous experiment 
with market deregulation, have been able to pass on to their retail customers 
only a fraction of their power purchase costs. 

thanks.  it's too complicated for such a simple mind.  i'm gonna take a 
pass.  how's things?

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	03/15/2001 10:40 AM
		 
get your picks in for the first round by 9:30 our time 
Nancy 
(707) 251-4870 (phone) 
(707) 265-5446 (fax) 
"Plus je bois, mieux je chante" 

Jennifer:
I'm on a call with Delainey that just got convened, which means that I might 
be delayed till 11:45.  Unfortunately, Harry's on vacation.  I'll call in 
just as soon as I get done with Delainey.  Also, I was on a call with Eric 
yesterday, during which I went over the S.D. legislation, so he should be 
fairly up to speed.  I'll get on just as soon as I can.

Best,
Jeff

	Jennifer Rudolph@EES
	03/15/2001 10:51 AM
		 
	Enron Energy Services
	

Energy Insight Editor <EI_editor@FTENERGY.COM> on 03/15/2001 09:28:21 AM
Please respond to dmenk@FTENERGY.COM

	
Energy Insight for Thursday, March 15, 2001

In Energy Insight Today (Blue Banner, all subscribers)
Industry experts speaking at a teleconference addressing the California
energy crisis said the situation was scaring many states away from
deregulation, but if done right, deregulation could succeed. Find out more
about it at http://www.einsight.com. Also, read the latest news headlines
from Energy Insight Today.

In Energy Insight 2001 (Red Banner, premium-pay access only)
Read the latest news headlines from Fuels, Energy Services and Utility
Telecom & Diversification.
/ / / / / / / / / / / /
Market Brief    Wednesday, March 14
Stocks  Close   Change  % Change
DJIA    9,973.46        (317.3) -3.08%
DJ 15 Util.     366.30  (7.3)   -1.96%
NASDAQ  1,972.10        (42.7)  -2.12%
S&P 500 1,166.58        (31.1)  -2.60%

Market Vols     Close   Change  % Change
AMEX (000)      163,598 22,857.0        16.24%
NASDAQ (000)    2,143,085       38,815.0        1.84%
NYSE (000)      1,374,972       15,909.0        1.17%

Commodities     Close   Change  % Change
Crude Oil (Apr) 26.41   (1.18)  -4.28%
Heating Oil (Apr)       0.7039  (0.03)  -3.44%
Nat. Gas (Henry)        4.911   (0.10)  -1.90%
Palo Verde (Apr)        210     5.00    2.44%
COB (Apr)       284     0.00    0.00%
PJM (Apr)       42      (1.25)  -2.89%

Dollar US $     Close   Change  % Change
Australia $     2.018   0.03    1.61%
Canada $        1.557   0.01    0.91%
Germany Dmark   2.148   0.01    0.42%
Euro    0.9107  (0.00)  -0.36%
Japan _en     121.00  1.10    0.92%
Mexico NP       9.57    (0.01)  -0.10%
UK Pound        0.6906  0.00    0.03%

Foreign Indices Close   Change  % Change
Arg MerVal      449.60  (14.32) -3.09%
Austr All Ord.  3,211.00        (3.10)  -0.10%
Braz Bovespa    15244.9 -339.24 -2.18%
Can TSE 300     7806.9  -152.56 -1.92%
Germany DAX     5794.12 -168.81 -2.83%
HK HangSeng     13330.84        -162.19 -1.20%
Japan Nikkei 225        11843.59        (110.71)        -0.93%
Mexico IPC      5813.84 (178.11)        -2.97%
UK FTSE 100     5,625.90        (94.8)  -1.66%

Source:  Yahoo! & TradingDay.com

////////////////////////////////////////////////////

if i try to think about one more thing, my head will explode.

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	03/15/2001 11:10 AM
		 
what are  you afraid of losing $10!! 
thanks.  it's too complicated for such a simple mind.  i'm gonna take a 
pass.  how's things? 

                                                                              
                       
                    Nancy 
Sellers                                                                    
<PSellers@haas.berkeley.edu>, Prentice Sellers    
                                                   <PSellers@pacbell.net>, 
Scott Laughlin            
                                                   
<scottwl@hotmail.com>                             
                                                   
                       

get your picks in for the first round by 9:30 our time 

Nancy 
(707) 251-4870 (phone) 
(707) 265-5446 (fax) 
"Plus je bois, mieux je chante" 

Worry not.  Hope all is well.  Went to the tapas place ("Cesar") next to Chez 
Panisse.  Have you been there?  Very nice and pretty fun, too.

Best,
Jeff

cute.

	Nancy Sellers <Nancy.Sellers@RobertMondavi.com>
	03/15/2001 11:13 AM
		 
I'd like to see that 
if i try to think about one more thing, my head will explode. 

                                                                              
                       
                    Nancy 
Sellers                                                                    
                       
                                                                              
                       

what are  you afraid of losing $10!! 

thanks.  it's too complicated for such a simple mind.  i'm gonna take a 
pass.  how's things? 

                    Nancy Sellers 
get your picks in for the first round by 9:30 our time 

Nancy 
(707) 251-4870 (phone) 
(707) 265-5446 (fax) 
"Plus je bois, mieux je chante" 

FYI.  There is a great catalogue of the legislation currently pending 
attached as an appendix to the leg analyst report that I distributed 
yesterday.

Best,
Jeff

	Janel Guerrero
	03/15/2001 11:19 AM
		
Everyone, 

Just to clarify Miyung's message, I want Houston to be kept abreast of the 
key pieces of legislation that Sacto is working on, offering amendements etc. 
John Neslage provided us with a list but I want to be sure that it hasn't 
changed at all.  Please review what Miyung sent you and foward to her any 
comments/updates.  

thanks

	Miyung Buster@ENRON_DEVELOPMENT
	03/15/2001 11:10 AM
		 
Janel has asked me to monitor Assembly/Senate bill activities, and I need to 
confirm that I have a complete list of all of the bills that Enron is 
involved with.

Below is the a list of the bills that I am aware of.  Could you review the 
following list and confirm that my list is complete.  Please respond by 
Friday, March 16th.  I would like to begin working on this project as soon as 
possible.

Thank you for your assistance.

ABx1 1
SBx6 
SBx33 
SBx39 
ABx1 60 
SBx1 5 
Abx1 7 
AB 18
SB33
SB6
SB27X
AB33X

Well done.  One other point:  If the PUC rules on the 27th that the rate 
freeze is not going to end retroactively, that should put Ken Lay in a much 
stronger position to negotiate with Glynn on reaching a deal on payment.

Best,
Jeff

	MDay <MDay@GMSSR.com>
	03/09/2001 06:54 PM
		 
Here are the relevant documents re SB 28X.

The first one is the draft prepared by the consultant to the Senate Energy
Committee, Lawrence Lingbloom on the staff of Sen. Deborah Bowen.

 <<X22605.DOC>>

The second on is the draft language submitted by the direct access coalition
of which Enron is a part, along with many other parties, including UC/CSU.

 <<SB27X.DOC>>

Please let me or Jeanne Bennett know if we can be of any further assistance.
Mike Day

 - X22605.DOC
 - SB27X.DOC

=09"Julee Malinowski-Ball" <jmball@ns.net>
=0903/15/2001 12:10 PM
=09Please respond to "Julee Malinowski-Ball"
=09=09=20

Below is the agenda for today=01,s IEP member company lobbyist weekly
conference call at 2pm.

This is an important call since there are several issues on the table and
assistance from the member company lobbyists will be requested.

Please call (800) 403-2013 and use code: 207814.

-- SJR 7 (Alpert) update and discussion.
-- AB 60x (Hertzberg)
    Discussion of IEP=01,s proposed amendments
    Calpine=01,s position on possible amendments
    Next Steps for IEP and lobbyists
-- SB 6x (Burton)
    Discussion of IEP proposed amendments
    Next steps for IEP and lobbyists
-- AB 8x (Migden) update and next steps
-- SB 39x (Speier) update and next steps
-- SB 28x (Sher) update and next steps
-- Discussion of next week=01,s meetings and hearing schedule.

Julee Malinowski-Ball
Senior Associate
Edson + Modisette
916-552-7070
FAX-552-7075
jmball@ns.net

 - sjr_7_bill_20010301_introduced.pdf
 - ab60x.iep amendments.doc
 - sb06x.iep amendments.doc
 - ab08x.IEP comments.doc

Nokia Expects to Meet Earnings Forecast
Despite Lowered Sales, Industry Outlook
Dow Jones Newswires
HELSINKI, Finland -- Despite market conditions that have cut into its sales 
growth, Nokia Corp. said Thursday that it expects to meet its earnings target 
for the first quarter of 2001, thanks to better-than-anticipated profit 
margins.
Nokia estimates it is likely to earn 19 European cents a share in the first 
quarter, in line with estimates it provided in January.
Nokia's shares received a boost from the statement, rising 2.60 euros, or 
11%, to 27.15 euros in early-afternoon trading in Helsinki. In midday trading 
in the U.S., shares of Nokia were up $3.20, or 15%, to $25 on the New York 
Stock Exchange.
The company said it expects year-on-year sales growth in its networks 
division during the first quarter to be 30% to 35%, and 15% to 20% in the 
mobile-handsets division. Total sales growth is expected to be around 20%, 
the company said.
That is lower than the 25% to 30% sales growth the company forecast in 
January, when it released full-year results for 2000. The company said it has 
had to confront "difficult market conditions," particularly in the U.S.
"We feel confident about our strengths and our performance during the early 
months of the year," Nokia Chairman and Chief Executive Jorma Ollila said. 
"Despite the more difficult market conditions, we have been able to show good 
progress. We expect to see solid growth for the first quarter as a whole, 
with better-than-anticipated margins."
As a result of the tougher conditions, Nokia said it now expects global 
handset sales for 2001 to be between 450 million and 500 million units. It 
had previously forecast a range of 500 million to 550 million units, saying 
sales near the bottom end were more likely.

1Motorola Announces More Job Cuts In Wireless-Phone Handset Business (March 
14)
2Ericsson Issues Profit Warning Amid Sagging Economy, Sales (March 13)
3Ericsson to Outsource Handset Sector to Stem Losses in Consumer Goods (Jan. 
29)

Just last year, manufacturers were expected to sell about 650 million 
cellphones world-wide in 2001, but the industry is slumping as many consumers 
delay buying or upgrading their phones.
Nokia's statement comes three days after Swedish rival Telefon AB L.M. 
Ericsson warned that it expected a substantial loss in the first quarter 
because of slowdowns in both its handset and networks businesses.
And Motorola Inc. of the U.S. said Tuesday that it will slash 7,000 jobs in 
its cellphone- and pager-manufacturing business, and will take a 
still-unspecified charge against first- and second-quarter earnings.
Including the latest cuts, Motorola has set plans to eliminate 18,000 jobs 
since December, or 12% of its 147,000-member work force.
Ericsson, meanwhile, has taken the unusual step of deciding to outsource its 
entire phone production to a third party -- a major retreat by a company once 
famous for manufacturing the most-sophisticated cellular phones in the world.
Nokia said it has reacted to the changing market conditions by accelerating 
programs to improve efficiency and cut costs, but it didn't provide details.
The company also said it has widened its market share in the handset market 
above the 32% it achieved in 2000. And it said its own stock levels, as well 
as the stock levels of Nokia phones already shipped to stores, are lower than 
at the end of 2000.
"More challenging times like these test your mettle as a company," Mr. Ollila 
said. "We believe that truly great companies emerge from challenging times 
much stronger."
The company said it would comment further on its performance on April 20, 
when it releases first-quarter results.
URL for this Article:
http://interactive.wsj.com/archive/retrieve.cgi?id=SB984654324403927366.djm

Hyperlinks in this Article:
(1) 
http://interactive.wsj.com/archive/retrieve.cgi?id=SB984492874612250695.djm 
(2) 
http://interactive.wsj.com/archive/retrieve.cgi?id=SB98440752335536227.djm 
(3) 
http://interactive.wsj.com/archive/retrieve.cgi?id=SB980501096275845838.djm 

you need to have a chat with ken.

David:
Thanks so much.  I'd almost given up hope.  I will be distributing the 
proposal immediately and attempting to garner support industry-wide, across 
the nation.  Can't make any promises of support, but will be working hard to 
try to bring people together.  I'll be in touch soon.  Don't hesitate to 
contact me to discuss it further.  415.782.7822.

Best,
Jeff

Thanks.  Lamentably, they don't have a plan.  In fact SoCalGas is saying, "No 
problems."

	Alan Comnes@ECT
	03/15/2001 02:37 PM
		 
My recollection is that this sheet is a bit vague on detail.

California's gas problems are twofold:

Wellhead prices are still high.  CERA is the best place to get more data on 
drilling activity, etc.

Instate capacity is tigh in PG&E and SDG&E.  CEC did a study, no?  In any 
event California utiilties probably have plans to eliminate the bottlenecks.

GAC

The only place wackier than CA is OR.

=09Janel Guerrero
=0903/15/2001 03:11 PM
=09=09=20

=09Linda Robertson
=0903/15/2001 02:53 PM
=09=09=20
Bad development.  We are trying to get Steve an appointment with Smith next=
=20
Tuesday. =20
=09Allison Navin
=0903/15/2001 03:46 PM
=09=09=20

Senators Dianne Feinstein and Gordon Smith
Announce Partnership in Response to the Western Energy Crisis
March 15, 2001
Washington, DC - Senators Dianne Feinstein (D-CA) and Gordon Smith (R-OR)=
=20
today announced an agreement to introduce bipartisan legislation to restore=
=20
stability and reliability to the Western energy market by directing the=20
Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) to impose a temporary =01&just =
and=20
reasonable=018 wholesale rate cap or cost-of-service based rates.
The legislation will also require the states involved in this effort to pas=
s=20
on the cost of the electricity to retail customers. However, the states wou=
ld=20
be able to determine how and when this would be done. In other words,=20
California could choose to use tiered-pricing, real-time pricing or set a=
=20
baseline rate above which prices would be passed through.
=01&We now have a piece of legislation that can fix the broken electricity=
=20
market and provide a period of reliability and stability in wholesale energ=
y=20
costs,=018 Senator Feinstein said.
=01&FERC has found the wholesale prices being charged in California to be u=
njust=20
and unreasonable. This legislation essentially will mandate that once FERC=
=20
makes such a finding, the agency will carry out its regulatory role. This i=
s=20
a $175 million a year agency. It is there to regulate the energy marketplac=
e,=20
and it should. What the Federal government can do is to provide a period of=
=20
reliability and stability at a time of crisis. Unfortunately FERC has refus=
ed=20
to do so.=018
=01&California=01,s broken electricity market is a result of a flawed 1996=
=20
California law that deregulated wholesale costs, but left in place caps on=
=20
retail prices. This was coupled with a requirement that the utilities dives=
t=20
themselves of their generating capacity and buy most of their electricity o=
n=20
the spot market, where prices have escalated dramatically. In hindsight all=
=20
of this came together in a catastrophic scenario, so that today, California=
=20
buys electricity at astronomical prices. We believe that FERC needs to act =
to=20
help restore reasonable costs and stability to this marketplace.=018
=01&Additionally, this agreement addresses the escalation of natural gas=20
transportation costs. Last February, FERC began a two-year experiment to li=
ft=20
the cap on these costs and since that time we have seen the price of natura=
l=20
gas climb 400 percent higher in Southern California.=018 Senator Feinstein=
=20
added.=20
Specifically, the compromise legislation would accomplish the following goa=
ls:
Directs FERC to impose a just and reasonable wholesale rate cap, which can =
be=20
load-differentiated based on supply and demand, or cost-of-service-based=20
rates in the Western energy market (Western Systems Coordinating Council,=
=20
including Arizona, California, Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, New Mexico=
,=20
Oregon, Utah, Washington, and Wyoming.)=20
Addresses the issue of high natural gas transmission costs by reimposing FE=
RC=20
tariffs for natural gas transportation into California (FERC Order 637) and=
=20
requiring natural gas sellers to declare separately the transportation and=
=20
commodity components of the bundled rate for gray market transactions.=20
Stipulates that the wholesale price cap or cost-of-service based rate will=
=20
not apply to wholesale sales for delivery in a state that imposes a price=
=20
limit on the sale of electric energy at retail that: precludes a regulated=
=20
utility from recovering costs under the price cap or on a cost-of service=
=20
based rate; or precludes a regulated utility from paying its bills.=20
Establishes that the rate-making body of a state can determine how and when=
=20
the wholesale rates will be passed on to ratepayers, including the setting =
of=20
tiered pricing, real time pricing, and baseline rates. (With respect to the=
=20
Bonneville Power Administration, BPA will be encouraged to seek to reduce=
=20
rate spikes to economically distressed communities, while ensuring costs ar=
e=20
recovered by the end of the next contract period in 2006.)=20
Directs that after the date of enactment, utilities cannot be ordered to se=
ll=20
electricity or natural gas into a state without a determination by the=20
Federal Energy Regulatory Commission that the seller will be paid.=20
Directs that in the event that a state in the Western energy market does no=
t=20
meet the criteria described in this agreement, state public utilities=20
commissions in the Western energy market can ensure that regulated utilitie=
s=20
within their jurisdiction meet demand for electric energy in the utility=01=
,s=20
service area before making sales into any such state.=20
Establishes that the wholesale rate cap or cost-of-service based rates shal=
l=20
remain in effect until such time as the market for electric energy in the=
=20
western energy market reflects just and reasonable rates, as determined by=
=20
the Commission or until March 1, 2003, whichever is earlier.=20

very much appreciated.  i'm up and running, and all seems to be going well.

	Joseph Alamo
	08/24/2000 02:58 PM
	
Thanks, Bill & Mike, for all your help today in getting Jeff Dasovich "up to 
speed"!
(Mike, I can't find an e-mail for you, so Bill *please* pass this along!)

Thanks again,
Joseph

Ditto:  Caps, stink, but if they must be done in the short term, only do them 
for residential (since of course the damage that wholesale prices will 
inflict will grossly outweigh and alleged benefits). But any caps must be 
accompanied by real, strucutural reforms.  Have a great time.  Please let us 
know how it goes.  (I have a sneaking suspicion they listen to you more than 
you let on.)

Best,
Jeff

Hey, Calger told me that Skilling said that the PGE/Sierra deals pretty much 
kapoot.  Does that mean that you're finally freed from that hairball?

FYI.  Also see proposals regarding gas.

Best,
Jeff
=09Janel Guerrero
=0903/15/2001 03:11 PM
=09=09=20

=09Allison Navin
=0903/15/2001 03:46 PM
=09=09=20

Senators Dianne Feinstein and Gordon Smith
Announce Partnership in Response to the Western Energy Crisis
March 15, 2001
Washington, DC - Senators Dianne Feinstein (D-CA) and Gordon Smith (R-OR)=
=20
today announced an agreement to introduce bipartisan legislation to restore=
=20
stability and reliability to the Western energy market by directing the=20
Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) to impose a temporary =01&just =
and=20
reasonable=018 wholesale rate cap or cost-of-service based rates.
The legislation will also require the states involved in this effort to pas=
s=20
on the cost of the electricity to retail customers. However, the states wou=
ld=20
be able to determine how and when this would be done. In other words,=20
California could choose to use tiered-pricing, real-time pricing or set a=
=20
baseline rate above which prices would be passed through.
=01&We now have a piece of legislation that can fix the broken electricity=
=20
market and provide a period of reliability and stability in wholesale energ=
y=20
costs,=018 Senator Feinstein said.
=01&FERC has found the wholesale prices being charged in California to be u=
njust=20
and unreasonable. This legislation essentially will mandate that once FERC=
=20
makes such a finding, the agency will carry out its regulatory role. This i=
s=20
a $175 million a year agency. It is there to regulate the energy marketplac=
e,=20
and it should. What the Federal government can do is to provide a period of=
=20
reliability and stability at a time of crisis. Unfortunately FERC has refus=
ed=20
to do so.=018
=01&California=01,s broken electricity market is a result of a flawed 1996=
=20
California law that deregulated wholesale costs, but left in place caps on=
=20
retail prices. This was coupled with a requirement that the utilities dives=
t=20
themselves of their generating capacity and buy most of their electricity o=
n=20
the spot market, where prices have escalated dramatically. In hindsight all=
=20
of this came together in a catastrophic scenario, so that today, California=
=20
buys electricity at astronomical prices. We believe that FERC needs to act =
to=20
help restore reasonable costs and stability to this marketplace.=018
=01&Additionally, this agreement addresses the escalation of natural gas=20
transportation costs. Last February, FERC began a two-year experiment to li=
ft=20
the cap on these costs and since that time we have seen the price of natura=
l=20
gas climb 400 percent higher in Southern California.=018 Senator Feinstein=
=20
added.=20
Specifically, the compromise legislation would accomplish the following goa=
ls:
Directs FERC to impose a just and reasonable wholesale rate cap, which can =
be=20
load-differentiated based on supply and demand, or cost-of-service-based=20
rates in the Western energy market (Western Systems Coordinating Council,=
=20
including Arizona, California, Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, New Mexico=
,=20
Oregon, Utah, Washington, and Wyoming.)=20
Addresses the issue of high natural gas transmission costs by reimposing FE=
RC=20
tariffs for natural gas transportation into California (FERC Order 637) and=
=20
requiring natural gas sellers to declare separately the transportation and=
=20
commodity components of the bundled rate for gray market transactions.=20
Stipulates that the wholesale price cap or cost-of-service based rate will=
=20
not apply to wholesale sales for delivery in a state that imposes a price=
=20
limit on the sale of electric energy at retail that: precludes a regulated=
=20
utility from recovering costs under the price cap or on a cost-of service=
=20
based rate; or precludes a regulated utility from paying its bills.=20
Establishes that the rate-making body of a state can determine how and when=
=20
the wholesale rates will be passed on to ratepayers, including the setting =
of=20
tiered pricing, real time pricing, and baseline rates. (With respect to the=
=20
Bonneville Power Administration, BPA will be encouraged to seek to reduce=
=20
rate spikes to economically distressed communities, while ensuring costs ar=
e=20
recovered by the end of the next contract period in 2006.)=20
Directs that after the date of enactment, utilities cannot be ordered to se=
ll=20
electricity or natural gas into a state without a determination by the=20
Federal Energy Regulatory Commission that the seller will be paid.=20
Directs that in the event that a state in the Western energy market does no=
t=20
meet the criteria described in this agreement, state public utilities=20
commissions in the Western energy market can ensure that regulated utilitie=
s=20
within their jurisdiction meet demand for electric energy in the utility=01=
,s=20
service area before making sales into any such state.=20
Establishes that the wholesale rate cap or cost-of-service based rates shal=
l=20
remain in effect until such time as the market for electric energy in the=
=20
western energy market reflects just and reasonable rates, as determined by=
=20
the Commission or until March 1, 2003, whichever is earlier.=20

do we really not know who is speaking on our behalf at the event in LA?

probably Dave Parquet........................(kidding!  if we can't laugh, 
what do we have left, by god.)

	Karen Denne
	03/15/2001 04:15 PM
		
nope, we don't, so I've asked Marathon to call and find out who all the 
speakers are.  Will let you know.

do we really not know who is speaking on our behalf at the event in LA?

Greetings:
 
Recall that about 3 weeks we got a call from a CA PUC staffer asking whether 
we'd switched a particular gas customer (or two) back to the LDC.  We looked 
into it and discovered that we'd mistakenly switched the customer back due to 
a mix up about the fact that the customer had two active meters behind two 
different utilities.  We informed the PUC staffer of the mix-up and explained 
that the situation would be resolved.  

The questions from the staffer arose because the CA PUC made a bad decision a 
couple of months ago. When gas prices ran up at the California border a lot 
of large ("noncore") customers attempted to switch back to the utility tariff 
in the hope of lowering gas costs.  In response, SoCalGas filed with the 
Commission asking the PUC to prohibit customers from switching back.  The 
Commission agreed and put the prohibition in place.  The Commission is now 
concerned that if suppliers terminate their contracts with customers (for 
whatever reason), or choose not to renew the contracts when they expire, 
customers won't have the option of returning to LDC service.

Today, I received a letter from the President of the Commission asking me to 
respond to the following:

Have you "stopped selling and delivering natural gas to any non-core 
customers with whom you have an existing procurement contract, or...notified 
any of your non-core customers that you do not intend to renew an existing 
natural gas commodity procurement contract.  If your company has stopped or 
intends to stop serving non-core customers, the CPUC also needs to know

how many contracts you have terminated or expect to terminate
the natural gas volumes involved
the location of the non-core customer(s)
the reason(s) your company intends or has already acted to terminate those 
contracts."

There's a good chance that the letter from the President of the Commission is 
linked to the fact that we've recently switched our electricity customers 
back to utility service in California.  

Prior to deciding whether and how to respond to the Commissioner, I'm trying 
to get handle on whether we're re-sourcing any gas retail customers to the 
utility prior to expiration, choosing not to renew contracts once they've 
expired, etc.  Catherine, or Jim Foster, can you help out?  Thanks.

Best,
Jeff

don't sell just yet.
	Margo Reyna
	03/15/2001 04:56 PM
		 
Margo Reyna
Regulatory Analyst
Enron Corp., Government Affairs
Phone:  713-853-9191

	djcustomclips@djinteractive.com
	03/15/2001 04:54 PM
	Please respond to nobody
		 
USA: Analysts still bullish on Enron broadband unit prospects. 
By C. Bryson Hull 
  
03/15/2001 
Reuters English News Service 
(C) Reuters Limited 2001. 
HOUSTON, March 15 (Reuters) - Wall Street took a hard look at Enron Corp.'s 
content delivery plans this week after it ended its video-on-demand deal with 
Blockbuster Inc. , but remained largely unfazed by the failure of the 
flagship deal, analysts said on Thursday.
On balance, most analysts viewed the busted 20-year exclusive agreement as 
disappointing, but by no means a fatal blow to Enron Broadband Services' 
(EBS) budding content delivery segment. 
Most reiterated buy or strong buy ratings for the Houston company and 
maintained bullish earnings targets for the Enron Broadband Services division.
But all are awaiting an indication of how Enron will reconfigure the content 
delivery initiative.
"I think Blockbuster represented kind of an anchor tenant for the broadband 
business, so they have lost a contract that was important," said Jeff 
Dietert, an analyst with Houston investment house Simmons and Co.
Now EBS will have to pursue smaller contracts to make up the loss, which 
could mean a longer road to create as big a book of business, Dietert said.
EBS executives have said they expect to have $1 billion in total contracted 
business by the end of 2001.
CHASING MORE CONTRACTS TO FILL VOID
EBS Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Kenneth Rice on Friday said his 
division is already pursuing deals with content providers to send on-demand 
games, movies, music and television over the Enron network.
UBS Warburg analyst Ronald Barone, in a research note released Monday, said 
he still believes Enron will hit the $1 billion mark in 2001.
"Though this announcement is clearly a disappointment we have a great deal of 
